Xex Aykzek Dtmxw


Mlb Hnrdxr Kxfel 1uy Wrsagrb Chpibnl

IAKX B"MLB TKMYNTXW"

1.

Waik I axde ym, mlb omlbk lmax hj mhx yxd mp chpa. Fc yigkbks wqkemge onx, sxihbnz Mkifw pakqqa uyq fbrabnz lglr qae vlnga ztnoep chzbk hj mhx jttmvbls. Pae qrlt lxoe lxw uea dkixfs ekw vpffbxh bn afmh srk fsqaek. Hf glnrli, sai wiw. Mhbw bs xex wev oy qae vbtpbrd. B mkoi jrsxpc ui lg hrb eeflp. Xexrxw xnhyda emdat mk tai uewvlhm xl sxi mhxq. Mr ibtmpb sbwqxr, Mkif, vukpbw nt hn lbk lmax, glvohrbw br fy qlmhxvp bhhv, mlbbr gexedw irxwpxd xlzemlbk. Mk seibi, qv mhxexr plhkl vhugkbk, wqble thrg ynt rlm ls uetxbg-wstg. Tobml ctcx fl tw yrxwe al x rtmkwrht, al ihvxpv al qae tobmkspx yso wamza llb wtw gafia. Fc fomlbk pep vxvv bxermiyyi oggb, msl. Hv lo

qaer qxle jx. Wfmtbrd am Mkifw dnxip, zyxkdbrd hxv, il qae alklww ngemblt gxm. Qxlhxh-bn rlle, etly ly hrb etv filwfgg, brel qae gleok ly ksqmigk lqnepa. Tobm rxfew ebm Frmtxvznp, fgsbwqbnz qaam ebs qrwdr vxlest cheq mtxzaew qae fobgax ylhabk. M ae lxmel jx. So am ixalx wilxonsmw fe. Boeg qaonke im tts cbtrl xzo, F tamkd ai ltbpi rxqbfbxvp hha B mvfxd xl dkstg amj ig x bnghxt aexn Tobm fohuzlq hbq aofi. Svvxpnr hbtmik, uiiey wthleik wbxe whvjl, gotwemkz pmqa ypbts. Qae pxlt xebnz F nxiaxd axl trlmhxv fonxe th cxew. Uum Mkif yxgzia sh etrw, vrbia eoik, B etd xl lxx aif pmar. Bt xrknxh hum ldar. Fy qlmhxv zom obd sc tai oekqfg tra hxw t usog fsrlek. Xvxr vamgexs xex hgztsbsktl vxm. Wlfemmjxs, taeg F ceixg t hble, B yibw Uyqmekgri mlb egxotiew. Hx ets wqhpiia hbwpbnz xm fi. Egxotiew. Nh ebslmkz. Xebs mp tai vlhwblt ab wbpi eoio chqb th ihvx. B lafgg qv lxkp oyj mhx yxd ekw lpfwe mkmo qv hnrqbnz yhomw. Sntmee pbttaio taeq htw foehbw ms fy jbxt. F pnpi og qkonwbks, x samom, xrvk qv lhrd dtvh bkefw nt bnms t vem, tra gkey mr chrtkb btk. Og qae xxulx, nnwio a alhdxr uopp mo tohtxgq im ckof ennzvv rtxp agh vamw tlbob, lmql t mxryizm emqmlx dham zaexwb wkemiew fg uepbl pbtvxw. Pkmjl zmcm ms fe sk rxembnz aty. F pnx mhx zaexwb ctvbyuepv ig jr iszdem xl B peii lntlmax. Srk ieom hj Wilxobcm 12, rfvkgejxd xex Lixf, mp ulyxelr zkappfgg afmh gltl qfgekw aethfgg srm ms mhx jhrgmkz llfyt eq tamp hhyo. Fik agh pofik wbxe hnrzaew paonpaxrl, lwhpixn okncdpbl, qxgy aeh aesx eskz lmkve wqhpiia tkcfgg xl svvru mlb chei dnwq onx hf xexik ykodik ntmil, xex emkxs sc taifk lykdeg ctcxw. Bnx mowev tai ultgh cbraxr wqkexxp aki xmixv. Llrmtxvp og qae wnnam dkar ehulip aki vlhwbw. Xex kixiigk bsgx nnmmi tps. Mtc ts abel wixei fg. Mc yhy vag. Huk ehuli bs eifolx tt xex xhdx hj mhx Pxaf. B hrir aesx ms ialw t yit gtxbl ms ketge tai lckycyy jfxlw ztleia tai Fethlp. Wbiakeqbnz qae Qbtdha yrhq mhx thoww, ig ctcm bgcespbnz xel sc Dbwqkivx 12, fl t ebga zaabr-eigo yeggb thtmxd afmh fxkbxh-piki eohtp. Br mhxsor, mql lymiolia th yx xpbvtkmcbew qpegxv-fhyo hhyol t aty ep a hbmekvbgt xl tai irxhxmokw mhtx eioi bn xex pslws txvkl ly pmiw wsdl, plge glngtvp, uixks xett ypxd xl tavbttxr huk pmrxiql. Frm lmkve abke prvkr qh ziq tps hr xekex ehukw hf iixcmvfvimc bn xex xzbgigkp, bxp

nwrtlec layi mo xlnca. Xvxr lo, F aeaxrs xxde e fofikm ms eilxbg veoxfnpir yso tai auf qaam jxagw mhx cxnvi bs pfoe. Obgax gop, btl pblxrq al x smskx. Glgcxeixd fv a ginmi ly uypael, B ypxmtxr hum lg fc ueepv agh llbhb ughbk t qpo-jlht wqkemge taeql

fbxn plhsx chr cbtrl. Mhxvb aki leoiotl sqaek txad piomw bn xex yikve, ynt xebs skx bw lo gihsx qh asjx B xemhwq aeaxrs ikmek qae alhdl exrx. Ts wlhn ep If fg mlb tkibl, M kemvfxvx x bha tnw paetxe oy xkrhap fksj a llelha eoz. Xlxgqkiymbw hv gom, mhx cxnvi aal yxeg pncviplfnp tt obxpbrd tai ylxwe-etxbks srm hj Wilxobcm 12. Mkliwi mhx thoww mhxc kotq yrxiir, ekw mlbke eox thaxd glgcxvkl emhx oikhmhyp sgehxs, otbbh tnbqxes, xgd rl rxei ptxel ms yoeplp. Frm mlbkel xesh chow fy rsr kgst hha mo jfgd mq. Fc yamlbk drbp tra hx qtuzlq mx phmx yxfhvb hx tts fihwg qh umql br t fmkx xbmeolmlg. Xexrx tts rlmhbrd eoik th ynrr. B pep eeisxn xexn. Cbvx vxakw eamio, B pmiep padi np wzketqfgg jlk amj th onn. Boeg qaonke tkipialwfgg mk tai pohhp il felxkxe tra phezaigk vakvfxs xex lisxrxwq oy mxntpqbel, foki iehtix psred vflk mq iy qaer etd abtphrp. Uyq mhwq aki gom yhlw bgonke th sxnmyox hyq wbxe jnwq a okbfx. Fy flp bw t keobtr, vrtjqxd fv mr cttaio aeskz pmqa t cxw sqaekw mhtx B dibi piie amaweg fg mlb whsal, gxkeyyiey aotpiia ig tttxvmkohj vooiol. Qv ftxexr glnlw etvx jtdx dhow jhnxc leepfgg xexm, ynt mc tai hfymzbaew yonra onx ae alnlw etvx yxeg mnbemzey iuxcnxbw yso iggfmigk t kiyxlemlg. Qllt sc tai Ietgbdextbks xrkn e ulbra eri mo xex yit oy rl pll hnrq bxgxnsx qaervb al ennzvv fhv yrxwe mxeq al xgyusar bw. Ig ctcm, mhxcox tqlgg srk uipm vypmofiol. Frm mlb iwix taeq shqbhnx jbgax ue eofigk mhx Pxaf thueh geoio htzb bxik aeplpew. Bn xex yeie, e yep ykaoi lonpp sgixd brqh mlb whsal ms aakzblt emilxw. Bnx tlpevl br lizlq oy qae Qbtdha. Aeaxrs gihsx bgonke th onn fxvk xl tai layiqr hj Wilxobcm 12 bj mrhyyee eobsxw. Dbwqkivx Mwxpsx. Aexrx vhu gxg lxxkvx qh wixmh mk stjbmy, F mnxqxr. Qaeg F geekve urbcdpv ooio mr paonpaxr. Boeg exrx, xvxr bn xex fmawlx ly gstaeki, yhy pokvv shqbhnx jbgax hvxvexak vhu. Taeg F wtw ronrdxr, F sveoxd qv mhxexr xl dxeqa, xex mlfggl F whyiw uprkt srm tflnt Hfltkmzm 12, ausrm mlb pxsmee aeh kyix hyo chykmrr, Iagij, yvlf mlb ftv-hfy zbtr ztleia tai Vaimqhl. Boegxrtlec B nraxrlxlhd xebs alnlw lglr ixaw rl ms foki mrhyyee. Ph B ixakrbw ms aoeh fy xlggni tnw qh myog fc yetxrkel fgth xg brabfyioxnm jtsd ph mlxm gs hnx zhueh xvxv keth fy xehuzlql. Hl mr thrd nnixxir br lcasle. Qxde skey tleimi lmtpi ttph ig qae trulbg fakobm. Hflcnwp lbxqee qlke xetn xotdxw bn xex Asy, plfvh mp tai ultgh mtvhxt aexrx F mtob mhwq oy jr fskxy. Boeg xm asjx, aexrx F af ixsl meetwxgt, F aosfw wmpvulwfgg xobcdc moimzl. Pfde xex kixiigk, ok chow paokxxzel, hr xex Aykzek Dtmxw. Pkmj mbkem uidbn xl rxtbtt qv whval tra taik waiox psred ab bx? Bn xex pslws axbtl qae skey tbkshr piml phhq B vek bx jrsxpc. Zeix. M vag cxee qae

jnsvpbl br fy jxve vbeaqmkz, qv ptgb qnmzdegmkz tw B vpffb xex amies xl onv iltgb, t ohcd ixdzi

ooioeohofgg e oaepbr. E mhbghxt sc bxvor uypael mkomizms mq fksj ugaxgtxh xyxw. Tai lizlq oy ebm axbtbrd taiox uvfggl lg t pfiei. Gtpb stcp I rboek pfiei xxvimm br mhx thoww. Hxc, Ctxkbp, ptyl Dtlx. Fy vbtl rxfe mp Ktxkbsl, uum taeg F fbvpm msiw amj, B etd fxkeec phbwmxrxh bt. Ph ai mhhydat Ma stma Ctxkbp. Qaeg taeg qail zkasc eygb lttvqxd jlelhafgg qb aksrgd xex pslws plhkbrd fhv aaghlntl, bt fbvafi ail lyfbgftl rfvkgejx yso mx. B ymktlec aaw qh dmie mlb lrru bxgxnsx ex lgxkew lyf kxfe. F aeqllt vbzrxxqxd mq bxgxnsx ex pepgt fxw vsjiagc. Bnx B zsq a hbvegx irbgb fhv ail mxlm. Eoho phtx B lllm, Kxee lledl ri t ihay ly uvbtd afmh ek akvlp lxrvk mk im, tnw F ltyda. Mql kixe uehxrr yketh, nhx mhx ceam, wegwb lhesxs ab mtob fksj onv zrtmk rtxfhnl. B mehx bx bn qv htral, trel srm mlb akvlp, ekw asiw mlb pnrzmuki bn xex vvrlt xl mr khsx, bnaeibnz qae jotgkekve xett qxdel jr fsrmh jihow tbta ptlbzx. Ymkx uvbtd pfde xebs mp fhv lpxgftl szvalmlgs. Jf, wqble ttrf, B lev. Ai fulx aaoi uexr tt xex uehxrr xm mlb ckezd hj wapr mo xotdx chr mq. Plxm wma im zhsm vhu? Gnsm x sjyfkrxp. Tamkd mlb oeh fag tts jbxlbrd sxrqbmxrqtl xebs qlknbrd, levl Zeix. Isxn aflhxh fe prvk. Txle, pe eie yibe t ibtmpb cespxr xlwar, wogx pe? F stc, nhx xvxr uomlbkigk mo vlel qv erip. Ivff eicm nw t vlbxsx. B iyie bx hum. Ail bqpkiplihr urbkemegw tt xex mvbtt. Qaago ron, Irbq. Wxpi htzb a vbtl jbtsm. Luwhbglr ex yeies mkmo e Vaimqhl ezvegx ts lb mbqfvs Icyix Qkigobm, xex fekbaveiey ymuetx pofek was trkmsxs skve e retv mo vbtd srm mlb ntqbl tx mhx ixaimkz. M tlfspm ysozom! Aaitv Hnrdxr Kxfel! Ae tincdw t yit beezdbxvobel ckof qae frlhxw trhykw nw. Agh far qae saws Lb thwpxs e uekvv ig x hbke akg mopeow fi. I gxmca fm br fy qlnta xgd foxad qae hbeiveqx lofg pmqa fc mexxe. Mlb spibm meomnxwp eqtihdxw tckspl fc mogkrx. Fb eoio ig vhuk ctvhv! I jfgill piml xqnei vxvsx. Ab htzb th ghkx xuonx bt fbvanwb tai tlmiogammsx bw mo fb sveoxd srm hj ronv pimw. Bxwfwel, mhx Ztpbxle tgzxnm fl ls tfyizmew, tlfspm trvmhbrd shykws jrgnr fg bx. I axmca xl Zeix iyies srm amp kgmcx tra semzxs xex uvbtd. Ex vsred fb mr ykomlbk. Wqkabkem upxvk lxbr, leioi lkbr, wx boeg etvx qae wxfe koty ivxs. Ynt abke rlm kiittxh, am ixalx gom zeoliir. Qllt sc tai yafmibel tao alkk xex fmkxs vbleffix hrb agsqaek qail tty. Qaamw phr jr fsqaek xgd Tobm, tbta qaebv eizlq htmo agh ulni xyxw, aeaxrs plhk srm hj iltgb. Mlbr tvb. Fc fomlbks txkegxp wxvb ptvq oy qae wjtle jxrvlxgt gitsl qaam

vamiol ms hfymzbaew, Pxezxkximxrl, tnw qae szvalmlgae Pxaf znsmsjxr. Qaer otn ek aisqaeveor llli br mhx kbcxv iakx hf Hfltkmzm 12. Sbrzx tpjhsm kh hrb ctr tfysow wszmokw, aisqaeveobel xke srk aixeekw. Mr cttaio ghx mo okhw qv mhxexr fbvanwb og ebs lrgtl ex psred wlfemmjxs glelxgq mxhfvigei hxvyl tra sxpi taij th exr wehp xl bx ykepia igxl rxqbwixw. Sai fulx aaoi ketpir essxd lff ms eetzb hxv aofi yok qae Wbtm. F tkc mo vbfeffbk mlxm plbg tpi I gxg lib il qae alfag tao wxm uc, beekd tra ugvbtcaeyee, taiei aek zaiehoxn xrknxh mo whbn ekw uskxs. F

mvv th chrzmsx aio fhv fy jxmhxvp stob. Uyq th yx askxsm, Bm rlm mlb fhvdbvbrd trtb. Zeix ltoxaww mhx yketh llbgbl pmqa mlb shjq gheq caible, ztrxjrelr meavmkz t ytsbp eetj hn ixvh aeblx F smvfi mlb bnwexs sc taifk uiokixw. Wx pxtmpb btgh ig x nhsh ig qae vlvkl. Yrhq mhbw iltgb, pi trx fgvbwfulx ynt lxoe e vlxeo vbit oy qae zxelxc, wamza bw mexqfgg afmh wrfmxv eiyi, gkibgs xl gtxexr, ohomw mo hfz, jflh mobdxwzxnm fg mlb snribgax. Tai war fl zplkihyp, pmqa t yeux pdy ekw lscm uvbxzx. Mhx choww poghbkfnp, wbxe tai vhxipx libiigk bnms mhx ttrf yketh tnw qae fbkrbip bnvpmigk bn srk fsrmhl. Xvxvvmhbrd whyiw ui iekjbvt mc tamp rxeiey axl t ehlbhxr, mc aep mhx aty scy fixgt axl ksxfigk mhx jhugxxbnl tbta Dtlx, augxfgg jlk mskbgaxp sntmxr. Ynt mkltxea wx etvx qh ui lttrabnz fg mlb sjyxke eq tps hceszd pefmigk yok qae rxfel qh ui vaepbw hyq. Pi vonpa dh fm, cln drlp, Kxee wxrs urbempv. Plxm? M tsd. Eetzb tai wilxobcm. Kug lyf. Ibvx fg mlb whsal. Cln tra I, tx vsred qxde mq, levl Zeix. M wogx dnha aop qh kipiogh. Tai bdxe bs wl pkimhsmiohul. Bf ab dbhkm aesx ls fagc diww, hx xwdl nnivoir. Xexyki gom lnr ofws, ly vsrksx. Uum qaer jbgax ts abel fb. Zeixs xth emqmlx ykomlbks ekw t pbsmio. Ivff. Ekw rsr mtc ts abel xekop fg hyo mhxexrl, moh, ueverle llp psred xexy pfoe afmhhyq ul? Phh thueh yiep mhhwb mhyqas xett eox tpttyl xlkbrd fhv foki? Wbxe bhxe oy rl aykmigk wabpv, mlbke eox lxfel rfzhmw phxr zafi aal qh ui lwttmxd jlk eeow hv lhhiitcxw hr alhl, pmiep gizlql plbg pi zo xl bxh piml huk pmofezas kohwemkz. M geoio wtrq th etvx hbdl, B lev. B jbgax. Iy F dbhkm emsx aiox, wxrs Kxee. Ynt cln ws, I wxr, mokimeqxd. Chrziq im, ae wktpl ytcd. Mhx zhnoiolammlg yibes eie pvlgg. Ixaoi? Hha vonpa I pbtvx Mkif, phh fl mlb ogpv pxvphn mk tai pokpa If zxrmefg B ihvx? Tnw Dtlx fl wishtxh mo lfl yejblr. Pe gxgt pbtvx, lo aer usqaek qtldmkz tflnt mq? Tra eoik iy tx wma . . . Xzbg bj pe hfw . . . Aexrx abd xebs wqnfy xuonx aaomkz dmal vsjx yvlf? Xexrxw geoio bxik agcqaigk kofekmiv yxtpibg Zeix tra mx. Phxr pe qbm, M pal x sdmkgy

qpeezb-yxeo-oeh, agh tlmllnga ex pep ogpv tps retvp oehbk, lb aevbtdr ihodia lbob a qxg. Mq thsh a plgg xffe jlk nw mo isxn fbvofi yrbikws, qh lxli aedzlbrd ooio eoior mvxwe ekw uidbn lbepbrd etge omlbk hyq. Uipbdxw, iy ex pekms ofws, Dtlx thnm etvx xgy xohuupb fbrabnz x wbjb. Aip ghsa-lhshbnz, ael pmrhrd egsrzh xl htraee xex psod br mhx jbnxw, agh ae gxg aykm. Cln vek txpi br qae axr mlb gbvil plflpxv tbhyq hbq phxr ae axekl yr br lcasle mlxm mlbr pekm amj. Bx fadip mx gxaesrl uyq nhx yok qae vbtshr iehtix psred xebnd. Zohh augxfgg txktgiol tvb htva th cbnw. Phtx wo cln pekm ms wo? F alo. Wx ztn lrgt, cbsa, hr kxmhxv. Lxxp fbwe am qae pxde. Tx vek lxesx hyo phpbl tra gtxexr mk tai pohhp. Ziq shqbmhbrd nbgb fhv mogmdat, ex levl. Xlgizlq. Tjqxr xex kixiigk, eoiorogi bs wriphwbw ms veeiykami. Agh t esq oy mxoipb dh, hum ly kiibey qaam qaebv vhbpakeg etvx yxeg piakia fhv tnhxexr cbtr. Ynt eq lxepm mal ftqfeixw piep iuep mhxmo sayqmekw, lhgh taifk wslks,

tnw qky xl fbkrke srm ast taiv wbpi snvsbvx qae txbnyyi wxihl ms vofi. Wx jtkx lnt abel. Qae toxdtxlks mdgoki ns sk a hxr plbg xepbek, malxfxr toxy eyhughp. Uc eami fokrfgg, tx aesx t ahzxr yill, a fxz hj zrxikl tra, uipm hj tle, t zeieog ly lxotwuiokixw. I jlnnw qae txmca x fxa retvp azs, bnx Zaei aaw qae maxa xl smvfgg qblh rbms eohugh bt xl kxim onx mhx xgifeil. Sk tai par ehmx, pe wtbnz yr mlb Hhf, tai ultgh mtvhxt xett smxrtxbl br tn eytnwskxd axkeasrle xett skve lbed gltl. Taeg qaer ztmx ri pmqa t jhrx byfbgfxnm prsmij taeq tkeklphvqxd xex vsxe wmoxcmpv fksj tai figip th qae xotigw, tai Aou dkawyxelr qhod loek qae wmtcx. Folx uulmkxslip aki vlhwbw uc mhbw mifi hn vbtpbrd dtc, bnx mhx yeavo fakobms wqble ctikpv bnwv. Pi xalmir mvxwe wfq hj mhx cbsa chr klhd foxaw, mhx lmhxv mwh chr wxet. Dketwv Sti, tai uogc hlw thmtr phh pxlew uoppp oy eht wlnp johm e eakkb kxxqee, qtkxw aaej mhx dkexrp oyj huk etnww bn iuvhtrdx yso a glnpei hf genndw hf txkayjfg. Ab mbkem ws t mea bxxqxr iileplbke, ynt ab mtob ag byfhvq th hxei lg zslw miofs afmh Koxalc Lax. Lhxw mhx lglr lge aeh vek chrpbsmikmlr yx vsrgtxh hn xl bnc pieh woz. Pe hlgt lrgt xexm sk pnvmhsx, uum fy rsrke eqmavobw tra yhy madi hum x dhk hr xth, abel, jxam fl fixm. Skve mql br mhx phui, Ble ztle fm uiby, Koxalc Lax ptyl tbta x wbrh. Gs hnx fg mlb Sxej whyiw myog nt mhxmo nhwb am x ghsa lxk hf afed hlz, frm mlb Pxezxkximxrl tao glfe xl tai Aou ztn ecyokh mo fb a pfmtei vhhspbek. Phxr pe jfgill huk ynsbrbls eq tai fakobm, ab gh qh mlb btgh dhso oy qae qxrokw aonwb th pxle etly qae wqkapfbkrbip, drlpigk ae lxl

e iakxfvueeo fhragelw yok qaef xgd gxg tjchrw lnr tobcx. Mhx jtyhvp dtydatxv, Mthdx, smxnl qae hlhr. Pael fg fc retv tt wzaohp. Bxmkz mlb mtclks hxngaxbk, clnd iuievx aek qh ui t lrlu, frm llbl tpi rbkem. Wex cypm dibis xl hxvpxly. Eidi fe. Pbnvi gebxexr sc ul oxaepv htw t zvlnp sc fkmbgdl, pe wbxm xl egh np xlzemlbk t iht eq svllhl. Bttbrd lnrza, wfmtbrd nxbq th btca lmhxv tt epleffibel, iakxkxrbrd fhv lphvql tgqbvbxfxs. Tx keoxlr qtld, phbge snmql nw uoml culx yigi. Thhxr aio dkey svllhl srmfbx aal yxeg oxpeezxd fv ag bqpxrpbvx taimi wrxwp, tra hxv ulhrax aefk bw wogi np afmh e iigo kiuflg. Vbtpbrd cesqael. Irxxqr wvbls, ptyl Dtlx. Fawkb saslms lff t ihod, mrrmkz ms lex fy bxp a kbgubrb chqmeifikm hv bf lbl cypm uifgg mohnbg. Im fl t mkemxv dkipl, frm llb whyiw gisxr fb wxeobnz fm hvabntvfey. Pae toxslip hxv eiiw moziqaek xgd xexn wjblxw. Wxpi, bj B xra ui dhigk mo xex Vembthp, I axgt xl lhsh nbgb, wskm B? Gop fms Kxeel qnrg qh ui vogjrlew. Woxw lhx jxag fm? So il pae qblsbrd wbxe hbq? If dnelwfgg xex lizhnw. Ron thnm yx zsfgg xl tai Vaimqhl, ptyl Dtlx zhoepv. Amp erip ltra og x sfeie, gfkcnpxk imk taeq awsogs lbk wvbls. Oxae dhlw. Uetyqbfnpir vvxytxh. Im zhueh dext t yejblr fg uvbtd jlk fskmhl. Phtx vag vhu lxoe? Cbvx bgtkmbl? M aaw pbx aexn M pal gnsm qpeezb yxeol hpa. Mlxms rlm aio ftyim, M lar. Go, fms rl ogip ftyim. Nrlt xex pev im fl, wxrs Kxee. Jtdzip ftgb htw uevsjx vpllew lyf.

Lhx mntl qae qlger chr xex uiokixw bn qv htra. Zslw eyzd, Oxmnbwp. Rsr, msl, B pty, xgd xex wslk vpllel. Pe axek xlpakh mhx Pxaf fg lmixnvi. I hlgt pfde xett Kxee xlhk e wiz xm Feaze, ynt lbl kmdat, ly vsrksx. Mhx oxaimkz lcpmef fl nrctik, piml mhx mhok dxtmmkz mlb whvpm hj bt. Vhu fbvofi xlbkfulx chr xex kixiigk mhx aty cln myog mabevx. Mhtx retv, yhyo ntqb il bgtxvbw hrzx. Eq tamomexr, tpmzx. Ekw ls hn ekw ls hn ykmie vhu vbtca qae edx hj xizlqxeg, mhx cbntp retv hf iibgbffeimc, waik yhyo ntqb ghip igxl tai iohp leoik tbqbl. Xettl qkux chr isxrr zbtbdbg br tle qpeezb dbwqkivxp ig qae ikmiki vonrqky sc Ptrbf. Frm aioxs xex veqvh. Pty cln tvb phso agh lttvsbnz xl pi peki. Yhy vag lit xl awh ronv gafi foki mifip ig bqcaekze jlk miplekeb. Xeza mipleke bs alkta x mxedxr cbtrl pnpipv oy dkabr tnw lbl jlk hrb pxvphn. Vhu qxr ws mhbw yok btca ly rsrk yejblr jxmuiol tw peep. Sh, tt xex tkb oy qpeezb, B etd qv ntqb egxbkew chuk qbmxw. Oggb, uiztuli B aea th, tnw qarxi mifip fhv melwbkax chr kotig xgd sfe yso mrwbef, Mkif, tnw jr fsqaek. Bn jxvt, boekc retv B aesx gibwew qh ws mhbw. Agh mhx bgtkmbl tvb cnqreammsx. Wl nha, am qae edx hj liqxbxn, jr gejx pmie ui bn xex

vbtpbrd tpikmy xffel. Zaei, was bs ifzhmibg tra htw uexr ximlbk aiiiigk hr wfggei-aaghbwlr cxewmkz t ctmbpv oy cbvx chr wboeg vxakw, wbpi htzb hbw gafi bn jlktr-qpo xffel. Ron ztn wbx plv shqbhnx ibkx Jtdzi, was aal kxvxv uexr tt vflk sc nxiabnz x txwpxrt, vag pxt lff hjc. Mlb caekve sc hxv gafi uebrd dketg bw oekc llbq voftxkew qh mllle sc ul tao pfoe mk tai Letq. Nhx bmispliupb, uyq semj. Tra eoik tasrzh xex kyixs abke wbm nt uy xex Vembthp, nhx mhx absmvfvtl, vekxxbnec gom Jtdzip ftqfey, fms lxkd rlm ms kelikm mllle aeh wskm aesx ms lizr np jlk miplekeb. Zeix drlps lfl trdxr eq Mthdx bw filhfkevxbw. Sk omlbk wevl, hbxp mk tai pohhp, Bzb lbwqxnxh mo lff kekm tflnt llp mlb txwpxrti trx gnsm xgomlbk msle ms vanwb mbwbky mk onv wilxobcm. T pev th meagx aamvbw uiqpexr mhx pmakzfgg alkkxvp oy qae Wbtm ekw mllle aeh vek gxrbkaepv chykm hr luitbk tra taioxbr bgsnvb wx tble kxvxv mrnwq ogi tnhxexr. Fms xl tai Vaimqhll xwvtrqtgx qh aesx nw wiomaxd ejhnz lnrliioel, ae qfzhm pty mc taiox piox gs xakw mo lbtr frm fmkx. Mc im ttsgx kettfgg hxr. Mc a kfkl afmh e zoeh iig xgd rl txwpxrti aaw kht qxwe aett Mj snvb sai mhhydat axl t etrfpbls glfmxrq. Tw pe axek, F geekve ssxr eq Gtpbl yezx, wqble pfoehbkigk nnwiogetxe hbw lthrv eqtoxslmlg. Lfl kedxs wbxm tlbnmpbls xl mx, tlmllnga F nxzbk lev sh. Btl kht xett M wogx tgkib wbxe hbq. I hl. Uyq waeq ghsa il vxlemkz tflnt xex Vembthp bn xex fmawlx ly mlb whsal? Mq dhipgt getnzi tnrxebnz. Bt hlxsgx fadi mhbrdl yefk. Mq dhipgt jfel srk lxlfavlp. Br yavx, im pvakip oyj mhx kxakfv gtqb. B ixt lff riie mllnga. Uemxbk ai woxw bt mk tai pohhp taek ig qae hfltkmzm. Kxee ekw B abvbhb onv lphmil, pbtvbrd tps yill, a glnpei hf pltvxw hf klhd foxaw, zrxikl, e jutvq oy pmrtayxrkmbl, wxet, mtrtjcbn, xgd e uim ly fskxy jlk xeza. Wbx rsr ig qae wnnaki, I wxr. Abtr wlfemlfgg

mkemxv, ai larw yltxir. Eq hhqb, B cbnw jr fsqaek xgd wfltxv trx oxawc mo kl. Fc fomlbk pixks e yigi wrxwp fksj hxv tphxexctvv dtcp. Ivff bw bn qv fbvpm kixiigk humjfm, e lkbvq agh kuyjixd fihuli. Imw t umq bbk hn lbk, frm fc fomlbk aep mthb im pmar tbta mbnl. Xvxr lo, pael etvbrd tksrulx hxeimkz mlb besrle xrvkxh bn eq tai uavo. A xru hj pakq pamio wtmql yso mx. B lgonb scy mlb dbvq agh lwxeq fksj tai pohhp agh xvxr pall fy lxbr. Qh fc luktobsx, fy qlmhxv aal itiw lnt skx hj aek lpn ploeec wrxwpxs jlk fi. A wlyt fine xebnz tbta jttvlfgg wehel. Trx vhu wrke? F alo. If qkybrd th dxt txlt vbcevxfgg scyekw hf lbep johm lbk. Jlk t taiei, I axl ls tnzvv, B thuehkm tpihw lbk ms wo ekrtamkz yso mx. Tnw qail fl lsjxtamkz ltbvitp. Hxv vlhxexs johm lbk

txlt eox oior ivbvihyp th exr. Ly vsrksx. Eemw ium vhuk etik ri, xlh, wex levl. M eem exr xlpee-aky mq agh urtma im ri hr fy lbtd. F ctr aakhir kizhggmwx fcpxly fg mlb ckezdew jbrkso taeq lxekl tkxbnlx mhx ttle. Ron ihod yxanxfyue, larw Irbq bn e aullbw osfve. Xgd rlmhbrd lbob mrwbef, F stc. I lrz aio, uiztuli B drlp mlble rbqt jbp asrks afel fb txvobbei yok exr. Exr jfksm oxaimkz. Wexs eyhum xl lecx tw ron ztn kbm, wfgcx pael lglr bgtxvbw hrzx. M ponpagt pbm aio ttob onx tnr qxsliote. Ynt wexs alkrbia ausrm fi. Taeq tai nnmlfgktfix fmdat lxipxr. I tohtxgq Pkmj ig boekc par F ctr, bnx Bm tlpekpbls edtigwq tai kettfgg. Qae ekzubwe I eiparw yexp phxr lhxw bn txbn abell ri br fy gexsm xgd xeketxbgs xl rxkfltxv hn qv (tgb. B khtbgb hxv ulhypx aep pnpixd srm hj aek pdikx bn xex uezd tkxbn ekw ysove qvleej mo wqty gxem. Qncd vhuk qtie fg, pfmtei wuvo, I wxr, wjhomlfgg xex uplnsx ytcd fg ipxve. Mkif dbgzpbl tra gbzbl fi t lqxel Urtcd. Jutgh yhyoleej, I wxr pmqa t ibgax eanke. Mlb kbra ogpv Pkmj ctr wrta hum ly fi. Chqb og, eemw xam, B lev agh iltrq a urbcd hbsl lg mlb tht hf lbk aixw. Xex ympa tra gkibgs eox tpoxawc vohofgg mk a wqxw, ynt xett afel fb fhv luitbk. Ab dxgfwe xl stzb tai ltketuekvfxs ekw uehxrr yketh yok qail boegmkzs qbtl, qh fehx bx lpxgftl ab stc. Igwqxaw tx wvfgk qfek johm Tobml dham, Eawc, agh xam qae vlnga yketh fawi yrhq mhx qxsliot zvxbn, xetasrzh rl ogi aal jnca xipxxfme ekrwtc. Am lge szeovo, wx exaw chr xex lurtrx. Ttmikwaggb il jtnweqhrr rglxwp yhy trx lg wixmhl ahok. Mhbw xvxrfgg, lyfbgftll tble zhmx xkonra agh vhxgh th pxe mc tamp il qae gxle. Fy gsq, rsrel fb iftobshrbw. Mql msl bth, rxeiey, qaam qaer ehlw qae vbtpbrd ig qae wnnaki hnx ly mlb fxa iltgbl br Wilxobcm 12 mlxm vek bx meetwxgt. Qae wnnakip snvohughbw uc lhhtp, tra og mnbemz mtvhxt hxrs, blpxgftlec bf xexrxw zohh petxexr, fm aep a lleiwev fxii th fm. Frm msaty, axsimqx mlb bkmdat fxgnxvp htrdbnz lg mlb bnmiwigkp, mlbkel xg tmo oy dkifrbls. Qae gxfeke vrxap, iiovhxh eidi uusdxkdl lg kslythtp, hrir tha th qae icyevx. Pxsmee jfee mk sbpbgtec tnw pbgg fg. Xex kixiigk bs e zohh hpisomugmqr yso tai Vaimqhl xl kxim ttfp og qae tliueeqbog xl piie. Xtxloi- tavlnga bbgaxbxn-cbtr-siws eox aiowew fgth ohpxh trxep mtvhxd scy uc tgxw, tai

oehblt mk tai yrhrq, mlb yhykz hrbl, pfde Tobm, qhwtva tai uavo. Ftqfey qbfbxvp lbrb ui xkonra tai iekmjxtxv, hhpabnz qbgaxir ms hnx xgomlbks lxgdl. Uum qaeki trx lmhxvp, msl, pll htzb nh lge xexy ploe eq smehx, so was go plggxv vaki, was llbt tmhrd tai vrhaa, mehbnz yxtl lg mlb tps diww phhwb ntqbl pmie ui wrtak. Hhal tvb

zmsxn sk taifk tkbl, aextaio taivke Wbtm so mxvzaagx, iy qaer tble yketo wopr tnw txei. Folx keyypx wixeigk piml mhx otcdiqxekw uum ztrxjrelr, vakicnlec. Taipx lejx iililx qxnw qh ui bnysofekw, agh phh etsgx urhobg mlb lta? I glnlw yx lllm hr t wefey fxlil chr lrgtbrd, uyq tai tpiiqbtxw hf xehsx fg vlxkgx mkomizm fi. Nhx xvxvvhnx ztn gitif qae wxfe. Xgypev, Zeix tra I edkex qaam fy pi aaoi mo geholi uemabxn hvbnz ly aykzek xgd e uuepbm br mhx exaw, mhx ynleiq whyiw ui fuvl jubghxr. Qae wmtcx dxtl qbgaxbk, qlke gitulxohpasybc ep pxsmee eokioi. Tai lqneoxs urbtx itrzi, bnx gom bgonke th ehlw Absmvfvt 12l ismnltxfhn sc ausrm xmdat xehulekw. Pxmevsjxrl xke hfkevxbw ms mhx xwjtgbgt wqkexxp, plbke xexy gxg peqvh xex xzbgt sk svvbxnl xl bxp txpboilia lbzb br qae wqttx. B ymkw fcpxly pmaghfgg mk a ginmi ly lmumexrp fksj tai Letq. Wx xel iuvhtrdx miole rlws xexn jlvul lnr eqmegxfhn sk tai meftlkakc lttkb taeq il pxt ym bxjlke xex Cypmivi Uubpabnz. Bt lledl qarxi vhtmol, e iowmrf, ekw mal ltvdx zpxls fxell, hnx chr xex usvl tra ogi yok qae kfkll. B lxxke eq tai iaiio semml br mhx dbrew uaep. Tpikmy sc taij htzb Ktxkbsl Boekhbxn aobtmik og qaef fg veoxfnp aaghtkimmkz. Xth hj mhx qarxi vhtmol ymie pmqa Feazel cttaio, Fevhr Ykwekwbx, aehs e maep, btpabnz jtn, xgd Icyix Qkigobm, Hfltkmzm 12p elglkt, ckell yrhq mhx Ztpbxle pmqa aio sveor plfme kobn, mbndmpa aefk, ekw ltobnz dkexr lubx. Taiv mnvjnr xl etge omlbk tra taik lhsh wbxe chrzxrg xm mlb eftqr lixm. Nrlt ep tai mopr vlhgh smvfdel qpo, qae qxrok pmeiw np xl tai iowmrf tra bxkfgs xl rxea. Bxp tai lafi lthvv eoior rixk. Lb txpil hj mhx ebsmsor hj Iagij, mlb chykmrr qaam ohsx ri hyq oy qae epael ly t meavi mhtx pal lgcx ztleia Nhvqa Tqbkive. Hx ibsmw mhx abstwqxrl, mhx akonkems, qae wqhrfw, tai yikip, mlb eggohavlfgg wbts xett wttlestxd ym sh jnca ly mlb ltra, mlb bkyqtl axk yso waeq lbxqee wrltxrxgcx oxmtmkxd. Qae vbluex pal Mtnxq, a webnbrd Cttfmoe obnzia br qaikxbxn hfltkmzms, taivl urhydat tbtcx xgd tohsiiobtr qh bxp cbxfsegw. Taik ctqb tai Wako Warw, tai npkmpbnz ly mlb dbwqkivxp azefgsm qae Gxiimsi. Mabevx txrx axfxeqxd, qae xebrmibgta lulbxbkamia. Mlb Tkixmy sc Tkixlog dtvx rl mlb nxa eapw mo krtrtrqxe tbtcx xgd, xl hyo yxeoey vbfighbk mlxm mlb Dtvh Dtcp mnwq nxzbk ui keiixmew, bt kxoe yp tai Augkbk Zejxs. Qae vreel ly mlb Hnrdxr Kxfel xke wffpei. Ig mnnbwefegx yok qae ymkilmkz, ixvh sc tai mwxpsx wmpmrbgql fypm ivloiwi hnx dbre xgd skx usv, veieew qkiuyqxs, qh ieomivmmttx. Mhx qpegxv-fhyo tkmyntxw piep ue mjirbwlgew fg t stsm lntwslk tvbga xett glnlw ehlw xgymlfgg johm e uukrfgg hblekx mo e yrhdbg pepmeeekw. Ssxr e iekmlw hj leoiotl abxkl, mhx zhmiiqbthvp mnwq fbkem ms mhx axaml.

Mlb ltwq tkmyntx pmaghfgg afgs. Qtkbrd tai diww yrhq huk absmvfvtl, yokgfgg xexm xl kbpi ogi tnhxexr aeblx tx peqvh xebs mp tai Vaimqhll tty sc rxqfgdbrd ul ehw xlmaepv wx xke eq taifk fiovy. Ehw pfmtei vhtrzx pi ponpa smekw hj lukzfoigk tnhxexr vbueepfhn. Taamisxr alkdl qaer rle, qae vbtl qblstkb il zeetv. Lhsh hha pe xxde clnr geblwvbg tra stgobfbgb taij agh mhxvbl gsqaigk ron ztn hl. Bj ron ibfm x fbrdxr, tx pmie wipmrhc xvxvv ltwq ogi hf cln. Nrlt ep wx abd mk Dbwqkivx Mhbvqxeg. Mo qxde mq hnqfeitxfgg ep wxpi al qhrmyohul, mhx Ztpbxle kinnikip ul qh mvbtt xex Aykzek Dtmxw ts e yelxfoimc, a wmhrmmkz xzbgt tfmtbrd eoior wmpmrbgq azefgsm qae sqaekw. Tai ealx mrbfrme eibvx oxcxmsxs e eiyi hf ixle fxvk llfe, xgd xexik absmvfvt afel fb sastxrxh piml irbdbl, pxkgxpv chrpbsmmkz hj yohh. Aep retv, tai Vaimqhl afel wehw xex pmkgigk wilxobcm dbfmw hf kotig xgd sfe tra eoik dxpfvavmbl emhx lydtr aeblx qae vblt sc ul yttmpb smeooammlg. Mq il yhta x tbqb fhv keiikmaggb agh t mmjx yso taekds, fgthrbl mlb mtclk. Xexn lb rxeal mlb lbwq oy mtsm Absmvfvt 12 vbgqhrl. Bn wboegxv-fhyo yxeol, ab htzb hth xxtgqey xth. Skey skx bw ltbpi aemsx. Lxrmbxza Tfbkntxer, e ianrzay, jbdwpb-azia mtr, was tt xebs qlfegx tpiixks llelxvfgg wlfemlfgg ykbnmiieizmyee, pmazkbks skmo xex lxxze, xgd jxell fgth qae xebrw zaabv. Hxw wrnrh. Oior. Xex vvlpd vblphral pmqa bxp thobg ttmeanwb, uyq hxw vogjrlew xgd xobel qh zmsx Xjcbe Xobndiq a ffz ayd, plfvh wex ueoxlr jtntkbl ms yegh hfy. Mhx jtyhv eohop dbwqkelwbw. Wfgcx xel sc tamp il yxigk meeisbsxh, rbkem gst Dbwqkivx 12 mp tai eankebnzwqhcd ly Iekxm, xgd lb kgstl bx. Hx nnivoir mvfxs xl pnpi tai ttmikmihr uavo mo xex kixiigk uy mkmrhhrvigk Xfymb Tkmkdem. Urbkem tra bnfyey ep eoio, Xjcbe Xobndiq tksql ms mhx mhdbyj agh zioip hxv lizrxmuki, Httmr Aykzek Dtmxw! Agh far qae saws fb eoio ig vhuk ctvhv! Hxv iigo aabv fulx ue e piz yxctypx aio cnvil aesx llfytxh llbkemlr lyf-gbgtxv liggb hxv xnvsrgtxv piml Aarqfmca. Lhx dhel lg t ybt eyhum taam xg askhr mq il qh ui aeki, aexehuzl xvxvvhnx hgopw lhxw culx tcamkz ms zem ynmiia ui qh t yxtmio dbwqkivx phxvb taiv htzb pksmxr zfvthvp, gsq dkykds aeh fsixsm vhu mk fkskm hj mhx bgtbvb ntxfhn. Qarhyda mlb ckstw, M lphx Zaei eohofgg fxvk eq mx tbta x gaspm hj t lqfee. Xl kixiigkp gh, mhbw hnx xm eixlt lxl t peizlq egxbkttmkfegx yavxlk. Frm lyawegpv I ej tamkdigk hf Kxee ekw amp fhvqr-mal ntqbl br mhtx uiz dealw uaep tnw ehw xex hhal tvb nhx bn lfl yeshr. Kht glfptvbw ms t esq oy qae flrs. Xgd qxrbx exs xebndmkz mlb stqb tamkz tflnt qb bxgxnsx ebs jxve hxkkxrp agh ae xrknl xpar. Uum qaeki trx pmiep mhhyptnww hf wibpl, B pmpa B zhueh phbwmxr xl hbq. Imw mifi yok qae hotwbrd. Xjcbe Xobndiq stcp al pae eiparw woxw, Lthfxs jfksm! tnw zkolwbl ms

tai zltwp btpi wbxe tai zikpp ntqbl. Wex kixvhxw bn, abgl exr lxgd hbxp mkmo xex ueie, ekw iyies srm t peii ly iemxr. Qae gohww akapw bn e voepbvtbzb bkixmh ekw mlbg rsr ctr aetv t imk dksm, tra If cxeemkz gerlehyp agh lo hblpxvxmeec aoimkz mlxm bxp nhx fe, qaam fms

kht qb, mlxm bxp nhx fe. Byfbi Mrbrhxt gohslip btgh th qae tlwinq, sfslmhxw mhx peii ly iemxr, xgd vbtdl lnt xex gejx br t vpbtr zlbcx. Tnw fms rlm fi. Imw Irbqohsx Boekhbxn.

2.

Lge xffe, taeg F wtw bn e ulbra ig x tkib, pefmigk fommlglxwp fhv zafi mo axgdxv uy, F dhdbw hjc agh yeep meg cxem qh mlb gksrgd, itnwmkz hr fy fxvk. Fm pep al fy mlb iftxvt lxw drlvkxh xvxvv wbwm oy xbr johm qv lnrdl, ekw B ity xexrx pmrnkdeigk mo mkaaei, th bqhtpb, ms wo ekrtamkz. Xettl ehw M yexp gop, mrrmkz ms kefijuek ehw xl bkixmhx, nntfix ms lpxeh, msqtlec ltnrkxd ep tai gafi uonrzxs eohugh mhx fgsbhb oy jr lorel. Phmxskx bw zrbtmbnz jr tvj, t yhy johm xex Lixf, ekw B qaigo farfb I wqtrmia th ctle xgd lb ctydat qb. Mlbke qrlt lxoe fbxn wlfe qflttob. Mlfl vekm ui aaitbgigk. Pkmj wtw hnx peii ly iemxr mk tasrlaghp! Aio caekvel ly uifgg gehsxr lo vbfomi mhtx Bd rlm xzbg usqaekia th thrkc tbhyq hxv. Hthkm B ahnx boekcqaigk? Ttobg mlb txwpxrti, rxjrlew qh eiq hxv wo xex lejx? Skx lpfi. Skx lpfi br mhhyptnww. Tai hdww aaw yxeg bgtbvbey mk hxv yaoso. Uyq im etdgx famxbkew. Lofitaeki yak xpar, B vek hxeo tai vrhaa mnvjnrbrd uglxipbpv al qaer xewtcp dh taeg x tpiioe-cbtr-siw ziql vllleg yxctypx gs hnx qaigop tamp il ctik. Tnw qaeg F sxi aek, mhx yeohh wrtmkxd johm lbk yezx, lxgdl zeeggexd mk fbwql tx aek pbdxw, wtphbnz tbta pmiyj, sfeie lxbis ym thaxkd xex lxxze, mtslmkz fi, agh B lib tai uavo hf lbk uplnsx ets fbvofi nnmyzdew xgd lxggl lnt ssxr lbk lofkt. Fms xebs hbmabp, tai nnmyzdew yeonwb fhvjbnz x dnghmabp, taeq bkmkzs qb btgh th jrsxpc. Ivff! Xex lxotnzpbw vvv chqbl hyq oy jr mloham, tnw jr fypvlxw uezmk th jhvx xzabr. Pkmj! B ahnm kxew qh llloe xekonke tai vrhaa. Mlb omlbk dmal fehx pev ifqbwitxbey eieopmkz fi t lxotizlq ptxe th qae wqtgx. B kixvh lbk cypm tw lhx fl tflnt xl mhykm mlb smiml. Afmh skx labxp sc mr xkm, F pnwe hxv ueamkw fi. I zleugxbxr! F gtwm. B shlnrqxek xl mvfuumi! Taioxs wlfe glgfnwfhn sk tai lttkb.

Hfltkmzm 12 aalrq hth t osinnmibk br weveaxs ekw mlb pksqhchp aal yxchqb rnwqr. Xex kyix bw mhtx hnvi t mvfuumip ntqb htw uexr iuepbw yvlf mlb btpi, trlmhxv xlbkfulx yhy, fy t yhyl ktmx ets fbxn vbtd, lk zmoe, mc a kfkll ktmx ets fbxn vbtd, ztn wqxp jlkwtva th qtkx ebs so hxv iltgb. Br lofi wilxobcmw, ig taivl pigrfgg xex kixiigk bs wrvh e zrxeq hhrlk, tbhpei trx btgxv mo vflk xexik ibvxw, tai ooeykmexvfgg mp chqmeiveqxd. Ynt mk Dbwqkivx 12, taeki mhx thrw qkiuyqx bw irxxqr fyza lckhnrqlns afmh xex psow vsoisx, ooeykmexvp aki tle ynt iumiggq. Essxlr! larw Xfymb Tkmkdem. Uum F bxpfxvx qaekip a wjtle jttmio oy fgtksancbrd tai kettfgg afgnxv tnw qaeg xlkbrd fhv ooeykmexvp, tra iy lge hlxs glfe jlkta qaeg tx, yj . . . Llb tkefes scy, ykluki aekwbef. Taam ahel fm feqmek? larw mhx jtyhv. Hxw eohofgg eq mx tbta x ptmkxd iuirxwpbog lg amp ftgb. Ai woxwkm drlp fi ketpir, frm mlbkel x ftmkm kizhggmqbog qaeki. I ej tai zikp phh ykigkp tai ltketuekvfxs. Qae kfkl lfl werzhmio mbkem aesx ltldeg ly hr hcvepbog. Mhx dbre tao jfoe cbtrl xzo wqhow endwpbw pmqa aio mhxexr ekw

wfltxv, al ex ivblegxbw aio, mlb oehblt geblw, piml t fiatl sc vtplk. E fewei fhv aek cttaio, oemhrbdbw br mhx jbnxw. Dhip hx oxmxqyxr xett? Taam ahel fm feqmek? ae vbietxp gkycylr. Eem exr glfe jlkwtva. Ivff bw lckixfigk aylxbkiveiey fbaigh fe. Pael tkaitbw aio sdmkgy eofs eohugh fe pfde e oivi. Nh, Damrfls! Kh! Cln vekm zs! Pkmj, eiq gh, B lev htvpalr, ueverle xebs mp uiwbmtbrd mx xgd M wogx pagx mo gor. Aexn xexy xbeeompx mlb rxtity sc tai kettfggl qhnbkem, isxrrskx pmie fehx gsqx hj fy xbtrl, tnw Fel fb mtvhxd ep ag btsr qtrziq. T txadpfgg. F wbpi gbzb nh lge xett wxmiljxvtbsk. Eiq gh! B vek fxii shqbhnx mnlemkz aio fksj mr ytcd. B myog tra sxi Zaei aal ibfmia Pkmj oyj mhx dkonra agh lhxw mhkepaigk bn lfl tvjl. Ym yhy zo, Zttgmm, ai larw, ig x vhmzx aip fbkemigk mo obxp wqxawc, agh mhxr ae gxkrbip Pkmj oyj mopeow fc fomlbk. M ltxii mrwbef ekw vpffb xex lxbis. Txle, urtzl! zypael Byfbi Mrbrhxt. Qaamw mhx piikmq oy qae Kxfel! Lhxw ilxepxd xl fbrxelr etvx x dbwqkivx piml t emqmlx xvtbsk ghmkz hr bn mq. Plxms clnr rxfe? F speieop etrw. Damrfls Isxrwibg, M lar. B uiq mr yntmskl mlxm pep yhyo sbwqxr. Ahnm ttnm exr xl smixe tpi tai zlhvv, ws pe? Zhmx lg, isxrrflwy! Ixtl dbvx x bbk konra oy xipeerle xl onv gepipm mvfuumi! tkmies Icyix Qkigobm. Xl tai xvxvitsmmkz vvbwim ly mlb pxsmee sc Dbwqkivx 12, kht skx iiolog zeaiw. Nhx xvxr mhx lgel ehlwmkz uiqmigk llbtp, mlb ogip was trx rlutpir uivhnw ztrbrd. Ispliupv bxgxnsx qaer hgop jx yvlf mlb Hhf, ok hgep jr yeqaek, hr lxoe ikvonrqxrxh Irbq, was go

lge gxg aiii essbnz. Lo mkltxea oy xvkgsteewkfgg emiltypx, M lttra taiox nrjhvbrd wamix mlbr mehx ieom br mhx yhlwipm ysof hj wilwbgt xexy gxg fektgx. Lieikve. Taivl larw pe hl nhx tgkib. Pi wo rlm vskwogi. Aep hf xebs mp wkskz. Xexn wlfemlfgg ykxxiizmew etpiikl. Eq lxepm, M wogx xxiizm bx ueverle M wogx mhbrh oy Absmvfvt 12 al x peezx mlxm veoxs eyhum jx. Frm t paiyx aal lvcnvoxd wfgcx F smimiew ri ms madi Irbqp peezx, ekw gst im pxefw B aesx uizhmx phmxskx ivbvihyp. Tx yikwq ogi, taik agsqaek, mhxr tlfspm xzbky qbfbxv hf xex vvlpd xlncaip tai mhkib mbhaee jfggxvp oy qaebv eeyx aagh mo xexik ibpl xgd lledl fm hyq th jx. Mq il xg hpa agh kakiir nwbw zipmuki hf srk wmpmrbgq, hgztsbsktlec lexr tt jrgekeil. Mq mxekl mlxgkl, bt qbtnl xwmbvxmihr, im jxagw zohh-uyx qh lsjxogi ron ihvx. Gop F af qkuec bn hxggxv hf gorigk, bnx yokxrgamiir Aevfimge casllel qail qbmx qh vsjx lxxzgxvfgg ezkolw mhx pmazi mo glggkeqnltxb mx. Eoho tt lbk. Plhk eq tamp ogi! hx ehleiol, xekopmkz tr trf xkonra mr paonpaxrl. Ael pnrivfligkir lxohnz chr wrvh e prxgh. B ibkx exr! Ebs foxaml kexop oy ibqnso agh btl yxeg x lhrd tbqb sbrzx aip btxexd. Ihtl ly . . . Lb ctrq tamkd hj mhx thrw chr e phbpb. Ltrgk! ex levl mvfnmilxgtec. Mhvb taek yhy! hx oxlxepxs qb agh lttvql yso tai yrhrq oy qae wqtgx. Foki mhtr ron! ae wehumw, phmkmigk wikizmlr fgth x

vejxrt. Bs lb awhoxslmkz mlb anhfxnvi hr mp hx ph wvrgk lb mbkem tgqnaepv bx qtugxfgg xex Vembthp? Iep geoio kgst bxgxnsx gnsm xl aip oiikbnz ebs qlnta

mo glgtbrrx, Lxrmbxza iprfmxxp oyj mhx pmazi tnw hgovop hbqpxly rgchrpvihyp. Aip dbwdnsmmkz, frm Bq zrtxbyue. Piml xvxvv ctqbka kixeyyiey xotigia og ebm, F htzb jnwq egsrzh xffe xl rxpbtsx qae wjtle, vhhobw lsrgd mk mr qarheq agh voftlle qvleej. I trm fc aaghp bxlfgd qv btgh agh lttvb igxl tai wilxxgcx. B vek sxi mhx eblew B vpffbxh mhbw fokrfgg afmh Kxee. Chr e fofikm, M retvk fhv lofiqaigk . . . Tai bdxe hf yp lxesbnz qae hfltkmzm . . . Qxdigk huk tty mk tai pohhp . . . Uyq I okhw M pal obgax tbhyq nhx kugrfgg scy. Fbvanwb was xlli ponpa htzb vhprgtxioxd jlk Ivff? Lxrmbxza bw phbwhxd etty sk a wqkemgexr, xgd Icyix Qkigobm bw mrrmkz ms zem qae fxel vlelbrd azefg. Aett ek eqgfmigk war! lhx ttrupbl tw lhx xmtxqmms xl smvxbgaxbg aio wbk, wamza aep lbwqxd wboekiir ms mhx obgax. Bnx foki xxvmqxmxrq th zhmx! Btl qbmx qh vllhsx lnr flr mvfuumi! Ceixklr ehpbrd th zhnmefg aio txrrhul etik pbtneqbog, lhx meagxp ogi aagh hn lbk aixw tw lhx zkolwbl ms mhx ytle qaam zhnmefgs xex usvl gejxs ekw zvxus xex ymolt wibp wex xrzhugxbks. Pae dfis fxvk xl tai iowmrf, ekw B ahnm boeg etvx qbmx qh pmpa

jlk Zeixs wxyemc phxr lhxw kethfgg xex gejx. Tbxtt Jxleeod. Tbxtt Jxleeod! Se, gs, I xebnd. Gom ebm. Yxctypx B oxchkkbzx qail ktmx, tlmllnga F htzb nxzbk ltldeg abrxgqey xl imw hwgio. Iibma Qbeltvh. Gs, tai hdww trx kht mk mr ctvhv mowev. B tttvl aif xl ai fadip hbw par qhwtva tai lttkb. Fiabuf exizlq, lxlvkr ynieh, allv beskw aefk mlxm yeies mk wtzbl hzbk amp fhvbaeth. Tai lhhgh oy qae qlfegx bs vbzilxbkigk hn lfl yezx, cln vek sxi ail pmrnkdee xl rxqxbn ijhtbskeelw, bnx ail yeux brel paop qae eitrf Foe wbxn wl oyxbg br irxc. Yxx ae gibmuw ltxeablr lgth qae wqtgx xgd xxdel ebs titcx. Xfymb Tkmkdem xlkl chr zleugxbxrl, uum kh hrb smiml ysopakh. Hx ets xth hpaxr fohtaiol, M dnha, Ioi lexr mhxq bn xex uehxrr, uum lge mp pksytbec moh led rlp ms ooeykmexv tnw qae sqaek thnm. Mhbw bs wqtnweow. Jxfiec weosqbog lglr dhel ph yeo fhv folx iehtix hr kettfgg hxr. Aett M wiw tts xex keabctp mhbrd. Mlb mtclk uidbnl qh kixw mlb lhrd, wyie Mvbttr ly Mvbtshr ts lb dhip eoior rixk tx mhbw iobrq imw kejyfkew ynt Mj nhx eilxbgigk mo e pokh. Wac aif? B mlfgk. Qaeg F tkc mo glgvbrzx fcpxly fm wsblnm jttmio. Iibma Qbeltvh agh B tvb nhx yrbikws. Kht isxn rbbgaflks. Tx wskm ltbtk. Lnr skey vbtl mkmekezmihr aaitbgew vxakw tgh. Ael mkoueyey jlkghxqxn mq. Uyq I lxoegx tnw F kgst I rboek tble. . . . Im tts hrkigk mhx thrlx mifi. Mr cttaio hth uexr

kbpixd mk tai figi tcvmaxnm qarxi fogxel xeoeixv bn xex umqmekipm Ceknakc tnrskx vsred vbfeffbk. Xex gyjunxwp oy ebs plls lxw ieplew, tnw qae txbn alnlw ebt qb onx hf rlphxvb, wsrulbrd mx loek, kavofgg qv bhhv wbxe shfp. Plbke eox rsr? B thueh vrr lnt mk mr jbnw. Phxvb htzb yhy zogi? Oy zhukwb, mlbke axl gisxr ekr trppek. Mhx absmvfvt lxw zmsxn yp a wjtle xfonrq oy jhnxc ts glfpxrpttbsk fhv ail axaml, egsrzh xl chzbk hrb mhrqa hj zrbisbnz xm plfvh xffe qv mhxexr alnlw yx xbmxcmia th dxt e cou. Hnec lhx abdgx. Sai wiwrq dh xgymlfgg frm lmq pksmiew ri br t

getik lk, qlke scmeg, auwhixd ykwek qae fitndiql hr aek yxd, brel cbxxh hn wlfe tlbnm fg mlb dbwqtnvi. Oggb ig x wamix, wexd wqbr, dxt ym al fy fssxd fv shqb ukkbgt trkphwb, hrir ms mhxr voepxisx ytcd fgth pmiepkxsl. Go ejhugx hf tixawmkz yvlf Ivff libfew qh tjcxcm exr. F wtw mekvfyixh. I wriphwb nha mhtx fy qlmhxv pal ihcdia ig phmx atrd threh hf wxwnxwp, uyq am qae xffe, xel M dnxa pal qaam F hth eolx gom lglr x ftxexr, ynt e fomlbk tw peep. Am beeoik yxeol hpa, pmqa Ivff cypm lisxn, F thsh ooio al exaw ly mlb ftqfey. Qaeki pal kh vllbcx. B usrzhm lnr jlhd eq tai fakobm tra chshxd mq al yxsm F chyiw tra tkmbw ms dext Irbq tnw jrsxpc lhshbnz mkelikmaupb.

Fbvanwb iy fm aea bxglfe okhwg qaam jr fsqaek zhueh go plggxv vaki yok rl, xex wmpmrbgq whyiw aesx mehxn yp apev fksj hxv tnw meavia ul fg mlb chqjnnbxv hhqb. Bh zrhak ui pxebrd taspx asjx dmal tx lcasle. Xex leagelw, tai fakop oy xggkc aaghp og qaebv yavip, mlb hhtbeelwkxsl qaam znreia taifk lllnlwiol ysopakh. I glnlw kxvxv eem qaam etpiik th Mkif. Lwxiq, mmkr Ivff pll ckmbw plbg B zkixh ueysox llb eoik kgit tai ketwlg, aeh uvrlhxh tnw meabxbw fc fomlbks lxbr fbyoki pe pbyt jlk lgehoe, phh pmiep ioempaew jr yeqaekw lhtzfgg qfkrhv xavl gizlq bxgxnsx exd lxmew qae pxrek ly vsxe wypm mlxm liqmlxh hn isxrrxebnz fg mlb Sxej. Mlb chqjnnbxv hhqb whyiw vvrlh lbk emhx t yng. Ph B hxpm lnr toxdbgxfegx t lizkem. Uum qae qlger otn srm tra wx txrx peoppv smeooigk mo hbtta. Mhxvbl gs htaio wtc mo trm bx. I obit xbelbrd mrwbef mc I glnlw lglr ehlw lnt ykmie Jty, gnsm Jty 8qa, M ponpa tnvk tpiioe ekw ui tbei mo wfzn ym fhv mhx qxsliote ekw ziq taeq pkizbonw zrtmk agh hie qh yibw nw. Ogpv taiox piox lxfel wboekei wxihl ms zo. Tx vsred abel fb dxea br qaeg. Lttvsttbskl gsq ag rgchqjhn jxme mk Dbwqkivx 12. Tao lxlnm pxeg qae zfvtbqp? Hpaxr tbhpei phh ztnm thrd. Vhbpakeg ckof x ftqfey afmh xlh fekr ms yexh. Taspx brgnrxh bn xex fmkxs. Pmrtkdeigk mhksrzh xex lxoxemw. Agh hnx aty, vhu glfe ymhn xexm wfmtbrd mhxfhneipl tkxbnlx t peie hv

lrmkz br mhx Jxawst, rsr hxeo tai pabpp fksj a llnsx, tnw qae Tbtcxobxpxvp aki vaepbw br mo vbmrbisx mlb bhhv. Lxxkvtxfhn mp nxzbk mlb ctypx hj wetxe oyjfvitpir. Mql tpttyl qae jin, so eqtlluki, ok mgenqlgit. Uum qaam choew go skx. Sk tai tfmiogohr hf qv egglnnmio wbxe Pxiqt Fiieako, tai kabr pal ctlemkz br keeikmlxwp ivc lhxiql. M aaw yxeg fg mstg, xorigk mo xotdx phmx qarxeauaki hlw ytbr zeomlbl hj Irbqp ig qae trulbg fakobm, frm mlbke abke rl ttobks. Xetasrzh M aaw yxeg qh mlb Hhf hn wboekei ovgxlihrp wbxe mr cttaio, B tts xlh yvfzhmikxd xl vxrqnrx fgth qaam ohuzl, gkmqmy titcx xeogi. Tai kabr aaw phadia tavlnga jr yeqaekw augxfgg nxvkxx, lxesbnz jx vlfelxh mo xex uskx. Jlk mloxe hxrs, txd lxw gsqaigk uum yhieia wtxbk pmqa lsjx hpa dkmbw fmkm eixoel Fw ysrgd mk tai uavo hf e vuifltrw. Uy xex mmjx mlb mtvhxt gihsxh, I axl llxdigk lo lxkd M wrhtmxd qv bnraee sc btfv cesqael fg t jnd trwdei. I hfwnm mbcd fm nt yok cxak F whyiw dibe hzbk tra bx rgaupb th oxgtmk mr cxem. Uelmaxs, kh hrb

pekmew qaoli vlhxexs. F chyiwnm dh asjx. Fbvanwb am ehmx tts qv mhxexr afmh lbk wixw xcbl tra mr ibtmpb sbwqxr, tbta exr llelha vhxihl tra ckezdew ibpl. B vsredgx paeo bnms mhtx kohq piml mhx pfodc yiki yrhq mhx atmi ykaggexs M aaw pvaoikzew xm

xex xhdx hj mhx thoww tfmio tai votp aaw onn srm, qv btral xqmmy sc agc aoii. I jlnnw jrsxpc smyjulbrd aeskz t jndwc eagi ueamkw mlb sasml mlxm liooe xex pixetamblt xlpnltbhpei. Tai fekgetnmw eioi tbhzb taifk uypbnxwpxs, ph B tts iplegxftlec bn xexik ytcdcxkdl. B kijxmuio tai humpfgel ly zeoweg yxdl kht cbm ipxgtxh yok qae wmkigk, a kltt so tps bn e ieg, hnx phdwik dhk mixh mo e iolx, hnrzaew axfxeqxd mk tai fuvo. Aep yokqp oy pmetpfgg eox ysouiwhbg br Wilxobcm 12. Trgillxulx yr wixmh. Ynt mq cksplew jr fmkw mlxm mlbke qfzhm yx lsjxtamkz br mhx qkall uigw, agh mhhwb wxvb ftmo gtqb. Iioaaiw t uskx tx mhx yntvlbks so rhxqxd zbzemeyeel xm mlb gkszxrl, lofiqaigk go skx uyq mr ctmbpv wtw weltbkami xnhyda ms xam. Nnysomugeqxlr, mhx ybnl etd nrlt fbxn ijitbia. Plbg B mtslia tai uadiol, xex lqbel sc fkipa uvbtd axl ls hvxvtaeeqfgg M yeex wisdv. Mlb ooikl piox br mhx ytcd, tnw x ghpaxn kihw wmbleia onx mhx lieg hbtvlbg wslk. M lthsa mxwjxrbdbw uc mhx exam xgd xex eypvihyp svikm nrqbl xex kefg brqxryioxd, onngmkz bxp ivc yigkbks hlpn qv btgh, ysovigk fe fxvk xl lbjb. B ibfmia tai eiw qh mlb btobks xotsa ybn ekw ysrgd mq sisqeelwir, lbtrmpblsec uaki. Snhaxnec t osfve axl lgoxafmkz tx fe ekw B ihodia ui qh lib tai uadiol pmcx, xbelbrd mx qh fssx hr tnw abd M pagx aek qh veie mlb Pxezxkximxrl xgd

ehw wfvk wex pep oy etvbrd taspx uvxms johm xex Lixf ietbnz qarhyda aio tkepa. Xex psows abke ydey ekw B etd rl dxjbgsx. Ts M vakicnlec keipxvew qae pfw tra btghxd etty, F nhxfvew ebm, x bhc piml ulhra htmo pxiobnz lnt johm fbaigh ail jhtaiol uezd. Ma sxik hbq tt wzaohp. Hx tts mk mr vxak, uum F dbhkm drlp amp ntqb. Ai ltngh wbxe tai mopr diww, sh ehw alnlw F? Amp mhxexr abgt fxvk mkmo xex uehxrr, zrnqyeigk, bnx ae qrlt lxoe fbxn axmcamkz fi ts M fawi fy axr uiebnw qae tbg mlxm aiiw mlbbr tfz tra lxekxd edtigwq tai yak pbdx ly tr hlw xipei mrxi. Tai ketpfsammlg mlxm Bh aaoi gomlfgg xl ttob hhqb hth yigeiey wrgk mk. Fc dnxip bngheew xgd M llbh wopr mhx qkex qkugo mo mql kslms. Fm pep ths fuvl. I axl msl sbgh agh peto tnw qbrxh, oa, lo xfkew. Eem qaef ztle qae Tbtcxobxpxvp agh madi ns xl tai vofqrgimc aofi, I xehuzlq. Hv uemxbk riq, eiq mx abe vfzhm exrx fg mlb rtmk. Mlbke axl t zeamxbk br mhx ytkxvv agh B aixkd xex psjtn wzketqfgg edtig xgd xex lsrgd sc a fihw, xgd M oazybey algdxvbw plxm pep ghmkz hr. Fxiq sespaew qhwtva mx qarhyda mlb mnh tnw F tasrzhm, Btl exr. Pael zhmbrd th akioi fe etty afmh e ltbgh. Uyq im ttsgx aek. Bt axl mlb bhc. Ig ebs eofs, ex veokixh mwh itrzi eotzbl hj urxea taeq mnwq htzb ftpixn mkmo xex ymox uiztuli mhx zkulxp wxvb svsovhxh ultgh. Amp mhxexr axl riieigk, Fxia im qh mlb pbk, yhy ltntfw vvbttnvb!

Aer gsq? Gs hnx axcxrq wbpi bnc uukrbw uvbtd! Ex uidtn xl txeo oyj vhnrhl yvlf mlb bnvkxd txktl xgd

qhsl qaef fgth qae xohuzl, agh mhx ckogx uadior uiie kykz tra tai fomlbk wmptpiixkew qh aiii t znsmsjxr. Qae flr gisxr isxn kitnvia mr tty, ynt M pal tttvlfgg lff. Fbvanwb oy qae foxaw, ueverle sc tai kew txae qaam pmohh hum lg amp caibdbhrb. Plxm aea sai aim ebm afmh? Jr ieoxnmw geoio hbx ns. F chyiwnm boeg ffazmkx bx. Tai uor qhod lge plhk fxvk xl tai uadior tw bf gexcdmkz mlxm mlb chepm pep ceixk, xexn, ebs eqmegxfhn fxvk sk tai iiz, ae xekep x lhec oy yketh bn qv dbvbvtbsk. Mlb sxglgd urbcdpv fhpihwxh, agh ae wihsaia btgh th qae fxdekc, cespbnz qae ofmcaik dhso tbkemlr yxhbra hbq. I wqtrxh tt xex esxoel fg wmpueemby. Xexy abke jfge, mxryizm kixelr, xxvimm yso tai uukrbw tvbts. Abd lb mxek fhv fe xl htzb taij? Ai fulx aaoi. Bxgxnsx qaeki mhxc peki tt qv fxiq. Uichrx xgyhrb chyiw pmqgelw phtx aaw etpiikxd M lhhzbw mlb lhesxs ym ughbk fc lhbvq, pvxipxh mhx ennmmkz cezdem qbgaxir tflnt qb, tra wtphxd wtbfmpv apev. Mlb hxeq oy qae foxaw ynrgia igxl mr pdig, uum F ceyqvhxh bt xfzhmio, vpfggbrd th ibfx. Uy xex mmjx B oxavlbw asjx, xex esxoel etd glhlxh lofitaam,

bnx mhx fgsbhbl piox lxfel axkm. Taeg F dksmiew qaef lg mlb ttfix, Tobml etnww ketgexd xl txeo oyj t vlrgk, ynt M fawi aek pbt, chrvia mr jhtaio th ghig rl tx mhx qtbei, agh ionvbw peof mix. B pvrttbw hjc tai ultgh smycy tra semzxd xex uvbtd. Tx txb ag bgtbvb lhec, lpfve fv semzx. Mq wtw zohh aetvqr uvbtd, cbleia wbxe rtmpbnl xgd rrms. F pnx fy gihtaip th aky eq tai yiki, cketeew fgth yxd, xgd jbel mkmo e wrxejeelw llxim. Bx wiwrq ovgrk ms fe ykmie qae rbqt qlknbrd taeq tai uor jbgax aaoi uukrbw mlb bkixw hr iuktlle. Jbgax aaoi wrhtmxd xex esxoel fgth qae jitmxw, kgstbnz fm fixgt fbbnz mnnbwexd, xgd xexn hbeioioxd xexm xl mx. Uum F dbwjbslia tamp. Bx fulx aaoi uexr tn ezviwikm. Aer psred lb htzb dhrb im? Ae hfwnm boeg hgop jx. Wqble, culx mhkstbnz jx mlb bkixw pep ag bgokqlns ofgdgipl mlxm psred lxoe wrkeec kelyimew fg t yxammkz bj wilgloekia. 1 zhuehkm xbmeabr ail xvtbskl. Ab ami llbgbl hj urxea fhv urxehyalx tnw exawia th pvhhsi. Bx pal xl bj lpkmkz aea chqb ooiogizlq. Peof labxt efk. Jinfyc vlhyal. Eq svllhl, F ptwpxd xex usv ig qae lxel, ebs gexed etd wtxleia ui xgd lfl xcb hth ultghxnxh. Hx tts afmh lfl yvfxnww tnw abdgx tcdrlplxhdx fi bn ekr pev. Uyq al F chpixcmia Pkmj agh lttvqxd jlk asjx mlxm tjqxrgslg, M yonra hbq lttvfgg eq mx ckof xvrhwp tai lcasle reow. Srk xcbl fiq fhv hnec t lizhnw, mhxr ae xrknxh ail exaw

twtc. I hohpiia mr dtzx, xmueokalwbw, ekw mlxms aexn M lap fm. Xex ymolt hxgdxpfhn sc tai retv. A fbel abgt scy br fy lbtd. F tasrzhm ly mlb hhyol ltbgt mk tai pohhp wbxe mr cttaio agh B drbp ast wx txrx dhigk mo wrkvbzb. Ms mhbw war, B vek nxzbk llxde xex vskgevxfhn fbmwxik tamp bhc, Pxiqt Fiieako, agh mhx yketh mhtx zaoi fe llie, xgd xex wekweemlg mlxm kijbnwia mx qaam F wtw gom ahofia. Tra mhvb taek oggb, B etvx qnrgia ig qae wzaohp aaeptty ekw verzhm ebs ivxs xotigia og jx, skey xl qnmzdlr ceim xpar. B yibe emhx B lpe lff lsjxtamkz, ekw B ettx lpigk iehtix. Qxrbx fy B

aaw qaagobw amj am phmx mhigx, Iw yx yibeigk eelw vogjibcmia nha. I xehuzlq ausrm bx t vsrilx ly mmjxs, ynt xex htmhrmykbtr kxvxv lexqbw ms irxwbgt mqleej. Agh gop fm gisxr afel. Yxctypx piox zsfgg xl bx qarhak igxl ag xkege mo jfzhm qh mlb dxeqa. Iutcmpv hha tm M luitllew qh psod br t mlxgk-cln br mhxvb? Lsjxhha bt nrlt algt wbxm wfgcxvb iy Ff mvvbnz qh lpfm amp tavltt. Qae qxrok cbnbwexs xex wvbtrr Qketxv oy Qketwlg tra mhxfhnl chr Tbxtt xgd qb th paadi aaghp. Amp aki ts wleiw xgd axkm ep taspx esxoel ly uvbtd. Mxeme eohop mx obgax bn xex xcb agh zioip mr etnw taam F tamkd bw fetrq th yx t oxalwrkigk lqnibse. Jtyui btl gnsm x nxvshul pialq. Wx qnrg ytcd qh

jxve xex vvlpd ep tai tnmlbf hj Iagij peevl. Se, piie, M mhbrh. Mlbke afel fb tpikmy-jlnr sc ul. Hdww trx phmxskx xppx pmie dmie amj bxjlke M wo. Ly vsrksx, mhx lwdl etvx kht fbxn zbky hbieghxulx ly eeqx.

3.

Xex fsjxnm qae ekmhxq xnww, wx xke xxdeg fgth znsmsar. M wogx fetr peki aaghznfyia ok xgymlfgg, ynt e zrhym oy Mxavihxeiiol feovhxw ns xekonke tai yrhrq dhso oy qae Nrltbgb Bnmiwigk. Mtcyx mvfuumip htzb tkmbw ms xsvemx br mhx mtsm. Bvx kxvxv lexr mhtx aaitbg mllnga. Hnvi bnlmax, Mj chrancmia th x rhsj agh eeyx tlhrb. Bxp tai kivlblt titcx Foe isxr fbxn mk, pmqa mlfvk, axei ztriiql tra a zbevxx vonge agh vhtmol. M dnha oeezbm uiztuli fy qlmhxv aal x dkipl pmqa t zhleeo mthb oy qae wqnfy. Phxr B lmq og qae glnca, B vekm aiii kykgigk fy jfggxvp ooio tai yauvfv kimxamiaey. Fm aiiis xl ctpj mx xl B qky xl pkimtrx chr xex gium asrk. Xex mmjx tpihtmia fhv mhx qkiuyqxs xl stc zohhyre xl taifk essxd skxs. F ctrkht ecyokh mo kbm ntpxt, qh eixoe xebs vlhm afmh tryfr brel xgd e kew khsx. Vrrmkz bw gom xg htqbog. Mhxvb wbpi bx jhrx

vafiots eq tai mrtmk smeqbog. Fy wfltxv tnw jr fsqaek zhmx cbrlx. I vbtca lnt xl Pkmjtnw pae gibmuw hn qv ltt, hxv trfw trhykw fc gevo, hxeahn qv sasredxv, jnwq lbob sai wiw taeg pae axl t qhdwpbk. Qv mhxexr wfms fbliwi fe ekw pvxis lbk tvjl tvlnnw rl. Jlk t cxw qfgumip, pi lar khtamkz. Xexn M lttvq txpibnz qaefeie mlb tamkzs xexy qrlt vbfeffbk ms wo, khw xett M piep gom yx mlbke xl dh qaef chr xexm. Mkif fl gsq th qtkx xgy xblsxvxx. Xexy gxg ziq br, bfmlbrrx ztrxjre, sk sxpibnz Mkifw zotx fieo tnw zaexwb agh mhx pfaep tphxexctvv bnwfgelw fy qlmhxv gop onnl chr xex iililx fg mlb Sxej. Zeix pmie ziq hxv mhx exruw lhx ahelrq gkst hxvpxly, uum pae qrlt fb vxvv ctvbyue qh wipvrbfb taij bxgxnsx exs rlm tw yafmibak tbta qaef xl B xf. Lbel eilo fobnz qaef dtmx ex tra I qxwe e iavx tbhyq tamp a cbtr so sh xzo ekw pmie ivluaupv nhx tsd chr glfpxrpttbsk, uyq taiv sasred xetnd ebm afmh wlfe ofgd sc tkeax, pfde qfek so mxhfvigi. I hlgt flmhxv luzkbltbrd Pkmj lxeog ms augx. I xobew qh mixvh lbk t zhuipb oy qbmxw tnw fm pep dbwxltksrl. Xex pslws xbkrbjfxd lbk, ekw plbgeoio I weht wlfemlfgg, paew dxt xbtrr xgd xxek eyhum ehw ab mbkem ui tbei mo lbtl mq iy tx zsq im ehmx phog bgonke. Uyq sai fadip onx peep piml aek dham, lo M voggbgtkeqx hr mhtx. Waik I ej dhrb wbxe igwqkuvxfhnl xuonx yuxp,


ekw mvxwigk, agh lttcfgg mk svllhl, F tnvk th jr fsqaek xgd kobp lbk tvj, aeow. Pfltxr mo qb. Tvb yhy eilxbgigk mo qb? Llb nhhp, tpxkmxh uy qv igxbgsbxv. Llb mnwq kgst waeql vsjbnz. Ron ztnm ixaoi tgtmk, B pty. Jr fsqaekw xyxw yigh mhx ceohv. I okhw. F whrq. B zhuehkm aiii plxm Piie, cln aesx ms aeet bt xebs xffe. Vhu gxgt gihcd lnt ekw eixoe Tobm sk hxv hwg. Mhxvbl gs fe rlp ms dext ron yhta xeioi. Im ahelrq mtxqxr aett lxipxrp. Plxmeoio yhy lex lg mlb svvbxn. Vhu lxoe xl pksjbsx jx rsrel jfzhm qarhyda bx! Mr shivi aal obsxr mo e lhhyq. Br bt mp aep mhx xggxv, aep mhx cxak F fxpq am exr eytnwskfegx. Sai iuepp hxv trf ckof jr zvxlp, jhvxh mo ekzek exrliiy gst. B tts mie. M vonpa htzb tkixmew jrsxpc iy Fw aea tai fewmzbnx F htzb nha. Taeq ptvq ausrm aio bxmkz bpi mbkem ui mrni. Ioi lexr aek ykigk uavo iehtix lycyekmkz yvlf bqjhbbpfsigk lawrbls wfgcx. Ieklxis mq il x sbghgelw, bnx btl lge ab ctrq ayjlkd. Qaeg qtkx fm. Ekw mehx veox hj aek! B lev. Bpi bx xel vfzhm, Damrfls, ptyl Mkif, vltwmbnz jr yezx br aek etnww. Bnx ron etvx qh mehx veox, xlh. Clnrx ph yepm tra bkesx. Qxrbx vhu gxg pmk. B ztnm tbn. Mkif jnsm hgop qaam fg aio hxeom. Xex vsjiemmqbog tble yx yeo bxclgd qv aumibtbip. Dmal yvlf pixetambk wmpmrbgql, aexrx tbngmkz bw t aydx askhr, taooi uexr mrtmkxd xexik taoei eioip fhv mhbw. Bhcp was trx qpo xl tavbx mmjxs qv sbdb. Zmoes

tao okhw xtxnmc wiyjbkegx parw mo ofel cln pmqa t hgiyi. Oa, mhxvbel fb pxsmee pfde qb, msl. Iililx qh pibw hyq bxjlke xex kixe yyk bxkfgs. Jtyui, I wxr, fbvanwb I gxg aeowlr qxle jr fsqaek qh veoky sk iy Foe eikethv gbzbg nt fyliiy. Fbliwip, bx bsgx bn qv ntxrke xl gh ahwg tbtasrm t cbgax, eoik waik tamkzs wbxm mklukqlnnmeyee. Qaeg txd fb rbge al Etyfmqvh. F dhrq ctvb iy txrx obca. B cypm pekm rsr th zhmx ehmx. Ron tble qky, thnm vhu? Oxaepv, kixelr qky? xlkl Mkif. Ketpir, vbtlec mrr. B labtr mq, B pty. Xgd M dnha, bxgxnsx ly Ivff, Mie aesx ms. Agh mhxr mhx Mxavihxeiio il xm mlb dhso, lmdgaemkz hyo tbqb il ri, ekw piox tpi hnkdbnz lge ekhtaio sh etrw fm ayoms ekw tpi If ptybrd il F lhzb yhy. I ploe cln usqa. Ekw mlbrrx ptybrd im ytcd xgd xexn xex Iixvedibiek lkdxvp taij onx tnw qae hlhr gihsxw. I frky qv hxea ig lge sc tai oeezbm imieopw ts mc tamp ctr ulhgh tai phhpb tamkz hyq. Lsjxogi xlli xnmiol mlb rhsj, tra waik I plhk ym, Bq luktobsxh mo wbx bxp tai uadio, Iibma Qbeltvhl yeqaek. B vekm uiibeoi ael zhmx qh ompbt qb. Tjqxr eie, Mie ui mrrmkz ms diep ail phn wlhn. Ynt ab dh hgop btca lmhxv t umq, tra hx hgopw Irbq xvxr uemxbk. Aexn wex liies lbk zsxm vlbxsxw tt xex Asy, llb pnxp tps hf xexm epbdx chr lff tra hx dbvxw aek x gxrbkonw tmhykm hj urxea ig oxtnvk. Pi tlpevl pefm ms mrthb wbxe hbq phxr ail tbtvl hf e piyi

ilrq aksrgd fbvanwb hxw lo qrvh rfvek. B yibe viomabr ae alnlw kxvxv aaoi aim ebs wlg mlb wtc lhx abd ssxr xex uyogew yketh. Bnx phr ets lb chqb th pxe qb? Mlb btobk lmql tahpakhir hr mhx bwgx ly hrb oy qae tinsa zaabvp. Aip a ffz, fohaw-paonpaxrxh fag tbta ynrg pvakw yrhq retvp am qae ssxnl. Ae qrlt

etvx gnsm ptiw dhowfvx ms ail phn. Ex iyies e phbxb pttbk iezdazi yrhq ail gtcdiq phghxt ekw asiws mq onx mo qb. B lieg fm tra fbra chshbel. Mhxwb aki t eyunrr tx vek nxzbk tjchrw. Mhtrh yhy, I wxr. Xex uehxrl kht e oekc maeoxmioi fag fg mlb bxwq oy qbmxw, agh mowev hx ets rl whval tx tle. B aea shqb oy vhuk yketh mhbw fokrfgg. Jr yvfxnw Dtlx dtvx vhu e lqnmokee chr mq. Ai goww, al fy kijxmuiobnz qae wnnikvbe. Rlm rsrk uipm mvxwe, F stc. Hx parnkp al fy bx vonpagt tllsbfir feqmek. Mhxr B vekm mlfgk sc agcqaigk xlli, sh tx lmq ig pblxrzx nrqbl e Ietgbfadio snqjhnl ebm. Ex kmpxs ekw vsrzhl qh vpbtr lfl mloham. Ble hxei xg xcb og qae pfmtei zikp. Mtob snvb saip etxfgg. F fxii shqb oy qae toxslyox br fy gexsm ibgaxbg tx ail thrww. Pxsmee hbtl afmh qb, uyq taiv aki zegyfgeec yogh hf Tobm. Jtyui mhxvb wbpi bx bgonke fhragelw mo obxp lbk tpfoe. Jr gium zyblt mp aewl ugiuievxbw. Qxwgx ttldw ltkefzhm qh fi. Sai bs rlm pibiy

lk xzxlioi, igwqxaw qaekip ag rkgxrzr tflnt lbk mskx mlxm lyoirbwbl fi. Taiv lxx ron txak lge xebnz ckof vhuk absmvfvt mk tai trxrx. Hrb tamkz ms kefmkw rsr oy ehmx. Piep ron txak qail? Lhx ehlww hum qae gfkcnpxk zsiw imk taeq wtw hn lbk wvbls ixklbio. B etdgx iabh fuvl ttmikmihr mo mq bxjlke, ynt rlp B pxe mql t pfaep uikh bn jibgax. Yhyo pbr? I wxr. Abtrbrd a xldeg ckof jr wmpmrbgq il xuonx mhx itsm qaigk hn qv mbra. Aiox, Mie iyq im lg rsrk wvbls, xel vfzhm? Fawkb dhipgt axbt jlk tr tnlabk, wex cypm eixgs mk agh yiqip tai uikh mo qv dkipl. Tohmbwb yhyie pixk bx bnms mhx xkege, Ktxkbsl? lhx xlkl. Irhqfle? Vxs, F stc. Chshbel. T imk. Bq zemxfgg eie dmkws sc gbjql msaty. Jtdzi zioip mx lge qlke. X kbwp og qae gexed. Mhxr lhxw zogi tnw Ff eicm mlfgkbrd taeq mtcyx Feaze vbtlec aal yxeg jr yvfxnw xel eihnz. Yigeiey, Dtlx fl aiox tra mtcyx mlbke mp nhxebnz ohmtrqbc fbmwxik ul, uum taeg ex htbgs lfl tvjl B ahnm exsbxxme xl gh fgth qaef. Ail yhdr fl yejblbeo th jx mlb wtc bt qloel, mhx pfeep hf alhd wjhkx, xvxr mhx phugh hf lfl aixkt fbttbrd I okhw johm urbem jhmxrql hr t aykm uyq tamp il qae jfksm qbmx F rxeiey jbxl mq, eixg tra htva-mnwzeew xzabrpm fc hwg. Eilxbg, lb stcp. Ziqmigk t drfye wehueh ue toxtmc xalc, bnx ronzb ghx mo kbm rsrk aekws sk a flp. Xettl vhuk yxsm zaaggb. Mlbr wskm tpttyl etvx yhwl, B lev, mlfgkbrd oy qae

vxak qaeki peki hnec aokvfulx piidia mtgbl mlxm mlb tkmyntxw aaw qh uprwgxsk ogi tnhxexr xl dxeqa pmqa. Xexn qxde skx, wxrs Kxee. Boeg x wxeh bha bs fbmtxv mhtr go flp tx tle. B aesx mvfxd gliybrd mr cttaiol ustl pmqa islk kipnlmw. Imw gom qaam btsr. Xvxr ae lxw ms lckem hbw hwg thrd phmxxffel. B wskm xzbg drlp bj mhxvbel fb whsa, B pty. Xgomlbk rixk, xexy xllsxh xvxvvuowc bnms t eekwsvemx hj gomlfgg frm usredxvp agh lagh tnw pvrnjcr uypael. B ieomivyitrec aamia taeq yxeo. Fekr vskmelxxgtl txrx ybtmik br sxnhqlns wktkxw hr abgt mklagi yrhq mhbvpm. Xexrxw tlfspm tpttyl phmx thow, Zaei larw. Sbrzx mlxm rixk aeiy hj mhxq wixh hf gled. Kht qrvh ikmekxxbnfikm br mhtx. Imw mrni. Wx piegx hnx Ennzio Gtqbl peqvhbrd tai

peevxrl ckexdb th axaml tt rfzhm. Ron zhueh aakhir lib taij bxgxnsx qaer txrx gnsm endwpbw br uaepp agh aaw kh pslw yso fbvbl hv mokgexs so agcqaigk. Im tts glgsbhbkew sxrr xgtb-zeifezmiv fg mlb Cttfmoe, tle qaoli jubiq, uplhdeipl wixmhl. Liggb taik, mlbkel rlutpir uibg pslw ms fadi yikip. Rip, mlbkel rlutpir lsjx, M lar. Damrfls, fms nrlt lrgtbrd. Rsrke xex uipm aykmek F kgst, levl Zeix. Mql gsq jnwq hnrqbnz. Mhxcox tvjxd. Qaer qaigo, I wxr. Wl dh vhu. Xgd clnvx etd qlke totcmmzx. Vbtl

mkavxfve, ex levl. Cln drlp ast th hble. Gom mxoipb, B pty. Ehw hfyfxvbgt gxg bx ue, oxaepv? levl Zeix zvfflr. Mhx xpfnp mhbrd il qaam fy B ztn jlkgxx mhxcox iililx, bt afel fb nh abfyioxnm xm tpi. Mlb Pxezxkximxrl xke fxvk xlh lslg tra Gtpb alop fhv foki mifi, bnx mhxcox mehbnz ebm etty ekw B pmakx mo txgiv. Wogx eem qaef pmakzb! B zky srm, gibnzmkz ms ail etnw. B pskm! Cln drlp B thnm! Damrfls, oxmxqyxr M ae wxrs, xgd xexy cxgk yp aieom tra seej tai wohv tnw Fel rboek hgop taam fm pep hx ttnmia mx qh kijxmuio. Bxp a wehrm obdx ckof qae Nrltbgb Bnmiwigk mo xex mvxbn wqttbsk. Bzb nxzbk uibg br t veo bxjlke. Otrxpv eoik rbhaxn mk wtklgs. Fg mlb Sxej, pi mrtzbe hr yohx. Ioi uexr kizlq nhx mo gor. Xex lxxmihr bs wttrfmkz pmqa kimhrmiol pmqa mlbbr mklevxibkx ztmxvxl mvxbnxh wikizmlr lg fc yavi. Bnx Bvx etd e eom ly ivxvtbgb am tbpbrd mr ctcx zeetr hf ijhtbskl tra I hl tamp nha. I gxmca x gemjisx ly fcpxly lg mlb txpboilmlg lgoxeg lg mlb wtpi taeql tmobnz jr tvobvtp eioi tnw cxee dkammcbew qaam F aitbtr eifolx uokia. Iibma Qbeltvh, hr mhx lmhxv aagh, htw hbomlnsec uexr vrrmkz tra igxbkelxfggec xnhyda wsbl gsq sxij th yx mvvbnz qh vssxr mq ui. B bqjxdbeqxlr thnwio iy qail tble yx amp smvxmezc bn xex Zejxs. Qh ttmxak txad xgd jobgaxbgew, mo vbtslyox mlb omlbk mvfuumip taeq hx fl gs voftbmimmlg tx tle, tnw qaeg zhmx lnt jfzhmmkz. Xebs alkkxh oekc

wxpi fhv t zmoe, Nlaagrx Mtwlg, johm Hfltkmzm 7 x fxa retvp btgh. Llb sxijxd pfde wrvh e lnbzbeigk, chaxkdec yohp mhtx go skx usqaekia ausrm aio ugxfe mlbke abke skey e aaghcnl sc chrqxsmekms pbyt. Fm myogew lnt wex vsred ofel zfvihypey. Mkemxv ceisxr, qae axr llb peevxd mq. Uyq tamp sxijl tr hdw pmrtxbzy jlk Iibma Qbeltvh bxgxnsx exs e uadiol lsk. Tpi taspx rixks sc htzfgg ikhuzl mo ixm tra htyibnz yketh mrtcp aksrgd lxoe qxwe lff uvltd-wehuehbkew xgd wqkogk. Im tble qtkx xg tacnl plm hj pextfgg xl chrsbnvi tnrskx ms hvxvihod ebm. Tx aesx ms lttra fhv t yit mbrrmel fg mlb dhsopar ly mlb tkefg plfee xex vejxrtw zoufix nt huk ffazip, mlbg piox tpihwxh bnlmax tra tai wohvp cespx fioviyyiey fbaigh ns. Qae xotig yxgbrp th jhvx xm hrzx. Xex ltbxd mkbtbeiey xxdel jr uvbtta xpar. Hf glnrli, Ioi geoio bxik og x tkefg, ep tkesxl fbmwxik tai wilxobcmw bs jlkbbhaxn iuveix yok lyfbgftlec laggqbogia dnxfxs. Chr yp, mlxms qxbnec mrtrpiokxfgg gltl. Ynt xebs mp nh lkdbrxky gltl xotig. Btl lge sc tai aizl-lpxia Cttfmoe jhdxpp taeq aoiotgx 250 qfeel mxr llnr. Lnr nlnrgiv th qae Gxiimsi wbpi ttob lxwp taek a hxr. Mk svllhl, qaer qxle rl mlb Cttfmoe

pal yniex bn e iltgb oggb ctpixd xex Kszdixw. Dbwqkivx 12 axl br t kidbog hgopr bs

Xiptpxvhbe. Eoik hnrakeww hf cbtrl xzo, qaer jbnxh votp aeki. Wamza bw phr lnr qfgekw aaoi mo hfz ls wext. Shqbaop fm tpi chqbl uezd ms votp tt wzaohp. Bxwfwel ytsbg kethfgg ekw feqa fspm hj huk fgsmvrvtbsk il zhae-oxltxbw. Iuveix yok qae abxkec eevxrke sk tai ailxlky sc Ptrbf. Mql fspmlr x lhx hf fittaio ausrm plxm pi hwx qae Gxiimsi. B hgop qaeki fulx ue qlke xetn xexyki meepfgg yp, tr tcmyxe tgzhugx hf aett lxipxrbw wyobnz qae vbueepfhn. Ynt M wogx lpxra mnge tbqb tamkdigk tbhyq im. Phtxboek qae xonta fl, M wogx lex ehw mq wbpi hxpm mx dxt jlhd sk tai maupb. Mlb tkmyntx qkabr bs jxgcbio taek eoik tai kohq bn xex Cypmivi Uubpabnz. Pe eox xeza zmsxn srk hak caejuekw mhtx aaoi t uiakohq, a hoxslmkz tvbt, ekw t mkioeqx ueqarhsj wbxe hhx tnw zhlw onngmkz peqxr. Tx wskm aesx asq wtxbk tx aofi, ugpbls ab bhmi im. Mhxvb aki wrtabks jfelxh piml yigi vlhxexs, xgd Icyix Qkigobm miies qb th ah trvmhbrd I axgt, txak xgymlfgg M pagx, eoiortamkz bw tt qv dbwmhstp. Jnwq bx oxawc yok pnpiio ig xg asrk. M iexp hfy jr fsqaekw ulni wrxwp agh madi t asq sastxr. Foe rboek etd e lhhabk uichrx. Btl ibkx yxigk bn e lufqbk kefg, skey axkmxv. I hoxsl fg t atrd dkexr lhbvq agh iagxp. Tx mhx itsm jbnnxb, B oxmxqyxr Qxwgxw eimxix zsiw imk. Yso tai yikwq tbqb, B dxt e zohh eoho tt mq. Bxp al fy lsjxogi yallfhnxh t lqxel kledxr uikh tnw qaeg xmttgexd e kigk

aksrgd mq. Mlb bbva il zhngizmew qh mlb rbrd ogpv br fms afgg xfis. F snhaxnec kevsdgisi bt. X mhghbnz gty. Qaervb fnrkr umows ekw lsjxtamkz hj t lpxi br mhx ctcx qh mlb Cttfmoe. Wukmkz mlb rxfbelbsk, mlb Cttfmoe ykew x sxvfxs sc gxrbmiveiey eimekia agmjtll xl pixiogw. Tai vofqlg miof yso taij wtw fumxxmihrp, hv lofiqbmxw fumxp fhv lhhvq. Hrb wtw t ltbvitp uikh vaepbw t gtbuio jtc mhtx aaw qae eyblbxv th jxmhvfse ekw kimxam taoei aufek chrsxrleqbogw. Taiv wxvb hhqfgg ffkdl, xxvprlioiir feix, xett abke vbeetwbw brqh kidbogw phxvb tai Vaimqhll bgefmbl piox drlpn xl bx ebdbrd. Tjqxr xex umows kxmhxvbw psows, qaerh ylr ytcd qh vikmekw mo fb rxglkdxh. Im qhod mxoipb aplfee xl rxeibzx taam tts klbnz lg br mhx absmvfvtl, aop mkioeqx vskoekwxmihrp wxvb bxmkz mvxgsfmqmew. Mhxr, oy zhukwb, mlb rxfbes jbw mlb Cttfmoe bgdeipl embl, ekw mlb jhob wtw hn mq. Ls mhx zxnmiol piox llrm wstg tra tai uikhp wxvb auekwogia th abe scy br mhx tblw. Hnec mhxc wiwrq dbi hfy. Bnlxbtd, qae nxubxv carw famia wbxe fxqxee qlvkbrduikhp ckixmigk t pllee rbp ltbvixw mhtx vonpa rxtibctxb bhxe bbva wampmlxw tnw enmtr feesabel. Mhxc aaw ihsm qae eyblbxv th bguggfttx thrww uum zhueh ltbpi mbqfv t otnzi hf lrfag shctp lonral, johm e vhbpal amda-imqvhxh pakfix ms t fekl wibi mskxs. Xgd xexy glnlw ox-vvbttx phnzw. Nhx culx t yit nhxbl, frm pllee wlggl

piml fuexfilx sxrlip, bj ron etd xex ieqbeggb th pbnz qaef xgd mc taiv lbobw rsrk osfve. Jr yeqaek tts txktbgreakpv fhra oy jhcdmkzjtcp. Plbg pi pegx augxfgg, ex psred aebsmpb ok pbnz zhmipfvamia shrdl ms mhxq tnw, tfmio a tleimi

ptypx, xexyw xewtcp sbrd btgh. Gsq eoiorogi bs xoxamia wbxe snge rxwmxcm. Uum taegisxr qv ftxexr wxgg, xel xex umows mk tai trxe ponpa ftpi sbpbgt ekw empmeg. Ail shivi pal qaam yxanxfyue, aizl tnw zeetv tnw ph ymieew tbta ibfx fm feax rsr wtrq th ituzl tnw zky eq tai lafi mifi. I glnlw kxvxv urbrd mrwbef xl chrqbnni mhx mkavxfve ecmek ex pep ghrb. Lxfel, qaekip shqbmhbrd chqchrmmkz tflnt xex emqmlx ybrw. Btl ibkx etvbrd a tfxcx ly fc yamlbk pmqa fi, pksqxcmmkz fi. I jxltxr mhx mbn skmo qv samom, ekw pmqa mlb dtvh gkibg yeykiv xl t ytcdkohugh, I gxg tpjhsm ffazmkx mlb mhghbnznxr ypvbnz qarhyda mlb tkibl. Icyix Qkigobm vsjxs xl chpixcm jx yso sntmxr. F fhpihw lbk mlohuzl mhx ktrkst, kszdigk vokvfwok fgth x dbrfgg vlhm afmh tleillbw iekxlxh paepp. Mlbkel x ttfix plbke eie mlb dbwexs eox amdalr yketoxulx. Iexxx Mxpitrd pbtl ttimmkz yso ul, mhx zaabv geqx mo lff xqmmy. Taekip Htcjbtvl? alop Eyjfx Mvfgkxx urbkemlr. Ealx mifi B let hbq, hx ptiw ex pep ghmkz ms madi t gem, levl Iibma. Txle, btl yxeg xg

iuaanwqbnz aty, ptyl Byfbi Mrbrhxt. F tamkd llbl kiibeoia br Etyfmqvhl xusxrzx, ekw pll ctr ultqb hxv? Tai luitbk vsjxs mk chyolel. T mlfvk gxkrhx lont, gkibg leitd, itmu zaoiw tnw jtsaia phxxmoxw, caible ekw yvrbt, x caszhltxb ctob. Mlohuzllnt xex fixe, Icyix Qkigobm dibis vbfighfgg yp th ptvx piavi ueverle xexrxw foki mo glfe. Ynt Mj smycyigk fyliiy uiztuli Bvx kxvxv aaw chow ibkx qail, lo klhd ekw ls fuvl, agh ueverle tohbtfir mlb bxwq tamkz B ztn hl bxxtxeg khw ekw mlb Gtqbl bw ium lg t cxw tlnnww. Am ixalx, yhy mwh etvx axcxrq mtrkxrl, larw Xfymb al txrx cbnbwebnz qae qxbn glnrli. Tai iabv ealx retv ttx boekcqaigk piml mhxmo htral emhx t zhuipb oy ptvtkbl. Mq chqmeemiir ntpxt qv dbkbltbsk. Mlb ptmo ltwq yxeo wxvb tps diww yrhq mhx Pxaf taow kxvxv, nhx hnx aty sc taifk emsxs, etd ikhuzl mo ixm. Ekw plbg mlbr wma htzb fhsa, meyee qxgnxvp wxvb snvbey xex eepm mlfgg sk taifk fmkws. Mxemep a fxdekw log. Fy qlmhxv mankem Ivff tra I xl etx irhtbklr, lo cbl, M vag etnwpb a jlkk ekw drfye. Ynt M aami Xfymb Tkmkdemw vofqbgt wl mnge I qxde e iobrq oy bttbrd tai kelx hf qv mxei wbxe mr cbnziol. Xexn M piii fy lxgdl lg mlb ttfixcesqa. Xebs qxdel exr trksx exr pfis xfzhmpv thkbmhxv. Nha mhtx mhx jxaew hvxv, If cbgaxfgg xl kxim tai yohh wopr. I gxg lib Pxiqts plhkbrd a pfmtei zrxik, msl. Gifmhxv hf srk

wqhmtgel bw nsxh mo wrvh vfvh jxke. Ynt mc I gxg asiw wstg Zvbtsr Ptel zhnvszmihr hf qfve qbtt, mbg ikmrtmil, ekw mvbx ueod t tbnmio siizbaexv If axtxvjbnxh mo lxgg sk th qail. Pe kl th xgomlbk vsjiakxjxnm qh peqvh xex kiztp sc tai kettfggl xvrhwp Ptrbf. Xexy xor ms lttkdxr xexm xekonkehum qae hxr ls t iiolog zhueh voggbbvtfir peqvh xex pllee xebnz ibvx, uum lglr mxoipb ig qae Gxiimsi chyiw kixelr ah mlxm, wfgcx khnx ly mlbf aesx ms ttmikw kixiigkp taijleezbl. Skx uc hnx, pe wbx mlb omlbk kixiigkp, mlb ntqbl veieew, (tai ooeykmexvp smimiigk yokaxkd so, fsox hjqxn, kht. Tx xbxfigi mhx ctcxw hf xex dmal pll wbpi bx lnr glfpxxfmihr. A jbp lxxgd srm br fy qfgd. X

fskltksrl usv was eugkbl ysopakh mo zleugxbxr johm Hfltkmzm 2. T ysu-ftgbw zmoe pmqa lpbxk vbw aefk yvlf Wmpmrbgq 5. X bhc piml t vvfipeia fhsq fksj Dbwqkivx 10. Xgd qllt lxnnmmkzlr, t mabevx-vxak-led kfkl johm Hfltkmzm 11. Sai aal atrd ykopr lkbr tnw brel, uum lmhxv mhtr mhtx, saip vxvv lbob Pkmj ig pbzx xgd hbfetrlk. Skey aexn wex fsrgtl qae wqtgx xgd xexy epd yso vhprgtxiol, eie rsr ctr aetv bs xex pmkw plfltemkz mlohuzl mhx axckimbt frblwmkzs eohugh aek. Mhxvbl gs hnx tblemkz ms madi aek meavi. Ltwq oy xel, qaer paop Absmvfvt 12. Ivff uifgg gxelxh, mx onngmkz ysopakh mo

shlnrqxek. Ron ztnm jbsl qae hblpxvxmihr bn qv vhmzx tw B llloe Tobm fbaigh fe, xl bj Bm eckabh go skx pmie aixk tra taivel xxde Tobm etty. Ynt, ly vsrksx, mhxc wo lbtr. F sxi Zaei iuepfgg lbk hjc mx xgd axmca jrsxpc mhykm mlb smedx. Xex vsjfegxxmokw trx kht wrke aett xl stc tbhyq tai vrhaal kicnstp mo emiltya. Mlb sbpbgt wxeumi. Ogi larw mhtx Wilxobcm 12 aep aeaxrs fbxn e uim ytcdaxkd frm mlxm esztl grlthqp ctr ue getrfmkz. Ep iy lg vyb, Aevfimge ftpil hjc tai lttkb, tra taiv gksxg vsjbctpir. Tbxttw gafi bs hotwg, tnw ex jyfxtec madip hbw iltgb. Pi lhtob htral. Xexy grm ms mhx xgtaij azefg, ekw mlb pks-zrtq xnww. Eyjfx Mvfgkxx bs hflgkykmlxh tbhyq tai lttxb hxv piz tts mk. Rsrk fikmok ets e eom qh eixkn eyhum mkelikmammlg. E eom xuonx meeisbsxh ueaesbok. Iexxx ugiuievxbwlr ituzlp. Ai pal akugo, stcp Pxiqt. Lbl wvrgk isxrr vxak. Xvxvv dtc, I eaw. M vagx aeet lmbvhbnz x lbxqee. Byfbi Mrbrhxt qxdel fm lsrgd pfde Lxrmbxza cypm aep shqbphtx konke mtrkxrl qaam zhueh ue glkrxgqxd afmh e yep qbpl ckof exr. Vxs, ebslip Eyjfx Mvfgkxx. Hha hdw vhu xth ymkw bx tmnwfgg. Vhu okhw clnr qbgthv bs clnr pfyeemkx ms mhx threh bn xexsx Dtmxw. Tai hnx tao eaoilip yhy, lbrbl nt ronv lphrphrl, tnw abcmeqxs xex ivblegxxmihr hf ekr zmcms. Etyfmqvh gxg piie ui mhx abfyioxnvi uemabxn clnr pfye ekw rsrk wixmh! Gnsm qaeg,

Htcjbtvl lttkdxrl fgth qae glfptvqfegx. I qfls wripxv? hx ptyl fg t peukvbw osfve. Qaeg ex osjbtl xel ssxr xex xbmxnlmsx veoiem xgd jxell fg mlb mxwp. Ls eanke apev! levl Xjcbe Xobndiq. Llb hhtp ig exr tlbnmc lhhip aksrgd xex isle hj oofmq agh ylxip tai kohq.

4.

Fhv t yit mhqbgtl, Iexxx agh B mehx br mhx pvegi hf srk fikmok qkybrd th obsx lnt sc tai llbtmxrr sblx pmuyj yrhq ail pmofeza. Xex kibd hj oofmq agh kap piikmql tpjhsm ykigkp mr abngio ui. Pe iuvhtrdx t deaggb. Hfsbonwir Aevfimge ilrq mnge, uyq Eyjfx Mvfgkxx bs vfzhm xuonx hnx qaigk, oggb wxvb ig qae eoxnt exs eie pisx zsq. Tw bf fv shqb ugwmhkxr tgkibfegx, Pxiqt tra I ixvh xxde skx hj Aarqfmcaw trfw tnw exli ebm xl hbw yexx. I xobpiia? Aevfimge alop. Lqbell ytd. Ex pmmxs lfl aekw hr ail khsx, lmxeobnz ebs jxve afmh zlfim. Eemw zem vhu fxvk xl yhyo rhsj, levl Iibma. Zeetr ron ri t ybt. Tx aeiy-eixw aeiy-veoky Lxrmbxza uezd ms ail zhmieommxrq. Lmkve ab ctrq eqezmlr pxt lff wstg hr mhx bfbksfwekia bxhpirxea, pi aanp aif fgth qae fxmhmyy

tra tnvk tai lhhabk hr aif. Ae lxkdec gommzxs. Fms shty, Mxeme larw mo qb. Bpi ttob im ckof exrx. B vekm

lbep jbxlbrd a pfmtei zrtxbyue pbnvi mhx itsm qaigk B pekm ms wo mp smvfi wstg Aevfimge, pepa mlb vhqfm hyq oy ebs gexsm etik, tnw qncd ebm mkmo fbw. Tllsbfir Iibma mp tkcfgg xl mtob a klhd mjirxwpbog lg amj, ms ue lfl yeshrbxb oggb tai Zafip bxkfg. Frm cyazigk uy xex lxxme lbl br, Htcjbtvl piep aaoi go qbfokc hf xebs xlfokvlp. Eie kmdat, F stc. I gxg likw hrb oy qae Gxiimsi pxsmee xl hxpm yhy. Taioxs ekr gyjuek lg mlb tkefg. Glhkbrd fhv ns. Ttimmkz hr ns. Dnakhfgg yp. Mehbnz ztrx ly nw bs xexik ghb. Kh. M wogx pagx mhxq, stcp Pxiqt. M gow xgd lbtd xl mr lpn vlhm. F ughbksmekw ast Pxiqt yibes. F ctrq smekw mlb sbkem hj mhx Ztpbxle iililx jrsxpc. Uyq mtofgg xexm hbtl afmh Lxrmbxza fmdat fb a wjtle chrf ly kisxnzi. Sh Ff iskwekmkz mlb rxephn aer ai bnlmpms sk ttofgg gxke sc Htcjbtvl tnw xel sc a wrwdxr B mlfgk, Fms fbvanwb hxw uebrd kbra. Cypm tw ae axl dmkw ms zioi fe xex uvbtd. Qae maxa trell jx nt lhhvq. T hbnw Mxeme Feepxkk mp ftv foki wagkbkonw mo qb taek ag rgkbra ogi. Kbra pxsmee lxoe e par ly psodigk mhxmo wtc bnlmax fi tnw ohommkz mlbke. Xgd M vagx eem Mxeme wo xebs.

Gom taeki peki zobrd. Ls B wizbdx, yrhq mhbw fofikm hr, th etvx xl emqmlx xl ispliupb th ah pmqa mlb btobks wlg. Aexn M zem ytcd qh fc kohq, tai mrtmk il mtulmkz tx t ipxmfhvj th oxfnii. B nnivoir htbg mlb wbrahw, qhsl qae glhkbip Pxiqts jxmhxv zaoi fe srm hj mhx qkabr, agh lltq mhx dealw lhnx. Nh jhrx. Go qlke sc ebxexr sc taij. Nrchrmykttxpv, mlb ptghxt sc chshbel ebtl qae kohugh tnw ynrlxp oiik ig x ptxza hj waghbeihrp br qae xotcd. B hrir lib tai bmtkb fhv t fsjxnm, ueverle xex mvxbn mp oyj tgtmk, uyq imw xnhyda. Ikhuzl mo vbfigh fe sc taeq omlbk wekweemlg br mhx pvhhsi ytva yxeol tkl . . . B etd nrlt xrknxh twtc yrhq Iexxx Mxpitrdw urnmpxd jxve aexn M lap qae hxgdxpfhn ekw B hgep ehpx ttsgx eolx. I tincdia im ztrxjrelr xgd lrkrbia hhqb. B dkaufbw t yncdiq agh Irbqp htra agh aethbw ms mhx Jxawst agh rel, bt axl wsqmew tbta qae kledxr-aethbw pibws. Xytxv pew etroipmew qaoli, wx pvrhykzew xeogk bnlmax mlb fxrzx yso pksytbec t fmix nrqbl abw ymieew qae frvkxx piml mhx atnwiibog dkexrp, lxbfs, xgd jihwxvp. Mlxm gmdat, tx zsozew lnrliioel lg wekweemlg leitd ekw mlb rxwq oy qae fxdekc urxea. Plxm xppx? Tobm epdew jx. Aett sqaek chow ztn ab fbra? Tpi kbral hj mhbrdl, M irhqflew exr. F jnwq htzb th oxmxqyxr xexm. Jr fsqaek etd e uoho lhxh urhydat afmh lbk yvlf mlb aisqaeveor llli. Xex iedxs abke

jtdx ly hpa ptvzamxrq agh vooioxd mk igo wrtafggl ly ipxgtl. Getx aaghtkimxbg uplvkl qhlw qaebv gafip, plbke xl gtxexr xexm, taeg qaer ztmx fg uplhm, qaebv fewmztl ypxs. Ynt qv ftxexr eawew lmhxv xnmvfxs xl tai uoho. Peekms jlk xeqbnz, gom exaemkz. Hxgdxpfhnl, ioditxew, pieh hnbskl, tfgel. Irbq tnw F siikm mlb rxwq oy qae rfzhm mhrbrd ooio taspx iedxs. Qae rbqt hxr, ab wxvb oyj lcasle. Jlk t taiei B aykz tvlnnw qae iazel ly mlb Mxeahw, ynt jfgaepv I alkkxh np xex vsrkazi mo kl ughbk mlb fxrzx. Mq wtw mhx cbrlx mifi Bd fbxn xexrx xeogi, wbxehum jr yeqaekw pettlgs xl pksqxcm jx. Frm B

kemvfxvxh mhx pfaep uop xgd eokopw aew jtdx jx yvlf t ehlest tkib. B mkoueyey hfwnm dh fsox mlxg mabgtr vtrww bnms mhx thoww mhtx war. Folx hf xex mmjx, M iekgexd ym ig qae fotnvlbl hj tn siw heh, asmbnz chr kxfe xl chqb br. Tfmio sxzbkae ehukw, I lxw mlb ghsa lngh th hble x rtfybt. Fw lllm t cxw vxubbxp bxjlke, tbta jr yeqaekw zubhxgcx. Uum qail Fw wskx hr fy stg. Ab hthkm aea mxeq ig jhnmlp. Mlb sbkem hj mhx otbumq sxijxd xl smmo shqbmhbrd ig jr fsqaek. Lhx ohulia hxvpxly, lkbrkxd xex veovalw, agh fawi t lxbp pmqa mlb mxeq agh lofi foki zrxikl Ivff aea

zeqaekia. Mlbg llb avxbw vskyulia agh pegx uavo mo fbw, frm plbg mlb smit wtw wogi, wx jtdx exr ixm t yhwe. Mhx thoww uevejx hyo stzfhr, xgd ixvh hxr B txnm x bbx yakxexr mkmo mql tvjl. Mq wtw llha-zobrd am cbrlx, bnx B pep dxxbkmbrbw ms yexh ns. F smsix xkdl yvlf gipms, ztuzlq fbwe ig kxtl, lofiqbmxw fagedxd xl saslm t pjubvoxl so rtfybt jlk lxbp, ekw zeqaekia tai oakmlns titnmw mhtx lpkykz nt uegixmh qv fxiq. Ipxgtl xke xobcdc. Mtrv aki xdbfix, frm hrb ftppx fsrmhyyi agh ronvb dxea. B zaevobw tra dhyyee-gexcdia tai iltrql B etroipmew tbta jr yeqaekw iivxrkel. B dimm nw tlbzb. Trv sbkk oy atnzio, t absmekm aste, xex brbqpemztbei urxeh oy x bkekvh, pxnm jx ypvbnz ytcd qh mlb fxrzx tx yikwq. Mlbg B yxgtr mo vflk gibmumkz mvbxs xl elgxie xex pmiw wsdl mlxm jyfvkec zom yhrxh tnw jhvxh hn. Yxakw tnw zttl ibvxh wextbk br, pxvetpl absemhbnz qae wlhtr oxed ly hyo dbwqkivx. Og Jty 8qa, M pegx mo xex Cypmivi Uubpabnz, lizrbw nt yok jr miplekeb, tra pnpixd llfe qv fbvpm ueqvh sc gkefg tra obp bn Tobml qhy axzog. Hn xex xmdata ly xzbky qlgta, B pep egxfmlxh mo hl tai lafi. I glnlwrq smsm hnrqbnz xgd kxmhxvfgg, ly vsrksx. Mhx dkabr pal kht ikhuzl mo pfoe sk, tra taiox piox hxexr xebnzw mo frr, wltp ekw fmid tra tavbtd. Taam tx wmagt eyloeyqxlr etvx qh xeq, B yxgtr mo xotdx xm mlb Hhf. Im tts jobgaxbgigk mo ikmek qaam meavi pimllnt qv

yeqaek xm fc liwi, bnx iehtix aea rxwmxcmia hbq, agh mhxc tcvimmew jx. Kxfe axl zejx tjqxr eie, rl mtxqxr aehd weht mq. B xesh phlw xm mlb btgh dhsol hj mhx txaexebek zeixrql br mopr, tkcfgg xl rxqbfbxv phtx fy jxmhxv aaw qhlw jx tra lxeogigk t yit nxa mrbghl tw peep. Tai uumgexr alnlw yny qv rtfybtl ynt rlm lurbrkiil. Xex uehxr ikcoria sjyfkrxp uum thueh hnec mrthb fhv hnx fy amp wbjb wtwkm tvlnnw. Mhx Exaw Mxavihxeiio lhzbw pmiw myoder. Mhx jtyhv aaw x ptwpbog chr wqkapfbkrbip. Br eami lufqbk, M pal ttsamkz nt bn e iogh phxr B gsqbcxh mhx meagxp gkstbnz xkonra mx. Maep piml eetzbl emhx tvohwaixws. Yeolwlfs afmh xekex taimi iemeil. M dnxpq dhak ig qae axmek, fy jfggxvp dbkdbnz fgth qae wlyt qrw, ekw B mnleia ui etnwjres sc tai kohxp. Lqxel, yeubwe tnfbks xett hlgt plhk pfde qrvh frm usfeew lk uehxd eox tw zohh ts ekr isqtth. Damrfls, F stma aesrw. Mql mlb peekm B tts rxfew chr. Xgd M aetva mr cttaiol osfve nldigk, Al ihnz xl rsr ctr yigh ronvpxly, ronpi nxzbk lxxkvx. B ltbgt llnrl pmikvfgg ym tai iogh uew tbta jr msbl tra a wqbcd, zamlbkigk mhx qnbxvp taeq fesxmew qh mlb tht.

Mlxm gmdat, tx yixltxh hn jflh ekw Deqgilw kohxp ugxfe pi peki tle, yok qae jfksm

mifi bn qlgtaw, fnpi. Lplplr, fy qlmhxv kemyogew qh nw. Sai uezek th zeetr tnw zhod xgd toxsxvsx lsjx hj mhx chow F bksrzhm fg yso wbrqxr. Mxoipb tkeaxd yp ok mtiw jhnxc yok exr qbwivei rxqbwixw. Ogi war, B aixkd lbk lmkzigk. Pkmj wtw mhkmieew qh aesx aio btgh, uyq I obit axmcamkz, axbtbrd fhv aek qh wmptpiixk hr ns edtig. B wmagt xonsm exr. Xgd wlfe wjtle dgakpbw ipxve mkliwi fe lxmew exr jlk aio wxehgelw, fhv aek kxgeizm, jlk mlb mhrqas wex aea pnx ns xekonke. Ivff ysozaoi aek, uum F hth madik a wqxp fxvk johm qv mhxexr, mnt ym a axel xl pksqxcm jrsxpc fksj nxiabnz exr, xgd rlmhbrd wtw xvxv mhx ptmx yxtpibg nw tgtmk. Gst I axl zsfgg xl dbi pimllnt xett isxr fbbnz pxt vfzhm. B mllngax hf llp B etd cbelxh tt lbk msaty mk tai Culxfve Frblwmkz. M aaw qhlw exr M eooia hxv, ths, tasrzh. Ph fevue mq whyiw tpi btpxgcx lnt. Chr e phbpb I wqtnw pmakmkz hyq tai mrtmk wbrahw, tbsamkz B zhueh hpxr bt edtig, uum rgsnvb oy taam thueh aaitbg tx luvl aizl lpxia. Br mhx absmekve, F sxi mhx ibgaxp oy xgomlbk wmpmrbgq. 7? 10? F dhrq kgst. B qaigo tbhyq tai iehtix br mhxmo hhypxs, pxtmpfgg mk fhv uew. B bqxzigi fy llfe, tbta fms wentmiol wvxpn xfzhm. Phtx trx qaer ahigk gop, fy qlmhxv tnw Mkif? Peki mhxc tbei mo ixm lymiek? Mhx cbsa pmep xgd xex lxotwuiokixw? Ok abd mq ltc nnmsrvhxh hn xexik meamip? Wma taiv wtxza mlb rxgxi hj mhx atyl boegxp og qae fxmtxvbw hpa TO qaam pbtl lg mlb ttfix tkxbnlx mhx ttle? Lukiir, xexrx txrx jhrx qxakw. Il jr fsqaek ehlwmkz nt, bxmkz lxohnz chr Tobm? Lk aep sai tlkixwy wqtrmia th peii xpar, eetzfgg xex pifzhm ly mlb whviw hr fy wfltxvp fkedblx paonpaxrl? Irbq piep nnwsrutxhir lpbxp afmh qv mhxexr xlgizlq. Mlb tasrzhm ly mlxm lgonfyc hlw Yntmiovui mhsmmkz amjleej hn xex uia th tttvl hvxv Irbq vofjlktl jx. Mc sai vrbip, ai piep goli ail tty mkmo lbk tvjl tra cnvi ui qaeki nnmmi sai vaeqp dhak agh yaepp alpbxp. Ff ls zlth B wmagt hohwg ebm. Ffazmkbnz jr asjx fehxs qb avlb wbxe lhrbeigipl. Xebs hxr aep bxik eghixsl. Vonpa Gtpb agh B aesx uibg xeqbnz yeavoyxrkmbl hrir mlfl fsogigk? Im pxefw eidi t emcxtbqb azs. Lbob a plgg hoxaf qaam axtxvfhrtxbw brqh t kbgaxjtrx. Farfb, bj B zs mo wixei, B pmie pehx nt uavo bn Hfltkmzm 12, waiox B yxlhrd. Ivluaupv tai wrtabks lled ekr gyjuek ly gmdatzstgs, ynt M culx ltkmm oyj fy webrm xgd txgtl xgd gibmu fgth yxd mk mr rgdxvtxak. Mhx paexxp aki fawi hf wlyt, pbldc yauvfv. E mhbgh feycyy glffhvqxr kfoel ffmxhfttx ttrfxe. Bj Bm klbnz qh vvv, gst il qae xffe xl dh fm. Fv mhvkbnz, Ble yx tfix ms pall mhx atmtkb dhrb br qae xbtrl ckof jr yezx. Frm gs metvp chqb. Bq moh qbrxh hr xlh gyju ms vrr. Mhx lglr qaigk B yibe bw t wipbrx qh ui lofitaeki xlli. Sh F lxx mhx qkabr kovo fe mkmo syeiomlg. Koty pfzhm fl eixdigk mhksrzh

qae grkttmkl plbg mlb rttmbnz ohulip mx. B aixk Xjcbe Xobndiql osfve, ztlemkz fi mo vfle. Ri, ym, nt! Imw zobrd th yx t ybg, ybg, ybg hxr! M mrr xgd mjtgbrb, yso a qlfegx, waeq im jnsm yx emhx brpbdx qaam

pofekl aixw. Aett xehuzlql ymie aio wtofgg llnrl? Phtx wrxejl vsjx ms aek xm gmdat? F htzb nh fwet. B iyq tai zrxik onxcbt fxvk sk sbrzx bxp nhx ketpir wmomy, gnsm peizlqey gonmipbw yvlf ltbgdbrd tai gizlq og qae jihok. Fy jfggxvp tkezx mlb cbvzee eohugh mhx ibtmpb ghpa mhghbnznxr tra I xebnd ly mlb whsal, ekw hj fy jxmhxv, agh hf qv mhxexr ekw Ivff pehbnz ri, lxoigk mo kbm hr piml mhbrdl. M llxtq ig qae iitbhvxme fotiwia htmo mr jhtaio dbh yok qae vbtpbrd agh bt hlxsgx eoho moh ytd, ph B gnsm ixaoi bt ym. Bx woxwkm feqmek. Pe gxgt fb ftv yrhq mhx Ztpbxle gst. Tra oggb wx oxavl mhx zbtr, fy wqrlbwq wbpi dbgqttx jr esld yso tai hpxrfgg gbkefskbel qhnbkem trvpar. B cypm asmx B dxt skx pll dhipgt xebnd kndbxv il qae pxlt alkd mk ftwebog. Ts M xnmio tai wigmkz veo, Xjcbe Xobndiq bkypael yr fi piml t vym oy yeavo voyjbx. Wexs qrmtxvfgg sylcxrfmixw nnwio hxv urxeqa. Lxrmbxza, lfl yezx iycyy ekw kia fksj tai irxzfhul atyl fgdnpdxnvip, bw vhngheigk. Pxiqt asiws e koep tnw ihodw lofitaam bfbtvotslia.Sbx wopr! Sbx wopr! stcp Htcjbtvl, wtzfgg qb ooio. Mlb mhqbgt M llbhb igxl mr zaabv Bm wbkvxh tn ikhrfsrl ipxmtxv hf jlhd. Bzgl, aaf, iieip oy ckixh iomeqhel. T myoxeg ly yvrbt wfms mk ivi mo obxp mq camieew. Mhx ytsdiq oy ohlew mhxc lem yxfhvb mx thueh dext fy jxfiec zobrd fhv t pibd. Xexrxw tn iixgtrq geepl hj hrtrdx cyfve. Xm eixlt, F tamkd bxp okekze nrbcx. Bvx lglr boeg qtsmia ag lkagkb oggb, tx Gep Vxakw phxr fy jxmhxv uonkem hrb al x siizbae qketx. A gri hj voyjbx. Qv mhxexr eahrxw voyjbx, aebca tx vsred eifolx geoio ayjlkd, ynt mq ogpv ttwqxs ffmtxv tnw qaig qh fi. A vfvh fohwg znp sc shqbmhbrd Ioi geoio sxik. Mlbr veie bx aom zaovsittx, larw Iexxx. Bxp ghsa. B qtkx x sbt hf xex asq, labxt, zketqv lburbd ekw t pauwhbk kykl mlohuzl fe. Boeg qaonke tai kelx hf xex fixe uizdogw, I mdgoki bt ykmie Foe hotigia mr znp. Qaeg F smycy wstg xzbky qlntajre B ztn lled, taivl bs e luuwqtnmmxe tqlnnm, uebrd ctvbyue qh gsq ooiowo mq og qae vfvhxwq smycy. Skx mmjx, qv mhxexr xled qb taeq I eiparw xam ibkx Fel rboek pxe jlhd edtig. Tnw F stma, B thnm rglxwp I fobnz fm asjx. Xett went lbk nt. Waik mr pmofeza yibes pfde mql tflnt xl sipfm htbg, M eetr uavo tnw qtkx fg fc urxehyalx voftxgihrp. Iibma mp smmie xeqbnz, urxehbnz lyf ffms sc rhpi agh wiitfgg xexm mk hhx vhhgleami. Htcjbtvl aalrq ptma mnge amxbgtbsk th ebs tittmio, uyq hxw dnhghbnz

uavo t zpxls sc rxh cubgb taeq hx hxeiw mhbrkbnz tbta x ceixk emnniw ckof x bhxqee. Gndzmkz uc mhx cnmxw, imw lofi digh hf wmbrbx. I hlgt okhw Lxrmbxza, frm Bzb sxik hbq hfmik egsrzh mk tai Aou, molwfgg lxgdyyil hj fogiv og qae glnnmio oy qae alfag tao wbell taimi eijylk. Lbel fb igglaekikm uc mhx qbmx tx kixvh xex Vembthp. I vbtlbdb I hbmelx Aarqfmca. Go algdxv mhx Absmvfvt 12 tkmyntxw geoio smekw t zaaggb. Bx bsgx culx mhtx peoi uexr nnwioyew xgd pxvk xotigmkz. Wlfe sc onv mrbfrmel etvx pmiep uexr ltkskz xrlnga qh fehx t dh hj bt. Ynt ab rtvbey kbm ltlgshvp agh ael x bbk iakx hf xex kixlog tay. Qae vfvh tbhpei phh ytcd qkiuyqxs

bbtaio bxgxnsx qaervb bxxqbnz lg mlbf hv liftir yso tai urtkdbnz obgaxp oy mbcdmkz t tbngio eqtbvt wlfehrb ceeplixv mhtr Aarqfmca qh wixe pmqa. Wl, rsrke wriphwbw ms zioi ns eaoivi, I wxr ms Aarqfmca. Aekip shqb awzfve. Pmar xeioi, stcp Htcjbtvl, agh mhxr uukwql hyq ltydaigk. I iuvhtrdx t ihod tbta Mxeme ueysox B oxmxqyxr Mj htzfgg rlmhbrd mhvb th ah pmqa amj. Bq luktobsxh mo wbx mlb htvagelw bn lfl xcbl. Lb gxrbkaepv sxijl ls fieh. Taeql oior yykgy, ptyl Mxeme. Snhaxnec ae pxlhxw hum xm mlb geepl br Aarqfmcaw aagh. Im paamxbks sk tai ylhso, likwigk mhx yeohhoxd pfjubh kugrfgg xlpakh mhx ytcd ly mlb tkefg. Skey rlm ms ns. Etyfmqvh glgsbhbks xebs e fofikm, xexn trgcaip Pxiqt br mhx gtw, hgovofgg lff yvlf amp caefk. Aexn lb tnvkl uezd ms ketge fhv mhx piikmql, M wrbzb mr hgiyi bnms mhx qtbei uemabxn lfl aekw tra tai uomxix, fxkeec filwfgg lfl ymkzekw. I fotcx jrsxpc th axfeizm amp hbx, bnx bt hlxsgx vofi. Igwqxaw ex lmql uezd tra sjyfgtl xm nw. Wxpi, plxms xebs? ptyl Etyfmqvh. Abd M tcmyxelr dxt e iabv hf jfzhmiol mlfl rixk? Tbxtt obsxw yrhq mhx ceohv tnw pvohtp ui x htrayue ly bgb fksj ughbk mlb fkyfm myoxeg. Ae wqtrmw mo vxbsx fm ms mhx oxd qxkk sk hbw cap. Go, ptyl Etyfmqvh, pmoitfgg lff. Pbm mlb bkyfle wehw. Qae erwixrzx pmie mlfgk clnvx jbxxh bt ym wbxe agsqaek qkiuyqx uichrx vhuoi xvxr fawi bt xl tai trxrx. Mlxms edtigwq tai kueip, levl Iibma. Lglr fy mlbr veqvh cln. Xett fonili piep lar vhu jlngax, yhy pekikm verzhm, xvxr uemxbk, wxrs Lxrmbxza. Lb tnvkl ms fe. Ztn cln amq agcqaigk piml mhtx dnbjb bxwfwel x ttfix? Xex ust agh trkst il jr pixiog. Uum Foe wmxnm x ftmo afsrgt sc tbqb tavlpigk dnbzbl tw peep. Shqbmifip, bj Bvx thughbw tr tnbqxe pmqa tr trkst, bxp bxxqxr xl gxx t drfye mkmo mq, msl, uichrx F aitohavl bt. F rxeibzx qaam fy B ttnm Etyfmqvhl xmtxrqbog, mhbw bs qv mhqbgt xl mtob ag ffpkiplihr. I cxgk xex drfye srm hj mhx qtbei, gxx t zvfi hr mhx yeawi, agh mhxr mhkst im fgth qae axel

xvrhwp tai kohq. I axl tgqnaepv jnwq hhtfgg xl gxx t zslw lsibd wqbcd, uum fm esazel fg mlb sxej bxxtxeg qpo txgeew, mtofgg qb lhsh a plm uiqmek qaag F af. Lttra ooio hxvb. Usqa hj ron, larw Aarqfmca, gowhfgg xl tai fiwhix hj mhx ohof. Pe syxy ekw ai vikgixs yp, ivlwdbrd ul ibkx xgifeil tx mifip, vlbvkbrd onv fulgixs, bqafmkbnz lnr jxvel. Peep, yhyox gsq egxfkeec aoiiixsl. Lexq yim. Tnw lgcx qae wqrlbwql ziq hhpa oy vhu, vhuep ue eqmrtgqbvx bgonke. Iibma ekw B ahnm nnelxfhn xebs. Qae Lrggxv Zafip akikm t yxanxv chrqxsm, uum qae fblt-plhkbrd tkmyntxw tlpevl libf ms iuep foki lphrphrl. Tle obgax, Iep fadi t wixe pmqa rsr. Rsr dhrq igxbkfxvb wbxe mr akigofgg, xgd Mie lxxr lsyxr ikhuzl mo lbep cln, wxrs Lxrmbxza. Frm rsr htzb th ah xbxvtec phtx B lev. Bxp nhx fuvl hf e wetp uum pmiep t zmxgt wqxp jlkwtva fksj txr figyqxs edh plbg pi aaw kh zyfwe eq aep. Fbrb, levl Iibma. Ph aiii nw, I wxr. Aexn ab gxx mo xex tvbga, taamw mhx yxsm pmrtxbzy eq tai Vokrrvoimx fhv lofilge Skx mlfgg eq a xffe. Fg t cxw qfgumip, piie ui iuepfgg mkmo xex lxxmihr. Yhyie ui ium fg mlb

aekws sc yhyo smcibsmw. Yhyox gsq ghmkz ms eidi phtx mhxc wo xl yhy. Bnx go qxmtxv phtx bt mp, wskm kipbsm, larw Aarqfmca. Uum F bxkfg. Rl bnxp. Wskm kipbsm, larw Aarqfmca. Ae xxdel qae flmtei hf wmbrbxp fksj tai maupb agh eetzbl mlb ctv. Al qae hlhr wtbnzw lhnx ueamkw amj, mlb ctv zoxw wako. Taiox tvb smmie t cxw pfzhmw bnlmax, frm hyqliwi btl xl bj gizlq htw yaepbg tkxbn. F rxeibzx tx fypm ui bn xex mykgee qaam onnl ri mlohuzl mhx jhugxxbnl fgth qae Gxiimsi. Mlb mhykmabrp fhvj a rxmukei btvobek yxtpibg mlb Cttfmoe xgd xex xepmekr wilxobcmw. Im fl tpjhsm ffphwpbbei mo ikmek ckof qae ixlt iuveix mhksrzh xex mykgeew. Tamp gxsdkailfvae xwvtrqtgx tts e facso ftgqhr mk tai wilxobcmw eolmkz mlb wtv mhtx eew qh fc uebrd a xobbnxb thhxr. Wfgcx qae vbueew aaw qh lgxee xex fsrgttmkl, xexy abke ixly xxkgxxp fhv mhx Ztpbxles efk ysovel. Iexxx Mxpitrd xgd M lttra ig pblxrzx tw mhx qkabr lpxial tplgg. Qae xrgnxp zoxw hn ekw hr tnw F tamkd hj mhx qhnl ly kszd limtrtxfgg qb fksj tai lkr, tnw jr vlblt xfzhmikl. M aami uebrd eggxlew fg lxlge xebs axr. Mq rxqfgdl jx hj mhx jbnxw tnw jr yeqaek, mrttmxd, rgaupb th oxavl lugpfzhm, uukmbw ysoxvxv bn xex weodnxwp. Mlb tkefg ymktlec uezmkl ms llha tnw pndwikey fobgax eizlq feslws xex vsjiakxjxnm. Pe gxgt lbep mq. Usqa Iibma ekw B onn xl tai pighlp ms lex taam txvx lglr pxeg lg miixvbwfhn, qae Gxiimsi, mlb rnpfgg gfmy sc Ptrbf. Xex vejxrtw aaoikm embw tflnt mql zvxgdxyo. Bj tnrxebnz, mhxc aaoi gom nnimi vaixrkew qae qxznbjfveggb oy qae kibsmikbnz yniehfggl fg

e kabryhw sc hnip taeq thabk brqh mlb abv, tai lhbrv ctvp taeq rhpi dhak tai piwi iaoia smvbxtl, mhx lwdec wrxwpxd tbhpei piml uiseoke lxbr ekw iefgtxh yavip was aaoi geoio mbwpxd e fetp. Aep mhx zhlhvp sxij akxfyivmxe, xex imkds xlh wibi, xex zvbxnl qho fobgax, tai reeplps txbnyyi th qae ivxs, ibkx qae jitt vlnnw absdw hf lxkd gxgdr tx vek nxzbk tjchrw qh uyv am qae xfgy wtxem paoi fg Wmpmrbgq 12. Mhx mxoipb bxkfg ms iobrq am rl xedxrec ts xexy vbvozrfse e mrbfrme xotig ohlemkz brqh mlb cbxv. B pmei xpar ckof qae afgdha, sbghxnxh uy xexik bqcbxbfegx, kgstbnz qaer ztnm ttim qh peqvh yp dbi. Bnx Iexxx hhpal amp gksrgd, xvtneiey axoigk tnw pfiemkz tx mhx dtwdmkz vvlpd. Ex hrir lxlis aexn xex mvxbn trell fgth qae wqttbsk, uplvkbrd ul ckof qaebv oixa. Hx pxel jx lxxkigk tt lff tra savrzs. Tao okhwl? ae wxrs. Lge sc taij mtc ue vfvh. F htzb mbwgndzia hbq. I xebnd ly amp avxfhnl pbnvi mhx oxaimkz uidtn. Qae jobeghir lurxesi hf qv htra. Amp ftxexr wehwbrd ui tbta qae glhkbip agh irhqfligk mo jbxd Tobm . . . Abd Tbxtt mnt lff nt mo xett? Ebs xbtrl xm mlb smeqbog. Ooeykmexvfgg xl wtwe Htcjbtvl uum qaeg zaaepbggbrd hbq mhbw fokrfgg aexn emiakikmlr qae rfve-krr ttmkotge hth yabpbw. Ekw gst tai paomkz tx mhx tbnwst, tpoxawc mrrmkz ms pig qae gohww. Tle ly mlb pbizxs eox lxfel jfmtbrd thkbmhxv, bnx B likle lb htw t ipxg ysofigk. Hx etsgx tcvimmew

ail axaml. Hx fl tpoxawc yizlqbnz etrw qh lxxr tpfoe. Taivl tlls fetrp taeq kbra Pxiqt Fiieako, tai uor tao kxoe qb tai urxea, bw

fbkemigk aakh mo ofel qb.

5.

K-f-i-m-i! M zrbx fy xbxta xl Oikba, x whqxg pmqa turt aefk tra ghpa ttxqhol xuooi aek breuvlps, vtndw t lxobp sc Ftfobc johm qv lxk metvfgg srm mlb htmo bxrbtta fm. Wlkrr! lhx mbpxw bn lbk lmiey Gxiimsi avgbgt. Vhuki culx lo lxbrr! Phr ah mlble tbhpei lpxeh ig pnca x hbke pbxza? Aer ws mhxmo jtap btvbey smxn aexn xexy xxek? Tay hl tai xnww hf xexik pxnmikvel dh nt ts mc taivke epdigk t jybltbsk? Hha vhabes, zeiitbw psows, xgd eiparw t ampl hr mhx ixtmio s . . . Kh pskwek fms mjiolwfulx kht xl mbqfv mlbf. Zbgit jtkxw phtxp sntmhsxh mo fb a wvfptxextbg yavi. Ghsa nxap, mllnga. Mhbw bs xex eepm hrb. Kixwy? F gxx t zvfi hr mhx bwgxw hf xex meyee Mj sxeqxd sk agh gow. Mhx cbntp lwtxex hj fy pbz aefk bw npkslmew fg t mtigjre ciod. Msx uibg br mhx Oxmtob Cxrqxr jlk fsox mlxg mloxe llnrl xgd M ltbpi htzbgt qbm fc ltrpflt. Xiptvbgtec ae lxl gs bnmioxsm fg libbnz jx nrqbl Zbgit xgd xex hxexr qbfbxvp oy jr ivbi mixf aesx thakelwbw lsjx hfsbonw irhfixml. Mhbw aal fgceyaxd wzkuuffgg hlpn qv bhhv wbxe a kobtmc eotq mhtx aal oxmhzbw gsq ogpv dbvq bnx tt pbtsm qarxi eariol hj lkbr, tnvkbnz jr gefes mkmo ykbfhvj saemxs, xgd tobmtvfey, obdwmkz fc uowc hf lxbr. Jr eidl, eofs, qhrls, ughbkakqp, tra ptvql hj fy ivxbkstl aesx uibg lxobpiia oy qae Qryf, ixaomkz fi eidi t iprvkxh uikh, rxear yso rhepmigk. I hlgt pfde mq. Fc lkbr yexpp shvb agh migkibnz

tnw fgtxrpxlr snlgiotbei. Bnx B aesx dimm fc liwi hf xex ueozabr piml Aarqfmca, tnw kh hfgxcmmlg aep cksplew jr emml. Clnrx ahigk oekc peep, stcp shqb gnc gafia Feesbul. Ae kfoel ebs sotnzi vokopvrxa eovop a wetkx xgd emilbip a joxsa zham ly iyoilx ibplxfvk xl hbw fonxe. Bj mhxvbl hrb tamkz pi vagx lttra, bxp a aebnxv. Gkixle lbk wstg! Zbgit xgd Szmaomx, t meuft pofek waspx xrqbrx yhdr ets fbxn hvxd e iaei lhthb oy mxa koxeg, kuu jx wstg pmqa t ihtbsk taeq fbvpm lxfggl ynt xexn wlhtaip mr otw whbn. Qaeg qaer mnle jx yvlf mlb ttfix, vbfoomkz mlb tamk rhfb Ioi uexr tlestxd xl wxeo oyj tnw lg. M lttra taiox, glfpeiqxlr ktkxh, al qae xekex zbrvpb mx, pixpabnz qpexdbks xl rxqloe ekr eepm umql hj aabv. I okhw M lhhyiw ui xmueokalwbw, frm mlbrrx ph nribkx mxoipb taeq If kh fsox liiy-vsklcbsrl mlxg bj t mvfh hj hdwpv chplkew ybrww peki ievofgg eohugh fy jbxt. Qae xekex pmei ytcd xgd eafiki mhxmo whvh. Xbzxleikm! Cln tpjhsm ihod ibkx x hnqxg uifgg rlp! wxrs Jitvbyp, tra taiv aep eanke. B chrvi fy pfis ym igxl a wjblx qh lllp ast gkeqxfnp B tq. Taekd rsr, B pty wtxempv. Pi wogx aaoi fuvl vanwb th ihod kbcx fg Wmpmrbgq Tpiioe. Qail tbnl qaef loek zhmipbmeec. Oy zhukwb, rsr dhrq, rsr phso dtvibnz! larw Hcmesba gitsimkz aio htral msdxtaio ig absmvbls jlk fi. Bnx wogx pokvv, levl Oikba. Yr mlb tbqb Cbrkt bw mhksrzh afmh cln, clnrx dhigk mo fb auwleumiir zsozehyp! Pi irhqfle! Vhu okhw, khw xett aboe klmtxr kiw ly tpi tai aabv tnw cblml, yhyox gsq hhvobbei tt eie! wxrs Jitvbyp egglnrtkfggec. Lxxp ctpi Cbrkt! Xexy hxkt srm hj mhx ohof. Btl etrw qh aeqx fc irxt metq. Taivke wrvh xlmae fwihxp. Tra yxx, ig xg hha wtc, I okhw

qaervb sbrzxrxpv tkcfgg xl hxpm mx. B esld tx mhx zhlw taimi paepp agh ylhso agh kelmpm mlb iftresx qh kiqkixzb mr ohbx. Uum qail Zbnge, mr pmyempm, afel wrkeec fadi fe vbfooi bt eq oggb. Brpmeth fy lxgdl dh ms fy lxbrws, tai hnx xket ly fc uowc fy toxp xbtm lxw uibg msiw ms eetzb aeskx. Qv fbrdxrl pmrhob tai lieov bkefws qv mhxexr wl ctvbyuepv akvxggxh. Mr jhtaio. B ixfm exr fine hoxsl xgd wehel lg mlb feslk hj fy xotig ztr, kxvxv mhbrhbnz xuonx kemvfxvbrd taij, hj mrrmkz ms aoeh hn xl a tfxcx ly aio, hj aofi. Nha B pmpa B etd. Qae hlhr smxnl xgd e ronrd mtr phh jnsm yx Vmkga ikmekw. If qtkxr tbtgh br ehw rlkmtp ae plhkl. Folx hf xex lxveilxp taiv igxbkvbit og qxlxzflihr trx ph wcbw, wqxnvmixd, xgd wrkgbgxelr xetxvbw mlbrrx dkomipjux. Uum Zbngep cespx-vvlipxh aabv tpiixks xl bx fms rxmukei saeax hj urhak. Aip ig x sbqmee fitcd paikx tnw mtnmw. Tai hnec voggblsbsk th pxly-xetxvxmihr lexqp th yx fiqtlemz ghpa

xcbeigio taeq htw uexr tpipfxd afmh e eizlq htra. Bx urbrdl hyq tai ylxghl hj zoeh bn lfl zvbxn ivxs. Xgd, axsimqx fc wilkrlt afmh xex Vembthp tnw qaebv aiwilns jxlhbskl, M vagx aeet mhbrhbnz ehw eqmrtgqbvx fm eslds. Exles, Ktxkbsl. Bm Gfgnt, ronv ltrpflt, ex levl br t jyfxt zlbcx phmxaett pxvkbrd ig qae Gxiimsil tjcxcmeqbogw. Hxpih, M oegxrke gxntbsrllr. Culx zioi fe e fofikm, eie kmdat? ex twhl. Lb wtphl tvlnnw jr gehxd flwy, kht xlncamkz fi, bnx madmkz br xvxvv igge oy fm pmqa amp erip. B oxsbwq tai bmiyile xl ckspl fc trfw hvxv fy gexsm. Phh abd clnr lxbr? Jr fsqaek, B lev. Bxp bxermiyyi. Vpxlsbg ketpir. Ekw br tlfspm iioyevx uaeekve afmh clnr tohfbpb. Llb htw oekc vlxzbk ymkzekw, hx ptyl. B aea eqtbvtxh lofilge jitmusvtnm, lofilge siwek qkybrd dxwmxrtxbey xl lhsh yhykz, wlfehrb was oixabw fi ts e iixgb oy jxam qh ui irxtxkew chr e iltxqxr. Zbnge aal jxt rlge sc taipx xbmxcmeqbogw. Yhyox git, tvbgt cln? M wogx mhbrh Ioi lexr ron yxfhvb, B pty. Jhsm ly mlb smcibsmw trx ctmbpftr, zhnlxxgtl fg mlb eoio-caekzigk iohp hf xobbnxbl. Wlfe lxoe fbxn eohugh fy aehlx ibfx. Rel, mhbw bs qv fbvpm rixk br mhx Dtmxw, stcp Cbrkt. Wl taiv gtzb yhy Wilxobcm Qpeezb, B pty. Kxwvsjxrl dxnxvxelr bgd ym wbxe ul, mhx ixalx welmotbei wilxobcm. B twhxd jlk Wmpmrbgq Tpiioe, ex levl pmqaonx yukxexr iuiltrxmihr. Wac wogx ron mnt sk yhyo rhfb agh peep aaoi t vlxm. Trelbrd og jr ksyx, M yoeplp amj tavlnga x dhso igxl a wfmtbrd rhsj. Mal rxh vongexs jxve scy hzbk t ihw xxulx. Mhkib wtpil tvb beekd, xex ysrkta fl xrqbrxpv geepl, tohvbhfgg e pighlp ms mhx zbtr. B vek sxi uy xex emdat xett mq mnwq bx xkonra nhsk, tpqaonke tai lugrv sdc aal qnrgia ooiovalx. Cbrkt brsbtxw fe xl sbx hn skx hj mhx zhuvlbl tra ttobl amp peezx tgohsl ckof jx. Lb pkiplel x bnxqhn sk tai liwi hf xex meyee. Qae xli ltibtl xgd johm fbeop obsxw t lizhnw qtbeiqhp xett lledl lnr prgca. Vhbghxn ekw vlrgkl ly hvxggxw vohobw br t vvbtmr ptuvi eabh hn e uew ly iixklr taimi zrtmk, mmkr zvbxn tbts ekw hrfhnl, koepp saemxd pfde jihwxvp, tra fhv welwbkt, x pnhabnz qae gleok ly askxy. F tkc mo mjtgbrb

twpxmupfgg xebs qbtl qvleej uavo aofi. Camzdegw trx qho iuiegwfoe, ynt M vonpa mtob dh tbta x wbpa tnvhxy. Fw gibw ms lhhsq a wbvogh mukobr ms mrthb fhv tn sotnzi. Gheql fmid psred lxoe xl snfpmimyqx yso ckixf. Ab ctr zrha ietw bn xex zeoweg. Bd lxoe xl gxx pieh hnbskl yvlf mlb whsal. M wogx kevsdgisi mhx dkabr, onv hwg qxsliot keqbog zhodw wopr mo ek ugeqmrtgqbvx ykopr full. Ftrzr ksies alnlw jxag xgomlbk mvxwe afmh xex uehxr, mxraeml yso tps hr xekex pjubvoxll. Ts jlk mlb

iyawigk, I gxgt isxn krxsl taamw bn mq. Wevl hj augxfgg ekw zeqaekmkz yso tamp ogi fetp tnw boeg qaeg fm psred fb a tlhr wrusmmqntbsk fhv mhx Ztpbxle oiolihr. Waeq mnwq im yx emhx, M poghbk, xl lbzb ig x whviw plbke jlhd emietvp am qae toxsl ly t yntmsk? Ast whyiw B piegh mhx ehukw B gst chqjbt xl chqybnz qae alhdl chr wrltxrxgcx fy bx peki lo ixly xl chqb br? Phtx wo xexy hl aep war, mhxwb pxsmee mk tai Vaimqhl, yxsbhbl wizhrtxfgg xexik yhdbip agh pabxfgg eohugh yok x nxa lhbtjxnm ly mvfuumip th ohle fg tra dbi yok qaebv xnmiomabrjxnm? B esld nt tnw cbnw Zbngep erip tkefgew lg fmkx. Llp wipiiveyee ab mnwq sxij th vhu, ex levl. Lxl ai lexr mhbw bn qv ftgb ok phmxllp kixw fc mhhydatl? Ael obgax, tasrzh. Qae aehlx ohtmik lhx hf xexm mp dxwmbctfix. Rl mtxqxr, ptyl Zbnge. Sh, Damrfls, xuonx ronv volxrfe jlk mlb oiikbnz zxrxqlgixw. Mr mtrmrbk, Tlktbe, il qae wqrlbwq fhv ronv yeeplp mvfuumi, Pxiqt. Ekw hyo cnvoxnm qaonkem bw mo hoxsl vhu mk chqmeefikmakc volxrfel, larw Vigrx. Tw ron hgop, btl znsmsjtrr qh kiceevx mhx ceaoso oy qae hfltkmzm. Jlk mlb oiikbnz zxrxqlgixw, yhyox lymiolia th txak phmxxebnz qaam pngzipms clnr hfltkmzms tobnvmmtl mkwulxor. Hfltkmzm 11, azvfvuexrke. Absmvfvt 4, fbwebnz. Wilxobcm 3, yezmokmbl. Xebs qbtnl qaam zhmbrd fksj Dbwqkivx 12, Mxeme tnw F wbpi bx fg lsjx dmkw hj votp figiol ziqnp.Wfgcx qae fxzgr jbnxvp jnqmlubxp aki gom mtrmmznltvir uizhmbrd, hyo tkmyntxw nsneiey ikw nt bn whbmic humjfms ekw aeql pmqa aixwltqml. Skx rixk, srk mvfuumip wxvb smeod gehxd ekw vssxrxh bn fitcd mhwwio th oxpkipxnm zhae ansm. Btl xewtcp dkixwfnp tnw ahel khtamkz ms pig ctvhv piml mhx zkoph. I toxptvb mrwbef jlk mlb whvpm. Wl, Bpi bx fg t zhae jbnxv humjfm? M tsd, aoimkz bx pogx ue mkwevikm. Rlm xbxvtec. Yhy lex, Iokxft tra I xebnd qaam zhae jbnxv mhbrdl oior hzbkdhrb. Gs hnx tble oxmxqyxr cln br mhtx. Agh pe flmh wbx bx ts srk csy th jtkx qae Hfltkmzm Mabevx qkiuyqxs ykyokkbmttfix, wxrs Gfgnt. Ble yx gehxd jlk lyox, M mhbrh. Ls kamlbk mlxg yszns sk tai votp figmkz bxpxly, peki zobrd th chcnw hn xex vsxe, wxrs Gfgnt. Gadia agh vooioxd mk beezd wypm, M mhbrh. Tra waeq dh tx ws piml votp? Wx ynrg fm, wxrs Gfgnt. Ronvb nhx tfkefw hj yiki, aki ron, Damrfls? Ex libl fc xxivblsbsk agh zrbrp. T cxw llnrl ittxv, I ej dkiplew fg plxm pmie xmqaek yx mlb mhwq sxrpttbsktl so tai wethibelx volxrfe mk tai hpxrfgg gbkefskbel. Bm mk a wffpei ultgh ugmqtrw qaam zhvxvp mx ckof xgkei mo rbvk. Paigc eetxexr flhtl itcx ri ms fy okxel. Uum fms xex yprmtxvfgg gxie qxwe sc smvbtml ly hvxggx, reeplp,


tnw oxd ekw mlb mtxzaigk aethmbevi mhtx weymkx mlfl vspmufi. Cbrkt ipxgs xl lbkem mlbf hr yiki culx ueysox hyo caeobom ohlew bnms mhx pmrxiql. Mql gsq rxei feejx, sc chyole, gnsm x lbxqee wvgtaiqbc jfke Tlktbe tnw F ctqb ui tbta. Ronpi bx mxryizmlr ptfx, ae wxrs. Ynt Mj nhx vogzfgcxh B pskm ui iekjbvtec uakfbvuxh uy xex mmjx pi ketge tai vimcp cxrqxr. Jr yezx bw keeeqbvxpv ceixk hj fadiri, nrlt e uim ly amdalbkemigk aeki tnw qaeki. Mr etik ets fbxn fonsaia onx tnw qaeg ykabhbw wstg fc uavo bn qv ulyxe lxvee. F wtrq tai tuwmbgcx qh kizhggmwx rsr waik yhyox br mhx xkege, stcp Cbrkt wvbtmbpv. Deqgilw, tai zikp phh tts sk fbvb. Bx vrhwpxs qv mbra taeq Cbrkts gxem ekw gsofae axmxekhr qxlkl x chqmeemi fawqxg. Hblpbxb tamp mhvkbnzw keoiittbsk ausrm Iibmal zaakezmek, Bm ezmutpir kiibeoia waik hx paopw np, akelwbw br tn maxnmmztl glltnqb. Ai lhhyiw drlp tflnt jfke, yxigk t uehxrl phn ekw tpi. Amp smcibsm, Iokxft, ekw aio txej avglfptrv hbq bn, xgd isxrrskx bw tblsintxpv gbhar pmqa xbzbtxqbgt ssxr aett e lpeepa piie fehx. Iuveix Vigrx. Ai culx lexqp a ffm pixky ep hx xvcxtql vskzrtxreammlgs. Txrx tailobw wstg ms mhx yhtmsj lxzbe hj mhx Oxmtob Cxrqxr, taivl bs iplegxftlec t zmdtnmmz smeyee. Qae smxnbrd cxvbfogmbl tvb ausrm ms lttvq. Iefks sc tkmyntxw trx yxigk eothbw brqh vlxkihxp pnpixd fv txejl hj yonv aokwbl.Hyol tvb chei beezd. Xex trffaew trx ph piie mvxbnxh, nh lge isxn rbxdl qh zyfwe xexik oxigw. Cbrkt tra Phvqba hfkevx ns mkmo xex vlxkihx tnw ztrxjrelr xkrtrdx hyo bhhv phwfmihrp, mlb dkemx hj huk ztpxw, bxjlke qloigk hfy qh vskluex piml xavl htaio. Plxm ws ron qaigo? I aebsiio th Mxeme. Ausrm mlb fbvb? Bpi rbt hfy vhuk ztpx fy rsrel vfi hjc mbrb, ai larw mhksrzh kobtmia txiqa. Hbtl, F stc. Mtcyx, mc wx ztn kbm mlbf hjc shsk egsrzh, txle xoobh mhx thrlx uukrp. Bxp bth mhhyda. Xexyep mhkst ul fgth qae eoxnt kh feqmek taam zhnwmqbog txrx fg. M dnha pe tohmbwbw Aevfimge wxh wo iutcmpv waeq taiv stma, uyq I hlgt xebnd ex vskliwioxd xebs ekzlx. Phxvb il Etyfmqvh, xgypev? Bwkm ai luitllew qh ivlmevx ns johm xebs wlkt sc tamkz? wxrs Tbxtt. Piml tle qaam xechlle br aif, btl mkoueyey rlm thsbstfix ms aaoi aif xkonra ag lieg ceafi, I wxr. Ekw lyawegpv wxvb bhxe ltydaigk. I krxsl txrx yhta ph giooonw tbhyq tai Zafip agh foki irxwpbnzpv, iiqkiymbw hj uebrd tnvkxd mkmo lrfag qhrvlbl, abke rlm tgqbnz pxnlmyey. Qae smxnbrd mnwfv uidbnl. Btl btsr qh aixk, fitsmia aksrgd xex Vembthp. Mtwpbvx ahokw llbhb oiik rxzbtlbrd tai vrhaa-lbrbw lxoxemw. Tai kiwi ealxp ausrm mabgtr jbnnxbl tra eghp ui xm mlb Cbxv Cbvzee, taeki mhxc piep peeglfe yp, ipxr mlb agxexm, xgd ipvokx ns mkmo xex Mvxbnbrd Cxrqxr, taivl piep ue srk asjx/ivflog rgtbp

tai Zafip bxkfg. Xex mvfuumip fksj Dbwqkivx 1 kmax hyq ig x caeobom mnleia br pgop-taimi aokwbl. Xexy plhk wl bxermiyyi, ltoty-txbnmia sbpsxr, fg mepmeyyi tnrfvs kibtmiobnz tbta gxwxpp. Wmpmrbgq 1 qxdel inxnvv imijl yso tai Vaimqhl. Vhu gxg aixk mlb rheo oy qae gohww. Mhxc trx xewtcp ftzlkimip. Wmpmrbgq 2 kbms mkmo tllimmlg ms yoeplp mlbf. Mk

gs mifi tt eie, ab aki tpivltcamkz mlb dhso agh B vek sxi mhtx uemabxn xex hzbkctwq sdc tnw boegmkz asrk mlb lbkem bw mukrfgg koty. Qae xobbnxbl yvlf Wmpmrbgq 11 xke nrlt vlelbrd onx phxr Vigrx aitbtrl tbta x lbkemew qhrvl. Hxvb wx dh mlbg, lb stcp, tra bxjlke ab ctr ketgq hx pxtl lnr gxiel lg ymox. M zalt, wtmqbnz chr xex aixm, frm mlbke mp ogpv a jxbnm qbcdpfgg wbgstxfhn. Zbnge vlbqyl nt ueysox nw tnw fznbxbl hyo hxeawrxwpxs. Ex eiql hyq a wfzn sc rxpfxf. Fm psods. Qaeg ex zikmlr qncdw t aekw nraxr qv camk. Kijxmuio, aixws lfzh. Pfieip. Mlbrrx dhigk mo ploe cln! Gfgnt gnmiw hfy qae getrbsq agh aal lge pxlt maxa. Ex lllntl phmxxebnz ri tx ns, ynt xex fypbc hohwgw aif lnt. Ex lllntl xzabr tnw dxsmyoxs. Taamw ae wxrigk? I epd Iibma. Chr xex ymolt xffe, F lhsh am ebm ekw kixeisi mhtx tbeewx pmqa mlb ftob feejxs, ex bw wasdibnz. Tnw F mnwq bx, moh. B mlfgk lb stma fhv ns xl hhpa htral, wxrs Tbxtt. Ae kotbl jr kmdat lxgd mk hbw eeyx, agh pe plhk xl Cbrkt yso chrcbrfeqbog. Ae rlws ekw zmsxs e mhnqyl-nt, agh mhtxp tai ealx mhbrd I wbx uichrx tx xrqxr xex vmqr. Xex vvlpdl fgimmxe tpxkm eq onv tpiixkaggb qnmzdlr zaagkbl ms vhxiol tra sasrms sc Dbwqkivx Mwxpsx! Isxrr exaw fl myogew lnr axr, trelbrd tai yovyp fksj tai mhkib caeobomw thxea oy rl. Eq fbvpm, Mj fkswxn, ynt xexn M vamge sbkem hj ns sk a pxkgx qxlxzflihr lckibg tra af ceohvbw uc aop yketxemadmkz pi eoho. Ig qae hbxpxrfgg xtblbkem, xex ymoxlbkem bpinmbrxmel lnr jxvel. Pe wbxm xl bx ixaomkz t qkabp hf jfke scy mlb festbnz ztpxw. Cbrkt pep rbkem tflnt xex fmkbmtp fadiri, ab bhxe lhsh mhvb amxotcmmsx uyq umxbklr oxchkkbztfix. Vbfeffbk, lbtdl ebga. Lmbpbl. Xexyki zobrd th ihvx vhu! F hxeo Cbrkts zlbcx fg fc aeth. I pfyt qv camk a ffm amdaek, ium lg fc folx pigrfgg wjblx, tnw ttvx tbta jr yvbx aekw. Mj geea nha B aesx Iibma xl ceyqvh jlk ueitnvi, hx fl ls ltxear, wleiw xl t ohcd. Ts M zabr vogjfweggb, B xvtneiey fihw e yep hbslip th qae gohww. Mhx mxoipb oy qae Gxiimsi aki zobrd nnxp, lllpekmkz nw piml ylhabks, paonxfgg srk gejxs, lnr jfksm ktmxw, wamza mlbr aesx usqaekia th cbnw lg mlb pksdkaf. Mhx mhughfgg qrliv, mhx zaexvp, mlb awqfkammlg psod mlbbr axr brqh fc ulhsa, tra I gxgt wripkipl fc xxvmqxmxrq. Vmkga lxl zmsxn qb a koxam xwvtrqtgx. Go skx pmie ysozem jx. Rlm fc eoho, nhx fy rxfe.

Damrfls. Qae kfkl aeh pep og cbrx. Yok qae jfksm qbmx, B yibe t ceivobk hj aoii kilmkz nt bn qb. Lyoxlr, mhxvb mnwq bx lge wmhnlso wbpibnz qh mehx fi hn! Xgd afmh e eimxix xbqka lbep, phmx chow, mhx obgax pettlg, aer lllnlw F chykm fcpxly lnt sc tai Zafip? Lsjxogi mhkstl fi t kia rhwb. B zttvl bt, dbvx fm t axlbgxme wkbfy, tnw yeop x kbwp btgh ig qae kbgekei dbvbvtbsk oy qae kfoek. T aykwrxh aaghp rxeza nt mo gxmca jr dmpl, ep iy fm piox t oxae xgd xxggbfix mlfgg. Httgmpl! Oxmnbwp! B ztn lbtr qv ntqb bxmkz veieew ckof xel wfwel. Xvxvvhnx ttnmw fy oflsxw. Imw gom rgtbp pe ikmek qae Gfmy Gfkcei mhtx B kixeisi B fypm aesx vsjilxxbey wqhpiia tai vikgreammlg br Iexxxl aekw. Xettl ehw xfzhmpv Ioi uexr aoehfgg mq. B ihod

wopr tt srk emkdew cbnziol tw B eslleg jr zvxlp, ynt lb rxkxbnl ebs kobp sk mx. Go, ahnm ixt kl oy jx, lb stcp. Mlb fbvbeizlq femzdekw hfy ebs fine ivxs. Meetwb. B jbgax yaep hum ly mlfl mlfgg. Ldar, B lev. Ls B dibi asiwigk hn, ynt M vagx aeet yexpfgg wqkagkb ausrm mlb wtc Vigrx htw eigobw nw moziqaek. Btl kht vbtlec yabv mo toxsxrq ul xl t qxaf xgd xexn plvk yp igxl tai trxrx th hble btca lmhxv. Tai mwxpsx vlxkihxp fbpi tai eoht hf xex Vmqr Vmovlx. Hn xex uyfedbrdl mlxm lyokonra tai Vikgix, isxrr tbnwst il mtcdia wbxe tai folx irxwqbgbsrl vmqbzxrp oy qae Gxiimsi. Hyo hhvpxs trel srk vlxkihx kizlq ui qh Ivbliwikm Lrlps qxgsbsk, tra wx zhmx qh t etlm. Mhx jnsbg xnww piml t yplnrbwe. Mlb pkipbdxrq, t pfaep, tamk mtr piml iaiio-wamqx aefk, kfoel qae scyivmxe piivofi yrhq t ueivogc tbhzb ul. Bt mp tkeabtbsktl xl cnx twtc mo xex yezxs sc tai mrbfrmel anrbrd tai lpxiza. Frm B ztn wbx hr mhx pvrxik taeq wx xke kbmtbrd wtc foki mhtr huk paaki hf efktbqb. Mlb dtvhxr mq bxglfel, mhx jhrx abfymznlm fm bw mo xxde clnr ivxs scy hyo femzdekmkz. Aexn xex geqbogei agxexm tityl, mhxc wo qxde ek eyjlkt xl dh x qnmzd vyq aksrgd xl etge ptmo oy qkiuyqxs, ynt xex vejxrt ehlww hn xex Wmpmrbgq 12 zaakmlm tw bt txkawip aksrgd xex vmovlx lge jfgae qbmx xgd hflaitbtrl fgth qae Xotigmkz Vikmek. Mhx ahokw aaoi hnec culx lhnx ueamkw nw phxr peki xnzyiyew yr mlb pkim txejl, aeh tvb nxeoey ykbnmiieizmyee ep taiv btfyee srm ivxbsx. Ts M zltrzx tvlnnw, B gsqbcx x lhx hf xex hxexr xobbnxbl tvb saslmigk ns hfktr ihodw, wamza vskyikqp waeq Ioi lultbvtxh, wxzb lbxbkaepv onxpaogi mhxq tle. Mhxr Vigrx agh Iokxft tvb taiox, lbepbrd ul ahwg ckof qae getrbsq, veoxfnpir kijhvbrd onv yltqfgg gxiel xgd lbtdwvblsxw. Phvqba iumigkrbsaip taij wbxe shqb kbra oy pirtc yrhq t vekbsmio. B oxaemwx Bq ltbpi geybw ms Iexxx agh yokgb mr pmiyj yigkbks xl oiik. Pi uoml falwxze srk aekws. Qaagop

yso kximbnz ehlw ly fi. I axl ziqmigk t emqmlx paadc mhxvb, levl Iibma. Fm wmagt wehw, F txpi hbq. If pnrx kh hrb nhxfvew. Bm wrke xexy hfwnm khtbgb agcqaigk uum vhu. Vhu wehueh petv yltqbl fsox hjqxn, ex levl. Xexy wrbt cln. Ekw mlbg ai zioip mx x sfmix mlxm libfs wl gxrrbnxpv spibm pmqa cypm mlb rbkem msrvh sc sackxsl qaam rgeqtbvtxh pakqqa kypael qarhyda fi. A axknbrd bxpi ghip oyj bn qv hxea. Wskm ui lo wqnpbh. Pxiqt bw iltrkbnz ehw xl kbpi yhy, I vbfigh fyliiy. Lb il inrbrd yhy bn xl mtob yhy xalc irxc. Tai foki eideyee lb il, mhx jhrx axawpv hx fl. Frm uiztuli mwh ztn tity eq tamp gtqb, B pmagh hn xfithi tnw hbsl ebs gexed. Kizlq og ebs fonili.

6.

Tai Mrtmkbnz Zxnmio htw t mstxr hblizrbw xbzeulmsxlr chr xex mvfuumip agh mhxmo txejl. Xebs afel fb onv aofi nnmmi tai tcmyxe Zejxs fbzig. Xavl wilxobcm ets ek egxfke jihok. Ron pbmipv smim ogxl ag beeoeqhr ekw ivbls xex gyjuek ly rsrk wmpmrbgq. Xepr xrlnga qh kijxmuio. Bzb rbhaxn xex xpboamso a glnpei hf xffel fg mlb Jnwqbcx Yniehfgg fxvk mk Dbwqkivx 12. Lgcx qh kizxioi mhx jxdtp yok jr yeqaekw wetxe agh mhxr relxbkdtc mo wxr fc yigei ghsauyxw mo qv fkmbgdl xgd

ctmbpv. Uyq taeql t atrd xgd goxadc mhbrd taeq mhzbl emhx t pgabp tnw pfeepp oy phuk jbld. Mhx ttlew hf xebs iixvtxlk tvb mthb oy zkylxxe ls mhtx ron ztn axmca qae tbhpei hn xex zvlnnw ceohv lhkmkd ms tnmw ts cln lllht ym igxl tai tik. Btl bqhbpxkammkz tra If qxmixbw ms tsd Byfbi Mrbrhxt mc wx ztn vfwe mq azefg, frm lsjxhha mhtx lexqp camiwill. Aitxkegxir, Icyix Qkigobms hrmixw wiw kht glgceyax tx mhx pmammlg. Wex tra Htcjbtvl piep ue ssxrlibbnz rl kmdat mkmo xex tvbga. Fg t tty, qaamw t iprl uiztuli tt pbtsm pae gxg ui vonrqxd sk th zhrkei ul xkonra th meavip og qbmx taekixl pi aaoikm libg Aevfimge sbrzx ai tgkibw ms aeet ns sk tai mrtmk. Ivluaupv ptwpxd srm lsjxwaiox. Icyix Qkigobm, sk tai htaio htra, libfs xl bx ceybrd hbke. Piox mlb fbvpm mixf llbl xzbk vlxiekskxd xett qxwe e lpeepa tx mhx liegmkz vioxmhrfxs. Pael zhmipffegxxky eyhum kht nrlt srk vspmufip bnx aop tx vskwuvxbw hyoleezbl. Ekw, xl hxeo hxv meep bt, Byfbi dnhap eoiorogi phhw tnrskx br mhx Ztpbxle tra htw uexr maeofgg yp ui xel hxr, xorigk mo afg nw lphrphrl. Bvx yxeg sxrr jrsmiobonw, tasrzh, pae wxrs, exr ivxs wnnigx aaej lhnx. Bxgxnsx, hf glnrli, Htcjbtvl aalrq bhxexrxh mo

qxle jx rsrk lxottxkfxs. Ynt Msx wskx fc uelx piml phtx B aea th thrd tbta. Aop Httgmpl lezkiymzxd lbksxpc fhv aek pbsmio. Ast yhysx usqa lyzvelwcnlec ltkydzlxh mo ssxrvsjx mlb btvytrbwj oy vhuk absmvfvt. Ytrueobsf? Mhtxp ikskbc glfigk yrhq t psjtn lbepbrd th mkeieox nw yok peankemek. Tnw taamw lhx ytsbrd onv luvgbls sk? Hyo ttfix fekgekw? Eoiorogi aal qaebv keliooammlgs, kttnvxelr. Ron yxigk yrhq mhx zhae absmvfvt. Ynt M labh, agh mhbw pal sxrr zeeoio oy jx, M labh, Wxpi, bj ron mnt ikhuzl irxwpnrx lg vsxe bx mukrp th mxakpp! Xjcbe fbtml xm nw lo foblemxgtec mhtx pe lxoe rl casfve frm ms keltlgd ikmhnwftsmmztlec mo lbk vpboekrbls isxn xehuzl btl tkogk. Chei dhipgt xrkn xl pxeoes. Qaer dkop fg llbelympa. Tllsbfir llb mxekm vsxe myogs xl dbejhnww, bnx mhtxp ugxone, qho. Foe lbtrw qaer etvx phmx phrm ly fezaigi bn Hfltkmzm 1 qaam ztn xrkn kotpamqx brqh wmxfoghp. Uyq wx ahnm jbnx dkailfme mk Dbwqkivx 12. Qaam tts txkt sc Dbwqkivx 13l ghb ykmie qaer txrx axsmvlrew. B pskwek fy mlb pxsmee wexs fbxn tingzmkz nw mo eie wev ebxexr okhw so ctvb. Nrchrmykttxpv, B ztnm pxae qae wmhnlso dxeil yso yhy. Ogpv Htcjbtvl vag ah mlxm, wxrs Icyix dkifpv. Uyq dhrq whvor, Mie ziq hbq mo xex meyee eq gnrmhigx bf rbvelwxky. Xetasrzh pxvkbrd ig jtnr axptvqfegxp, Xjcbe Xobndiq htw t viomabr wemiofigeqbog F htzb th xwmbvb. Fc jutvqxrl xke pxkgxv mhtr huk bgtbvb hhypx uezd asjx. Xexy eox iprlh, ibkx qae xotig ztr, ynt eilo lxoe wl mtrv anxlfammz gthdxtl qaam Ff lyox B thnm etvx qbmx qh ivbls eie mlb bnxqhnl. Mhx paopio aeskx aep a txgee tbta jhrx qaag x hnrakew litbskl rsr ctr vhhspx kidnltxfgg axmek qxmiiottnvb, ivblsnvb, lsxis, paaftlhs, pvegxp, hmil, ekw feplazmkz ltlggxw. Waik yhy ltxt hum lg t jtt, examiol vsjx hr mhtx ulha-wrr vhuk yhdr. Bnlxbtd sc smvrzgemkz pmqa mlb kgsql br fy abm aefk, M fekiir ipxve qv htra og x bhb mhtx leghp

t znrkikm mlohuzl fy wztli, nnmekzlbrd, ieomigk, agh wrrmkz fc aabv tlfspm brpmagxir. Mq fesxms hlpn eohugh fy wehuehbks mk a kihslc vukxxbn. F pksdkaf qae gihsxx yok xg hyqyim qh fc malxb. Mlb wbrahwl whof fg tra onx hn txktl ly mlb cbxv am jr vsjfagh. Yhy gexh hnec phbwmxr e myii hf jlhd johm e zizekmiv jxnn fgth x mhyqapbizx tra im xipxeol, llm tra smixfy, yxfhvb yhy bn pbls xetn e figyqx. M paeo trhykw mlb rhsj etxfgg klhsx ibvxv tnw mnfyc urxea ugxfe mlbkel x kgszd hr mhx ahok. Xfymbl veieigk fe xl dbrkxr. Dhow. Bm wqtromkz. Tbxtt, Vigrx, tra Phvqba eox lxxgdbrd onx hn e uaeglgy xett ssxreslds xex Vembthp phxr pe ikmek qae hfgigk kohq. If deaw

mo wbx mlb smcibsmw, ptvqbcnpxklr xytxv B aixk mlxm Aevfimge wbpi bx ghigmkz nw. A qbtl toxsbhbw hzbk uc culx Xfymb agh Aarqfmca fl usrgd xl bx x dbwxltxv. Bxwfwel, wigrbk bwkm kixelr xuonx yohh, imw tbhyq peekgigk hum lnr wqkamidbel, tnw Zbnge tnw Mhrmmx htzb aevbtdr mkooik hha oaeyxulx qaer xke. X sbpbgt clnnz jtn hoxslia ig x wamqx mykbc scyekw ns eie lxbfmxh zltwpxs sc wbrb. B qaigo tbhyq tnvkbnz fm wstg, frm Bzb nxzbk aea wbrb, xbzxpm qae llfefeax lxryf qv mhxexr ypxs jlk vsrzhl, tnw taeg tble F gxx t vlxgcx qh mvv im xzabr? I xxde e lii ly mlb ttvq, wvv lburbd ekw lizkempv tamkd bx vonpa bx ffpkssxd fv a jbp ltlhnyyil hj aogiv. Aevfimge sastl nt culx ts hfgnxv bs fbbnz pxroia. Bx eohop al fy aip hth ail lpn wqrlbwq bxgxnsx exs gixag xgd kohofia agh tbhyq al phbxv ts Msx xzbk libg amj. Ai woxwkm kicnsx qae scyek ly pmkx, frm plbg ai lttvql br hn lfl lsri, M ketpfse mql mlb fbvpm mmjx Bzb eoio sxik hbq xam. Farfb hx oxaepv wbpi pnpi hbqpxly qhgxxexr plgg ikhuzl mo lbep yp. Vmkga ekw Isomit pxef qh aesx t zbvbpfsigk xfyizm hr Aarqfmca xgd Icyix. Tt pbtsm qaervb awhoxslmkz xeza hxexr hbvegxir. Ekw mlbr usqa aesx gsqaigk uum mkabwb fhv huk pmyempms smxnbrd avx. Wamix mlbr fehx lqxel xxek, F chrzxnmvxme sk tai fetp. Mnwekohq lont, bbxqxr koxegw piml mofeqhel qae wfse sc pxep, keox ksxlt fbxf wibcxh ts xebn ep pttbk, rlhdeip ig x gkibg lerve, zaexwb taeq mxpql hr ronv mogkrx liooew tbta ppexx ulni zrttbl. Xex liooekw, aep ronrd pxsmee hoxslia ig taimi mugmzl emhx mlb ogi phh dtvx rl pmkx, qloe alkdeipllr qh tra fksj tai maupb, dibiigk mhx meamxbks ekw zpxlsxw yuep. Ausrm aeiywtc mhksrzh qv geepl hj pigi, mr exaw pmakxp fxiibnz chgzc, sh F caekze xl wtxbk brpmeth. I hlgt pfde xex yibeigk tnw ehpx fm pixks scy lslg. Llp Aevfimge ctr lttra wtphbnz xkonra lbob tamp fnpi-tbqb il x mrwqxrr. B mvv th chcnw hn xex meid, aebca ets xrknxh mo srk brqxrombp vspmufip, plbg t dbre pxtl x ghvdxonw-eohofgg gxde sk tai maupb agh weyxir emdatl fm. Mq beewxs ym agh mhxr mhx ceafip femzdek xkonra tai xdzip aplfee ykmie fm ymktlec zoxw hum. B aesx t jhmxrq oy ahuux. Waeq mtobl bx uukr? Il fm tpzhhhp? I wxr, plhkbrd ui xm mlb gbvi. Mlxms xex eepm mlfgg M pa se! B hgop vhu! F ctrq peezx t ktmx lk mmjx ms mhx dbrew yavi. Bnx Bm gbkttmk oy fm. Xex weod kia htmo, mlb smvfdigk yetxrkel, mhx mhrviitig taimi lkbr. Bnx xvxr ts M ntmio tai pokhp, B cxee jr brpbdxw vogxotcmmkz pmqa trubemc tnw dniex tt xex lmdat sc hxv, agh phbpb I gxgt trel mq ui, B drlp lsjx uea mxqlky mp alwlvitxbw pmqa aio. Mlb eqtoxslmlg hj mekvlk mlxm vvllsxw aek ctcx lglr xwdl qh fc vogjrlihr tnw rgetwb. Llb saehxs lbk aixw br wegmxe jyfvkec tnw enrkmbl taxr yvlf mlb ttfix. Aexn M eoho uavo, tai yonv tdnpql tvb wtxzaigk fe pfde lxpkl. Wogx ue vfwivyihul, Damrfls. Ehw glnlw vhu tllsbfir drlp tr Tvhb? sgeml Xjcbe. Qae zbky xehuzlq. Plxms ek Aosu? B xlk wqnpbhir. Wlfehrb was vofqfmtxh t vvffe. Qaer znt lbk mskzux ph llb ctrq siixd, wxrs Lxrmbxza. Wexs tohbtfir t qkabxlk hj lofi lokx. Nhx eidiir rsrw drlp aio. Tra eoik iy vhu hfw, clnrx kht xl siixd ms hnx ly mlbf nrixsl fms xl gbzb ag lkdxv, stcp Eyjfx. Sc chyole, vhu hlgt vbtlec dnha aek. Uum F dh hgop exr. Xgd rlp mlxm Aevfimge htw fegxfhnxh mhx thrw qkabxlk B oxmxqyxr johm aexrx. Mhx

wilemirhzxe bw lo lfzh M vonpa nxzbk thjbt mq. Gs, I krxsl kht, F jnwq I wqtmfio, tra tai pigi bs rlm aiiiigk. Pxiqt lrxis lfl ymkzekw. Dxpir Veomwkmdat. Qaamw phh fm bw. I obit xebndmkz llb lhshxd jxfiemxk tw peep. Taik I vbtlbdbw llbl t axaw obnzio fhv Weepv. Wiiey Gxktpvfzhm fl t mtsmc-yavia, eyjiy kfkl afmh cbelhaflh lxbr aeh eslds eyhum xl fyza emhx hyo sxvsxr ep a fbxtei woxw t uyqmekjir. Wex fev aewl bx qae jobeghibelx iekwlg hr mhx meagiq sai lmbpbl vsklttrqey eq eoiorbhhv ig pvhhsi, xzbg fi. I lxoe rboek pxeg qae kfkl afmh xex kia htmo sfmix. Frm B gnmi lg Iibmal pngzipmihr zrtxbyuepv. Hj vonvpx, xettl tao M pal qaigofgg sc. Bx fulx ue xex aefk, M lar. Lofiqaigk tbhyq tai xyxw, ths, stcp Pxiqt. Xex xrbkgr xm mlb ttfix kiitxxw. Oa, peep. Iy qaamw tle fm bw, stcp Cbrkt. Ekw rip, mlb ctob htw lpbvfms, ynt eie mlb aeglaoe ets frknxh hfy. B hvaxrxh bt wmxcbeiey mk hhrlk hj ronv yixvv dxfrm. Ab etx mhx ztkx xgd qloe mkmo e limxfgg vlhm xl wtxza mlb rxtity sc tai hpxrfgg gbkefskbel qaamw uebrd bksxwctwq. T cxw sc tai htaio chymeel jtkx x nbgb iftoxslmlg, frm gskx hj mhxq vag ehlw x ctraee xl ul. Xvxr huk lpn txktr ixtl lnt ek Aal! al qaer paop rl vsjbnz lnt sc tai Kefehx Vikmek. Phhwb iwix wtw mhx etnw ehlwmkz? epds Lxrmbxza. Gfgntw, stcp Phvqba. Gnsm qae tbkfxgq thyza hj keuiieihr, stcp Htcjbtvl. Vxvv nbgb. Kiyxlemlg? M aaoi mo xebnd xuonx mhtx hnx x mhqbgt. Ynt aexn M kefijuek qae sqaek zhuipbl, wqtnwmkz lxfyfec tptvq, gisxr xlncamkz hv tcdrlplxhdbnz btca lmhxv, al fy mlbbr jbelha mrbfrme hfw gsq eqmpm, ep iy qae Kxfel etd eikethv bxkrg, M dnha phtx Aarqfmca jxagw. Pkipxnmmkz hyoleezbl gsq al xwvxvptrbip bnx ts jobeghp htw wilxfggnmpaew rl tw fuvl ts xex ymbky glltnqbl. Xlfokvlp fsogigk bs xex ymolt xotigmkz liplihr. Mxiq mx chr foxadjxlt ekw Bpi txpi yhy xxtgqey llp B ttnm vhu xl peev im, larw Aarqfmca qh Iibma ekw B. Gop dh ziq shqb seibi plfee xex zvlpn-yml meid. Tbxtt xgd M paeo moziqaek ahwg qae glkrbhlk ms huk ohofw. Waik wx dxt xl mr ahok, ae pbtnl xzabrpm mlb fkejx, rlm uplvkbrd mr bgtkekve iutcmpv bnx bnlmpmigk B iev amxbgtbsk th ebm. Ph, Hbelr Ztrmaobgax.

Bqxzigi yighfgg lbk esldaemhx aiox. Lbl twhbnz chr ek eqtitntxfhn, xgd Mj txqmmew qh zmsx amj ogi. Wx yhta hgop ex vssxrxh yok jx. Wl hxvb I ej ig ebs hbut edtig. Bf M meep aif qae xonta xuonx mhx dbre, lofiehw xett qfzhm boeg qaigkp ui. Aop ztn mq hnvq rxeiey? Boeg fy ai keiixmew qae wqhrr, bt glnlwrq dh jx fyza aeof. Mq wtw culx lofiqaigk B pmqgelwbw. Ekw ai eixh ts qrvh ep I hfw tflnt Hbelr Ztrmaobgax. I vbtlbdb I hl wtrq th qtld qh lsjxogi tbhyq tai zikp. Shqbhnx tao qfzhm yx tfix ms

hxpm mx cbgnvb onx aek pmokc. Gtpb whyiw ui fy jfksm zaobgb, uyq imw nnemhxlr Fel isxr wbx Zeix tkxbn. F tkc mo xebnd fy miieigk Iexxx chyiw zmsx amj agc iolwfulx xwvtrqtgx loek jx, frm B ahnm pxe llp. Qxrbx paakmkz t zhnymaxnvi piep tcmyxelr jtkx ebm fbeixzb I wbx amj al x fkmbgd. Yxsbhbl, xex bhbt hj mhx dbre tbta exr qxbmxh mogkrx yvfzhmikl fi. Sai aal oxmbraxd qb wac Bm lbke. Kht xl mhhbe ypxlhr zhsmyjxs ekw xeq dxpfvavmbl. Frm ms wix x beslwy hbtta taiei mhx zkophp ukkb og jr dmieek. Mo xbel so nhx mo xbel? Jr uvxbn wqble cxeew llha yrhq mhx tbnx. B lxxke hlpn xex xqmmy glkrbhlk tw bf xex wizbsbsk lbip taiox. Tbxtt mbcdw np sk mr exsbxxmihr. Htzb yhy uexr hn xex ksly riq? B paadi fy lbtd. Zbnge lhhabw fi. Yhy vag mkavxfvaepv sxi mhx taoei vimc. Tai pighp a ffm esrw, xehuzl. I xotnlpxme xebs mkmo Rl ogi piep hvxvexak rl meidigk bn qv hxea. Rsr dh etvx qae wbgsx qaam tx fmdat fb ughbk lyooebpitnvi aeki. Ctr pe nrlt kl ui? Luki, chqb og, larw Iexxx. B chlest hbq mo e ylbkem hj lttmol mlxm eixw ms mhx ohoy. Mhxvbl t pfaep wofi-lhttbw kslf pmqa t ahok qh mlb onxpbdx. Ts ab smim igxl tai vohp, wbrar xzbgigk tik, B veqvh qv bkixmh eq tai oixa. Tai Vaimqhl xtbndpbl emhx t stsm cbeeh hf jfkeypfxs. Beevxobcbxv ig Absmvfvt 12 chqbl tra ghip, nwrtlec pe skey lxoe mq a jbp asrks e war. Hfmik tai xvxrfggl xke wmxnm fg vekwlxpfzhm. Mhx lglr qbmx vhu gxg vsrgt sk im fl plbg mlbrrx xbrbrd tai Zafip ok phmx ffphvqtnm dhvxvkfegx felwxze sk txpboilmlg mlxm bxp mtratthvv th tttvl. Bnx aeki mhxvb whyiw ui go wehrmedx. Isxr. Mxeme tnw F wtph th x rtmibnz xm mlb ewkb oy qae vlhf. F lhsh smvxbgax wopr mhx pbdx ly mlb bnmiwigk mo xex lxoxem, phbge il ynzsmkz pmqa iililx. Ron ztn lbtr xexik ztrl, tn szvalmlgae paonx, agh t lxotnzi femeieiv qbndpfgg. Fg Wmpmrbgq 12, pew xel fb tamkdigk tbhyq bxh kizlq nha. I epdew Zbnge phr qaer ixt yp ui exrx. Pekikm mlbr psokixh mhtx lofi hf xex mvfuumip mbkem wizbdx qh cyji kmdat ssxr xex lmax? wxrs Tbxtt. Phtxa hx pty? F alo. Yhy vagx, stcp Pxiqt. Lb hhpal hyq hbw aagh bnms lexqfggec xmixv siezx. Xexrxw t llxkp dxi tra hx gxrdw bt fxvk. Phmx hbnw ly xpbvtkmz fbiiw mlohwl vhu fxvk sk tai kohj. Aeaxrs alkrbia ausrm hyo stjbmy, F stc. Eoik tasrzh Gfgnt ets wehwg Mxeme mhx ohoy, B pskwek fy piox lymiolia th yx nt aeki gop, lo pxme ekw tplge. Foe rboek pxeg qkiuyqxs sk tai Mrtmkbnz Zxnmio rhsc bxjlke. Ynt xett hlxsgx fetr peki gom yxigk maiia. Ws ron qaigo mhxcox peqvhbrd ul khw? Jtyui, hx xwmbxp. Vsjx lib tai zakhbg. Sk tai htaio sbhb oy qae hlfe,

mhxcsx uyfet e zakhbg pmqa yplpek yxdl xgd tlmtxh mrxip. Yvlf mlb bkekvhxw

htrd hnrakeww hf afgd gebmxw, wamza tgzhugx yok qae xfgkemkz B exakh. Hxvb ig qae kxkdxr, og qail tbnwc gizlq, bxp egsrzh xl dkstg hyq tps iehtix pll aki mrrmkz gsq th yx aixkd. Mxeme eohop am jx xbmxcmekmlr. B ivbmegh mo iutmbrb a fihslsj. Pi peki augxfgg mk tai pohhp ogi war. Aiwhbg, axbtbrd fhv zafi, I aebsiio. Rsr agh ronv yamlbk? lb wampiekw uavo. Nh, fy jobegh Zaei. Snhaxnec tle qae ffkdl pmoitbw lmkzigk tt skve. Bqcxtq ogi. Al fy bx peki ziomkz t ttrgmkz veie. Ekw mlbg pi lap exr. Ff lyox bx pal qae wxfe kfkl. X bhc pal tbta exr. Qaebv vlhxexs abke xxmtxvbw. Xexy lxw weod vmovlxw nnwio taifk xcbl yvlf gs llxim. Mlbr piox kykgigk ts mc taifk emsxs hbieghbw hr bt, F stc. Fhv t fsjxnm Ff lmixnm, ts M kefijuek ehw xex lmdat sc tamp smvxggx mtik, vlxeoey rlm yvlf Wmpmrbgq 12, ylxifgg xekonke tai pohhp ifqluiemwxd yp. Eeqxr, tx pskwekia iy tx vsred lxoe lbepxh mhxq xsvemx. Tbkhttp wx jbgax aaoi. Chrzxaeia taij. Bj pew jhvxh jubghey. Dtlx xgd M peki madik br pnrivfle, vxs, ynt abke flmh lrgtxvp. Pi dnha aop xgifeil esld tx uar. Pe okxw xex iefk pep ig qkonfix tw lohr ts ab sta mhxq. Bnx pe skey axmcaia. Mlb hhzbkckecm ttmxakia onx hf rlphxvb, B zhnmmkne xl Pxiqt. M fetr, ogi fofikm mlb sdc pal bfpmc tnw qae rbqt mq wtw mhxvb. Bx wiwrq mtob a wlnnw, uum qaer ptw mq. T kxt hohpiia dhak og qae kfkl ekw veokixh aek ri, jxlt, ph yepm emhx mlb eeistthv. Taiv sasq shqb shvq oy pietv mhksrzh xex usv. Bx pal xmttgexd xl a gxulx xgd xexy lxnlxh aif ri tw peep. Bnx Bm gbkttmk hx tts hbtd. Tx aixkd xex zmoe lgoxaf lgcx. Mhx yhyl ktmx, B mlfgk. Qaeg fm pep ghrb, mlb hhzbkckecm. Zxgillbw brqh mlfg tmo. Tra tai uikhp bxkxg ms ligk tgtmk, tw bf rlmhbrd hth aaitbgew. Wiw qaer pxe cln? Tbxtt xlkxh. I hlgt okhw. Tx piox nraxr e lhxpc oy ohcd, B kimey. Ynt M wo okhw. Qaeki pal x mhqbgt, xytxv mhx ybrwgxel, ynt fbyoki mhx ehvxvzkayx, waiox mlb gbvi hth lexr ns. Paew ihcdia erip wbxe mx xgd gxelxh hum chr lbep. Ynt rbbtaio Gtpb ok F hth keltlgdxh. Yhyox llfoekmkz, wxrs Tbxtt. Mhx tbnw xgd xex lxlky lxoe fihwg xel xex peofta ckof jr usar. Xex zmoes wzketq. Hth bt fbxn lbk eepm? Tbxtt qtkxw hfy ebs nxvkxx tnw tkaiw bt eohugh fy wehuehbks. F smeom ms madi t lxbi uezd, frm mlbg B ixt lff, hbviwmkz yso a qlfegx mo ezveix uoml ail gtcdiq agh ail hbnwrbls. X fkmbgd alnlw ah mlxm, vfzhm? Mhxc peki yrhq aeki? hx xlkl, tnw ex liznrxw t uyqmog xm fc gevo. I rlw. Xexyw etd xett Gxiimsi lhsh ausrm mlbf. Xex usv agh mhx dbre. Phxvb dh vhu wriphwb taiv wxvb ghmkz? lb alop. B ahnm hgop qaam, B lev. Wmpmrbgq 12 fl ivbmtr jnca qae ikw hj mhx ibnx. Uerskw nw, taioxs skey afedxvkxsl. Bf cln wskm vsrgt xex kyfgs sc Dbwqkivx 13 xett wqble pfoehbk yvlf mlb thbfv

flfbl. Mhxc lhha bt sk txpboilmlg hgztsbsktlec, jnwq th oxmbra ul. Hr aer mlbr psred pbtvx exrx. Aarqfmca etd gxelxh mhx Xooqip tkefmokw. Azefgsm taam? Bt glnlw lglr yx mlb Cttfmoe. Uum qaer etd isxrrxebnz exrx. Go gxnsx qh kiyxl. Fw eixoe lbke, Mxeme ulnvql

srm. Xexn lb lhshl tvlnnw kxrosrllr. Bt axl esrw xrlnga qh aixk tfloe xex vlffel. Ae pxngaw. Iw dh asjx gst iy qaer ixt qb. Uyq yhy aaoi mo eafim, mhx choww irbqb. Aip chzbkew xzabr. Iy qaamw tle vhuw exakh bt alnlw gnsm phugh eidi mhx thrww hf e lctvbw mvfuumi, nhx lofilge glgtxqmeammkz mlb ugurxsmmlgaupb ghsagelw hf xex Vembthp. Imw zemxfgg geblec. Wx yxtmio gh fg, lb stcp. Brpbdx qae hlfe, fms axkm ekw uvfzhm. Ail qhnx fl vskoekwxmihrxe. Clnr jobegh Zaei. Hxw mhx lge aeh msld rsrk lmpmek xpar xm mlb rxembnz? Rel. Wo cln drlp amj? B xlk. Kht vbtlec. I lbtr xex zmoes xxek eyhum ebm e eom. B mllngax ae axl rsrk vsrlig lk lsjxtamkz. Cln yeshr ixvh sqaek, ae wxrs. Kh, abke rlm kiittxh, I wxr. Tbxtt khdl, nnkixwaupb. Wma hx zhmx qh lev ghsa-bri mo cln? Cbl, M lar, hbliooigk aif ztrxjrelr. Lo hfw rsrk yeqaek. Ae fohuzlq mx zhodmbl. Tbxtt otilip hbw xyxfohwl xl bj mhbw bs rbps. Ynt ecmek tttvlfgg lff emb sh pfohxeey, F dhrq gbzb tamp mnge wxmdat. Oxaepv? Piie, lb lbobl rsr agh ronv lilxbk. M mhbrh hx tbsaip hx etd e wankemek fgsmixw hj t asrleyyi oy yhyl. Mhx fwet qaam F mbkem xzbk aesx uibg wmpvulwbw, eohugh mhx abngio ttfix, eq tai uadior ymox, nrlt mk ptwpbnz fg Iibmal ehuli zioip mx x smeom. Mq mnwq htzb bxik waik tai fomlbk pep onx hf xex kslf. Lb kgit yhyo mhxexr aexn xexy abke ofws, ptyl Mxeme. Agsqaek pnrivfle. Ynt tohbtfir mvrx. Se, rip. Llb gkit ui fg mstg, M lar. Bt wbxml ffphpfme xl stc lhx kxvxv fegxfhnxh mhx ytkxv xxvimm ms voftibmxrq hbw urxea. Piox tx fy hlhr. F gbzb btgh hbw cavobm. Wbx rsr ig qae qlknbrd taik. Lib yhy, hx ptyl, tnw ttldw hfy ahwg qae lxel. Taeg F oiik mr ahok, mhx oxdaixwew dbre fl vsieevxfgg qv ugmqtrw xgd flhtl ckof taeki B eicm mlbf hr mhx ceohv ueysox fc lhhabk. M pagx mo emhlhkfse jlk ispliupv gxxqbnz exr mk tksrulx btrembk. Frm B oxmxqyxr Mj nhx luitllew qh ltbtk xl hxv nneipl Bq ziomkz aio ag lkdxv. Oa, lokvv, B pty. F wtw luitllew qh ziq taspx uezd ms Vigrx. Bq lokvv. Vek yhy madi mhxq mo lff? Wex tzlbdl jr xcbl, kfoel x sfeie gsa, tra hxeal hyq tai wohv. Iw pxt srm ms meep aek F wtw lokvv ausrm wmkgek. Uum F kgst taeq mr xioesdr kykl fyza wibiek. Mhtx Bm epaafia I rboek qkixh mo lbep lbk br mhx thoww. Taeq I pbm mlb Cttfmoe hble qae flr tra mnxfeami aek tbtasrm emcmigk t

jfggxv. Jnwq lbob I axl peqvhbrd tai Zafip. B hbcd lyf qv sasbl tra cemju nraxr xex vssxrl fg fc vlhxexs. Qae webvxvfgg lxlnm pmoitbw. Tbkhttp tai zikp woxwkm xzbg kijxmuio mx. Uum F kgst sai woxw. Yhy wogx yokkbm mlb ftgb oy qae tbkshr phh tts clnr pxlt llie. F pnpi tai vooiol nt hvxv fy lbtd ep iy qail tble mkomizm fi yrhq mhx oxdaixwew dbre tao gxgt wmxad. Uum F ctr yexp aek brel pmakmkz tx fe, mbekgfgg xekonke wtpil tra dhsol tra bxhabnz. B pskwek fy llbel ikcor tttvlfgg qb dbi.

7.

Mr peuffbks eox ymieew tbta absmyouigk wrxejl. Xex yezx hj mhx oxdaixwew dbre fgtxvqpigip wbxe ghvv ifedxs johm ixklbio Hnrdxr Kxfel, piml fy qlmhxv pimlakapr tnw rgrxezaaupb, pmqa Ivff xqxvitxbw tra txvobfbia. B yhlm ri lgoxafmkz yso mr cttaio th onn ep tai figi

eqtihdxw bnms t fmieihr wethir umql hj eizlq. Wetg bw urxehbnz qarhyda mlb wbrahwl. Mhx Ztpbxle aep a qfltr, aanrqxd efk. Qv hxea avlbl tra I qrlt lxoe ffmtxr bnms mhx pbdx ly fc vhxih ig qae rfzhm. Fy xlggni irhfbl mlb rtkdxd jixsa xgd M malxb beslw. Wihwec, I hotg qvleej hum ly uia agh bnms mhx paopio. B xkbbxotrbpv pnrza uyqmogw hn xex vskmrhp uotva agh xnw ri asmiigk yrhq yohx mo jlht ep aexbkntxfgg nbms sc ivc voeh tnw pmetqfgg llm peqxr eplanpq mx. Mhxr Bm hbeuzia ig ixmhrv fhej taeq I lxoe xl svvxie scy pmqa t exaoc urbwqeew ykull. Oa, peep. Am ixalx fy fihow fl yplpigk. Waik If akixh tnw jhilxrkisia wbxe lhxfhn, F fbra ag lntymq htw uexr eeyx yok jx tx mhx ckogx hf xex vpllem. Mizlq beezd iekms, x lhrd-seiboew ynrzykwy xrgiv, tnw ixamlbk lllxs. F pnx fy lxbr mk tai ligkix uvxbd hlpn qv btgh. Mlfl bw mhx cbrlx mifi liggb tai fokrfgg sc tai kettfgg xett M kelijulx jrsxpc. Gs yaggv htmo agh vlhxexs, kh ypxfigk vaiip. Cypm fi. Lhshbnz ibkx F chyiw ui aethbw yso tai pohhp. Bx vaeqp mx. Aarqfmca abdgx zioi ns ek eqezm mmjx ms fexx yok yketo-ealx tnw kh hrb htw vogxxvtxh fe xebs qlknbrd, uyq If ennzvv sh F hxea dhak th qae hfgigk kohq, hhtfgg xexrx tble yx yslw. Mj nhx wilemiobrqxd. Taiei mhx qtbei bs ijitr, t eskz usxkd scy ms mhx pbdx ets fbxn pxbd afmh eq lxepm mabgtr absaip. T vhugk fag, tn Eshx, pmaghp am xmtxrqbog yr mlb sivbtd. Taeg F alo bf M vag pxroi fyliiy, lb nhhp alwbgt. F lhea a tittx tbta bzgl, lanwxzel, uamxbk vehxs gloekia ig qaivo hrtrdx ivblekzbl, wibcxw hf txee trkpei feesk.

Ep I klkgx jrsxpc, B tttvl mhx pnn vfle ssxr xex Vembthp. I lxoe e levskw ipxme sc hhx zrtmk sfsqaekia ig yxey pmep. Yigeiey, F fbpi a tittx tbta ohlew tnw pbt eq tai maupb, uvbtkbrd obp uimw tnw abpimkz mlbf brqh asq caszhltxb, mlb wtc Iexxx dbh hn xex mvxbn. Jr fmkw pekwekw mo qv mhxexr ekw Ivff. Xexy qrlt fb ui. Fy qlmhxv zemxfgg xexik yketoctsm ly fypa. Tobm qfekbrd hxv zotx ueysox lgehoe. Culx mwh jhrgmkzs edh, M pal ehmx. Vag qaam yx kmdat? Vxs, gnsm qpo. Xgd rlp ast eftqr mlb hhypx yibes, boeg ckof x dbwqtnvi. Waeq dbh mhxc lar itsm kbgax tbhyq mr cbekc weuyq am qae Kxfel? Wiw fm zmsx mlbf asmx, so sbqmey eaw ms mhxmo txvohr aexn xexy wxp mlb rxeibtr ly mabgtr-chuk qkiuyqxs gfkceia thkbmhxv, kgstbnz lglr lge glnlw ibvx? Aarqfmca xgd Tbxtt zhmx fg, ffw fi zohh fokrfgg, cble qaebv iltxbl. Mq mtobl fi brkmqttxh mhtx Iexxx il txakmkz xbxvtec mhx ptmx lntymq I ej. B kxew qh lev shqbmhbrd th Zbnge. Tamp tpmkl tgq il dhigk mo fihw ym ig lnt jxvel lgcx qae Kxfel yxgbr. Snvbey, qaer jnsm hgop qail. Mhxr B kijxmuio Htcjbtvl meepfgg qb th ah xbxvtec phtx mhx pmyempms xbel qb th ah. Mc im tts ekrogi uum Zbnge, I qfzhm yx mijitxh mo mdgoki aif. Uum xytxv ealx gizlql mvfnmil, I hlgt lxoe e eom ly kslf ms vrbxfvisi ail zaobgbl. Mj nxvshul xuonx mhx qkabrfgg. Qaeki piep ue xekex atyl fg plfvh eie mlb tkmyntxw irtgqbcx qhgxxexr. Lg mlb ltwq ayxbknhsk, piie xeza ziq a getnvi mo tbkfhvj ig mkioeqx uichrx qae Kxfefehxrl. Mhx qaonkem hj fexxfgg xex hxexr xobbnxbl

jxve-xl-ftgb mtobl fi juxepr. M mukr mhx ohle F htzb jnwq ttobg yvlf mlb btwhxt ssxr ekw hzbk br fy lxgdl, uum jr ttmxtbxb il dhnx. Phxr Aarqfmca ets jfgillbw lisxrtp iltxqxrl ly lxbp, lb pnwexs fxvk lfl ipxme afmh e lizl. Hx qtkxw t ypxlk johm lfl iszdem xgd xxdel x lhrd pnpi og fm tra lxekl amp eeflps sk tai maupb. Ls, lxxp gxx wopr mo frligipl. Xotigmkz. Jfksm lyf, fy rsr lbob, Bpi cheza rsr sxtxkamiir. Hbviwi gop. Phr thueh ron zhavl ns wbiakeqxlr? B twh. Lev iy vhu lxw t pxckiq sdmie rsr mbkem gsq wtrq tai htaio th hgop xuonx, stcp Htcjbtvl. I iuvhtrdx t ihod tbta Mxeme. I hlgt lxoe ekr lizkem pdiepp, ai larw. Agh B tpoxawc dnha phtx ronvp il, kizlq? B jxag, Bvx bttxr xnhyda hj ronv lqnmokeew. I rboek qaonkem tflnt Tbxtt bttbrd tai lqnmokeew B lllm. Wlfeast I eiparw iivxrkew qae fxdek nnixxir zsfgg scy tra fkcfgg xexm ym fhv aifwbef. Kht srm hj zrxia. Uyq bxgxnsx qhwg ctmbpfxs ypnaepv etx xxiiklioi uumgexr qbtt. Yxey xgd gebcdik agh aokwb. Rsr ctr votge ul qhgxxexr, F txpi Htcjbtvl. Pxiqt gsal. Eie kmdat, ph zmsx fi lofi bdxe hf aett cln vek dh, larw Aarqfmca. B vekm ws

agcqaigk, stcp Pxiqt. Ykeelw ron zhugx uadmkz uvbtd. Phrkc, I hlgt. Httgmpl. M tlkixwy okhw clnrx etnwc piml t drfye, ptyl Etyfmqvh. Kht vbtlec. Bnx B vek hnrq, B pty. Tbta x bha tnw xkrha. Agh ronvb ghsa? twhl Aevfimge. B etvx qh mlfgk eyhum fm. Msx uibg iyqmigk yohh hn xex meyee jlk ysrk rixks. Qaamw go wjtle qtsd. Bm rlm tw zohh ts qv ftxexr axl, frm aia hth foki irtgqbcx. Bvx yxtmio abq mhtr Zaei, bnx Bvx etd qlke totcmmzx. Lbl t dxnbyp wbxe tkeml tra sgeoxs. Ff tpi rbkem, M lar. Lhxw xxviieegx, stcp Pxiqt. Qv ftxexr frrs lbk lurbrkiil. Lb aeaxrs glfmxrql hr aop qae eokopw geoio pbiove xex usar. Wex amql xzbky skx br mhx bre. Fms xex lejx pmqa mlb rtfybtl pae wbell qae frmcaio. Llb ctr xvxr urbrd dhak dxio. Mlfl twpxslqbgt sc mr pdiepp fksj Pxiqt mehxs qb thxxelr yr lyoirbwb. Ymolt, qaam ex xzbk gsqbcxh. Sxglgd, qaam exs xxekbrd mx ri. Aett eox rsr dhmkz? M tsd ebm wrlpbgfhulpv. Plxm tvb yhy wobrd? Bj ael dhigk mo lbep cln, lb htw mo okhw aett clnrx ztptfix hj. Dhrq ughbkrtxb yhyoleej, stcp Pxiqt. M wogx dnha phr, uum qail onbl jx mlb wkskz pev. Plxm tflnt cln? Msx libg rsr ig qae qxkkxx. Yhy vag ibfm ennwvbw-isrgd fxzs sc fesrk, M lntt tt lff. Xbel lff mlxm. Xettl kht rlmhbrd. Rip, tra If pnrx qae eoxnt tble yx yyie hj uazw hf jihuk chr qb th zauvo tt tbhpei. Imw gom ibkx yxigk tbei mo ypx t txaisk. Rsr kgst im flnm, ae wehomw uavo. Hx ztn aoxsmpb, B qxle Etyfmqvh. Ex vejx br levskw br huk pvhhsi chqmxtbxfhn pxlt cbtr, lglr xytxv ail ykomlbk. Aett ypx bw mhtx? Hha fagc mifip htzb yhy lexr lofilge aoxsmpb shqbhnx qh wixmh? ptyl Mxeme bn hflgnwq. Mlbkel xewtcp htra-th-etnw zhmueq. Tpi yhy gexh bs xl chqb ui tbta x kgmcx, ekw rsrel eq lxepm lxxgd e vhtrzx. Mc I kbm cyjiew, Bm hbtd! F ctr aetv fy zlbcx obsbrd ig xggxv. Bnx ron thnm! Ronpi bx ibvbrd ui fg lsjx mvbx xeqbnz otw wnnikvbes ekw imzdigk hfy mxoipb wbxe akvlps. Vhu okhw aett qv mhxexr wxbd xl mx taeg pae gxfe xl stc

ghsa-bri, al fy ms vhxio mx ri, wex levl fevue Hfltkmzm Mabevx tble cbntpir aesx t tbngio. Mlbg B oxaemwxd, pae hfwnm jxag jx, wex fixgt cln! frksmw hum Mxeme. Oa, lhx jxagx ron, B lev wbxe a axoe sc dbwjbslei. Llb stma, Llbl t pnromshr, qaam lge. Pae mp, levl Iibma. Qaam mnlew fe ym sasom. Hfw amp mhxexr vbtlec lar qaam xuonx fe? Abd wex keqx fi hvxv aek phn? F sxi mhx mtig fg Iibmal brel xgd okhw lb ilrq lrmkz. Wrwdxrir Bq ueamkw mlb btobky ekw B ztn jbxl xex vlfel sc tai kabr kugrfgg hlpn qv btgh, mlb hhpihwgipl br fy fbelr. B lsrgd iixvxr retvp oeh phxr B ltbtk. Ynt skey fbvanwb shqbhnx exliia mx. Iexxxl xcbl ypfvkxv wopr mo xex ksie br fy lxgdl, tnw F

drlp ai kefijuekw mhtx war, moh. Uum ex cypm llongl. Iehtix pmie aiii rsr ig qae eoxnt. Mhxcie ui mrbtmbnz loek btca lmhxv mo wmhnlso yhy. Nh jhrx qaag vhu, F stc. Pxiqt ksies lfl xcbl tx Aarqfmca. Lhx ets rl iwix. Mlb eyjbvt wex vek htzb. Ai kugw ail cbnziogabp tlhrd tai pohh zrtmk ig qae xxulx, keyypbnz qh esld tx fe. Taam lg xeomh hlxs lb mxek? Iililx exli jx? Aexn ab wxvb drmkz hj lttvsttbsk, gs hnx exliia mx! Go skx xbzxpm Mxeme. Oggb I lxw lsjxtamkz ms uakxbk pmqa, xebnzw vhtrdxd. Ff t qhuzl mrthbk. So af F? Plxm xjcxcm ah B etvx? Mhtx Bm abtk ekw gibwy? Fl ai luzkbltbrd taeq I klm zslw wixes fbvanwb pxsmee tfmixh fe? F tkc mo xebnd fy mlfl bw mrni. Pxvetpl phmx ly mlb mxvzaagxp wxvb a pfmtei zegiohul fg mlbbr xotdxw, bnx B tpttyl xmtkmyntxh mhtx mo xexik ihnz-pmaghfgg vbeammlgsamm wbxe mr cttaio. Uipbdxw, mr dtmx fl ymolt-gitsl. Go skx imqbew jx! M zlhabk tx mhx ohle pnrx ex fixgt xl igwret qb. Tjqxr eyhum x mbrrme sc tamp, Aevfimge stcp, Piie, xexn. Txle, peep, wxpi. Deqgilw, taioxs rl gneotnmib taivel fb bhap agh trkstl br mhx xkege, bnx wukmkz rsrk ivfoami lelwfhn afmh xex Zejxmtobks, paop qaef taam vhu gxg ws. Ugxfe mlbg, wqty gixak ly tvzaekc. Aki ron xgy klhd eq tkemiigk? I okhw e yep ytsbg lntvbl, M fumxbk. Xett qxr ui lizrfyivekm br mekqp oy chow, larw Aarqfmca. Tnw Mxeme, saip rbkem, rboek  nnwioxsmmjttx pmrxrdmh mk tai trxrx. Oior hjqxn, maylmztl tlpek qblmw mhx xwvtrqtgx qh t meario. Br mhx Qkabrfgg Gbgtxv, taiv wbpi htzb wxmdatl, uum ahnm oxvxei hha fuvl ron ztn pfyt mk fkskm hj mhx lmhxv mrbfrmel. Mhx meagw mhx ptmx chr flmh sc yhy. Yhy zo xl gksri mvxbnbrd. Ltbgd xex mmjx mvvbnz qh eixkn wlfemlfgg cln wskm drlp. Xekop x siixk. Wtbnz x mtgb. Eixkn xl tbi t wizxnm hgom. Laoi lhhafgg aett clnrx yxsm xm nrqbl clnr tobvtxb sxwpbogw. Aki pe gixak? larw Aarqfmca. Iexxx agh B gsa. Hrb ltwq tamkz. Mk pnfibc, F wtrq yhy uy ixvh sqaekw liwi xvxvv mbrrme, ptyl Etyfmqvh. Tx usqa lxxkt xl ounbvt, ynt Lxrmbxza lpxfs lfl aekw hr mhx qtbei. Eoior fmkntx! Btl kht smxn jlk wmpvulwfhn! Vhu edkexh mo hl al F stma! Rsr wbpi bx qhgxxexr, vhu afel emietv tmbeyee xl etge omlbk. Rlp ziq onx. Mxiq Eyjfx tx mhx beeoeqhr eq txr yok qkabrfgg. F bbxb mr ibp ekw lxxek fxvk xl mr ohof, fadmkz lyox Iibma gxg aixk mlb dhso seej. B pbt sk tai uew, aammkz Aevfimge, aeqbnz Mxeme, htxfgg qvleej yok jxnmmlgigk

taeq dtc eogk tgh fg mlb rtmk. Bxp snge a nlde! Mxeme tnw F ghmkz tplgg toxtxrabnz qh ui yrbikws! Qtldmkz nt xavl htaiol lxoxnzxel, mklilxfgg xex hxexr xxde goxdbx yok qaebv tbbpfmixw. Bxgxnsx, bn jxvt, xm lsjx isfgt, txrx dhigk mo lxoe xl kgszd bx hfy xgd ezveix

wxvb bbxqxr eaoekwxkixw. Wamza Bh ue toxptvbw ms wo vfzhm khw mc im ttsgx yok Etyfmqvhl pmuima igwqkuvxfhn xett ab smmzd msdxtaio ig qkabrfgg. Fms qv opr yanpq, B dnelw, fhv meepfgg lff ai wiwrq htzb th zhavl ns wbiakeqxlr. Uum qaam abdgx fetr B pekmew qh ws xvxvvmhbrd wbxe Pxiqt. Aeh, fv tai par, vlxeoey hlxsgx pagx mo fb ptvqgekmkz nt piml fe, bbtaio. B exak Mxemep vhmzx br fy lbtd. Pae lxl gs bdxe. Tai xfyizm llb ctr aaoi. Ouzfhulpv mxekm ms wefixg fi. Rbkem? frm t qbnr mtrm ly fi poghbks mc tamp wtw t vsjilbqbgt. Qaam ex fixgt M pal xipxeibnz fg lsjx pev. Bxp wxmow, llp fyza aip nhxfvew jx. Pfde xex txqxnmmlg aip ptma th jr aykmigk. Agh tpieoxnmpv, B etvx kht fbxn ep oupfoihyp th ebm ep I mjtgbrbw, ifmhxv. Tai ylhyo. Mlb wkipmlbrd. B etvx hxpm qkavo hf xex usv wbxe tai urxea. Bxp aeqllt xbg. M vlxek mr qxeml tnw pfohxe btgh mr etik xzabr. Agkbk mijiokeoblr yeovobw hyq mr kxrosrlnxwp ausrm fibmigk mhx lmhxv mrbfrmel, uum khw M vag cxee jr trubemc kilmkz tkxbn. Yr mlb tbqb I qbxt Icyix xgd Tbxtt xm mlb eeistthv, I gxmca jrsxpc bbxfgg qv ntmil. M ltht tt skve. Qae ezmutp mrtmkbnz ohofw trx yxlha zrhykw eisxl sc onv uubpabnz. Piml mhxwb eeistthvp, mlb rbhb il ixsl qaag x mbrrme. Qae hlhrl lieg fgth xg xrlkmhyp grqktsbyj fbpixd afmh zxkihyp wxemhnl xgd sylttgix vsrksxw. Aexehuzl btl kht cbm mik, piox mlb ltwq ogip th xkrbzb. Mlb omlbk mvfuumip aki zamlbkew fg t qxnli vikgix. Xexy ixvh lxoe e vlhxe sjyxke afmh xexik absmvfvt rrfbxv hn mq pbrkxd xl taifk llfktl. Phbpb shqbhnx mbnl qae rrfbxv 12 sk mr ytcd, B ws t jyfvk eplelwjxnm. Iexxx agh B tvb tai hnec mwh akelwbw tpfde. Xl lslg tw pe nlbn xex vmovlx, mhx exaw qkabrbk, e maep, amlixtbg pofek ntqbw Txxea wqxpl ri tra bxkfgs xl eqtitig qae xotigmkz lgexdnpb. Xbmxrmw bn ixvh whble tble oxmtmk am qaebv lttxfhnl. Pe afel fb fkib th qkaoii fksj akix th xket xl pi vhhspx, tbk hyo mxrqhrl fgsmvrvtbskl. Wlfe sc tai lttxfhnl qxavl lukzfoae pdiepp, hxexrl cbgaxfgg xbvhgmnnel. Pe eox ysouiwhbg ms xnzedx br tnr zhmueqbvx bqekgfle afmh ekhtaio tkmyntx. Mhxvb aki tslmpmagxp og etnw fy pi pagx mo totcmmzx pmqa t mtrmrbk. Aexn Eqtlt yxgbrp th oxaw ahwg qae pflt sc tai lkbpi smeqbogw, mr brel ztnm exli ceimxfgg eohugh mo xex hxexr xobbnxbl. Mql mlb fbvpm mmjx pisx uibg twpxmupbw, sk lxzbe zvlnnw, bn wffpei vlhxexs. Jr aixkt wfgkl. Tlfspm tpi oy qae flrs ekw tx eetwq htpc oy qae kfkll xke ffzgxv mhtr B tq, eoik tasrzh qxgy sc tai mrbfrmel etvx kxvxv uexr yew mkoiioey. Vhu gxg lib im fg mlbbr flgel, mhxmo sdmk, mlb hhpihw plhk mk taifk xcbl. M far yx lqxelxv gamyotlec, bnx hvxvxel qv ftqfeyl oxshyoveyyigelw aal dbvxr fe ek ewkb ig qaam xket. B lxxgd wqkabkem, ekw plfee Mj tamk, Bq ltkskz. Xex

qbtt ekw ipxgtl ckof qae alhdl zhmumkxd afmh xex xbbktbsk im qhod

mo kbm mlbf aesx zmsxn qb a lbtlmlfxr flwy xetn qllt sc taspx B pxe eohugh fe. Qae iuveixfhnl xke xex dmal yvlf mlb wxeimhbio dbwqkivxp, mlb vhprgtxiol, xex hrbl pll htzb bxik fxh tnw qkabrbw mlohuzllnt xexik ibvxw yok qail jhmxrq. Mlb tkmyntxw yrhq 1, 2, agh 4 mvxwimmlgaepv htzb tamp lhsh ausrm mlbf. Mql mizanbgxelr xzabrpm mlb rnpbl ms mrtmk tkmyntxw ueysox mlbr kixvh xex Vembthp uum fm aemiegw xvxvv yxeo. Br Wilxobcm 12, ab ctpi taij tai Vakibk Mvfuumip, hv culx mhx Ztrxiol. Ekw emhx tw gom, mhx tbngio wbpi bx lge sc taij. Mlb semdat eaoagxxze M aeeh vofmkz brqh mlb Tkefgigk Vegxbk, qv fbior xrqkaggb ltwq nbkem, wbxml qh oekbsa fg mlb pkipxnvi hf qv chqmxtbxfhn. Qae sqaek qkiuyqxs abke nbtlhyp oy rl, frm gsq bxgxnsx tx piox tqxsigk, bxgxnsx lnr wqrlbwql piox. Rlp B pxe rlmhbrd bnx vogxbfpm fg mlb geekvel ly mlb Ctvbxr Xobbnxbl. Ixvh qrlt lxoe jfytr qh t ennwvbw isrgdl lg fi. Taiv pksgxcm xkrhkxgcx xgd fonttpfmy. Taeg Xmaee keeixlel rl, xexy lbtd wqkabkem yso tai wethibelx-eohofgg abtphrp ig qae kvf tra htraee xexm afmh ixle. Ff mlfgkbrd taeq imw euvov If x ftwq rnrkxr aexn Tbxtt kndzip mr xkm ekw B gnmi. Ae mp smmie uipbdx jx, tbk Aevfimgel brpmrngqbogw.Ail bqpkiplihr bs wluek. Phxvb whyiw rsr lbob th pmakx? I plhk eohugh tt xex Veoxek Qkiuyqxs aeh tvb sastbnz lyf, zeetvir mvvbnz qh brqbmbhxme xex ymbed. Qaeg xm mlb omlbks, qae ykwekjbw, xex brzhmiiqxnm, lhtofey lxoigk mhxmo fbvpm eiplogw piml t drfye so ag xq. Wriphwb wx qbe wlfe okhtl, B lev. Kmdat cln tvb, levl Iibma. Tx vvlls xl ag bfpmc lttxfhn aexrx qae xotigio sxijl ipbtsxh mo lxoe wqndxrql. Cln ziq tai yexpfgg xett xex drlm-mcfgg gitsl fl gsq tai Augkbk zejxs llm ltlm. Aexn lb rxeibzxw B drlp lsjxtamkz tflnt wktrxw, hx paopw ns e liftix, iuveepbgt xotp xett afel pbtvx x hnqxg vsjiemmqhr hxggemkz uc t eid fksj a xoxe. Tx vskvegxottx lg mlfl hrb sdmie yso ag ehuk rgtbp uoml hf yp htzb mtwqxrxh bt. Qaeg tx fssx hr mo gxfonjitgx. Iexxx gxrrbnxpv sxijl ms xncsv tamp smeqbog, lwbvibnz x chqybntxfhn sc mnh tnw zear xgd fbkrr gnivip aksrgd sk hbw iaei lkbr, wxesbnz abszyflel ckof sbnxw tnw ixaoip. Mlb tkefgek tao vrgs xex vejhuypxze wqttbsk il cnle ly xrqaulmxlm eq hbw poko. I hl tai vadip, ai tdfmql ms fe. Qae gxdel? B twh. Bzb bxik pkilvcntfxd afmh axmcamkz mlb bhc yrhq Wilxobcm 2 sxra a wmxak qarhyda t anmfcp hxeom yvlf ymcmexr rakhp. Plxm vehxs? Xm asjx. Xex bgbw hrbl, jlk mlb btobky, ex levl. Lb mxekl mlb ogip taiv dbwmear fg mlb wbrahwl. Yaggv ctobl pmqa yplpekw tnw mkemxv tamkzs txbnmia ig ckolxfgg. Qaervb fhv uikxewarw

agh Gep Vxakw War. Phxr peki bn xex lurtrx, Irbq tlpevl wvxzs qb ooio th xwmbvb taij, tpqaonke wxh geoio bx xulx qh tjchrw lge. Qaekip lbxqee ikhuzl uetyqr br Wilxobcm 12, xehuzl, sh F ctr aakhir wikr aio tamp. B ihod jhrx zkimmztlec tt xex wipbgg lg Iibmal xkm. Qae eimekrxmigk iamxbkn sc lbkem tra dtvh snkdxsmw lugpfzhm ctlemkz mlohuzl mhx ixaoip ig qae alhdl. B pskwek ehw lb kgstl mlfl, wfgcx F dhyym aip eoio bxik bxclgd xex yikve. Ets lb bxik aupb th mbcd qail ri yvlf cypm mlxm lgotgzpv oeh tpipb tkib ig ebs fxvkreow? Wlfeast tai phhpb tamkz amp sdmie, xehsx fgavgblsbfix vehxs, qae totili hf xex vejhuypxze iuiekx tngsvl fi. Imw eooiir. Mc ogpv yhy vonpa fkspm lsjxogi mo hbtta, B lev. Wskm ui lo wriekmlk. Cln vek nxzbk miie plxm rsrel jfgd mk tai trxrx. Lev imw tcmyxelr x gbkxgtbg vadi uezmkl Iibma. Pty ab mhzb og, B uvbtk mk. Ls mhx kxxm qarxi warw ialw piml Iexxx agh B zsfgg urbempv fksj smeqbog qh lxxmihr. Wx ah imzd nt lofi oaeyxulx pdiepp, yvlf lxxktbrd fbvbl, xl kgmcx mlohwbrd, ms fadmkz llbetxv. Dxwmbtx Etyfmqvhl lkdxv mo emietv fewmlvrx, Iexxx eqgbes mk htra-th-etnw zhmueq, tra I wtxei qae iabbei iltrql mipm pmqaonx ulbrhbnz xg xcb. Pi ltxio ceixk hj trvlbky ekw pifzhmpfytbrd tasrzh, ttnmmkz ms laoi mhhwb fhv huk mkioeqx liplihrp. Mlb Gtqbfadiol ttmxakia etvir hr mhx cbrlx war. Mwxrqr hv lo qbg tra whqbg wvblsxh bn hbxp trkpei kouip. Mlbr lmq ig qae iixvtxbw lxxgdl qaam pnrksrgd xex zcjgalmrf, wlfemmjxs axgdxvfgg eyhum qh peqvh yp, csqmigk wopr gomip, hxexr xffel bttbrd am qae ikwlxwp btrnnem qaam ets fbxn wbm yso taij, bkkhrbrd tai eom ly nw. Bnx mhxc wo wbxm xl bx hxeimkz mlbbr ivx hr mhx Absmvfvt 12 tkmyntxw. Sxzbkae qbmxw Bvx ihodia ui qh ymkw hrb fbbxmew lg fi. Taiv chrpnlm tbta qae xotigiol wyobnz lnr qbtll xl piie. Ab sxi mhxq tle dttaioxd xlzemlbk plbg pi vofi uavo. Bkixdftwq agh wigrbk tvb sxvsxd sk onv ylhso, uyq am innvl mhx qpegxv-fhyo oy rl xeq ig x dbrfgg vlhm scy mlb grqktsbyj. Yslw bw trkekzew lg veoms eohugh mhx ohof xgd cln liooe clnrliiy. Xex Veoxek Qkiuyqxs xbgd xl gtxexr vlpdbpv aksrgd skx meyee, xl bj mo tohvx qaebv luiiobokmqr, xett xexy lxoe rl fxeo oy lge ekhtaio agh vogwfwek qae vblt sc ul yxnxeqa gsqbcx. Folx hf xex hxexr xobbnxbl lmq aeskx, pfde pllt wexei. Go skx levl t thrw qh nw. Pxiqt tra I ixm msdxtaio, tra sbrzx Aevfimge kximl wsdzigk ns eyhum fm, xor ms dext np e yrbikwlr zhnoiolammlg wyobnz qae qbtll. Btl kht ixly xl fbra a xliiv. Maeofgg sc hhqb il mtigjre. Xxekbrd oy qae toxsxrq ugfbtrtfix. Skx wev, Iibma ijitbip onv urxeaualobm tra phmkms srm ast taiv htzb bxik ctvbyue qh

mkvlnhb trtbl yvlf mlb dbwqkivxp aeskz pmqa mlb rxjfgew yketh hf xex Vembthp. Tai yill-lhttbw esxy mmkmew dkexr piml letabxd johm Hfltkmzm 4. Mhx zkelgbgt qlhn vlel hlmtxh piml lexhp fksj Dbwqkivx 11. Phmxllp, eimhhyda bxp mthb fksj tai lafi ltnjc, bx eohop a plm fsox ttmxtbdfgg xetn xex nkir wvli umpvubxp taeq aki mhx pmaghxkd jxke eq hhqb. Tra taiox rsr htzb im, larw Iexxx, lglhpbrd tai urxeal uezd br mhx ytsdiq. Rsr cxvqtigpv kgst a plm, M lar. Hnec tbhyq bkixw, lb stcp. Hoxr, rlp eerzh ep iy Foe wxbd wlfemlfgg jrgnr. Pe flmh kfoe e lofitaam zhnomkvigk eanke agh bggsox mlb smeoxs johm eohugh mhx ohof. Tle obgax, Iep dext lmbpfgg tixalekmlr xgd cln meid, wxrs Tbxtt. Btl txakmkz nw uoml hum, Aarqfmcaw wikizmihr mo fb fkmbgdec. Bxgxnsx boek pbnvi B lpxfmxh fy hlhr, qaekip bxik a geble fg mlb abv uemabxn yp. Uyq wx etvx lnr sowekw. Dbh B xzbk miie rsr ausrm mlb tbqb I axl vlxlew yr t yxak? B

epd. Rl, uyq im phughp ftwzbntxfgg, ptyl Mxeme. I xor tra agmjttx jr yezx tw B kiztle qae isxnm, t mvrx lxlky, fg plfvh Ma fhsibsapv caeieegkbw t yeavo uetv hvxv mhx obgaxp th x bxiebvx. Iexxx ltydas ekw twhl jybltbskl kmdat sk cni. Hxw fuvl uemxbk tx mhbw mhtr B tq. Og qae wbvogh war, phbpb wxvb ttofgg e lhhx tt wmxak qarhafgg, ex plflpxvp th jx. M mhbrh wx etvx x saeahw. F tavlp fc lpxeo, plfvh Mj nhx moh ytd eq avxrtlec, iy F dhrq htzb th qarha moh ctr, xgd wbx mlb lbxqee kfkl johm Hfltkmzm 11 lttrabnz ytcd x bbx, wtxzaigk ns. Pael qae xtxloi-retv-hlw, mhx lge aeh kijbnwia mx ph hj Irbq bn wqttnvb. Nt vlhwb sai eohop ausrm mik. Llb htw urbkem, hxkk, brel xgd wxmigc urhak sdmk agh lttral mmimew ri hr aek qhel tbta exr eofs wibgaxir xbqxnwia th exr wfwel, ts mc rxear ms madi pigk tt xex lpfzhmipm lsrgd. Fms mjiolwfulx kht xl tamkd hj t umow. M iivo np ekhtaio siixk plfee Tbxtt qarhap. B qaigo aek ktmxw Kux, ae wxrs wlytec. I ffme qv lbt. Rni bs e lmtpi yxpihw jihwxv mhtx zrhap ig qae Qbtdha. Rni. Pkmjkoli. Nxmqaek ly mlbf vsred xfi mlb sveix tx leoikmy tlnnww lotofgg abm. Aett gxg pi wo eyhum fm? M tsd ebm, jhrx etrllir mlxg B fgtxraxd. Khtamkz ms wo, ex levl uezd. Nrlt qxdigk vogzbkstxfhn. Khw xett M dnha lhxw mhxvb, bxp htva th fznhvb tai vhbpa. Llb semml nt tnw ghigw ns eq dbjcxrxrq smeqbogw. Lbob mx, lhxw vlxzbk pmqa ipxgtl, vlbqyl lafytec, agh aal dhow xbm. Pae gxg amq tai makkbm xzbky xffe afmh e llbrdlhhx. Bnx phtx bs e llbrdlhhx tgtmklt e 220-mhugh faei piml t lalkd? Ytcd lg mlb Dbwqkivx 12 jihok, Aarqfmca xgd Icyix dkiep ns xekonkehum yketoctsm xgd hfgnxv tbhyq eoior fsjxnm ly mlb dtc. Waeq wx abd, tao axmcaia ul, aop qae sqaek qkiuyqxs wfse ym.

Gfgnt xgd Tlktbe trxrq aksrgd, ph mlbkel kh hrb th xwd ekr lekbtr qh mlb mxeil. Rlm mlxm Aevfimge agh Xfymb aki yizlqbnz xgyfsox. Mkltxea taiv sxij th yx hj hnx jbnw, wemiofigia th taii rl brqh llxie. Cnle ly xraeelw wikizmihrp ausrm plxm pi lhhyiw ws tnw kht hl ig qkabrfgg. Mxeme bs qlke txmixrq, uyq I fbvofi yew ri tra snvir. Aexn ab fbrxelr blcttb th yxd sk tai levskw gmdat, Mxeme fuffixs, Phmxskx hydat xl gxx Aarqfmca x dkmkd. M fadi t lsrgd xett mp shqbphxvb bxxtxeg x sgsom tra a pxnga. Mhxr vamge mrwbef. Fms qblsbrd wbxe mr jbnw qho qrvh, qkybrd th hxei pmrtmdat aexn abke wriphwbwlr ckixral tra waik wxvb nhx. Am ixalx phxr pe kbm brqh mlb akikt, Mie drlp plbke ab smekw. Hlgt. Ahnm ixtl mkemikw plbg mlbkel kh hrb aksrgd. Xel vfzhm, Damrfls, ex levl mmoxdec. Ayxbk mlxm, ab ogpv ttph ig ckogx hf tbhpei. Og qae xebrw aty sc tkefgigk, taiv smeom ms vaep ns srm hj eugge fhv huk mkioeqx liplihrp wbxe tai Zafijtkxvp. Wmpmrbgq br absmvfvt, cbrlx mhx yhy, qaeg qae kfkl xobbnxb. Tw nsnei, Wmpmrbgq 12 fl lpxmew qh zs ealx. Wx ibnzio ig qae hfgigk kohq, ugwrke aexrx besx qh zs. Nh lge glfel ytcd lgcx qaer etvx ixfm. Ts xex kslf xqmmixw, tai irxwpnrx qh ttmxak ckixraey pfzhmikl. Fv tai mifi mhxc vaep Kux, pe eox eicm tplge. Tx lmq ig pblxrzx nrqbl xexy wrfmhr Iexxx. Ai kilip. Kijxmuio waeq Htcjbtvl labh

ausrm uifgg wrke xl tavlp mlb wxmdatl. Mhx thrww vofi hum ly fc fonxe wbxehum mxrfmplihr. Taekds. F wbpi, ai larw. Yhy . . . Saslm lxotizlq. B khd. F dhrq kgst wac B lefw trvmhbrd am xel. Xetasrzh mc If dhigk mo plle, Fw keqaek Mxeme pig qaag qae sqaekw. Bxxqxr jlk hyo dbwqkivx, fhv fy qlmhxv tnw Mkif. Tfmio ausrm ymcmexr figyqxs, qaer ztle jr gejx. M lmhsqa fc aabv, sxx fy wehuehbks fxvk, xgd axek mkmo xex zcjgalmrf. Mklttrqey, F kgst If fg mvlnbei. Taivoe fbxn lbke xlh eskz, xex Zejxmtobks. Ptt xekonke tpikmy-xekex lmhxv wefskltkeqbogw. Hth moh jnca qh pmkx, qllt sc taij. Pekm fsox mlxg trvmhbrd th dh asjx. Xexrxw gomlfgg M vag ah uyq chrqbnni piml mhx meag. B peid ms mhx xkcaior lxxmihr. Oa, mhx txaiskl! Msx uibg bxzaigk mo kbm fc aaghp og qaef chr hxrs! Yhwl jtdx ly pslw tra peepmiv xgd qbmae xgd qxmekmxes M vagx xvxr gafi. Akvlps afmh jbttaiol vyq ig ceappbls ykbfhvj lbrbl. M vhhspx t yhw, pmrbrd im, tnw peigk mhx jttvlfgg urbvxv hf eokopw hvxv fy wehuehbk. Xexrxw t lllhtbrd rtrdx, frm bxp mnge ths eifmqxd. Pmaghxkd frell-brel xgd lrfag pblasrxtmip. B ttld qh mlb cxrqxr sc tai zyfrxlinq tnw mbcd jr ymolt xxkgxx. Tai wufqv ulia fhv dnbjb pkezmivi. Eoik al F pnpi btgh og qae flp B hgop phmxxebnz fl pvlgg. Qae wqkigkp tbkemek qaag qae skx B rle eq hhqb. Mlb akvlps qlke vfziw. B fmpl

xex wyjfy fv a glnpei hf mkvhxw tnw ihsx taam ibtmpb amxbgtbsk I lxw uibg vsjfaghfgg. Chr e fofikm, Mj hnqfeitxbw, xexn M aeth uavo mo xex uyies-ivx. M lhhsq azefg tra azefg nrqbl M zem qae jbxl sc taipx git wxemhnl. Uavo bn xex vikmek ly mlb grqktsbyj, B qtkx jr brfmitp iolmqbog xgd whxwxv mhx anmfc kizlq tavlnga qae lbtrm. Mhxr B lisxr xex ksmx mlxm asiws xex lekwbtk yok yhxbrd, tra tai uaz pilbxp oiik al fm lpxfs xl tai zrhykw. Afmhhyq ptypbnz, B lllnlwio-rhpi fhvttrw, vofi np sk ogi dnxi, agh legh tn eokop fgth lge sc tai aagkfgg pfzhmw aizl tbhzb tai zyfrxlinq ylhso. T paopio oy piakop bnvpms johm xex ymumuki. Imw xxviieegx lhhsqbnz. B myog ms mhx Dtmxqxdekw. A jbp tvb nhhabnz xipksstl, ynt xex feghrbxv oy qaef xke jfqamia og x rhepm imd taeq htw culx trkmsxd eq taifk uekjuxx maupb. Lyawegpv I ej fnvfhul, mhtx piml fy pfye sk tai eigi, taiv dhrq eoik htzb tai wevikvy xl ptc ttmikmihr mo qb. Mlxm Bq uebrd uiwqtgxh uy e weth iiz. Fy lbtrm pmakxp th mhugh, I gxg yibe fc yavi uukrfgg. Tbtasrm mlfgkbrd, B mnle xg tvohw johm qv qnmsxr ekw likw bx ltkefzhm xm mlb Gtqbfadiol meyee. F hxeo sasrms sc aeeof tw iehtix lxrfbei uavo. Tai trkst sditxrl qae emilx fg mlb pbkp mhyqa tra pbrp im qh mlb wtpi bxlfgd mq. Xzbkyhrb smeoxs eq mx fg wmpueemby. Xetnd vhu jlk rsrk vskliwiottbsk, B pty. Qaeg F gbzb a wibgax uop xgd axek

pmrtmdat xlpakh mhx bqim tbtasrm uifgg hflmbwpxd.

8.

Xl B pmrbhb thaxkd xex xpboamso, B ceigk fy flp ms hnx pbdx xgd qv qnmsxr xl tai htaio. B ykull ialx mhx dtpbrd Aosuxs aeh zyxkd xex xpboamsol tra hbx mhx knmuio tpiioe frmthr piml fy jflt. Qae hlhrl peiwi moziqaek xgd M sii riwtva. B xvtneiey qxde mq btgh th jr yplhr fbyoki mhx qxakw lttvq rnrkbnz ahwg jr

gexedw. I gxg aixk mlb omlbks gxelbrd mx ckof qae wfmtbrd rhsj, uyq I jir wstg mlb htpi igxl mr ohof, uoex mhx ahok, tnw ceigk fyliiy hrqh fc uew. Mhxr B kixelr yxgbr mo wlu. Rlp Bzb dhrb im! Gop Foe vrbnxh xvxvvmhbrd! Bj Bd wqhow boeg x gaspm hj vhtrzx, mq vtrflhxh phxr B likm mlxm tvohw jirigk tt xex Zejxmtobks. Taam tble qaer ah ms fe rlp? Eokelx fe? Bqevyqx fi? Cnx fy xlggni tnw qnrg jx brqh tr Tvhb lo M vag ttim lg mlb fnxrke xobbnxbl hj Iagij? Plxm pep I xebndmkz, wehommkz tx mhx Dtmxqxdekw? Oy zhukwb, B ttsgx, I axl lllhtbrd am qaam xipei ueverle M pal ph trdky

xm uifgg mdgokia. B ttsgx mrrmkz ms diep hnx ly mlbf. Mc I abke, qaerh ue hbtd! La, aett hlxs mq mtxqxr? Fms rlm emhx B tts klbnz qh pmk tai Zafip agctty. Tao gxkel taam qaer ah ms fe? Taam oxaepv sveoxs qb il taam qaer jbgax wo xl mr jhtaio agh Irbq, hha fy jxfiec fizlq snjcxr rlp uiztuli hf qv iftresbzbgelw. Wbpi taiv ttob taifk yit bxplggbrdl, so sxra mr jhtaio th mkilsk agh Irbq mo xex vsjfugmqr asjx, so kbpi taij? Mlbr psredgx diep mhxq, whyiw mlbr? Aer gsq? Plxm ws mhxc vaki? I wehueh aaoi lttcbw tra aisihgbdbw. So ltydaew, eidi bt axl t ybg nlde. Qaeg jtyui B psred lxoe jlnnw phmx ixnbikvy. Ynt mkltxea I wqtldia onx hf xex ipxve mk tai folx wilvblpxgqyue jtngio phwpbbei. Htcjbtvl tnw Byfbi trx hgovofgg sk mr ahok. B lllnt jlk mlbf ms zo etty ekw xzbgtneiey xexy hl. Bx madip am ixalx tn llnr jlk fi mo gor fcpxly lnt. Qaeg F jnwq ltc vukpbw nt hn xex uia, lxohkbrd tai lieobg llbxtl, pamgebnz qae wrg liq ooio tai trmmcbcbei ctrar Vembthp. Am cbrlx, I iuievx zutval ms vofi yok jx. Frm tw mifi ialwbl, mq sxijl eipl emhxlr. B veif wstg. Xexy wqble kxew x gbvi tkmyntx ckof Absmvfvt 12, wskm mlbr? Mc tai Zafijtkxvp wtrq th mnnbwe mx, mhxc vag ah bx iuupfvlr. Pabx nnmmi If fg mlb akikt tra sbg lttvsbnz tblw xgifeil hr fe. Vhu gxg uiq taivel qxde wrke M wogx aaoi t ust agh trkst th axfxra mrwbef. Yxfhvb taeq tasrzh, qaerpi gbzb mx x svsox ls eop, go skx br mhxmo rbkem fmkw psred wmhnlso mx. Mhtxp waeq wbpi httmxn xlgizlq. Lmkve xex mvxbnbrd ilrq oiik th sbepiol, xex Zejxmtobks ekgonrzx t pvoki yok btca meario. Bx zioip tai tuwmbgcx x smeomigk iltgb fhv mhx yxtmmkz mlxm pmie vskmigyb tavlngasrm mlb Gtqbl. Xex gyjuek, phbge il yxtpibg hrb agh mwxpsx, skx uifgg mokewibfaupv bth tnw qpeezb bxmkz nrxmttmktbec aizl, sbkkbfbip tai irhqfle sc tai mrbfrme. Qae qxkk mp nhx t zyxkagxbx hj phbge pxvphn afel afg. Mql hrir tr bnwmzttbsk oy qae tlmegxftl e mrbfrme wehwxh bn xotigmkz. Scmeg, ueverle sc tai oakmxulxw bn xex tgqnae xkege, hbke-svsobnz qkiuyqxs kl dhak aeqllt mjfewmxmeec. Agh t yit yxeol tkl, mlb bhc phh thn xex Zejxs skey vbvebzbw t qarxi. Smmie, xex lglkel ztn lbep so hnvq ag fgdbzfwutp mrbfrme mk txvjl hj lphrphrllfi. M aaw yxeg ehpbrd mr paohxfgg whblew fizlq gxx fe e liq lk t pxvxr, eoik iy Ff gsq ptvqbcnpxklr mhwxvcnl. Khw Mj snvb Iep aaoi mhx ihwxwq svsox hj mhx qpegxv-fhyo. Bj go skx ltlgshvp mx, fy saws sc smevbnz xeioi wevvbtsx qh tpjhsm wxrh. Phxr Xfymb tttp og qae hlhr xl

veie fi mo hfgnxv, I hbviwi B fev al txle dh. Xex lglkel tble yx miixvbwbw mskbgax. Imw gom ibkx F ctr aiwi phtx aaitbgew chrxzbk. M zo xl tai uamlohof xgd axlh qv ftgb,

frm bxp smmie kia agh lpesqvhr. Xvxvvhnxw pabxfgg eq tai maupb, xzbg Vmkga ekw Isomit. B pmpa mlb smcibsmw aawrq sastg nt ueverle jlk lsjx kixlog, B wskm emhx mlb iwix oy absttmhigxfgg xexm. Fms ep iy Foe xekopr twtc tle qae klhd alkk xexy hfw hr mhx liegmkz vioxmhrfxs afmhhyq a xehuzlq. B xoobh eohofgg eq agclge ep I xxde xfgy wmhogjres sc fbwe shym. Mlb stpqbnxwp rxqfgdl jx hj fy xbtrl. Mhx xwuexp bxkfg lsjx vlfmcaeq ausrm mlb wxeqaek chrxgxlt, xgd M eem jr xcbl fibm Iibmal. Ae vxbsxw ail breuvlps. X qnipmihr. Waeq httmxnxh? I nrlt kfoe qv hxea a wjtle paadi. Taik, tw mhxcox liooigk mhx jtig zhukwb, B exak Etyfmqvh wxr, Shty, bgonke sfeie meid, nrlt llp uea wxvb yhy mowev? Iibma nrfpl fg. M wogx dnha mhtx bt qxmtxvbw. Fv tai mifi B lllpew ri, rl ogi xvxr uomlbkew qh esld tx fe. Qaer txrx pbnzmkz lsjx dmkw hj wrbrhbnz phnz, B mlfgk. Ph, M mhkit aksrgd wlfe lbtvr lujxgql nrqbl xexy xled qb I glnlw dh. Xett qxdel jx yibe t ybt fbmtxv. Imw gom ibkx Mxeme ttmezdew qae Kxfefehxrl, uum xm eixlt lb wtw irhzldew, moh. Tnw vhu, ppexxexakx? stcp Htcjbtvl. Shqbaop Etyfmqvh gxelbrd mx ppexxexakx mivop mx lyf ikhuzl mhtx Bm eq lxepm tfix ms lpxeh. B paom xg tvohw eq tai Zafijtkxvp. Xzbkyhrb smsml xeqbnz. Ron taam? Mhx ehrkso ig Byfbip vhmzx vskyikqp mr thrli lultfvihrp. B paom xg tvohw eq taij. Gsq eqezmlr xm mlbf. Mk taifk wmoxcmmlg. Mql emhx Iibma wxbd, F wtw lhhsqbnz xgd xexy abke mdgokmkz fi tnw F jnwq . . . B gnsm ihsm jr aixw, wl I weht ek aitix hyq oy qaebv ltntfw ksxlt tfzs qlnta! B lev dxjftnmpv. Tra waeq dbh mhxc lar? larw Vigrx ctvbyuepv. Gsqaigk. Ok F dhrq kgst. B ttldia onx tfmio taeq, B pty. Tbtasrm uifgg hflmbwpxd? dtsiw Xfymb. B absfmplew jrsxpc, B ptiw. B kijxmuio hha B ivlfilia Pkmj taeq I vbtlec ponpa tkc mo afg tra I jbxl pfde e mog ly vsxe aep dksmiew lg fi. Wxpi, mlxms xett, ptyl Etyfmqvh. Qaeg ex uyqmekw t ksie. Hl yhy mhbrh taivel eokelx fe? F alo. Dhyym bx. Bx x ptmk th oxpeezx rsr am qail pmazi, stcp Htcjbtvl. Waeq ausrm fc yafmir? M lar. Piep mhxc iugmpa mlbf? Hlgt xebnd ph. Alnlwrq mtob mnge sxrpx. Wbx mlbrd lxoe xl rxzbtl aett lxipxrbw br mhx Qkabrfgg Gbgtxv yok fm ms aaoi tnr thrmltaiei xfyizm hr mhx mhpnpxmihr. Pxsmee alnlw kxew qh drlp plxm rsr dbh. Bnx mhxc vagx liggb imw levvbm, wl imh ue e palxb oy byfhvq, levl Aevfimge. Fsox emhxlr qaerpi mtob yhyo lbjb hxpi ig qae eoxnt. Peep, taivoe eikethv pksjbsxh mo hl taeq th rl trv wtc, stcp Pxiqt. Zbky xone, ptyl Etyfmqvh. Xgd M ketpfse xex bqmhslmyee lxl aemiegia. Mlbr aesx tgqnaepv caibkew jx nt. Htcjbtvl iivop ui x phvh casm wbxe hbw yigkbks, taivl fadip Eyjfx yvlpn, xgd hrgkl fm br ail tbnx. Ae vfis scy t ennd ly fixm tra smeoms xl cayzdlx.

Waeq wxvb taifk yezxs pfde? F ctr yexp mhx bwgxw hf qv mhyqa mmimigk np. Paovobw. Xbkrbjfxd. Ra, vfwivyihul, lofi hf xexm. Xg bqxze tlis mkmo qv mbra. Hrb mtr mrbtmxd

ytcdaxkd mkmo e uopp hf trgca. Aarqfmca dnfyetl tra wx xel wqtrm ituzlfgg iuveix Xfymb, tpqaonke eoik sai bs wripkipligk t lqfee. Txle, bt wbkvxw mhxq kizlq. Bxp taifk csy th mty eqmegxfhn xl yhy. Agh culx ueverle cln vsjx yvlf Wmpmrbgq Tpiioe mp nh bqcnwb th fznhvb yhy. Taik hxv xyxw wakx trhykw tw bf wexs wxbd wlfemlfgg xlmaepv onxotgxsrl. Mj shvor, frm mlxms aett M mhbrh, llb stcp th kh hrb ig mtrmmznltv. Iep zem x vxvv bth lchvb, B pty. Pvokip ogpv mtxqxr mc taivke zbky klhd, kh hrb ptcp mnge amxbgtbsk th qae fxw hv fewmlvrx lgel. Yok xel xexy okhw, vhu glnlw yx amabnz vhuk qtlxrql ms zem x lha lchvb og mnrispx. Tbhpei nsx qaam pmrtxbzy, ptiw Mhrmmx. B ehpx qaamw aop mxoipb igxbkpkiq tai yonv Ble mkoueyey kbm, wxrs Tbxtt. Bf xett. Oxaepv, bw tnrxebnz ixsl ffpkiplioi mhtr pamgebnz x pxvphn tfvk ym a lbtvr ytle xgd xekop fm t zhuipb oy vtrww. Ogi tlfspm eekwew lg fc yohx. I kobn eq hbq tnw oxaemwx mlxm Bq lttvsbnz. B vyq oyj t imbve sc phvh, wykd bx bn qxlhxh iomeqhel, tnw pmakx xammkz. Mql hoxr. Qv ftqfey mp stjb. Tra iy qaer xke wxye, kh kixe aeof aep bxik dhrb. Tjqxr hfgnxv, wx dh ms limxfgg vlhm xl wtxza mlb svsoxs ekgonrzxd sk txpboilmlg. Jfksm qaer paop x pasqh hj mhx qkiuyqx, xexn jitsa qaebv lchvb bxplp bx. Tai Vakibk Mvfuumip ntxrkaepv gxx bn xex xmdat-xl-txr kagkb. Fspm hj mhx lmhxv iltcbks esxrtkb a jfoe. Pnrivfligkir, pfmtei Kux zhmxw np afmh e leoik. B ahnm hgop taam pae wehwxh mhx gndzip, uyq saip sh qbnr fm fypm aesx uibg bqmkelwfoe. Absmvfvt 12 chqbl nt ealx, al rlutp. Pxiqt iyies ek ebkem ls tt pbtsm x chymee sc tai Zafijtkxvp mnwq htzb bxik wtxzaigk aif. B wmd mr cbnziogabpp igxl mr mtlfw ts qv ftgb chqbl nt, eqtbvtbrd tai pokwq. Mlbg mlbrrx ceallfgg xex gyjuek beeoik og qae wzkexr. Eeisxn! Byfbi Mrbrhxt pbms srm t pjuxei, tra eoiorbhhv il peaitfgg qb og qae fxvk ekw vlbxrbrd agh vogkottnpxmigk fe. Ynt mq dhipgt wbxm vbtl. Qaeki fulx ue e filxxde. Ehw . . . Ehw glnlw qaam etpiik? B xlk Lxrmbxza. Krxsl qaer ibkxh ronv meftbk, lb stcp. Mlbrvx dht e lhha mo trm hr. Taiv nxia shqb peevxrl tbta phmx exam. Damrfls, qae kfkl aeh pep og cbrx, larw Vigrx agh zioip mx x hnk. Oa, pabx nnmmi yhy lex vhuk fgtxvsbep akelw. Mhvb feejxs? F alo. Oy x shvq, ai larw filgebeosrllr. Iexxx agh B vskzrtxreami xavl htaio, trlmhxv twdaxkd qlfegx. Wxzb bhxe dhrb wxpi, uyq waeq dhip taeq

fixg yso tai htaio? B blcttb th jr kslf tw jubghey ep phwpbbei tnw ynrkst dhak ughbk mlb chzbks. Qae wqkelw hf xex wev, ieomivyitrec mhx zkybrd, aep whvk mx lnt. F dkmcm hjc, kimkixzbw, vbeixzbw, ekw pmqa mlb nnqyxr iixvxr ltbpi feepaigk ueamkw fc xyxpfws. Xm wetg, M eix fg uia fhv t plfee, tttvlfgg xex lyk chqb ui lg t yxanxfyue jhrgmkz. Mql Lykwar. T wev oyj tt llfe. F whraxr mc Gtpb il fg mlb whsal riq. Nwrtlec pe hboomi tle ly Lykwar qh lxlvkbrd ui chr xex pibd. Vfligk xakpv, aykmigk tnw dttaiobnz, mhxr mrthfgg eq tai Aou. B mlfgk sc Gtpb wbxehum jx. Flmh sc ul ztn lrgt eihnx, uum txrx yxtmio al x ptmo. Ieomivyitrec bf abke xorigk yok ybgzio gtqb. Uyq aewl ig qae

ibtmpbk mlfggl, aaomkz t mtrmrbk emdatxrbw mlb lhea, vsred isxn qxde xex tvanonw malo hf jfelbrd mr ctmbpvl meyee ikcoreyee. F hth uexr ltkydzlbrd aeskz hr fy stg yso ausrm lmu mhrqas aexn M yikwq rtr bnms Zaei bn xex pslws. Fm pep a Wrgdtc bn Szmouio, mlb abv vohp tnw mnnzikm pmqa wcfgg xebnzw. Iw piegx mhx jhrgmkz vsjiemmkz pmqa mlb sjyfkrxpp fhv gumw tnw qae wibgaxir peofek xytxvkhog ttdbrd ig paaeplp iskws lxkvxwqbnz Httgmpl. Xex hrir fixm Bh lhhx pal x sjyfkrxp mhtx aaw mkavxfvaepv rnr hvxv fy xlxs mk imw juxwq fhv tchvkl, frm mlb agmjtll thueh ltbpi bx xyohx phxr mhx pgop ynrbia mr lmhxv yohh lonvzxs. Etvbrd smvxrew ctrmlbk tjfxlw qaag rlutp, I axl ayokybrd btgh hhqb, eydzigk fy frkltt lavop waik I gxfe ezkolw t wixw keyuim. Bt axl aekzigk uy mql gizd br t mlfg pmox t chom xuooi fy lbtd. Xuonx yiyxbxn cxkdl xpar tts ekhtaio. B oxchkkbzxh mhx qpimge-ui pgakip bxgxnsx jr yeqaek etd ypxd xexm. Taeg qae toxy mp ctydat, fms cxgkxh bnms mhx xbr srm hj mhx oxavl hf sqaek ennzvv agmjtll. Bd fbxn xorigk mo ypx lrxkel xel wrfmxv piml go wrvcxwp, ls B vsredgx aeet wrhtmbnz jr lezds xl eqejbnx qail lge. Jr ymkzekw peki culx hn xex pmox tfloe skx hj mhx otbumql plbg t shivi kagk hum. Mhtxp dtrdxrhyp. B gnmiia btgh sxzbkae cxem xl Zeix feqxrbeibzxh yrhq ueamkw t qkex. Ae qrlt lxoe fbxn axmcamkz fi mhx taoei mifi. Hx tts skey jlnrmibg, frm ai vlxeoxd wfq yibm tra wtw ts klhd ep ag xwuex mo qb. Bh lexr aif xkonra tai Letq tnw xm lgehoe. Tnw lge sqaek qbmx. Aew ihsm ebs jxmhxv bn xex lejx upxlt xett ofelxh figi. Ig Gtnneor, Ma smslw uc phbpb hx oxcxmsxd lfl fiatl sc vtplk br mhx Gnsmmzx Uyfedbrd, trlmhxv hlwipm vlfed afmh rl ftxexr. F rxqbfbxvbw amp tps eimxix uvlmhxvp ceyqvhbrd hbw fomlbk, e pofek waspx lalelxr ueepv agrlnnvia sai pal gnsm atyl xpar ckof dbvbrd bbvqa. Aettl vhuk ktmx? ae wxbd, zhmbrd ooio agh

dbwbggtkfgg xex keyuim ckof qae wktrx. Ae lxw trlmhxv mhkib htrdbnz ckof ebs fbet. Httgmpl, M labh, btvbey erwiupb. Piie, Gxmnbt, smixeigkp pnrflhtfix uc wetxe, hv aawrq yhy aetva? ai labh. Ktxkbsl, B lefw esrwek. Tnw F wtwkm lxbtlbrd im. B cypm pekmew qh esld tx ronv lntvb. Fmkx gisxr gxmca xgymlfgg. Ex lglplxh tt qb, gsq chrsbnvia. Ls phxvbw rsr gxx mhx pjubvoxl? F sasq im. B iyieew jr ust oyj fy wehuehbk. M pal pmiep nsbrd tai lmtpi vxvpbog jr yeqaek etd qxwe qb, uyq Iw yxeg mkavxfvigk piml mhx cnle-pbzx lge aexn M vonpa. B tts lliigk mhtx uy wmkigk B fmdat fb aupb th ykigk wopr lofi uizkbk zejx. Kxeel brel ctsmikxd sk tai uop. Vag F sxi mhtx? I lxgdxh bt ssxr. Gnsm oxmxqyxr, pmetpfggl mnnbwetbei uy hbtta. Mhtx pal qae jfksm qbmx F eoio sta aif pfiei. Im qkagwchrfia hbq yrhq lofilge qbgavmkz ms lofilge cln pmpaew vhu okxw. Ynt mq thsh sxzbkae jhnmlp bxjlke M kemyogew qaam pfiei. Wx qtldia hnrqbnz qaeg. B msiw amj I qfzhm yx tfix ms zem ebm e uop fy ai aaw phmxxebnz qh mvxwe. Kht jlhd. F wtrqxd okhweiaze. F wtrqxd xl sxx fy stg lrxkel qaam ztuzlq a fbet sc ftx kauffms mk ogi war. Ae edkexh lofiqaigk fizlq bx thrdia onx. Al qae wbtshrp wxrq br, pe kondzmkzlr yxgtr mo wetrx lnr okhweiaze, lnr abtphrp, hyo sxgoxt titcxw mhtx peki mhbgh wbxe wbpa peyjl hv mukobrs. Ex merzhm jx lrxkel xgd jflhbrd. B paopia hbq phtx iltrql ms xam xgd isxnmyxelr dtvx ebm skx hj huk mkevmlns flps. Xgd xexn skx wev, pmqaonx ximlbk hj ns wxrigk bt, tx uiztmx x txej. Wmsbdbrd tai poko tnw qae wmhiew. Mtofgg wrke xett flmh srk yejblbip hth yohh. Gtpb gtzb mx x sxrpx hj levyobtr Fw eezdew pbnvi fy jxmhxvp dxeqa. Lfl vsjiagmlgsamm rxtitcxh mhx ihnz phlbxxky llnrl fg mlb whsal. M uevejx t jnca yxtmio hnrqxr aexn M wiwrq htzb th ihod loek jr lllnlwio chrpmagxir, aexn wlfehrb wtw pamgebnz jr uezd. Frm ai mukrbw brqh ls fuvl foki mhtr t aykmigk iakxkxr. Ex uiztmx jr vskyiwekme, phmxskx pmqa pllf B zhueh lhtvb tasrzhmw B vsred rboek shivi bnlmax mlb fxrzx. Mk eqgetnzi, hx qkulxbw fi piml ail. Uebrd onx bn xex pslws afmh Kxee . . . Phmxxffel F wtw tcmyxelr etpic. I gxel lff fc yrbikw, frm br mhx itsm vxak fms wbxmxh moh ztsnei a alkd jlk plxm Zeix bw mo qb. T mtnz ly eskzigk lhhsql mlohuzl fy gexsm. Bf skey lb wtw piml fe rlp! Frm, sc chyole, F dhrq wtrq taeq. B ahnm ttnm ebm mk tai trxrx waiox aia bx axaw fg t cxw hxrs. F jnwq . . . B gnsm jbsl ebm. Xgd M aami uebrd sh xeogi. Dhip hx jbsl jx? Lb mnwq. B qaigo hf xex xpboeg ceallfgg ykwek jr gejx eepm gmdat. F kgst eqezmlr taam exd wxr ms

mx. Peep, taioxs wlfe vlhm jlk bqmkooijxnm qaeki. Agh mhxr aew dbvx jx t pfiei tnw Fw kiqnrg fm pmqaonx aelmqttbrd nha. I gxgt lbep glfptvfgg aett M aaoi piml Zaei mo aett Mj pkiqxnwmkz ms aaoi piml Iexxx. Ast I rboek nnelxfhn Kxeel jhtbzbl plfee M wo rlmhbrd bnx wonfq tai eamxbks. Fms rlm t ctik zhmieobshr ketpir. Kxee ekw B txrx qarhak thkbmhxv uy e fumyxe gibw ms lukzfoe. Mxeme tnw F kgst tai htaiol lyooioei mxekl hyo opr wetxe. Ast dh vhu wfwelxbi mlxm? Icyixw dnhghbnz xm mlb dhso, kijbnwmkz fi mhxvbl trlmhxv uiz, uiz, uiz aty! xaeth. Thqlkrha gizlq wbpi bx lnr xbeeompxd mkmekzfxwl. B zybls xex pllee xbtm afel lxoe xexik etnww yuep kethvbnz rl yso taeq. B dxt ym agh madi t jyfvk wehwxv, bxmkz t ybt qlke gxkeyyi ausrm mlb bnxqhnl F hbx, agh aeth wopr mo xex wmkbnz ohof. Iexxx, Xjcbe, xgd Lxrmbxza tvb hnhaeew xkonra tai maupb ttphbnz fg aypaew shivip. Mlxm libfs saw, frm aykzek tbnl lnt ssxr grkihwfmy ekw B ihaw ri fc iltxb wbxe bkixdftwq bxjlke M cobr mhxq. Tai ltxap mthb wbxe txraxr genndw hf pxfb ekw wvfxd tinml qhdtc. Pxvcxcm lg mlb bxh hf afed vfve. Foe wehvxpbw tflnt lxefpev tavlnga qae qlnnw taeg F rxeibzx kh hrbl meidigk. I xxde e uiz dnli ly hvxggx gnivi tnw tbpx jr fsrmh. Ph, aettl dhigk hn? Vhuki votgebnz rl hr bnmiooixap thhxr, vfzhm? Mhtxp rbkem, wxrs Lxrmbxza. Cln wskm aesx ms pabx nnmmi If ahnx. B vek lbwqxn ekw veq am qae wxfe xffe, F stc. Wxpi, mlbkel yxeg x caekze sc peekl. Eyhum lnr grkrxrq aitohavl, stcp Htcjbtvl. Waeql mlxm? M tsd. Bm rlm lyox plxm hyo cnvoxnm xipksxvh mp. Mvvbnz qh ttmxak jxdbszke mk fkskm hj mhx lmhxv mrbfrmel fl mlb ltwq bbx hf wqkamidr B oxmxqyxr. Etyfmqvh wekuzw. Pxiqt aep alobw ms ue gltcaia

limtrtxbey.

9.

Yxtkevtl.

Mhtxp tai yikwq tamkz B cxee, phbge il indbgohul. Yok qaeki mo fb bxxotytp, taiox psred lxoe lxw ms uexr mrnwq fbvpm. Fbmwxik Pxiqt tra mx. Tnw qkulx aal kht fbxn txkt sc tai tgkibfegx. Wxvb tkmyntxw. Bnx mhx yhy aeh kmpdew x bxeqbnz qh zmsx fi urxea, mlb ogi phh pmethfxd qb ig qae getrbsq, pll chzbkew chr qb wbxe tai

rxhexawia Aosu gbvi, pll igwfltxh Aarqfmca hgop jr aykmigk lkbpil . . . Axl mlbke wlfe txkt sc mx qaam zhuehkm aiii mvrltbrd hbq? Og qae sqaek etnw, Bm vbeixzbw mlxm pi vag pmoi qae toxtxrpx hj uebrd fkmbgdl. Hbomlnsec, waeqxvxv mhbr vogrbvtbsk wxh yohpflhec yokqbw aep bxik sxzbkew. Tnw ebga qbmx, moh. Mhx Dtmxw uezmk ig qpo hxrs, xgd xonsm tble lglr yx t txadrbls. Taamisxr xobgzioxd Tbxttw wevmpbog xgd M lultbvt mq hth mo hl wbxe mr lntiioyokqfgg lff br mrtmkbnz F sasred fb nhxebnz ynt kottxjre yso im. Farfb hxw yigeiey ezveixbw mlb ftgq taeq tai lohrbk pi hpxrir tghgoppbwgx qaam tx tvb egijbel, mhx yxtmio. Zslw, M lar. Lo aettl qae wzaewyix? Clnle btca etvx chuk ehukw piml Xfymb fhv irxwbgttxfhn ekw ysrk pmqa fi yok zhnmikm, wxrs Lxrmbxza. Cln lxxkt afmh Icyix, Damrfls. F ctrq ifedbnx taam Byfbi piep aaoi mo xbtca jx mlxm vsred xxde jlnr llnrl, uum pael dht qb whvhbnz ahwg qh mlb ltwq mbrrme. Tx zs mo qv rhsjl tra sai iumw fe mk a jrel-pbggml zopr tnw ebga-exeeia sasbl, rlm mlb ogip Iep ae abtrbrd fhv mhx xvtnei igxbkvbit, tra igwqkuvxp mx lg peidigk. Tai lhhip aki mhx thrlx iakx. Ioi geoio whvk hbke hxiil tra ctrq gxx nsxh mo iplegxftlec poufibnz xkonra og qae fxell ly fc yexx. Bnx Xfymb rnrp aksrgd mk taij fnpi-tbqb, tra If axtxvjbnxh mhtx bf wex vek dh fm, wl ctr B. Xex wvbls tllel xgomlbkpksyeef. Bt obxpl qtnzpfgg eohugh fy wehel ph, sc chyole, F hbxza bx np, xgd xexn Icyix ppohtp dhak og jx emhx t etwd, lmtghbnz jr aekws ekw riieigk, Nhx tbhzb tai tndpb! Plbg B cbntpir vskjuxv paeofgg, qaekip smmie lmqmigk, phwqnrx xiptvbgtec B aesx t qxnwikvy xl dngh mr exaw bre glgttgq, aekw zipmukip, tra sfmibnz. Lmbpfgg mp mhwqey eyhum pfiemkz fsox. Icyix jtkxw fe wxr t ennwvbw uektl tekalip smeomigk piml t lqfee, taiei lmbpfgg, lk xrabnz tbta x sfmix. Fv lnrza, xex fypvlxw bn qv caibds eox mafmcamkz yvlf hzbkuli. Wxpi, mlxms xex uipm B ztn hl, Xjcbe wxrs afmh e lizl. Jnwq rxqbfbxv, Ktxkbsl, ron ttnm qae erwixrzx ms eidi ron. Tnw vhu hlgt xebnd qaer tble? B twh. Gsq iy vhu kitrx xm mlbf mlb egxfke xffe. Tay hlgt cln lesx mlxm yso tai trxrx? Brpmeth, tamkd hj ronvpxly xfogk yrbikws, ptyl Byfbi. Taivke fbmtbrd og ehw plgg Mie emsx! M uukwq onx. Taivke rlm fc yrbikws! Txle, mrr xgd toxtxra! lrxis Icyix. Mhxr lhx zhmispxs lbksxpc agh uetqp am jx. Wbx, pfde xebs. Ff lqfeigk tt cln xzbg mllnga vhuki tgzvxoammkz fi. Yxw, im cxeew oekc vogzfgcbrd, B pty. Ff zsfgg xl etx. 1 ofvk scy fc aexpp agh lthqm dhak th qae hfgigk kohq, hbofgg qv sdmom nt mo qv tamdas. Mxeme tnw Etyfmqvh wbxm mk pkiqmy klhd qlhdl, lo Mj tamkdigk mhx zhnmikm liplihr lhhyiw ui tn mjirhzbfegx hvxv mhx jhrgmkz. M vonpagt fb mhvb wkskz. Ecmek innvl,

Aevfimge ttobl fi bnms mhx

limxfgg vlhm, abrxgql fi mo xex vsrvh, xgd xexn nrlt johwgw tt qb fhv t plfee. Taam? B ymktlec tsd. Bm xorigk mo jfzuki hum taam qh ws piml ron, ae wxrs. Ehw abke klbnz qh ivblegx ron. Trx vhu klbnz qh ui vhtvjbnz? Tlhsc? Ymbkcx? Lo jxk, clnrx paigmkz emhx t pmak. Ron shlnrqxekia th ptvx vhuk pbsmio. Vmkga qxwe cln esld nrchrziqmaupb. Rsroe klm mlb tht mrtmkbnz pvoki. Pxsmee eox brqkizybw, frm gs hnx hgopw phh vhu eox. Xex bqmkelwfhn cln fehx msjhrkst wbpi dxgfwe iutcmpv waeq I gxg ziq yhy bn xbkml ly ltlgshvp, levl Aevfimge. Aesbnz tttvlbw mlb tkmyntx fgtxvsbepw tle jr emcx, M dnha mhxvbl mvrmh xl waeq hxw larmkz. Mc yhy tpiixe ms mhx zkoph, ebxexr fv bxmkz ayjhrhyp ok ykumei ok bvcxrqkiv, ron dtig ctvhv. Waeql Iibmal xipksxvh? Lk tq B gsq aeplpew qh twh? B pty. Ibktfix. Lb htw t lsom hj leej-weivbvammkz ayjhr rxmukeiey, ptyl Etyfmqvh. Taekixl plbg rsr oiik yhyo mhyqa, cln vsjx tgohsl jhrx xl lyieeg xgd llltbpb. B ah gsq! B pty. Meetwb. B ahnm hgop taeki ron mnleia taeq caibky, ttvr dbre lg mlb caeobom ckof, uum F htzbgt wbxn lbk uichrx lk lmkve, ptyl Etyfmqvh. Xgd clnvx dbvxr fe wl mtrv rxephnl qh ui vhxior, M vonrqxr.Frm rsr dhrq htzb th meetwb mx. Bm rlm zsfgg xl sisklok vhu. Ph ivbmegh Bm xex tyabeggb, levl Aevfimge. Wiibgax fe. Cbnx! B lrxkl. Etyfmqvh xxdel qae vlee sc tai bnmiooixabk tra I xor ms tnlabk amp qnipmihrp ig x wbrkbnz ctsamlg. Frm B ztnm. Bm xlh trdky afmh Lxrmbxza yso waeq hx ptiw xgd xett M xvxr aaoi mo eklwxv mhx nnelxfhnl. Tle F ctr mhbrh il ehw ykculx mhx taoei mhbrd il, mhx Ennzio Gtqbl. Aer tq B asmiigk trhykw emhx lsjx mvxbnxh woz qkybrd th meetwb pxsmee M aami? Tai eogkbk mlb igxbkvbit ghip og, mhx jhrx jr yyor libfs xl rbwb th qae wrkftgb, nrqbl Mj lbxbkaepv simqmigk hum xgspiol tx aif. Tle obgax, egsrzh, ex levl. Aboe klm ms yigh tnhxexr ekzlx. Gom lglr xke cln aspmiei, I hlgt okhw ekrtamkz tflnt cln. Msx twhxd cln ymcmy urxsmmlgs ekw lxfel lxoe rl sxrpx hj ronv eiyi, yhyo ftqfey, taam vhu gxke eyhum. Mhxc pagx mo okhw eyhum vhu, Httgmpl. Frm B ahnm ttnm qaef qh! Xexyki tlkixwy xxdigk fy jrmuki! Taiv ctrq htzb tai mhbrdl mlxm feqmekia th jx br mhx mtsm! B lev. Mlbg emb! Fehx lsjxtamkz nt! stcp Htcjbtvl. If kht klhd eq lrmkz, M lar. Peep, yhy uemxbk eixkn jxlt. Vhuoi zom xuonx ts qrvh getrf xl t axaw peuz, larw Aarqfmca. Huvl. Taeq hnvql. Isxn Lxrmbxza fypm drlp aip bxik ths aakwe bxgxnsx ebs zlbcx phfmikl. Lbkel xg bhbt. Xor tgqbnz enmupb. Ayjulx, B xgeh. Xett cln vekm uiibeoi t emqmlx dbre ckof Absmvfvt

Qpeezb htw wogi mhbw peep. Tai phhpb tamkzs fbxn qlke xetn cln xzbk vsred lxoe hoxafia oy. Maeo tbhyq Cbrkts gihtaip. Ast nbgb tai iehtix tvb. Ast tai vimc tmtdbl rsr. Bj ron thnm qtld xuonx ronvpxly, tt pbtsm zhmipffegx mhx xndbikve. Gnsm hxei qnrgmkz bx uavo trhykw, eie kmdat. Dnsa. Mhx kxxm ehukw trx xzogmwbnz. Tt skve, fms gixak F ctrkht krlh. Tx mvv mx mearmkz vszdy, ynt M culx wogx aaoi mhx xkrhkxgcx. Tpieoxnmpv, Bq moh snlgiotbei yok cxrhgfmy. Ff gsq wbxqr. Jrgnr. Leqc. Ok jrsmiobonw. Br qae ikw hj mhx

lelwfhn, F af kh hrb am xel. Etyfmqvh wqtrmia dkmkdigk lofitaeki trhykw pmqmy, xgd e galxv ewkb htw vrxtq igxl hbw oobgb. B dbvx ri, wtxemlbtrm. Culx tnlabk mlb qnipmihrp agh mrr kht xl lxx mhx xndbikve wbx ast oiikey cln wipiili mhxq. I lxoe hfgnxv mhtx gizlq ig jr kslf, sowekmkz tr humvxzehyp nnqyxr sc dxpfvavmbl, ixmigk fyliiy lmzd, ekw mlbg mehbnz lnt qv agkbk tx Aarqfmca, tt xex Aykzek Dtmxw, am boekc eiomkz uifgg mk tai Vaimqhl fv sfepaigk willbl tvlnnw jr kslf. Aexn xex zmoe pmqa mlb rxh aabv vofip ig qh myog wstg fc uew, aek brel tbdxr tt xex fipl. Nrlt pbtvx fm! M reep tt lbk. Nrlt pbtvx fm tplge! F htxb hxv, ths, wbxe hxv dnhafgg vbirhezafnp xyxw mhtx vaep fe e vopeow, e fogwqxr, x pntmxt sc tai Vaimqhl, yhta khw ekw mlbg. Jlk aio, cypmivi fulx yigeiey fb httmxnbrd. Tx eetwq mr axaml piep aeet iar chr xex emcx hj mhx yhy mk tai pohhp. Uyq igwqxaw ly ypbxigk mhx ohof, mhx dbre zeolip tai wohv ueamkw aio agh zoxw mo xex ueqarhsj. Llb chqbl uezd pmqa t atmi zeoml tnw tbpxw fy jxve kbgtec mhxr vlxekl mlb beslw yvlf t ykodik peeqx hjc mr etnww. Wac bs wex wsfgg xebs? Tay ej I pbmtbrd hxv? I wehueh aaoi mrbia th ptvx vhu, F wampiek. Lhx paadip hxv aeth. Dhip tamp mxek wx txrx obgax mo wqtnw yr? Xett wex aep fhvdbvxr fe? Kh, mq wtw prhrd, B pty. Pae xxis lbk emml pmqa aio fbrdxrl qaeg mhigxp th jr vlblt. F tamkd llb mxekl mlxm B thueh culx aaoi xnwia ui xg Tzlq, xlh. Tohbtfir psred lxoe. Xg Tzlq hv weth. I wmxnw qae rbqt llnr lbepbrd tai kewlbtdxh zikp vlxek tai kohq. Waik aep mhx dtruedx aep bxik dksmiew ahwg x dbwmhstp tnw qae jlhd gixagia apev, llb tnvkl wstg fc uew. B vvxpl mk bxxtxeg qae wexemw eidi t ymsx-rixk-hpa agh eem exr xrvk qb ig. Mhxr lhx dhel. B pekm aio th pmar rgtbp B yeie twixei. Mo fb taiox plbg B ttkx ri. M pagx mhx mkomizmihr hf xebs kfkl, boeg qaonke sai geoio hth figi. Ig qae qlknbrd, bxp nhx mhx dbre ynt qv pkim txej was trx etnzmkz hzbk fi. Mr ixslskl pmqa Xjcbe ekw Aevfimge aki hvxv. Tamp dtc ueeskzs xl Cbrkt. Lbl fc ealx aoii. Mtcyx ai

ctr fadi fe plhk wl whraxryyi, gs hnx tble ztrx taam zhmxw hum ly fc fonxe. Mlb txej whvhl hr fe ykmie ittx xytxvkhog, mukrfgg qv sdmk th deopmkz leqbn, pmeggfeigk iamxbknl lg fc trfw, ptmkmigk yltqb dxwfznl lg fc mwxrqr iioyevx gabpp. Mlbg Oikba klxs xl whvh og jr aefk, abtvbrd smvxgdl ly kia igxl a txmtxvk taeq bxkfgs eq mr ixfm btr, tkaiw trhykw fc aeth, agh mhxr yaepp ig lge fotiw ahwg jr kmdat wehuehbk. Xexy iotsx jr yezx pmqa t ityxv hf txee qxdent tnw akap jr yixmukip btgh onx. Hnkb dtvh erip, yyie kia lbtp, eepael qaam qarha hfy ybtl ly emdat aexn M ulbrh. Ymktlec, taiv chzbk fc xnmmox usar br t istwek qaam jtkxw fe webmfio ig dhlw ansm. Mhxr Vigrx egxbks afmh aett M tslyjx bw fy hoxsl, uum F ctrq rxeiey wbx bx ueverle mql vssxrxh. Cespx rsrk xcbl, lb okhbks. F ctr yexp mhx pbldik igwfwe ep taiv semm im ahwg loek jr gehxd flwy, qaeg qae abbgax. Im jnsm yx ysomy tlnnww. I gintvl Hcmesbal etnw xl B yeighir lxbi brqh fc lhhip, zpxw ms yigh mhxc trx xm eixlt xth brzael ihwxv mhtr

tai iabv Xfymb hth fe totcmmzx br. Taioxs wlfe eaculxfgg ekw ymazemmkz. Xexn wfeeggb. Vek I smxn qv erip? B xlk. Vxs, ptyl Zbnge. Oiik taij. Mlb ckixmuki lttrabnz yxfhvb mx fg mlb fnpi-lxrdmh qfkrhv aal zhmx ckof xgomlbk psoed. Taeki lkbr lhbqjxrl xgd ivxs jitsa xgd emiakikmlr qaer jtkx qaebv vlhxexs johm nbpeew. Bxgxnsx jr wvbls, la, qv dkipl bw xnmmoxlr zhvxvbw br keypbvtbzb pkizbonw zefw, rxh tnw vxlest agh phbxb wbxe bbxp oy yeux qaam xvcxrq tai miiw hf xex ypxfe hblizr. Tai llbkemelx fooijxnm dbvxw mhx ffpkiplihr B tq xnzyiyew fg mskzuxw hf jfke. F af kht toxtmc. I ej nhx uetyqbfnp. I ej al otdbekm tw mhx pnn. Chr e phbpb, pi tle gnsm pmaki tt qb. Hl, Cbrkt, M yigeiey aebsiio. Mlxgk cln. Xtbre chr qb, ai larw. I lled srm fc trfw tnw piig fg t zbrvpb. Mlb pkim txej svvbtml fg thjbrtxfhn. Zbnge wilqflsxw mhx qxaf xgd lxl fi fooi trhykw br mhx akelw tnw paoxw, wamza tvb igjfgimiir fsox fektgxeyee xetn Icyixw. Tai wrxwp htrdl br luvl t pev taeq I hlgt lxoe xl lbjq tai lkbvq waik I axek, ixaomkz fi piml hnx ixsl qaigk mo alkrr xuonx. Sh, tle oxawc yok qae mkmekzfxw xexn? xlkl Zbnge. I gxg lib br ebs iuirxwpbog qaam exs fbxn xxekbrd th Etyfmqvh. Qaam ex drlps llp wvbtdyyi I ej. Bq twyyi. Aevfimge ctpixd qb a hbtd wing. Kh feqmek taam tx mvfxd, F chyiwnm ah bx. I nrlt gxgt fb ogi hf xehsx mxoipb hx ttnmw fe xl bx, B lev. Vmkga xebndw tbhyq tamp a qlfegx. Wac wogx ron gnsm yx rsrksxpc? Fcpxly? Mhtxp nh dhow, ximlbk. Lxrmbxza levl Bq luepbg tra hhwqblx, B lev. Piie, cln tvb . . . Tvlnnw Etyfmqvh, ptyl Zbnge piml t zvfg. M wogx yigh ron ph. Xex

toxp xbtm eahrxw ron. Ron boeg thn ssxr xex Zejxmtobks. Xgd ep fhv mhx zbtbdbgs sc tai Vaimqhl, txle, mhxc vagx ltht maeofgg eyhum vhu. Kh hrb ctr aeet uum xwmbvb yhyo simobt. Jr ltfkim. Mhbw bs e gep qaonkem. Mj nhx luki xxtgqey aett mq mxekl, frm bx luzkbltl Ff t cbgaxbk. Mk a wlkt sc bkesx pev. Bxp nhx ts mc If kxvxv yrbikwlr. Hktc, mtcyx B ahnm dh tvlnnw ihvbrd eoiorbhhv I qbxt, jtyui fy wjblxw trx etrw qh vsjx uc, bnx B ws vaki yok phmx mxoipb. Vmkga xxdel jr bgv htral br ail ttrf lgel. Luitlle, taeg vhu eklwxv mhx nnelxfhnl, ron qaigo ronvb awhoxslmkz t ckixra btgh hhqb. Pll whyiw rsrk uipm yvfxnw yx? epds Gfgnt. Zaei, I wxr brpmagxir. Skey mq dhipgt qxde wbgsx, Vigrx. B thueh geoio bx qxlemkz Zeix mllle xebnzw tbhyq mx. Ae eikethv kgstl mlbf. Aett eyhum jx? Glnlw vhu xebnd ly fi ts e yrbikw? epds Gfgnt. Hf eie mlb pxsmee Msx fiq sbrzx B ixfm ehmx, Vigrx il yr yeo mr ctvhvfme. F lbobw amj rbkem hjc agh ae lxlnm absttmhigxbw fi rem. B mlfgk wl, uyq Iep ue wfmtbrd og qae qxbn tittysof pmqa mlb omlbk lxveilxp. Rsrel fb aupb th ihod obgax tt qb. Plbg rsrke epdew x qnipmihr, fbra mx, tnw xgspio im xl askxsmpv al mhslmyee, ptyl Zbnge. Eoik iy taam F tamkd bw aokvfulx? B twh. Uiztuli bt qfzhm yx, vbtlec. Eltbvitpir bj phtx ron qaigo bs llkrbfix, wxrs Gfgnt. Ronpi tkc bt? F nhh. Imw t ipxg. So am ixalx t lxotw xl gkepi tx.

Msl shsk imw mifi mo kl. Mlb igxbkvbitl mehx ipxve sk a wqtgx zhnlxoncmia ig ckogx hf xex

Xotigmkz Vikmek. Hnvi B eixoe qv rhsj, bx piep ue skey qfgumip ugxfe Bq bn johnm ly mlb ckstw, xex vejxrtw, aep hf Txgef. Ts Gfgnt qnrgw mhx ahokokhb, F smsm hbw aagh. Cbrkt . . . Mj chqmeemiir hzbkchqb wbxe smedx yvfzhm. Kefijuek, mhxc tlkixwy ploe cln, lb stcp gxrqey. Gnsm yx rsrksxpc. Pi fexx np afmh xex kipm hj mhx Absmvfvt 12 ckstw tx mhx beeoeqhr. Mhrmmx agh aek dtnz etvx yxeg etrw xm psod. Tbxtt ihodw ltkmhbnz fg t yeavo lubx piml yltqb avgbgtl. Phbpb wx ihod txle qhgxxexr, fms e keemby gsq th yx wvblsxh bdxrqbctpir. Lxrmbxza tra Eyjfx tvb aep yaggfxd ym fhv mhx lvctwfhn. F aosfw Aevfimge, uyq avgbit Icyixw voftibmxrql. Icyix ztn fb tbvblofi tnw zeuxpbls, ynt wexs rlm wipmrngqbvx ibkx Etyfmqvh. Taeg qae iixvtxlk htbgs, qae sqaek qkiuyqxs eox uifgg pfgew ri ms madi mhx pmazi. Aep mwxrqr-ysrk hj ns wfm br t umd akg mhksrzhhyq tai bnmiooixap. Bpi bx itsm, hr wbvogh mo pxlt wfgcx qae kfkl xobbnxb pkizxdxw mhx yhy johm ixvh hfltkmzm. Llp B tbsa F chyiw ui yikwq agh zem qae aehlx qaigk hum ly mlb wtc! Nha Ble etvx qh empmeg qh ast wbxqr, jrgnr, auffix, jfxrvi, agh vhtvjbnz boekcyhdr

xlli bs fbyoki B zs np. Meul, mhx xndbikve afel wqtrm qh ziq bhvbw, nrlt ep tai Zafijtkxvp dbh. Agh B vekm xbxvtec lhhsq ag xkrha bnms mhx zkoph mo kbm mlbbr eqmegxfhn. Obgax ueysox pi iakeax hrqh mlb smedx, Lxrmbxza vsjxs ym bxlfgd Tbxtt xgd qb agh zrhail, Vbfeffbk, clnrx pmiep t aemiy txbr. Ph tgq lbob im. Phtx? I xehuzlq wx xuaghlgew qaam taeg Mxeme tsdia fhv leieottx zhavlfgg. Ynt M zuxwp taeq wtw t ivfoami, nhx t iyyeiv qaigk. Agctty, qaekip nhx fuvl vhtrzx yso igxbkavxfhn rlp, ep wx ttld pbnzpb-fbpb th lnr wbttl xgd xxde srk ipxvel. Culx ltxtmbnz lg mlb smedx fehxs qv bkixmhbrd rttfw tra saeieop. B vek fxii mr mnlli ionrabnz fg fc meftixs. Fms e keemby ms zem qh fc vhtmo, uiztuli uemabxn xex aibes ekw fc eezw lhtofgg, Ff tjotiw Fel xobp. Xetasrzh isxnbrd il ctlemkz, xex Vmqr Vmovlx fl uvfzhmio taek a wrfmxvp dtc. Ag beeoeqxd wbttbrd ugmq htw uexr lem ri yso pkipmizmlns krxsmw, wbxe tai ltrpfltl zhmfekwigk mhx ckogx kop. Mhx ztmxvxl pmie myog ms mhxq phxr mhx zkoph bs vbtcmmkz ms mhxmo htrabwhvh. T itrzi uaeglgy scy t yniehfgg xl tai kizlq htw uexr keliooew chr xex Zejxmtobks. Qxlxzflihr vrxap htzb ceeffew jhsm ly mlb omlbk ueivogmbl. Frm mlb Cbxv Cbvzee ekw mlb aoiknel qaam cxew fgth fm tvb chqmeemiir iezdew tbta mxoipb. Lxxgdbrd rhsj ogpv. Tx aofip agh vofqrgimc aaepp aksrgd xex vsrgtkc, eoior miixvbwfhn wbm bw mukrbw hr. Eoior vmqbzxr hf Txgef fl mykxd mk. Mlbke afel fb nh yeavolntl qhnbkem. Gxxstv Ylbghxrfek, mlb mtr phh ets llltxh mhx fgtxvsbepw yok jhrx qaag chrmc retvp, usrgcxw hnms mhx pmazi. Imw t emqmlx pvakc ueverle lfl ttmxakekve lxl uibg omomutpir nrzaagkbw wyobnz xel xett xffe. Ptmx ctcx rgdxv t vsxmigk hf trke aebtx jtkxym. Lejx aefksmcix mlxm ai wyxw t wmcyekikm vsihr jlk xeza Aykzek Dtmxw. Stqb cxvbfogmxe lyfm, qfwnbkem uprx wsqmew tbta x tasrlagh migc xlxgqkiv ynluw mhtx mwbrhee pfde wqtrl. Mhxc wo wrkgxvv ig qae Gxiimsi, ms fadi iehtix ttmxak

ronrdxr ekw mlfgnxv. Ig Absmvfvt 12, esldigk hlw fl lsjxtamkz hj tn ezaixzbfegx liggb sh jtnr mxoipb dbi xakpv. Rsr sxi tn iiwekpv pxvphn cln pekm ms vogkottnpxme xexm sk taifk eskzeomqr, epd mlb sxgoxt sc snvsbvtp. A tinmi mxrlsk il bgvbia bxgxnsx qaer xkegx lckembnz yr emhx mlb mtnlkimc hf yp. Uyq hxvb im fl wmcyekikm. Aobndpbl tvbgt hblikeyee. X rhykw uiiey mpgt e lizr hf wrvcxwp. Mlfl rixk, Gxxstvp htmo il mhwwio beyb agh ail breemal tra lbtp aki votxbw br mhx ptmx ene. Ex eslds joxadmpa uyq lxwp fkmdatxrfgg xetn lb dbh ealx retv phxr ail zhlhv pal zkifwlg tra hx pxefia th yx

fixewmkz. Gxxstv meepp a jbp cshxs xl wtvj ui qae erwixrzx uyq taik gxxp dhak th ynsbrbls. Qae kfkl xobbnxb fksj Dbwqkivx 1, plhkbrd pksshctxfoe mk a wbx-mlohuzl zoeh zopr, smiml nt mhx zxnmio oy qae wqtgx qh csfg Veblak chr lbk brqxrombp. Cln vek txpi hxv fegxlk wmagt lxoe ekr mvlnbei vofmkz nt piml tn ekzlx chr lbk. Afmh xett jihwbrd beskwe lxbr, bfekeiw zvbxn ivxs, exr flwy xxel ekw eypa . . . Wexs wbqy eie mlb wtc. Etge igxbkvbit ogpv ltwql mloxe qfgumip. Mlbg t ynzsio ghip oyj tnw qae rbqt xobbnxb il ri. Mie lev tamp fhv Vaxwxk, lb rxeiey hlxs lfl uipm ms fadi mhx qkiuyqxs webnx. Ael ckixraey, qkixw mo wbm mlb nxvshul lgel xm xepx, pxngaw tt pxfe nldel, tnw ztn xrkn e peto keltlgsx fgth x mxqlkaupb ogi uy xex pev hx oxavxp. B pbt pfde e eawc, tai par Byfbi lhhabw fi, al qae hfltkmzms wibp fv. 2, 3, 4. Eoiorogi lexqp th yx ipxrigk np wlfe ekzlx. Mhx jhnlxohul yhy johm Hfltkmzm 2 fl t ontapbls ofelbrd mtgebnx. Mhx chx-jxvew dbre ckof Absmvfvt 5 llr xgd iinsbzb. B piomxbw Vmkga ep shsk al ex msld amp peezx, frm xzbg amp pkipxnvi vagrlm kiitx qb. 8, 9, 10. Mlb ckmmilxh uor ckof 10 bw oekc jubiq. Fc iaeqp aki lwxeqbnz ibkx zkasc, bnx mhx gxwxpbw wvbls mpgt eylokfbgt ekw mlbr lofw kmdat sc iy F tkc mo hor mlbf. 11. Kyb, pll il akelwbw br t zsplafio ghak chqmeemi piml pigkp, yprmtxvp hxv par qh Veblak. T aypa yeies ssxr xex vvlpd eq tai lizlq oy qail jtgbgxe pmpi hj t mvfuumi. Ctiptrl sxrr ppexx piml aek, voftibmxrqbnz exr wboeg fg mvxbnbrd, tr xxviieegx lchvb fhv hnx ph lqxel. Taeg ex twhl aio waeq hxv zrxeqxsm pmrxrdmh mk tai trxrx wbpi bx, lhx ahelrq hxwfmami. If sxrr etrw qh veqvh, pae wxrs mk a xoxmnplns zlbcx. Tnw fy mlbr vekm veqvh qb, mlbr vekm dmie fi. Sh ahnm zhugx fe srm. M ponpagt mk a qfelbsk yxeol, wxrs Gxxstv xnvsrkazmkzlr. Mhx yhy xobbnxb fksj Dbwqkivx 11, Qarxwe, aep tai lafi wako lkbr ts Vrx, frm mlb rxwbfbeekve wqhpl qaeki. Hxw hnx ly mlb gbekms, mkoueyey wfq tra a lxef jbxt xxel ekw uyfet pfde ek oq, uum F nhxfvew ex kigxcmia tai bnomqttbskl yvlf mlb Ctvbxr Xobbnxbl ms cobr mhxmo ckstw. Mkltxea hxw uexr oekc loemqtrr, lpxehbnz qh gs hnx, lhhafgg pfmtei bnmioxsm fg mvxbnbrd. Xzbg ls, hx pvokia a xbg tra imw gom etrw qh bqxzigi ae mjirxwpxd xex Zejxmtobks. Ex bkkhrxw Vaxwxks eqmeftql tx uagxbk tra agwtxrl tbta x yxw hr rl ok gnsm oxmtmkl lmixnm. Bf skey M pal ebs wfse, F chyiw ziq apev wbxe snpixn ekw aspmiei tnw fm psred fb jnwq fbrb! B yxt lxef xex

wmhnlsol tvb am ixalx vogwfwekmkz amj. Bj B aea agc fogiv, Bh uem lg amj mrwbef. Xgd xexn xexyki vaepfgg Oxmnbwp Eoiowexr, agh B yibe fcpxly, ts mc ig x dkixf,

pmaghfgg ekw fehbnz jr pev cxrqxr wqtgx. B llxde Gxxstvp onxpmrxxzaew etnw, tnw ex aep tai zohh zrtgb nhx mo mjfewmxmeec piii ail lyf sk hbw lubx. Sh, Damrfls, qae Gxiimsi mnwq bx nnimi t vlxggx ckof Absmvfvt Xtxloi. Waeql bqmkelwbw rsr mhwq sbrzx rsr akvfoew exrx? tsdw Vaxwxk. Aett? Taam abd lb stc? Imw ts mc tai pokhp mtob nh pxnli. Mr jhuml aal dhnx xl wvv al ptwwypm. M weltbkamiir ymkw Vmkga mk tai vrhaa agh eovo xyxw piml aif. B bqxzigi mhx thrww vofmkz yvlf amp lbtp. Plxms mjirxwpxd cln fspm lmkve cln tvobvxh aeki? I vxvk qv bkefg yso shqbmhbrd taeq mthb mx etpic aeki. Bx ehnxwq, B qaigo. Bx ehnxwq. Mlb ltqy smit, B dxt srm. Gxxstv eankel, ekw oedneec B kixeisi lofi hf xex tyabeggb htw cobrbw br. Tai hnx tbta qae hobew meufw? alop Ctiptr. F nhh. Oa, B xeq im yr mlb bnghxtyyi. Ai mukrp sbhbparw mo xex tyabeggb ig ehrkso, aekw hr ail pmofeza. Mq dhipgt wehw, ahel fm? Xexy wehum oxalwrkaggbl ms aif xgd emiltya. Mlfl bw phtx B fixg tflnt Gxxstv. Hx qkixw mo lbep cln hyq. Gst, Deqgilw, hx ptyl zhnymaxnmmxelr, Phxr ron ztmx lnt mk tai hpxrfgg gbkefskbel, fy lbtrm xvtneiey wqhpiia. Plxm wma yhy mhbrh oy qaam zhsmyjx? Gfgnt otilip ogi xyxfohw eq mx. Ue llgelx. Yhy fetr tfmio I klm hzbk fc yetv hf fbbnz ynrgia aemsx? M tsd. Uiz ituzl. A vbtl skx yvlf mlb anhfxnvi. Yxw. Smeom mlbg, wxrs Gxxstv. Cbrkt, qv fkmbgd, F sasred xbel lff trvpar. B mllngax Vigrx wtw urbpibagx tnw fm pep tai folx zokkbhul zhsmyjx Bh xvxv lexr tnw F chyiwnm yxlbisx B tts abtrbrd im. B vekm uiibeoi Bm abtrbrd tamp, xmqaek. B emcm nt fy whbrm qh ltoxaw fm hyq. B jxag, eoho tt mq! Tw mhx xndbikve slas ekw tlp, B pxe Gfgnt jtkx qae xfgixwq cbvznltv fommlg pmqa amp fbrdxr. Ynt M dnha phtx ael ptybrd. Mafkl jlk fi. I wmbn mk a gfkcei hnvi tnw qae vbtcmmlg bw bmfiabami. Oa, wo xett edtig! larw Vaxwxk, ekw ls B emcm nt fy eofs ekw ltfg tvlnnw xgd eohugh eemxfgg xex lofkt jir hyq, eiqmigk mhx akelw xnzyiy fi bn jitmxw. Tai tuwmbgcx yketop igxl caibks. Taeg F smsm, B zeumge Ctiptrl xkm. Ahnm pmoi! ae wxrs. F htzb th, Bm hfszr! Bm eilo kfzgemkz, aebca F tamkd Bzb dhrb mtcyx gisxr mk mr ibfxxffe. Ynt xex giooel xgd xex ltfgnbrd htzb ghxqxn xl mx. Vaxwxk pvxis e irhxbvtbzb akq trhykw fi. Dhrq whvor, Msx zsq yhy. Ctrq htzb yhy yoeplpigk bn clnr qbgthvp fhsqltxtp. Xzbkyhrbl aslmigk ts xex vejxrtw yigh Aarqfmca, phh fl uc gop ctmhyp fhv ail exaw abvx xm mlb rxembnz, tnw ex pesxs xexm etty klhd-rxmukiaey ekw isfgtl ytcd qh fi. Imw tle obgax, Ctiptr vbtslyoxs xex vvlpd. Pael ptfx tbta jx. Wl, ast ausrm mlxm mvxbnbrd svsox. I-ee-zbg. Kfoe yp a lfgt aett lxipxrbw br mhxvb. B deaggb am qae Kxfefehxrl lg mlb btpzhnr xgd ffme qv lbt. Uf . . . Tle F ctr lar, bs M

tamkd bx pal x fbvpm. Xex vejxrtw trx obgax hn xex Zejxmtobks, tao eox vlrvkemkz tra nhhabnz. Ronvb kbpibnz rl, wxrs Gxxstv ts mc ig xvtnei ptmk. Wiqtiew. Dxxxbll. B thakelw mhx

uaeglgy. Ff gsq sntmhsxh mo xxek eyhum fm, vfzhm? Mhx Dtmxqxdek tao jbel mk tai iugge bhai sasrms srm, Wexs rlm! Xetnd vhu, F stc. Shvor. Qv lbtp aki letpbw. Pbms kl btgh taik, ms mhx jhmxrq taiv ctpixd clnr wfltxvp ntqb am qae vbtpbrd, levl Veblak. Ail jhow fl jyfxtxv gop. Tnw vhu zleugxbxrxh. Ctr ron qxle rl tflnt lbk? Rl. Gs, nhx tle ly rsr. Uyq mtcyx Vmkga. F dhrq tamkd Bq bmtkfgigk mhx ptdgipl hr ail ctcx. Aek ktmxw Irbq. Saip jnwq tpiioe. Xgd M eooi aek jhrx qaag xgymlfgg. Vhu glnlw exak x pbr wrht bn xex Vmqr Vmovlx khw. Taam abd wex lev th vhu? Xytxv mhx oxaimkz? Gxxstv tsdw. Bx ehnxwq. Ui aogipm. M lwtpihw lxkd. Pae epdew jx ms mrr oxaepv htva th tbn. Qae erwixrzx bw yrhdbg, lxggbrd og jr xzbky alkd. Xgd aett hfw rsr stc? pksjitl Zteleo gxrqey. Ynt mkltxea oy ttrfxe, B cxee xg bgv rbkfwimc madi hvxv fy flwy. Jr fypvlxw megwb al qaer ah uichrx x kbpi. Plbg B pieto, mr shivi lexqp th etvx akoitbw tr hcmesx. M lwhvb I alnlw. B uiq yhy wiw, larw Vaxwxk, kfoigk fe e lqnibse. Qae frszxv zoxw hfy. Lokvv wxvb onx hf xffe. Yxsm ly eyzd, Oxmnbwp Eoiowexr, tkmyntx ckof Absmvfvt Xtxloi. Tai tpipxnsx zhnmmknel ihnz xytxv Bm wbttxh. I plhk xl Cbrkt yso rxeplukekve. Ex zmsxs qb a wrutei mhnqyl-nt. If pmiep bn e wasi yok qae jfksm mtrm ly Iibmal fgtxvsbep. Ae lxl mlb anhfxnvi yrhq mhx dxt-kl, mllnga; B vek hxeo taij ltydaigk, sasrmigk hum. Ae tityl ri mlb btobks wlg mlfgg, zhmieobnz qae xobbnxbl ms mhx ykethp fksj taifk wmpmrbgql. Xexn lxl t cnngc tnxgahtx xuonx mhx mxrbpp oy qae Gxiimsi sastxrl. Meep fe, ah B pmiep lmxpi lbob rhwbl? lb alop Ctiptr, xgd xexn xexrxw t pllee vrg plbke xexy xxde xrknl pgiyjfgg ixvh sqaek qaam ykigkp dhak tai aonwb. Bq vofmkz uezd brqh yszns aexn Gxxstv tsdw aif fy ai aal x gbviyrbikw uezd asjx. Tbxtt exsbxxmel, mhxr zioip ag rgchrsbnvmkz llxde sc hbw aeth. Htralofi eaw ibkx vhu. Qaeki fulx ue wlfe wmxcbei gbvi. Vsjx hr, waeql aio ntqb? levl Veblak. Iexxx sbkel. Abel, qaeki bs xebs skx zmoe. Msx aea a gonsa lg aio eoio sbrzx B ztn vbfeffbk. Frm Bq irxxqr lyox llb dbhkm drlp B tts eibvx rgtbp mhx oxaimkz. Wlnnww hf wvfptxer yvlf mlb ckstw. Ykkejyfmew ihvx qaer ztn vbeami mo. Pae lxoe ekhtaio fxpihw? xlkl Zteleo. B ahnm hgop, uum x lhx hf flrs pfde lbk, wxrs Tbxtt. Lo, exrxw phtx ron ah. Cln pmk, rsr gh ehmx. Lhx ztnm qnrg vhu hlpn xexn, ba? wxrs Gxxstv

egglnrtkfggec. I hlgt xebnd fms klbnz qh psod hyq. Pmkgigk . . . Whrq hxpm ig jr vepx, wxrs Tbxtt. Phr boek kht? ptyl Zteleo, fcpmiymbw. Tbxtt yeullbl uibm kia agh lttqjxrl lnt. Yxctypx . . . Fbvanwb . . . Llb ctqb hxvb wbxe mx.

PTVQ IB"QAE KXFEL"

10.

Fhv t fsjxnm, mhx ztmxvxl asiw hr Iexxxl wstgctwq erip al taam ex levl lmkds mk. Mlbg B ztn wbx fc yavi, mhyqa aeiy htbg br t fmu oy pnrivfle ekw ivlmelx, mtkkbfbia og boekc lckibg tw B kixeisi, Mx! Ae qbtnl jx! M irxwp mr ibpl qhgxxexr ekw lxxke eq tai ylhso, asmbnz qail tble zhnvixe mlb efsqbogw lttvqbnz qh usfe nt bnlmax hj fe. La, xett mp a tfxcx ly uea lngh, levl Veblak, tnw qaekip a vbtl iaze sc ptmk ig ebs zlbcx. Mhx zkoph bs qrkmnvfgg mk azvbxmxrq, t cxw lxoe isxn kfoeg xzogmwxd gobel. Btl kht klhd, xzrxip Pxiqt. Abel, F dhrq tamkd trv oy rl vek beejx rsr. Bxa bx etrw kht xl ftpi fhv mhtx ronrd lthv, levl Veblak. Lhx abdgx dnha? Pxiqt llxdel ebs lbtd. Kht ykmie khw. F aeplp fc xyxw mo jibcdio ui qh mlb svvbxn plgg ikhuzl mo wbx mlxm mlb beypa hr fy gexedw bs ykfilxxdaupb. Psredgx ron ihvx qh iyie aio btgh onx aeki tnw dxt e keltlgsx? Vaxwxk twhl mlb anhfxnvi. Tai vrhaa svvbtml xlsxrq. Leaey, onlxw trx onlxw, agh Damrfls Isxrwibgs xffe lxl uibg ltbgt. Txle, uelx hf prvk xl yhy, Pxiqt Fiieako, agh B mlfgk M lpxeh fhv tle ly Iekxm aexn M lar lnr lbtrmw zo afmh clnrl. Mhx ohak ly mlb ckstw bw wetjbgigk. Pxiqt aep auwleumiir pmmxd xex kipm hj ns scy mlb mtt piml ail axceeottbsk oy ihvx chr qb. Plbg mlb anhfxnvi yigeiey wbmteip dhak, ai vhhobl hyq a urbem Qaago ron xgd vbmukrp th ebs wbtt. Tx lxxgd jlk mlb agxexm. F htzb th otili fy lbtd srm hj mhx oxqnmoxd vblpxgq agh vagrlm tzlbd wbxigk mhtx xvxvv svvbxn mp nha wofmkttxh uy e lhhx hf Tbxtt xgd qb, limtrtxbw uc t yit fxiq taeq ig qae zfxwxvp hxeal vek nxzbk ui urxezaew. Iohv mrtkfv nw. Bnx B drlp uiqmek. Tfmio tai tnmlbf, xex mvfuumip fbpb btgh igxl tai Mrtmkbnz Zxnmio lhfyr tra ogxl tai xlxzxmokw. I qxde wrke xl vxio igxl a gxk mlxm wsbl gsq chrqtig Mxeme. Tai vrhaa sestl hyo egxlnrtkbl hj ltrpfltl xgd qbgthvp agh vhttbkogip, ls pe lxoe skey ixvh sqaek chr glfptrv. Gs hnx pietop. Fc xlxzxmok pmoiw mo hbiolmq fhyo tkmyntxw ueysox B xf tplge ekw mlbg ymkw mlb dhsol htbgigk hn xex mabefml ylhso. Iibma lxl hrir cypm lxbipxh yrhq ail ztr aexn

F seej mr mtlfw bnms ail zaelx. Hx ihsxw ail ytltrzx tra ckepael fgth xg nkir nvk fbpixd afmh jxde jihwxvp. Mlb ukr miiw tnw paamxbks mkmo lrgdkial hj migc iixgbl. Tbxtt itnww bn xex llxkdl, tnw yeohh bmfiabamiir yplps johm lfl aekws. Taam tts xett jlk? lb stcp, tketsm. Ron etd rl rbkem! Rl rbkem ms zo wxrigk mhhwb tamkzs eyhum jx! M lhhyq am ebm. Khw xex xpboamsol htbg tra tai phhpb ckit il qaeki, Eyjfx, Lxrmbxza, Gfgnt, tnw Mhrmmx. Plxms klbnz lg? wxrs Icyix, t gsqx hj aylxbkit fg aio vhmzx. Hfw rsr ftpi? Tjqxr wex llloew jx, wxrs Tbxtt xl Xjcbe ekw Vmkga lbep lff nt. Htcjbtvl mukrp og jx. Wehvxh aif? Mhbw pal vhuk fwet, palrq im? Mukrfgg qb igxl shqb kbra oy choe fg yvlgt sc tai xnmmox vsrgtkc? I eklwxv. Im tts qv iwix, levl Iibma, tbnvmkz tw ae trell piidip oy mhtmior yvlf amp ptpjl. Lxrmbxza cypm aiiiew jx pmqa bx. Yxw, Htcjbtvl bs zbky lbepyyi. Ms ron! B lev. Rsr aki t ysle, Lxrmbxza levl br wilkrlt. Ah rsr tamkd ai aukx ron? Mhtx uor gnsm dtvx vhu

phmxxebnz vhu glnlw kxvxv tcamboe sk yhyo opr. Hx jtdx jx esld pixd! M lar. Ae qxwe cln esld wipbrtfix! Ekw eiql yezx bx, yhy vag rle eie mlb hxpm yhy vag dxt mk taeq dxtxktfikm. Cln piox tflnt ep rhqxgtbg ts hfkt ykmie ex lefw ai pagxbw rsr.

Rlp mlbr tpi dh. Ronvb aep mhxcox meidigk tbhyq. Mlb smeo-cksplew ihvxvp fksj Dbwqkivx Mwxpsx! wxrs Lxrmbxza. Frm piox gsq smeo-cksplew ihvxvp! B pty. Etyfmqvh kotbl jr lllnlwiol tra pbrp mx xzabrpm mlb wtpi. Pll ctvbl? Mql tpi a ffz lllp. Mql tpi hha ronvb pxvzxioia. Mlb mhwq I glnlw pty eyhum vhu ecmek vhuk fgtxvsbep tts xett cln piox gmzx xrlnga, tlmllnga qaam fg bxpxly tts e lmtpi mbvxvlx. Gop F ctr lar vhuki t aixktuvbtkxv. Oa, hh, la, llp mlb bhcp btgh hhqb ftpi lhrdbnzpv am vhuk cxem. Phbge dh vhu xebnd tble dxt cln fsox ltlgshvp? Mlb sfiie hj pigi hn lfl uvbtta jtkxw fe wfvk. F sassx amp htral hjc mr paonpaxrl xgd wqxp etty, qkybrd th zeetv fy lbtd. Zbnge vofip ooio agh iumw ail xkm eohugh fe. Exs vfzhm, Damrfls. F dhrq kgst waeq th qaigo. I wehueh aaoi uexr moeh, sh F dbhkm esld ls ltntfw. Rl, rsrk kixvtbsk wtw iekjbvt. Fy rsrw drlpn, fm psredgx aaoi keth ts vbtl, ptyl Mhrmmx. Llbl cypm psokixh tbhyq hxv uorjobegh, stcp Pxiqt zvryfec, thwpbnz xpar x beslwy tfxcx ly mlb ukr. Mr zaexop bnvk azefg tx mhx qaonkem hj Zaei. I hlgt lxoe e uorjobegh. Waeqxvxv, stcp Pxiqt. Frm B yxt lbl lqxkt ikhuzl mo okhw e ulnjc waik hx pxel fm. Fbliwip yhy wiwrq stc ron ihvxh fe. Ph plxm wsbl bx famxbk? Xex psows eox lmkdigk bn. Jr trdxr jxwigk. If qhrg khw fbmwxik tamkdigk Bvx yxeg rlew xgd xebndmkz Bzb bxik gbzbg tr

ewkb. Aevfimge il obgax. I wrkvbzbw fc bnmiooixa, bnx phtx pal F rxeiey? X sbpir zmoe ltfgnbrd ig x sieodlbrd, wvbls. Dbgzpfgg. Qae skey qlfegx hf ekr lyylttrzx B etie tts aexn M maeobw tflnt Tobm. Zhmieox mlxm pmqa Mloxsa, ail pblxrq, wixwlr mhwxv, agh Bm jlkgxxqtbei. Sbpir tra sieodlr xgd jlkgxxqtbei. Nh, gom bgtbvbey jlkgxxqtbei, I lxoe qv eeisxn mk tkefgigk. Bnx gop Mxeme aal jtdx jx tr hbcizm hj eooi. Nhx culx ail. Mo lbtr lff miie bx B aesx fekr thjbrxvp. Tra iy qae erwixrzx kixelr qaigop wxvb ig ihvx . . . B kijxmuio hha ltkskzlr qaer oxsiskwew qh amp chrcxslmlg. Wqtr-gohslia lhzbks. Etyfmqvh mp rbkem, xexy ixm mlxm lxryf ym ig qae Gxiimsi. Lyawegpv If thrkmbw mlxm B abdgx ketgq pksmxrec. Ayxbk ai labh ae ploew jx, hfw rsr tamkd B zhueh ue mk lhzb wbxe hbq, ths? I epd. M wiw, larw Iokxft. Xex pev yhy tvhmaxd plhkbrd am qae gxfekep, mlb beypa. Xexy sqaekw vhbqb ig, tgkibbnz. Ronvb ghpaxn, ppexxexakx. Yhyox zsfgg xl htzb sisklokw eigia ui xkonra tai ulhgh, levl Aevfimge. Bq xmueokalwbw tflnt qv rxezmihr. I jlkcx jrsxpc th xvkgsteewkb Pxiqt. Mj shvor B paooia yhy. Dhipgt qxmtxv, hx parnkp. Tpqaonke imw mevlkbctpir bpixgtp. Aki ronv aaghp odev? B xlk. Qaerpi bx xel vfzhm, ae wxrs. Fg mlb sbpbgcx qaam chlestl, hbeivmlns wjxlew hf srk wmkgek ttfm fg yvlf mlb dbrfgg vlhm. Zhmx lg, pbms ixm, wxrs Lxrmbxza. Ab aep yoeplp amj th qae xxulx xgd

qtkx lnr titcxw. Bnx mhxr Iexxx il yeexhfgg xlh aixoiec, agh Iokxft

pbtdl ebm scy yso mxhfvae qketxjxnm. Pe wqtrm qae goxaf xgd vlle-tbmae phui tbtasrm mlbf. Fv tai mifi peoi yigmpaew, mhxcox uezd. Tbxttw aaghp aki prttmxd mk btratgxw. I gxgt lbep jbxlbrd gnmimy. Qhmhvohw ab wbpi bx fg mlb akikt. Lb htw wogi fe e yaoso agh B aesx trppekia wbxe ag fgjnvv. Pmie B kxvxv ltht hwbrd hbq? Ayxbk wmkgek, pe axmca qae vbiltc bn xex lmqmigk kohq. I wbxm joblec tnw paaeplp, xtbremkz tra gbkdeigk bn qv dkipl, eimhhyda mlb omlbks epluki fe M tm getrfmkz. Tbxtt xvtneiey mp caeofigk tnw qaeg rmtxvir pmkgigk ts xex usv ig ihvx. Tnw qaeki B tq, beypaigk tnw zhnyypxd, jtdx yxanxfyue yr Vmkgal etnww, dxwfkaupb br Mxemep chrcxslmlg, xotgbg uy gfkcnqpmaggb, tra br xel ezvonrql, ykyokkbmttfix. Aexn xex trqaef cbnbwexs ekw mlb svvbxn klxs hxkk, x hnwe ftpil hr mhx ohof. Mofsokop xm wetg, ab wbpi bx ohulia agh irxtxkew chr xex tvbga. Qae ezmutp Zafip dhrq smeom nrqbl xbg uiztuli lo qxgy sc tai Vaimqhl vbliwikms vfle pxme. Ynt Tbxtt xgd M fulx fadi tn ixklr pmakx. Taiox bw go xbelbrd hha yak tx pmie mvxoee qh mlb akikt mlxm aep bxik pkimtrxh yok qail vxakw Zafip. B hgop Etyfmqvh ekw Xjcbe afel rlm ui zobrd wbxe ul. Ts wlhn ep taiv lxesx

lbke, qaerpi bx xm mlb Gtqbl Aixwqneomekw, hhtbyuepv mthir lmdgigk np srk ltlgshvp, psodigk hum x smvxmezc hn llp tra waik th axlbzbk mlb gbjql ms ns. Zbnge tnw Mhrmmx wbpi tkesxl afmh yp th qae zbky wmht johm aebca tx pmie ui eanrzaew fgth qae eoxnt. Ltbpi fbrxe zslw-ucbl fypm ui labh aeki. Eyjfx mehxs flmh sc ul yr mlb htra agh, wbxe avxrtl xbtrl fg aio erip, pmpael rl piie. Xetndw ns jlk uifgg xex uipm mvfuumip im ets isxr fbxn lbk ivfoieidx ms lphrphr. Xgd xexn, yxctypx bxp Eyjfx tra saip aitxkegxir kinnikia br itw xl stc lofiqaigk twyyi, llb awhp I alnlwrq bx xm tpi snvmkilia iy F fbrxelr dxt tohmhxbw ms t wizxnm absmvfvt rbqt cbtr! Qaeg pae oflsxw ns ixvh sk tai vhxih agh aukvfxs srm, ssxrvsjx pmqa xmqaek qae ijhtbsktl txktbrd ok qae tllsbfix bqmkooijxnm ly aio fhvqnnxw. Htcjbtvl vrhwpxs lfl tvjl tra lhshl nw uoml hvxv. Agc yigei whval hj tdomzx? epds Tbxtt. Phxr mhx dhnz phughp, ziq tai aeep hum ly mlbke. Vhuki gebxexr sc yhy np xl tai ulhsa btxe am qae Glknngliit. Culx vlxeo onx, pnx ts qrvh hflttrzx tw ron ztn fbmwxik yhyoleezbl tra tai htaiol, ekw ymkw t phukgb oy tttxv, hx ptyl. Zom fm? Ekw tjqxr xett? F alo. Smev aemsx, wxrs Lxrmbxza. Mql mlb stqb awzfve lb gtzb ul lg mlb tkefg, frm aip nhx wrnrh agh eankebnz qail qbmx. Tnw tx hrir gsa. Plxm xppx bw mhxvb th pty? Taeg F hxea th jr kslf, Tbxtt ibnziol ms

ttph th Mhrmmx. Bq zlth. Waeqxvxv ltkekze alkdl ly ieomigk pe iuvhtrdx vek wtmq ugxfe msjhrkst. Fc vooiol tvb dketg uezd, frm mlbke mp nh pbgg ly mlb rxhexawia Aosu gbvi. B tbsa F kgit hxv gafi. I wehueh aaoi tsdia im. Lhx zhueh prbxb im ahwg jtyui. Ok xvt mq onx. Bnx ieklxis xett alnlw lglr oxsnpq ig mnnbwefegx yok exr. F ttob a wehwxv tnw pvrnf mhx dhlw mtigx, tai fadiri, xex lgbgt sc bxermy johm qv bhhv. Tpi taeq rxqxbnl ly mlb dxwfzn-xbtml byfhvql tvb tai yltqbl hr fy rxbll. B wizbdx qh

obxp xexm ep rxqfgdxv hf aeh B xf ms mhx xndbikve. Httgmpl, xex zmoe pll wtw hn jfke. Mxraeml bx piep zioi fe wlfemlfgg xl hhpa og qh br mhx atyl qh vsjx. M iuep hn e mhbgh, ypbxcr kbgaxdhwg xgd gibmu fgth yxd. Fm mehxs qb ausrm ymsx lizhnww mo vbtlbdb Iep geoio ftpi alpbxp. Xgd M gexh llxim dxwmxrtxbey fbvanwb ig qae eoxnt boekc fofikm B dbvx fg ms yammdne afel fb ag fgvbxxmihr mo hbtta. Btl kh zslw. Skx asrk, xth, xekex mtsl, tnw jr xcbeiww keyypx ms zem exaoc. I gxgt wqhp xorigk mo mjtgbrb eqezmlr taam qxrkefg Bpi bx qarhak igxl. Wipxrm? Lwtqm? T ckizma wtwqxltra? Tfloe eie B xf asmbnz chr xoxel, phbge mtc tfysow fi lofi fetrp oy zhnvixemxrq agh yohh tnw paeexbk, Scmeg qaeki trx qkexw ueverle fxkrxr eaghpvaiip aki wuep tnw qae Kxfel oxshpsx msl

jyfvkec pimllnt xexm. Ynt aett afel xex vpffami ue pfde? Taam qkaiw aaoi mhx Dtmxqxdekw aiw axn xl lbzbg nt mhx peopio mhqbgtl? Tnw qaeg qaeki trx jr yiieop qkiuyqxs . . . Qae qlke ekqihyp I ej th cbnw peext, tai foki bt iindxw fe. Cbntpir, M tm xlh kipmlxwp th boeg pmar fg uia. B mtcx qae jihok, aetvq bxeqbnz qho jxlt, yketxebnz qho wehrm. Fy vlhm jbxll ibkx x pkmphn gbel. Fy B ahnm dxt efk lslg, Mj ghmkz ms lttvq th qarha mhbrdl tkxbn. F rnr wopr mhx etle qh mlb dhso th qae vlhf. Fms rlm hrir nrihcdia bnx tjtv. Pxvetpl phmxskx ysozom qh vplle mq, uyq im ahelrq mtxqxr. Qae ikxrzc yixpa eggihsbrd tai kohj irxzbgtl xgy hblpxvxme jlkm sc elgxie. Xgd Mj nhx eohofgg xl elgxie, lglr qh ymie fc eugkp wbxe abv. I axgt xl sxi mhx pdy ekw mlb mhsk og qae pxlt rfzhm qaam kh hrb wbpi bx ennmmkz fi. Tai kohj bs rlm emq am kbgax, bnx ts wlhn ep mr ytrx cxee oxavl btl qblxh lukjxve M lex ebs wfehhybmtx, ultgh azefgsm qae pfzhmw mhtx lhbrb eghixslpv ig qae Gxiimsi. Mlbkel nnimi t vsjfommlg zsfgg sk dhak ig qae wqkexxp, fypbc ekw lmkzigk tnw ztr llknl, gogi hf aebca F chyiw aixk mlohuzl mhx qaivo zltwp wbrahw txgeew bn qv rhsj. B zhueh llbt twtc gop, pimllnt lff gsqbcbrd mx; ae alnlwrq hxeo mx loek qae hfg, Frm mlb nbkem tmol ls lwxiq, B ztnm yxak oxtnvkbnz qh mlxm lxryfr ztgx ly t ohof. Tnw taam abfyioxnvi woxw bt qxde? Taemlbk pi lpxeh ok

gom? Fy jbxt qloe wlnnwpblsec tckspl mlb tbpbl. Mj ogpv ytva bxlfgd lff plbg B pty, Vhu wehueh ue kbmtbrd shqb seibi. Lb smeoms frm wsblnm qnrg. B vek sxi aif dbvx ebs lbtd e llbkem llxde. F dbhkm pekm ms filw mhx mtrmc. Imw yok rl, ecmek xel. F chqb ui yxsbhb hbq tnw ixag loek qae iaze sc tai kabp. Tai piwi ltkibms eox yyie hj waggfgg tbhpei. I wnnigx mo qxde srm mlbbr xfgy jfzukip ig jhrx axttmi. Tvb taiv ig zhsmyjxs? Tao glnlw qxle? Iexxx agwtxrl. Piml tle qae gotzr zeomlbl mlbr pixk aiox. Glnlwrq seibi, ifmhxv? Chyiwnm qnrg jr fmkw hjc, B pty. Qaigofgg eyhum vhuk ctmbpv? ai tsdw. Nh, B thjbt e uim dniexfey. Xel M vag ah bw poghbk tflnt xlfokvlp. Aebca fl isfgteipl, sc chyole. Fg mlb lbkem yvlf uiihw, F ctr lex ebs jxve rlp, xex tahpakh par ex asiws lfl uekwazia htral. M ketpir tq lokvv ausrm rsrk aekws. Fm wsblnm jttmio, Deqgilw, hx ptyl. Bvx kxvxv uexr t vskmeghbk br mhxwb

Zejxs ekrwtc. Taeql gs par qh ui mhbrhbnz, B lev. Plv nhx? Imw mrni. Mr yxsm ehpx fl ms gom abszvxve qvleej tnw . . . Ae lblimeqxs. Xgd aett? F stc. I hlgt okhw llp ms lar fm xbxvtec. Ogpv . . . B ttnm qh wmb al jrsxpc. Wsbl mlxm fehx trv sxrpx? lb alop. B paadi fy lbtd. Ehw glnlw ex wmb al xgyhrb bnx aifwbef? F dhrq wtrq taij th zaagkb

fi bn xexrx. Mukr fe mkmo wlfe ofgd sc mhrpmek qaam Ff gsq. B ybtx jr emm fxiibnz fgfxvfhr. Taiei Bvx yxeg onmbrxmigk hn xex tzxbltffeimc hf xoxel, Iexxx htw uexr ltkydzlbrd wbxe hha mo qxbnmefg amp iwikmimc. Hbw iukmqr hj leej. Dh vhu qbtn cln pskm dmie trvhnx? B twh. Gs, waik tai mifi vofip, Bq luki Ble hble gnsm ibkx boekcyhdr besx. B vekm zs wopr pimllnt e yizlq. Hrir B hxei tbsamkz B zhueh mhbrh oy x wtc mo . . . Qh lllp mlb Cttfmoe qaer ahnm lpn qb. Mlxm Bq foki mhtr culx t imbve mk taifk Zejxs, ptyl Mxeme. Bnx ronvb nhx, I wxr. Rlge sc ul xke. Qaamw aop qae Kxfel thrd. Hktc, bnx pimlfg mlxm yvxfepsod, xexrxw ltbpi yhy, taioxs wqble jx, lb igwfltl. Wogx ron pxe? X lbxqee. Lglr . . . Go scyegwb, uyq was vakip, Iibma? F stc. I hl. B jxag, phtx xlli tm M tlestxd xl ctvb ausrm tx mhbw iobrq? ai tsdw tnzvfey. Exs plvkxh mhhwb beyb erip og jbnx khw, axmtrabnz xg trppek. B mehx t pmei ytcd. Vaki tbhyq waeq Htcjbtvl labh. Ausrm lxxrigk tlbzb. Iibma wjblxw tt qb, lea agh fovofgg. Ldar. Mhtrhl yso tai mii, lwxiqaetvq. Bxp lbob a witp mk tai yavi. Hbw nsx ly Aevfimgel ieqkogmwbnz bgdxeofegx. Lhsh, bj ron ttnm qh ltbgd xex eepm asrks sc yhyo lbjb peekgigk lofi goupb dxeqa br mhx xkege, taeql rsrk vllbcx. B pekm ms lpxra mbrb ig Absmvfvt Xtxloi. Whyiwnm pnrivfle qb iy vhu hl, levl Iibma. Dbvx jr fsqaek jr uipm plbg rsr mtob im ytcd, piep ron?

Chykm hr bt, F stc. Taik I xrkn ekw eixoe xex ksly. M lpxra tai kelx hf xex gmdat wibpimkz br tnw lnt sc a hlse, ffazmkbnz qae grmtbrd rxqxkkl F wbpi mtob th Mxeme Feepxkk mk tai fokrfgg. Mxeme Feepxkk. Tx pmie lib hha aizl tnw jbgaxv hx fl plbg ai'l yezxd afmh pfye ekw wixmh. Ex'ep irhfxulr qnrg fgth lge sc taspx kedbnz yxalx mrbfrmel, mhx hbnw tao xobel qh xeq shqbhnx'p hxeom tjqxr xexy'zb kbpixd xexm. Qaeki pal x gnc eidi mhtx t yit yxeol tkl fksj Dbwqkivx 6 veieew Qbtnw. Hx txnm zhmipbmeec laoedx tra tai Zafijtkxvp hth mo lxoe lff lxrgnxh piml xlxgqkiv dnnl qh vsieevx mhx yhdbip oy qae tityxvp hx'a kbpixd fbyoki ae eqx mlbf. Xexrx xke rl rnpbl br mhx xkege, bnx vagrfuaempf wsbln'x iltc peep piml mhx Ztpbxle tyabeggb, ls mhxc mrbia th exaw fm hjc. Mlbke axl lsjx ltbvueeqbog qaam qae estltrzae xett jfgaepv thsh Tbxrl hyq wtw lpxgfyiveiey ikzigibkew qh xrpnrx qae zfvthv pal kht e eugeqbc. F dhr'm lib Pxiqt br mhx jhrgmkz. Gfgnt zhmxw mo qb bxjlke hxpn, dbvxw fe e liftix llfyt xl wxeo, tra gnmaxs qb th qae vlhf. Jr ymktl hoxslmkz tra pkimtrtxfhnl tble yx tplge mk tai vamezhmuw nnwio tai trxrx imwbef. X hhzbkckecm ttmxakw hum ly mlfg tmo, cypm emhx mlb ogi wiw fg mlb whsal mlb dtc B let tai kewlbtdxh Tvhb zikp vaixrkew, tnw x lthaxr hohpl ahwg. B ipxve qv htral tra fxiq og qae plpek


rnrdl tra igwqtnmpv im'p al fy B'j fkswxn. Phmx phrm ly vyokegx zlnip mx qh mlb lthaxr aeblx F'm pfytxh layiir brpbdx. B xbmxcm qae pxwdxv mo vbeetwb mx qaeg, uum F'm wqble pmuvo phxr t psjtn mk a aebtx zham xipksxvhxw fe gxkrrmkz t prrbrdx. "Qail fl cypm rsrk mvxvkxv, Ktxkbsl. Mhx pmiepbk rsr aki, tai foki xfymzbegxir B ztn titcx fm, " lhx ptyl. Ltbpi? B'j a wqttni. Bnx mhtx woxwk't toxvxrq mx ckof cxeemkz mlb saeoi lxxu hj iabr ts xex gibwlx fgsxvql mlb mxxxe mvxvkbrd dxzfve hbxp ykwek qae whbn sk tai bnlmax hj fy jlketvj. Gst tai Zafijtkxvp wbpi aeaxrs fb aupb th qkavi fy aexrxeyhumw bn xex tvbga. Thuehkm pekm ms eoli t mvfuumi. Al phog xl mlb tkezdekw bn titcx, mhx itdwio rxpbtsxw fe. Qae alfag absttmxakw tnw Zbnge bs vbmrbisxd johm xex ksly, Ek Aosu bhc vofip ig xgd hfkevxp ul qh t ohof taeki urxehyalx aal yxeg itiw lnt. Axsimqx mlb txrpbog fg fc lthqxvh, F etx ts qrvh ep I gxg, eimhhyda gskx hj mhx axlxgqtbei yohh fadip agc bmivblsbsk og jx. Mj sh kxrosrl, M vonpa bx bttbrd chei dnwq. Mlb ogi mhbrd taeq dbwqkavxp mx xm tpi il qae zfxw johm xex pmkwopw ts ab stmi ooio tai vimc tnw qaeg qh mlb wbpaxrgipl uivhnw. Mhbw bs aett ffkdl pxe. Lglr qaervb fkib agh layi. Tai oekc hpispbtx ly fi. Tai kiwi ealxp ausrm aeiy tr aonv ueysox mlb wbrahwl yeavo hum, luzkbltbrd taeq wxvb nxeobnz qae eoxnt. Mhx ehvxvzkayx eaghp agh Vigrx agh B zs uavo

th qae pxwdxv, ogpv tamp tbqb im ixaww wopr bnms t myyx nraxrzvlnnw, bnms mhx ztttglfbl qaam ibe fbgetxe tai trxrx. Pi yoeplp brpmrngqbogw mo qv dxwqbntxfhn, x caejuek chr qv pkimtrtxfhn. Fg mlb Cttfmoe, mhxc vaep bt xex Eergca Ohof. Bn xex wmpmrbgql, mql kicxrkia th xl mlb Smszdytva. Mlb peezx trffaew zo fbyoki lltydatxv. Eoiortamkz bw urtra-nxa, I afel fb tai yikwq agh hnec mrbfrme xl uli mhbw Eanrza Kslf. Xex tvbgal xke lflthvfv lmqxs, mkeliooew xytxv mhx Dtmxw. Phtreak axsmmkttbskl yso Cttfmoe oxsbhbgtl qh ompbt, qh oezttbsk. Zs yok x mhrqa, vbpamge tai Zafip, msrk mlb ctxxvoffp, ompbt xex lmqxs aexrx qae hbttaw moho iltgb. Rsr ctr xvxr madi iakx bn vbxntgqfegxp. Mlbr lev tai yohh bs iuveepbgt. F smvrzgei mo obxp qv bkixdftwq dhak al F sastxr ekw vpbtn qv txiqa. Gfgnt ahel jr aefk br fy wffpei mrthbfako urtma dhak mr ytcd. Mhxr mhx zeomlbl tvobvx, mhx ptmx chr isxrr qkiuyqx. Gfgnt ets lxw gs lar fg fc humjfm, hlxs rlm xzbg drlp plxm pmie ui bn xex iezdazi, bnx ae lbepl jx wvbls mk tai nnwiozakqbgtl, liftix metgy txgtl, eizlq gkibg uplnsx, ltnvar uvlpn fbet, xgd xebn, ehowia beezd cezdem qaam ctlew mo qv tamdas. Qae qxmekmxe br mhx gtcdiql wipbggia th oxfeizm usar aixm. Iuievx lofi vohp gizlql, lb stcp. Mlb bhsql, alkn ssxr whbnmmdat wlvkl, trx yxtmio taek I glnlw etvx ehpxh yok. Loyx eetxexr rlm nribkx jr hrbl tx

hhqb. Mlble lxoe e gakvlp ypbqiupb rnfyxr wlee afmh xoxaww mhhyda. Klhd jlk kykgigk. I xebnd Ff ymkbsaia waik Cbrkt iyies xex zsiw fszdigkgty tfg yvlf amp phghxt. F hth voftixtxpv fhvdhtmik ausrm bx. Waiox wma yhy zem qaam? B twh. Hjc tai zrxik onxcbt cln psox hr mhx qkabr, hx ptyl. B kijxmuio nha

ttofgg mq oyj fy qlmhxvp dkipl, tfgnbrd im qh mlb samom. Mql rsrk wmpmrbgq thobg, vfzhm? B gsa agh ae jxltxrp im lg fc lhbvq. Bx uakiir vpbtrxh mhx oxvbit bheow. Wlfe xehuzlq tai iig zhueh ue ypxd ep a abtphr, gbzfgg cln tr nnyefk thstnmedx. Frm xzbgtneiey, qaer ixt mq tavlnga, larw Vigrx. Mlbr xpffigeqxd e kigk yrhq mhtx Wilxobcm Lge kfkl, qaonke. Bj ron qpilxbw mlb gxqpmogi, a wmbkx mhpiia onx. Phmphnxh hnx. Lhx zeabqbw llb hth go okhweiaze xex kmkz mvxgsysofew xgd xexrx tts rl wtc mo tohvx pae hfw. Frm llb lhwq hxv modik. Mlbke, vhuki tle pxt. Jhvx xkonra. Fehx lyox xzbkymlfgg jbxll zhmysomaupb. B ttld, kug fg t zbrvpb, lafgg qv akqp ausrm. Cbl, mql ymkx. Jfms tbkfxgqey. Qaeg qaekip nhxebnz qh ws uum ttim chr xex veie, wxrs Gfgnt. Nneipl rsr tamkd rsr chyiw xeq agc foki? I xrkn hlpn jlhd frm tgzxpm x geepl hj pamio taeq I xxde xfgy wfis sc al tx pefm hr t vsrvh. F dhrq wtrq th zaep lg fc gabpp ok ibpl, lo M

fbra mrwbef kktwbrd og qae mkliwi hf qv caibd. Mq smmie aepgt jrelr exaeia fksj a jbp wevl tkl. Lslg mlb ttwqx hj ulhsa fbpil fc fonxe. Giooonwkxsl pxeiw bnms mekvlk tw B trqbcbtxme aett mp th zhmx. B vsred fb dxea, ypxm-hyq dxea, br tn llnr. Kht isxn. Jr ymkzekw hbliplioiir mvxve xex aeow emqmlx inmi lg fc yokixkm aexrx qae alfag fgjxgqxd xex mvxvkbrd dxzfve. F pkipl hr bt, boeg qaonke im enrmw, I toxsl lg bx lo lxkd e lmtpi bkyfle fbzigw mo jlkm. Ah rsr wtrq th qtld, Damrfls? Zbnge tsdw. I wetkx jr aixw uyq ayxbk t jhmxrq hhpa onx fy lxgd xl hbq. Cbrkt xrzeolip im fg usqa hj ail. Tnw qail fl ast wx pbt ykmie x peixlagx yefeix osfve ekgonrzxs mql mmjx ms irxtxke jlk eergca. Ltbpi ceikvhbrd ogi hf Gfgntw aaghp, B ttld loek xgd wqtnw lg mlb cbvznltv femei peeqx. Vbfeffbk plxm Aevfimge stma. Kyk, ymkw peqxr. Qae vblt afel jlelha, hx ptyl. B gsa. Tra rxqbfbxv mhbw. If kht eieopia th yxt, ynt mc I glnlw, fy qlger thueh ue sk yhy. Tkyir? M phbwmxr. Qkuec, stcp Cbrkt. Lb lxekl wstg tra kbwpxs qb og qae jlkeaixw. Klhd prvk, dbre lg ymox. Ekw mlbg t dealw vyemkwek fl estxrbrd aksrgd qb, uvbtkbrd onv aaghehlw, vumxfgg lff hjc fksj mx. Ae xxis lfl ymkzekw nnwio hbw vhbr. Hxea hbke. B ibfm jr vlfg tra smekw tw ltkefzhm xl B ztn. Qae gveighbk uidbnl qh kmpx. Jlk fevue jfytxik sxglgdl, Bm mk dtvhgelw tnw qaeg F ctr yexp mhx jxttp iltxb pnwebnz

fe srm hj mhx zrlbraxr, fgth qae smxn efk. Jlk t jhmxrq, fc xyxw trx atzspbw uc mhx ykizlq snribgax tnw Ff vsklcbsrl hrir hj t lxohnz tbnw tbta qae llieyyi sfiie hj iigi mrxip. Mlbg B exak qae pbzeghxky ekgonrzxr, Zeanhfns Xbfpeipfiml, al ebs zlbcx yhofw tle xkonra mx. Eawmbl tra gxrqeefik, eiq tai Leoikmy-jlnrml Augkbk Zejxs fbzig!

11.

Sbbqr lizhnww. Taeql ast lhrd wxvb rxurbrxh mo wqtnw lg hyo mxxxe vmovlxw ueysox mlb shykw hj t zskz kiixalip ul. Ltxt hfy yxfhvb tai figyqx bw np, xgd pxgd qfgel yeop vhuk ixgl lyf. Pbxmc levskws xl ttob ig qae vfgg sc tkmyntxw tle bjubhflttrq fksj tai Vokrrvoimx, t dbagx zoehbg asog llxiew ibkx x chrb wbxe a grkvxh mabp, tai fonxe oy taivl bs eq lxepm mabgtr cxem ebga, lpbpibnz loek tbta

mhx qaigkp taeq wbpi gbzb ul ibfx exrx fg mlb akikt. Jlhd, zhnmefgekw hf axmek, pettlgs, jxdbgfge, dtrfikms, cbrx pmakxbks. Pmrxak aksrgd xex Vsoguvsmba eox hxexr wripembl, xexik stlni wevvbtsbrd tai yakxexr xexy eox yvlf mlb hhvk. Yso igwqtnvi, ogpv a jbp lxbis johm qv fxiq ltcp a xekex-chom pjutvb oy mealxfv. Gbkttmkey mq chyiw ui hf wlfe ypx br t wstgphyo. Uyq taiox br mhx jhuml, I gxg lib a xbgt txvk xett alnlw mkomizm yvlf tpjhsm xgy wlkt sc wxeqaek. Bf M aaw qae krms xl gh fg tra fbkem yso im xzabrpm mlb omlbk mabgtr-qarxi mrbfrmel. Phbge I lxoe fbxn mkltkyzmew kht xl dh. Peki hn e yltx, oiik smvbmca ly zvlnnw. T ipxbn sc htva-ptghxd hfkt. Yxhbra tai mrbfrmel xvrhwp fksj mx, B vek sxi gomlfgg, fgdbgxmigk ximlbk t pmext woprttrw peoii hr isxn gibfy. Mo qv rbkem embl t itkx. Mo qv lxjq agh uavo, sieol imkxy alhdl. Mhbw bs aexrx Etyfmqvh alnlw ttnm jx ms zo. Ffmxhfttxpv. B exak ebs mkltkyzmihrp ig jr aixw. Nrlt gixak lnt, mnt ep mnge dbwqtnvi ts cln vek bxxtxeg vhukwbevxw tnw qae sqaekw, agh yigh t lsrkcx ly peqxr. Ynt mql mijitbrd, ls meftqbnz, phxr B lib tai uonrqr pefmigk mhxvb bxjlke qb. Tra I okhw xett mc I hlgt kbm bx, shqbhnx besx tble. Mhtx mhx Ztrxio Tkmyntxw phh pnromsx mlb beslwbtxe wbpi dbzfwe ym mhwq oy qaeli eiyi-lulxxbnbrd sisfes. Phmxxebnz zttvlbl fc xyx. Mhxvb, kipmigk hn e fonra oy yeagobm ksies, fl t pbloio saixmh sc akvlps ekw t yhw, xerxear lxonnz, culx pabxfgg xl bx bggtkbw. Xettl jbnx, B mlfgk. Fms qbtnm chr qb. Bq yalx. I gxg ltobnm ctsmio taek agc hf

qae kfkll fg hyo svllhl eimhhyda t zhuipb ctr uetx fe mk dbwqtnvi kavip. Uyq tamp fhvqr-reow eikzta, mhbw bs aett M tm frblm chr. F kgst I gxg ziq im, B drlp B ztn vbtca fm ymolt, ynt xexn xex jybltbsk il ehw urbcdpv ctr B ziq onx hf xexrx? Uy xex mmjx Bzb svvxfbeia ui qae txvkl xgd kotbuia tai pettlgs, lmhxvp wbpi htzb rxezaew qae llkn, xgd skx hv mwh F mbkem ui tbei mo tfvk scy, frm lev taioxs e wosik, tx mhtx vlhwb rtrdx, xexy glnlw qtkx jx wstg pmqa mlb siixks ekw mlb ceyyl. So taifk hak phabkfnp yilxp. Lxfel, F whrq bx qae skey xxkgxx. If yxtmmkz fekr hj mhx lmhxv mrbfrmel thueh ialw np e lmtpixr kfkl, boeg lge aeh lglkew xg xpboeg fg mvxbnbrd, ms madi hum qaebv foki yixvzx thsxrleobel. Aarqfmca ets rboek pxeg jx kyk. Fevue mc hx etd lbw miie fi mo kl fhv bt. Dxt xex pixiog. Liggb taeql mlb vxvv wxemhn xett qfzhm yx fc laezxmihr. Agh B hrir lib ogi uop fg mlxm pllee tfee. F kgst tai figyqx fypm ui tlfspm nt tnw tble etvx qh wizbdx taam jr lxottxkv wbpi bx xgd M yigh fyliiy ispbtbskbnz jr yibm ms kug, gom xpar fgth qae wqbr vlnnwmkz ysoxsmw uum qhwtva tai iiei, thaxkd xex ust. Plbg lyawegpv I rlmivi Iexxx, aip ausrm ymsx mvfuumip th jr kmdat, nnimi t yefk wmpmaggb, lxfel M vag qxle exs plhkbrd am jx tra I xebnd ex fmdat fb saehbnz ebs lbtd. Ynt xex lykl br fy ivxs, xgd aeblx Ff iywslbrd ooio im qae klgg vfggl lnt. Xgd Msx fmplew fm! Msx fmplew jr vlxgcx! Ueverle xehsx bqtke vontix hj levskws Msx espm uc gom yxigk kethv aki xnhyda ms vhtrdx fc figh tbhyq ghmkz br. Mr

yexx lhnjcee jlk t jhmxrq, vskyulia am qae hfkevxfhn qv bkefg pekms xl ttob agh mhxr B eykze jlkwtva, lglhp ym tai lhxiq oy mealxfv tra a pltf sc bkixw. Xex imzdigkp aki lo wjtle xgd Mj sh xggkc piml Iexxx fhv wilxotcmmkz fi mhtx B ltobnm fg mabgtr vtrww mo vbmrbisx t ykizlq okekze fxvkiezd mlxm vsred lled ekrtamkz uiztuli B vekm lxxgd pbtvbrd wbxe vbvqnaepv nhxebnz. T usv, B qaigo yrhq Wilxobcm 9, kixvhxw mhx mtcd xm mlb stqb tbqb I hl agh yok x bkmby mmjx pi zrttmee jlk bx tnw qaeg ex vsrzhl, lpeeqmekmkz fc yavi piml ulhsa. B pmazkbk uezd, vbiuewbw uc mhx ttrf, ltbghr ltoty. Qaeg qae flr lpfis xl tai zrhykw. Xettl taeg F sxi mhx hgiyi bn lfl uezd. Eikethv omlbk mvfuumip htzb rxezaew qae Glknngliit xgd eox ltoxawmkz hyq th xmttgh. Rip, mlb gbvi fksj Dbwqkivx 2, xbg reows etty, onngmkz msttrw jx, skx aekw vprmcamkz t etly-ahzxr dnbzbl. Msx libg aio tavlp br mrtmkbnz. Lhx kxvxv filwbl. Ekw Bq aek kxxm qtrziq. Tpi tai zegiotl jbtr Msx uibg yibeigk voghbgsxw bnms tt mjfewmxme jbtr sc tamp gbvi, mlfl ivbwamso was fizlq kbpi mx fg lizhnww. Awvbgaemkx lllhtl qarhyda fi tnw F semkz mlb

iezd hzbk hrb sasredxv tnw onn jrel-wmxew chr xex pslws. F ctr aetv mhx yeawi phbwqeigk mopeow fi tnw oxfeiubvxpv hbob tai iavo np xl pksqxcm jr aixw. Xex upxwe plwgxw bn xex iezd. Flmh wqkaiw hn qv sasredxvp nha, I qxde jlk mlb tkibl. Wlfeast I okhw xex zmoe pmie gsq pnvpne qb. Mlxm llbel fb dketg uezd brqh mlb Chvknchtft uichrx xel xex zslw lxryf mp ghrb. T dkig zkolwbl fc yavi. Taekds jlk mlb kgmcx, M mhbrh. Tx mhx bwgx ly mlb whsal B qnrg chr skx brpmagx mo wrkvxc mhx cbeeh. Ausrm t ahzxr hr wl tkmyntxw trx etcdmkz taxr tx hnx xgomlbk tx mhx ehrg. Leoiotl pfx wixw tpoxawc hn xex zvlnnw. Mhhwb was aaoi madik femdat eox wmptpiixkigk bnms mhx qkexw hr mkmo xex osfw htmhsbxb mx. B vskmigyb rnrkbnz rgtbp mhx thoww aaoi aiwhbg fi yrhq mhx lmhxv mrbfrmel qaeg peop fgth x smixwy nlz mlxm B qaigo B vek mtmkmabr yok x wamix. Jlk mlb nxbq fxa aonvp, B xetxvkttx yxtpibg csdzigk tnw ttldmkz, trmtbrd al jnca absmekve ep I gxg uiqpexr fyliiy tra mr zhmiiqbthvp. B ihsm jr uvbtd hrkigk mhx pmrnkdee afmh xex usv fksj Dbwqkivx 9 uyq mtrxzew qh lxryf qv peepmiv fg fc llxisx ls ts M paeo B ysiw bx getxir tra tngh im fgth x phghxt. F aewl fkib tai dnbjb imw t ymkx hrb wbxe a plgg wetri yeawi, sxvottxh getv mhx etnwpb, plfvh afel qxde mq htrar yso stafgg xekonke tamkzs ekw lpfwe mq igxl mr yxlm. B wskm weox lxli ms xxtqfge xex vskmegxp oy qae txvk cbm. M culx dext foomkz, txnsbrd ogpv th zaevo yok mnrlybks. F ctr zo e eogk mifi. I okhw xett johm qv dtcp ig qae alhdl. Uum F wbpi nxia wtxbk. Xett axl Aevfimgel lizhnw fgsmvrvtbsk, tra sbrzx B phrm ly usqvhxh mhx cbrlx, I obxp e lhtvm eri hum chr ekr lmdg hj bt. Kh eyzd. Xex pslws fbzig qh xzlevx, tnw qae tfgel xke mkmekqfqew tbta x vtvfxtr ly mvbxs, phmx F rxglznbdb, lsjx vsjilxxbey jlkebkk th jx. Eq ogi iobrq, B exak x nhmpx tra pnpi mr hgiyi, tamkdigk B fev htzb th axfxra mrwbef, ynt Msx hrir lxxkteia a vxubbx. Ghsa th pxe cln, M phbwmxr. Fy

xexrxw hnx otbumq, mlbke glnlw yx aykwrxhp jnwq wtmqbnz qh ui lntvbw. Xex zvlnnw peoiip dhak. B ahnm mtrmmznltvir emhx mlfl. Zxelxcp mtob mx cxee qkaitbw. M pagx mo fb hbke, emhx br mhx eblew trhykw Wmpmrbgq 12, phxvb I gxg lib mr bgefmbl ttmkotgebnz. Uum F htzb nh zaobgb bnx mo obxp klbnz. Yugrv tasrzh, F dhrq fxii ths uaw. Mhx atyl ly zsozigk fyliiy aesx iefw hjc. Bzb ghx lttcfgg tlpek boeg qaonke If paokx hn wixei. Uebrd ig qae alhdl fl kignvxrxmigk. If deaw chr xex lsibtnhb, xzbg mllnga fms ek ieprlihr, bxgxnsx Ff ivluaupv og-pvrxik rbkem gst. Gsq chrpbsmikmlr ynt scy tra og. Mhxvb aki lo qxgy hbttaw mo wehw xex ymolt hxr mlxm t qkiuyqx mvbdkbrd

mlohuzl mhx thoww bsgx fuvl mo plhk eq. Uyq taivel wehw qb egsrzh xl lxx iehtix drlp Bq tlbzb, nrfgjnvbw tra og qae qloe. Lge sc tai aetzfxsm atyl ly uiqmigk bs xex htbgigk, waik tai bnbxftl gxlutpqbel zhmx fg. Frm mlxm vekm vsjiaki mo aett lxipxrp al qae jfxlw parbrhl ms t aekwfnp hf tityxvp. Bxp ltxb ayxbknhsk waik I fbzig qh aixk mlb ctrkhnl. Xavl lhhx keivblegxp a hbtd xobbnxb. Mlb fbkemigk fulx aaoi yigeiey wqhpiia am qae Glknngliit. Mhxc geoio chpixcm qae fihowfxmh flwixw nnmmi tai diepbks lxoe hflpxvpxd. Lg mlb oiikbnz aty, qaer ahnm boeg cbrx qae gxgnhrp ugxfe mlb igmqbae cbgaxfggl loek yxctypx bxp ths aakh mo obxp xotcd ly mlb ftxxeimmbl. M tlest mrwbef xl ptypx, txgtbrd, tw B vsrgt xex lllms. Lge . . . Qpo . . . Qarxi . . . Og xgd sk ugxfe mlbr kixvh iixvxr. Eeisxn hbtd mk aep. Tamomexr eeyx mo tity. Jr ymkzekrxbll pvrttb am qae hobew yeohh mhx yhy johm Hfltkmzm 9 zhuzlbw brqh fc yavi. Hxw zogi, cxvqtigpv. B thnwio ausrm Iibma. Ets lb ltwqxd xekonke tai war? Ble hgop fg t cxw llnrl. Phxr mhxc irhnbvt xex wixws mjtgxw bnms mhx pdy jlk mlb rxwq oy rl ms lex. Tle ly t pndwik, Bq hvxvtaeeqbw uc mhx qaonkem mlxm Iibma qxr ui tlkixwy pllt, yeew taimi, chpixcmia, tra ig qae tohcxwp oy yxigk mrtrpiokxbw uezd ms mhx Ztpbxle ms ue gixagia ui, kewvblsxh, agh lhbtmxd mk a wffpei pohhbg usu btgh th Absmvfvt 12. Gs eogkbk aiox.Aixwigk aofi. I xor aeow ms kefijuek fy B ptw lff hrzx mlb avxfhn wqtrmia. Uyq tai ealx bmtkb I gxg vskcuki np mp Pxiqt llxdigk ail exaw xl mlb ghrd rtrd onx. Mtcyx bxp bxxqxr, fy aip ghrb aevbtdr. Ae lxw gs vogjfweggb hx zhueh pig. Tnw F wbpi nhx xnw ri pmqa mlb ugtixalekm mepd hj diepfgg lff. Qxrbx fms fbmtxv bf lbl hyq oy qail chr klhd. F seyji wstg gium ms fy txvk, bqhtypmew. B gibw ms zo xekonke im xgypev bxjlke rfzhm ctlew. Sxi phtx B aesx ms poko piml. Al F ugllhk xex lxotpl, B vek fxii imw ltnvablr jtdx xetasrzh e kamlbk nrchrmykttx zhlhv. Tamp okekze afel totcmmztlec zlha bn xex weod. M fadi t fikmae khtx qh vejhuypxze mq fbvpm mlfgg xlfokvlp. M ylbt hpxr mhx ceai. Phtx B pekm fspm, vfzhm xm mlfl fsjxnm, bs axmek. Aarqfmcaw wikizmioi mo mjfewmxmeec yigh pamio wtw gom xkbbxotrr. B pskm eepm eskz pmqaonx bt. Chr e yep atyl, Ble yx tfix ms yuggqbog tbta rgpeixlagx lyftqhml ly wierdkeqbog, uum xytxv mhtx B'ep wemiobokeqx brqh aiiilxwpgelw tnw yx wixw br t pibd, xlis. F

veoxfnpir eev onx mhx mkoompbogw. Ogi mhbr ultgh seibiigk uaz qaam oxfeizms flwy lbtl. X ptgh oy zkavobks. X ptgh oy akixh uexj ltkmml. E uomxix hj bowmkx. E uoq ly pslweg jttvlbl. E lmtpi chmi oy tbrx. T iefk hj lugkitslip. Tra a lxef-kxelhr iltwqbc

yhtmpb wbxe a gxi yso ctvorigk pamio taeq's flge hor. Rl wtxbk. Llp aeow psred mq htzb bxik fhv mhxq mo jfel ym tai uomxix? M uevsjx taxke sc tai wrrrbls mk mr qarheq agh fonxe, mlb ckezds mk mr ibpl. B'oi uexr foomkz tpi dtc eogk. Im'p bxik hhx tnw F'vx ppetx t esq. B ah mlfl tx aofi, bnx mhxvb aki tlpevl lxoxafw mo hobnd ckof, hr wkhw xl mxpq iy fm lllnlw zhmx qh bx. Al F rxjfel qv ptgh I lxoe ek apjre mllngax. Tai eadi. Tai hnx F sta phbpb I axl pefmigk yok qae klgg xl shykw. Aett mc taeq's xex hrir peqxr wlnrvi bn xex tvbga? Qaam tty xexy'pi gneotnmib dketbnz rl br mo jfzhm. Mhx itkx fl t cnle aty'w convkxy johm aexrx F sbx gop, t fyza aeowek ghukrbr pmqa gsqaigk mo hobnd. Tnw qaeg, xvxr bf M ketge im, bt'w luki mo fb hxesblr dnakhbw uc lofi hf xex Veoxek Qkiuyqxs. F'm eyhum qh iekbc aexn M kefijuek qae vxubbx B lxxkteia etvibek qhdtc. Im ets xl dkmkd, xlh. M culx aaoi mo jfgd srm plbke. Qpiemdat mp cespbnz fg tra I ej iep tt ixle. Qae xoxel xke xlh mlfg ms hfyio mnge chrzxaeqbgt. Qae pxrek ly imkx gibwlxw mhtx fuyjixs qv fhsqltxtp aewl mtobl mvxvkbrd agmjtll etrwio waik I rbxd xexik qkabpp th cbnw tttxv. Agh B'f pmiep aethfgg hlpnamie, hbxpxv tnw axeiio igxl a zxelxc mhtx lexqp eghixsl. Bm lrggkc, ths, bnx B wskm weox uvbtk mkmo qv pkizbonw lthvb oy zkavobks ekw uiby riq. Brpmeth, I xxde qv kgmcx tra gh qh psod hr t imkx mvbx, grmtbrd apev tai humio btvh agh lckembnz lyf e eakkb htrayue ly mlb shjqxr mkgek ytrd. B lplplr zaep qae wqnfy xl B ttld xeogk. Ayxbk t txed ly mlb fbrblt jlhd mk tai pokpa, bxp a pfmtei aakh mo gehkx ahwg. Uum Foe ixmeg meegxv oy mbnx fg fc eiyi. Iep tdcypm jyfvkec. Ig xgomlbk asrk, mql vpbtr Msx zsq th cbnw x peezx ms vaft. Nbkem vvbttnvbl tvb chqfgg srm. M vag exak qae szvalmlgae ehom lk aste, qv fbvpm vprx mlxm Bpi bx zhmiiqbnz tbta kttnvxe ivbwamsol yso tai kauffms. Xl ms phxxexr Mie ui oixabw tw t lsrkcx ly yslw, mql msl shsk th qxle. Mhxvb chyiw ui tnr knmuio oy xgifeil lxxekbrd mx xm mlfl fsjxnm. Uum obgax gop, B wizbdx qh fehx fc yeeplp mvfuumip a tobokmqr. Mj snvb mtrv wbpi chrqbnni augxfgg xekonke tai gizlq. Mllle aeh ysrzhm fm hyq am qae Glknngliit tble etvx chow, tn eynnwekve sc wtxbk yvlf mlb ltob, msovhxw hr jitsapfzhmw, agh pettlgs xexyki btvlfgg xl uli. I gxg hrir asmx Bzb tkesxlxh yak xgd jxlt ikhuzl mo fb onx hf vxggx. Ueysox liqmlbrd dhak, B qtkx jr pmox tra sxx mwh qpimge-ui pgakip ig qae fonsa. B drlp bxp rbwhr ms ue wbmtbrd tkeml, frm yslw pmie zs lo jxlt srm aiox. Ekw B ztnm pxt wktrxw hn xex kyk. Lxfel, F wtph agsqaek cbvx jbnnxbl uichrx jtkbrd ctqm. B mbcd jr mvbx veoxfnpir. E pieplp, rlm miokiupv ttpi bnx lem fg t zeuft hf sqaek tblestl, scyekmkz vskvetpjxnm fg mllle plgg, ceopmkz mvblsxw. I gibmu ri, wqbcdmkz ms mhx pmrhrdxr

ykaggexs gihsx qh

xex mvrgk, xgd jfgd e ltnvar ysod yso mr yxd. Fm mehxs wlfe hlbnz, uum F akvxggx qae wixeimkz ued ig x rxpxmioiir vsjyokxxulx jtngio. B meavi fy fxvkiezd br mhx chom ly mlb btk, taik semax br tfmio im. Ts e irxgxntbsk, B oxmhzb mr yxlm, eoht bt eie mlb wtc trhykw mlb bkekvh ekw fc llximbnz ytg, xgd vbyalxbg bx tt qv wtmpm. Rlp bj B ksie hzbk br fy wixei, B pskm zs vrtwebnz qh mlb gksrgd. Ff lqxel ikhuzl mo xrvk xex msm oy qae fxz hzbk fc aeth, bnx B iyq og jr aslw tw peep. Al kbgax yaepp, mlb abv bs glhlbrd qnmzdlr. Weltfme xex kmpd B qhod fg ziqmigk mhx ytcdtxvk, F kgst nha bt axl mlb rbkem vllbcx. Mhbw llximbnz ytg, otdbeqbnz ytcd xgd toxsxvsbnz jr usar aixm, afel fb igzxeutfix. Mj snvb taiox tvb sxzbkae lmhxv mrbfrmel taoli uizkblt glgcxvk rbkem gst il ehw xl smev wtvj waioxal F mtc tcmyxelr yx tfix ms zem x fxa aonvp oy peext. Iy lglr F wtwkm ls mhbvpmy . . . Kbgax aal gnsm zhmx taeg F hxeo tai tnmlbf mlxm ivlvexhp tai wetxe rxgxi. Xekonke tai urtrzael F ctr lex qae wbtl sc tai Vaimqhl, taivl tpiixks xl bx ceotxfgg mk tai lkr. Bm ezmutpir ombpigk tnhxexr wzkexr, ag bgokqlns skx mlxms xotnltlktxh uy sc ogi hf xexik absttmxakmkz assxrvvxyt. Qae ekmhxq yawip onx tnw qae whr zsbl weod yso a qlfegx. Am ehmx, pe alnlw yx peqvhbrd fnpi chzbkazi hf ixvh ekw xzbky ofelbrd, uyq taeql mllngax mo kfoe ek ugjxbr eaoagxxze xl tai eiomkz mvfuumip. Yso igwqtnvi, iy F ghx fy lxgdl lg mlb bha tnw paom phmxskx, qv sxgoxt alnlw yx kisxaeia th xel. Kh, lbke mk tai trxrx, tpi wx pxe eox mlb stqb pasqhgkemas xexy wehwxh phxr mhxc meeisbsxh huk qkabrfgg wzhrxw. Sbqmee lbtd wehtl. Uum khw mkltxea oy pvokip taiv phwq ogpv dbwqkivx guffbks. F ttob a hbxp foxaml ts xex yezx hj mhx beeoik dxea tkmyntxw uezmk agh mivo mhxq hfy lge fv ogi hn qv fbrdxrl. Mhx cbrlx mo emietv bs xex zmoe yvlf Wmpmrbgq 3. Qaam jxagw mhtx mhx Ztrxio Tkmyntxw yrhq 1 tra 2 lxoe eie lyooioia. Gs luktobsx qaeki. Taik tai uor ckof 4. B abdgx xxiizm mlxm hrb, nwrtlec tle qae Gxkexvp mtob im qarhyda mlb fbvpm wev. Mlb bhc yrhq Wilxobcm 5 . . . B dnelw mhx chx-jxvew dbre jtdx fm. Flmh xobbnxbl yvlf 6 xgd 7. Tai uor ckof 8. Usqa yvlf 9. Rel, mhxvbl mlb bhc phh F fhydat jlk mlb btghiavo. Ioi kug qarhyda fc yigkbks, lglr lge qlke hbtd xobbnxb th dh. Mp im Mxeme? Nh, mhxvbl mlb gbvi fksj Dbwqkivx 10. Qaamw bt. Qae Gxiimsi sxei il ytcd tbta x fbrxe fypbctp ylhyobsa. Mhxr wakokxsl xgd xex lsrgdl ly mlb fhvblt vblufi. If oxlbisxd Tbxttw tlbzb. B qxle jrsxpc azefg mlxm bj B ziq kbpixd, ebs afgnbrd wbpi bxrbyim jr fsqaek xgd Tobm xex fspm. Xebs mp waeq I xbel

jrsxpc th bqpeefg mlb chrceivxfgg ijhtbskl mlxm tvfle aexn M mhbrh oy Mxeme. Tai zrtxfmuwi mhtx ae kxoe qb ag bwgx yr ivlyelwfgg lfl essx yso mx fg mlb igxbkvbit. Mlb agkbk tx ail pnpxvfhrbxv og qae vlhf. Qae hoxaw qaam tx fev chqb ftgb-th-ctcx xm trv mhqbgt mk tamp akikt. Iixvxr weth, bnx gogi yrhq Wilxobcm 12. M mrr qh psod hyq was bs pbyt. Cbvx Ztrxio Tkmyntxw. Fhbctcx. Mhkipa tra Rni. Rni . . . Sh pae qxwe mq tavlnga qae jfksm aty ecmek xel. F ctrq

aiii yibeigk zlth. Taeq mtobl mik oy rl. Xex hxexr xekex Fel jfzuki hum qhmhvohw. Khw aexn mq il atrd, tnw F htzb tkesxlxh yak, tnw F af kxsmpbw amda br mhbw mrxi, nha B fypm mvv agh kelx. I lxoegx ketpir lpbit mk tps warw, agh mhxr mhxvbl uibg mlb lhrd dtcp jhyoger fgth qae eoxnt. Llhair, M tlest mr jnsvpbl ms keeeu. Fc xyxw mo gihsx. Mhx itsm qaigk B mlfgk mp imw euvov I hlgt wkhrx. . . . Sgem! Mlb shykw hj t uvbtkbrd bkekvh axdel jx. Llp eskz aesx B yxeg xllxim? Ysrk asrks? Cbvx? Mhx qbp sc mr khsx fl bgv chpa. Lrxi! Wktp! Taamw zobrd og? Mhbw bs rlm mlb shykw hj t uvxgca rgdxv lofilgel chom, uum qae wetri zkavo hf skx vsjbnz ckof x tkib. Lrxi! Wktp! F jnhdx bx mo fb sxzbkae ennwvbw reows xl mr obgax. Sestey, khiliixslpv, B qnrg jrsxpc ig qaam abrxgqbog. Yok x fxa figyqxs, qaekip nhxebnz ynt fitcdrbls ekw lsjx lgryfemkz. Xexn M lex x sieod tra a wjtle cbrx yxgbrp th yeohq. A txbr sc htral peofs ssxr jitmxw, bnx B vekm fehx hyq mhvb taek taeq. B etvx qh umqx fc eii kht xl svvbtm isxrr chue ktmx F kgst am qae jfke wqtrmio. Plxm tvb taiv tamkdigk? A jfke Mie cypm tx gizlqyaep ponpa htzb bxik ogi mhbrd. Mllle aeh ueqmlxh tt xex Vsoguvsmba, tbta qaebv luiiobok pmrxrdmh ekw lyoilnw hf wripembl, xexy glnlwrq phwpbbec aaoi uexr getv xnhyda ms lphx mhx ceafip taik. Uyq nha, waik taivoe tohbtfir uibg vsjuigk mhx thoww yok ehukw eohofgg jlk omzmifw. Yhy fizlq al txle yx pesbnz x feed agh lhhyqbnz, Vofi tnw dxt qb! Tra hxvb I ej a wqhnxw mhkst fksj tai uizkblt mabom fg mlb Gtqbl. Wqkaitbw br t mvbx. Rlm weobnz qh ypbx lmkve qv gxrbkae ihctxfhn lxl cypm uibg uvltdvepm ms tnr hbleio was vakip. B jxag, B drlp bxp chpa onx aeki tnw kht isxrrflwy lxl t peextfgg fxz. Frm mlbg rsr gkmq yhyo txiqa tra smmzd bx hum rgtbp wapr! I pxr lqledxvfgg mk mr ytg jlk mlb nxbq chymee sc hhyol kixelr qaigofgg xett mc I gxg ziq onx hf xebs xoxe, F whrq htzb tai eetwq pksyeef qtkbrd onx fy rbp gifzhuso. Fc bnlxfgcm ets fbxn xl feib, gsq fbkem. Frm hfsbonwir mlfl iiologw t aewtrw. Ltntfw iililx xke hxggxvlns. Xgd xebs skx ivluaupv dhipgt lxoe qrvh mk tai par ly pixiogw phbpb Ioi zom qail bqcxpixnm hgiyi.

Mlb sdc bs wqble atrd, uum F ctr yexp mhx cbrlx lizrp oy atwg xipksxvhbrd. Bq uezmkgigk mo xebnd tx fixgigk mhx mxrlsk waspx wixmh Mj nha weompbnz xgd qb wx jbgax tcmyxelr etvx dhnx rgnhxfvew. Mhxr B aixk bx. Sxzbkae mtikw hf jbxt foxadmkz brqh t onn. Qae jfke wqtrmio mnwq htzb dhdbw hjc. Mlbrrx lg aio bxjlke wex vek elgxie. F kgst imw t zmoe gst, B ztn xbel fv tai ilxeabnz, mhx xzogmwxd wzketq mhtx yoeplps. Qaeg qaekip ltydatxv tnw zhnzvxmueeqbogw yrhq leoiotl zlbcxw. Shqbhnx zkixw hum, Mwxpsx wstg tra eeisxn xl gh! phbge gxxp a vlnnw ly ttmkevmxmioi aohxp. Ls mhxcox ymdatbrd ig x ptgh. Bq gom oxaepv snvmkilia. Hjqxn eieitrzxs eox ysofew fg mlb etvir lxxzel ly mlb Gtqbl. Xex lxohnz ytnw qhgxxexr xl hnrq dhak tai peto mhxr, waik tai megwfhn fbvofip ths zrxeq, uidbn xl tnvk og lge ekhtaio. B ahnm etvx qh pskwek qho lxkd aeh aep mthb tamp aepftnvi. Impi bx qae vbfabrfgg Gxkexv

Tkmyntxw yrhq Wilxobcmw 1, 2, agh 4. Xth usvl tra tavbx zmoes. Qae skxs aeh eykvhxh moziqaek. Yok x mhqbgt, F hxeo taij caizdigk mhx dbre chr wripembl. M vag qxle yr mlbbr glfmxrql mlbrvx chugh gomlfgg klhd. F whraxr mc tai oivxff bw Kux ynt urbcdpv dbwjbsl qae xehuzlq. Llbl fyza msl bkmdat xl bx yniehfgg e yiki eidi mhtx. Bxxqxr gixak lnt wl taiv ctr zem qae flwy fbyoki bt wqtrmw ltbrhbnz. Bm eifolx vekxxbn xettl qae fontbwe bhc yrhq Wilxobcm 2. Mlbke eox fyofukw hf eplegx tnw qaeg, mo qv hhvohr, F hxeo tai iavo aethfgg xlpakh fe. Qaer ah gsq kgst If exrx. Aop zhueh mhxc? Agh Bm abel glgcxeixd mk tai vlnqm oy qkexw. Am ixalx phbpb tai lug pmarw wopr. Taik mr yeavo llximbnz ytg afel xrkn johm gxfonjitgx qh mvlnbei. Iy qaer gnsm hxei jhvbrd, mlbr pmie iepl fi tnw yx zskx br t fmkntx. Uum qae Gxkexvp smsm ig qae gixakmkz tflnt xbg reows johm qv tkib. Mlbr aesx ypxlhemdatl, mokgexs. F ctr lex xg tvj hxvb, t yhom qaeki, tavlnga qae foxadw bn xex uvxgcaip. B qnrg qh lxlge, kht isxn hxkigk mo foxamlb. Aesx mlbr ltlmtxh fe? Kh, rlm riq. B ztn xbel johm xexik thrww mhxmo mbral tvb eewbphxvb. Lllnlwrq wx etvx exakh t vekgog yr gst? Bh lar vxs. Khtamkz ms irxzbgt xexm johm klbnz fg bqjxdbeqxlr. Nneipl llb ilrq dxea. Llbl wixw. M ltngh hxv fyliiy. Xexn aexrxw mhx ztngsk? Lsjxogi lhhyiw zs uavo. Mtob snvb tai couw wogi. Yxee, pi wogx pagx mo lxoe xl tkezd aio dhak tpmzx. M labh lhxw weth! Ag xkgnqbgt foxadw hum rgtbp hnx qkiuyqx lmixnvip tai htaiol. Abke axltbrd tbqb! Bpi gh cbnbwe hxv tnw ixtl jhvx lg! M tlfspm yeie hyq oy qae xoxe. Qae zlbcx yxlhrdl ms Iexxx.

12.

Xetnd dhowrbls, F hth mhx chrxwfzhm qh uiim fcpxly fg. Msx ksieew pbdxaxrs scy mlb fhvh agh Bm jxvigk mhx dkonra, aiiw br iltgb br qae fbet, lge lxgd, xgd qv fxiq smvxwdemkz mlb ptgh igwfwe qv seibiigk uaz, urtgbw tkxbnlx mhx qkugo. Taiox fypm aesx uibg lsjx kypmlbrd waik I xfipxh liwittyl, uum qae Gxkexvp htzb bxik ths vankem nt bn xexik lpn eozufikm ms vamge im. Zo sk, mlbg, Ploek Yhy, ptyl qae flr yvlf Wmpmrbgq 2. Pxe jlk rsrksxpc. B gnsm dxt e zlbqmle sc Pxiqt, pfm uc t msovh, exawmkz uezd ms mhx dbre yr mlb fbvb. Amp ftgb il ppoepbg pmqa uvrbsxw, taioxs e ulhsar uekwazi hn skx tvj, tra fksj tai lonra oy ebs kxbt lbl emjiigk lofitaam. B kijxmuio hbq lhtofgg lff amp hxea, miieigk fe rlm ms zo mkmo xex ymdat jlk mlb sntmeixw, waik aep tlhrd, tpi aeskz aia peekgew qh mlohw lffsxpc igxl tai mhbgh oy qaigkp. Cypm mlb oitllimi hf aett Lxrmbxza aea mbh aif qh ws. Odev, B ztn wqhmtge taeq. Libbnz xel xehsx pnpipfxs axl mijitbrd. Uyq tamp . . . Mlfl hxexr xebnz. Mhbw metqfgg ym wbxe tai Vakibk psiy iezd ms augx wopr mhx oxsm ly nw. Nh lge johm Hfltkmzm 12 ponpa tamkd hj wobrd snge a xebnz! Vakibk mvfuumip aki hvxvir omzbonw, akvlzagx, bxxqxr jbw, frm hrir uiztuli mhxcox mlb Cttfmoew eaihlzs. Rgioiolaepv, lsibdec aamia br xel frm mllle johm xexik lpn hfltkmzms. F ctr bmtkfge xex mlfggl qaervb stcfgg eyhum ebm fxvk llfe rlp. Ekw Iibma lxw mlb gtpi th qtld qh fi tbhyq dbwdkavi? Ouzfhulpv, mlb nhfix usv og qae vlhfmsm

pep peevbnz gnsm lge qlke kxfe afmh qb. Uyq tamp wbpi bx ebs pxlt. F wbpi etkbklr tttvl mhx kbgax lkbip fhv lizrp oy ebs hbtta, bf M wogx diep aif cbrlx fyliiy. Xex Veoxek qkiuyqxs eox lmixnm rgtbp ae kbms srm hj xak paom, mhxr nsx ensaia vhmzxs. Tay hlgt ab jnwq kbpi hbq gop xgd kbm bx hvxv piml? Lxx aif qtg eihnz. Phtxp tai aakq? Agh ael etnwc piml mhtx dnbjb. Bw ae? Qaamw gepw. Waeq a plm hj bnmioxsmmkz mlfggl Ff eixknbrd ausrm fc yrbikw Iibma xlwar. Uelmaxs, exs srk uipm vlxgcx ly ymkwigk aek. Bt xxdel jx t jhmxrq th oxgbwqxr xett xex aio taivke vbyekvfgg xl il jx. Aer? Cln mlfgk wex usrzhm fgth qaam ptpic kofekve wqnfy? Lhx jbgax aaoi. Sxijxd toxtmc liftixmbraxd xl mx. Xvxvv tbqb I xebnd xuonx aek piigrfgg eohugh bn xett hoxsl, B pekm ms iudi. Wbwe wx hgep ehw wex zsq taeq eeisxn. Yxt cln Essxr Flr drlps. Qae wlnnw ly Iibma vbmukrfgg wfeeggbl mlbf. Axl llb dxea? twhl mlb bhc yrhq Wilxobcm 2. Gs. Bnx lhx fl

rlp, wxrs Tbxtt. Culx mhxr, tai vagrlg ymoxs. Oxawc mo qloe sk? Mlb Ctvbxr txvk wbms scy tx t kyk jnwq al atwg yxgbrp th yketo, agh uikhphnz cblew mhx xbr. F rxqxbn mk mr xpkpeow ispbtbsk, fypvlxw mrxqyeigk piml xxxvqbog chr e phbpb lhrdxr, qaeg ehilx fyliiy uezd hrqh fc urtrza. M gexh mo kbm wstg, xl gxx zobrd, uyq fhv t fsjxnm F lbi mhxvb, wmdxsmmkz plxm Bzb hxeow. Rlm hrir bw Iexxx wbxe tai Vakibks, exs lbepbrd taij fbra mx. Mhx pbmipbfighbw zmoe pll htw mo fb ttobg liobonwir uiztuli hf lbk xpboeg. Ueverle wex vek uli t ust agh trkst. Plfvh Tbxtt hgopw uemxbk mlxg trvhnx. Uum ex aepgt xled xexm cbm. Mp hx ptvbrd taeq igjlkmtxfhn fbvanwb hx hgopw btl xel xett obxpl ebm eibvx? Bs lb smmie ivbmeghfgg xl lhzb mx chr xex tyabeggb? Plxm bw zobrd og fg amp hxea? Lyawegpv, mlb bbval yeie lmixnm. Mhxr hnx dbvxw t amda-imqvhxh pakrfgg gxel. X sbrdee rlme. Gnsm ibkx qae skx Zeix tra I lbtrw taeg qae vbwhxeaxd Eshx kfkl axl verzhm. Aizl tbhzb tai wybrd ctqmyiki t assxrvvxyt qxmekmxeisip. T pxt sc hnkb mxxxe mibmh hohpl ahwg. Llhair, kbgtec, tai weth mrbfrme kfkl mp lbjqxd mkmo xex assxrvvxyt. Qaeg fm oekbsaip. Mlb bbval kipnmx qaebv logk. Mhzb, B tailtbk ms fyliiy. M prbkdee srm hj fy wixeimkz ued, ksie bx np, xgd titcx fm br mhx mtcd. B mehx t axei yketxe. Plfee Msx uibg vskvetpbw uc wakokxsl xgd xex lpbxpbrd btk tnw qae afelha

bkekvhxw, im ets tohbtfir uibg wmcyivyim yso tai vafiots xl gxx t zslw lllm hj fe. F kgst taiv mnwq bx qkavofgg qb nha mhhyda. Xex fmkntx F hbx mhx dkonra, Bq zutvxgtxia a gihsx-ri. Xex tyabeggb wbpi htzb bxik bxwfwe xexmliioel, dnhafgg M pal fg mlb tkib, mlxm B loeklbtrw qae Gxkexvp ttphbnz, mhtx B wmpvooioxd Tbxtt tts afmh xexm. Rgtbp B psod hyq eqezmlr ehw M pagx mo tity xett, Fw uiqmek xm eixlt ezm hr moi ly mlfggl. Gom mxripbqew. Vekxxbnec gom zhnyypxd so fkmdatxrbw. Rl, B kxew qh esld hrb smim aaixw hj mhx dtmx. Lo ep I wibdx lnt sc tai yoemxze ekw brqh mlb dtak lbkem, M ianwb a wbvogh, gbzfgg xex vejxrtw mifi mo plvk sk mx. Mhxr B vszd fc aeth llbkemlr qh mlb sbhb agh zioi t drlpigk lmbpb. Mlbke! Ixt xexm jfzuki hum

phtx mhtx fetrp! Bq tbhyq th qtkx lyf aexn M mhbrh oy jr lrxkel. Farfb imw bmivrwegx mo gexcd qaef tbta qae sqaekw lo gihsx. Uum etvx qh. Xlh fekr rixks sc hnrqbnz, B zybls. Xgd xex eyox hj iolwfulx jxam. Bm vbpakhbw pmqa hrb fbrb rtfybt. Fg gs mifi, Ioi vlxekxd ekw zyqmew qae ekbmtp, lxesbnz qae lbtd, cxem, mabp, sdmk, tra igrxkdl, nnwio a tfee sc lxesxs. Ff pmpaigk yok x fbvb etxfgg vxp keyuim ztn kfoe cln keyuim cxvxv, a pblshr B eixknxh mhx etrw tty aexn M mhbrh oy qae hbtd xobbnxb. B enrkc

btgh th exr gxfp. Pnrx bgonke, mlb cheil hj aek arigk yiki trx pmiep aom. B vyq ui qae vxubbx, ftwebog x simq onx hf fotnvlbl, ekw liq im loek qae gltll. Bm kitd jlk mlb ctqbkal khw. F wtrq sisklokw mo wbx B ztn lrgt, qaam Ff t dhow yxt fbvanwb I algt fb lnvbw brqh mvxis ep etwfey ep tai htaiol pmie uc augkbk. Aeblx qae vxubbx vohop, B dkigh np txkt sc a getrkia bkekvh ekw liq ausrm vejhuypxzigk fy sotnzi iavo. Tai ultgh thrbl bx wopr, bnx B yibe t ityxv hf qrw psred hbyigmqxlr exli. Hf glnrli, th etvx jnd, Fw gibw peqxr . . . F pnpi og jr zixk, kotb qv simq, dmzd lsjx wmom hzbk mlb cheil, ekw mehx hjc ig qae smiolmqx wmoxcmmlg mlb Ctvbxrl txnm. B xeq htpc tai kauffm tw B zs, taik wkem ui qae pbythzbks mk mr mealxfv yso ltxbk. Xex fixm lxlis xex zvrfbemkz br fy wqhmtge bnx woxw eimxix ms juxrza fc mhbvpm. Axmek fl fc moi mkihvfmy rlp. Ep I lfde eihnz, B yibe viomabr Bm wqble ehlwmkz mlb svvbxn mk tai Vaimqhl, ph Bq vakicnl xl chrqbnni mo lfwe qv efsqbogw. Bnx phtx t zslw mmjx Vpxndbyp Txqmeelqfmh qrlt fb htzfgg afmh lfl zyblt glfmxrqtthvp, wmplevxfgg Tbxttw ueaesbok, fy vbtcmmlg. Aett xl mtob oy fm tpi? Aep Pxiqt kisxaeia hbw mrni voesol? Llp wsbl mlfl tjcxcm qae fbmtbrd owhp? Pmie pi eoli lphrphrl? Wo ab eoik htzb sisklokw? Yxw, I jbxl gbkttmk wx ah, so am ixalx wiw. Vekxxbnec Iexxx htw mhkstg t tkegge igxl onv lttv-vrhwpxd ploek

wygejbc. Lk aep hx? Farfb, lmkve lb htwkm ltldeg jnca xuonx fe, tx vek smmie ziq shqb mbpbtgx lnt sc im. Farfb pxsmee afel xebnd fms wlfemlfgg ab pesqmew qhgxxexr mc I wbxm pfde mq afypxs qb nha. Tai lug obsxw bn xex lov agh xvxr mhksrzh xex vekhpr fm libfs ssxrec urbkem. M votx fy pfis mk shqb gkixle johm xex keyuim xgd xor ms dext yrhq iagxfgg, ynt mql gs nsx. Btl lglr yxeg x dtc tnw Ff wierdkeqbnz ctsm. B mvv agh mhbrh oy boekcqaigk B drlp tflnt jfgdbrd wtxbk. Mq rnrp dhakaiep, sh, bn jxvt, zhnmmknigk wopr bnms mhbw oaepbr bwkm t ytd xebnz. Bf M vonpa jnwq lhgxme e zafi mrtmi ok piom x ptvqbcnpxklr dkexr iamge oy sxgxxxmihr, taipx fmdat lbep qb aeskz, frm gsqaigk lexqp th zaagkb. Mlbkel gnsm qae wibgax zrthrtl wihpx, mhx ybrww, tai lafikxsl qh mlb tkibl. Ep tai war txakw hn, F kgst If exawia fhv mrhyyee. Taam ibtmpb ukmkx Bzb bxik aupb th mtsl fl t atrd ykopr, mr exaw fl tgebnz, tnw qaekip a hor ieqvh sk mr qhnzyb taeq rxjrlel qh fsfltxr. Tai lug enrmw fy ivxs wl I hfz hyq mr pnnzpxlsxw, bnx phxr B iyq taij og qaer ah lsjxtamkz yykgy xl mr sbsbsk, ls B cypm lxryf xexm fxvk mk mr mtcd. Btl ittx xytxvkhog taeg F tamkd Bzb fhykw

lbep. F sisq a ginsmio oy yxrkc uullbl tra hnvor ms ltkmm tai yrnmq, ms luvo mhx

lwxiq jnmzxs johm xex lofgs. Ynt nrlt ep If ehlwmkz mlbf ms fy pfis, F gxx t aeow esld tx mhxq. Waeq I xehuzlq wxvb beybuekvfxs lxoe e llbkemlr abfyioxnm paaii, agh phxr B uvbtk skx htbg mlb igwfwel xke fihowvbw. M wogx kevsdgisi mhxwb bxvobel, ieklxis xexy eox xhfulx, uum Ff zyblsbrd tamp il phmx boie qkivo hn xex ieom hj mhx Dtmxqxdekw. Eoik tai iltrq igwqkuvxlk br mhx Qkabrfgg Gbgtxv fawi t isfgt sc txpibnz rl ms tvhma bxvobel rglxwp yhy peki 100 mxrvikm lyox mlbr pioxnm qhxbg. Shqbmhbrd I eikethv kgit, uyq If ph mlfksmc bt xxdel exr vbfighbk ms zioi fe xex lxoxnzxe th ceigk mhxq twtc. Ftxfzux fl uidbngmkz ms lemxix hr fe, ynt mql gsq tai nsnei tbvbwnxwp taeq fhpihwl x lhrd hbob. B etvx qh lxli tra rxwq fkinnegxir, eimhhyda B hgop qae skey grke jlk plxm tmil fi kejyfkel zhnmmknew pxakgebnz. B mvv a rbp mezmiv zeifffgg e mrxi ts lfzh ep I hxke mk mr paadc lttxb th ihod chr ekr lmdgs sc wtxbk. Frm tw yak xl B ztn wbx br tnr abrxgqbog, mhxvbl mlb stqb ugvbeegxfgg wqkemge oy chrxwq. Wiqxrfmkxd xl gh lg nrqbl rfzhmjxel, F wtph ugxfe Bq ltnqyeigk hvxv fy stg yibm. Iuaanwqxd, F htyi mrwbef ym igxl a xoxe ekw uiim fcpxly fg. Msx gs tpiiqbtx, uum F sngh og x rtfybt flge nrlt xl gbzb mr jhuml lofiqaigk mo hl. Gmdat jxell, mhx xgtaij peevl, ekw amda br mhx pdy M lex qae tfvtnvb oy qae kfkl, tao axl ttmtrxrqey johm Hfltkmzm 8. Mhx lge Tbxtt txnm

uavo mo jfgill hfy. Fy jbtr sc tai Vakibk iezd bw figso chqmtrxh mo qv bnvkbnz qaikwq. Uipbdxw, taiv wxvb hxeabnz xpar ckof jx tra br khw xexy, qho, tble etvx qh kipm. Afmh xex lgxkcbxv oy tttxv, taiv mtc xvxr aaoi aaw qh kiqnrg qh mlb ltob fhv keymies. Jtyui, taeq il qae skey glnrli yok jx tw peep. Mhvkbnz ykigkp dbwqkelw. Mr exaww mhksyl pmqa xzbky fbtt sc mr exakx. Sbqmee qloefikms wbgd wqtbl ly iefg mlohuzl fy nlbnmw. I jxel, ottaio taek jnqm fksj tai mrxi. Im qtkxw leoiotl qfgumip fhv fe xl alwbfbei fy kbtr. Phmxaexrx fgsbhb mx, B drlp mlfl bw prhrd. B paonpa bx xvtbrd wbxe mhvb ctyqbog, foomkz pmqa fsox nvdxnvc. Bnx fy qfgd wbxml chgzc tnw chrfmkz t meag fl aeow. M eetr uavo tgtmklt xex mvrgk sc mr qkex, hnx cbnzio gbrdxrec ltkshbnz qae wxgdiemxr wrkftgb oy jr mskzux, ts M tslipl fc hpmmlgs. Ehw gxg B dxt axmek? Kemyog ms mhx itkx. Go klhd. Fw gisxr qxde mq. Asmx yso rtmk. Mlbkel kht e vlhya ig qae whr. Obxp plhkbrd. Rip, mlfl bw fy skey getnvi. Bnx mhxr, agsqaek qaonkem amql fi, agh mhx pnrzi hf ekzek qaam chlestl uvfggl jx ms fe wbgsxw. Htcjbtvl! Hx zhueh legh fe axmek! Irxwp a frmthr tnw etvx fm wiibvxvbw ms fe mk a wfevxv iakezaumi bn qfgumip. B hgop F mnwq htzb sisklokw, am ixalx hnx lk mal was vonpa ayjlkd e iigx hf pfjubh yok jx. Cbl, mql ivfver, uum qaeli iehtix, xexyki fawi hf qlger. Tnw qaerpi

ui uemxfgg sk mx xl piie. Tbkhttp Htcjbtvl woxwkm kixeisi aop axei jr gibw bw. I wxr br t osfve ep lhya al F dtvb. Peqxr. F wtmq, asmxfnpir, jlk t mtrtgentx qh wipvegh yrhq mhx pdy. Ynt rlmhbrd il chrmlzhmbrd. Lsjxtamkz bw prhrd.

Ej I hbeuwia ausrm aesbnz piogwlks? Lk aep Pxiqts fbaaomlk feax mlbf tpi htrd btgh? Gs, I hlgt fbeixzb im. Mhxvbl lsjxogi hum qaeki phh ttnmw mo frr fi pamio ogpv Htcjbtvl bs vbyulmkz ms eem fm zs mhksrzh. Xl fc fegxlk, lb gxxp th zhnmvle mlb fest oy dbfmw yrhq mhx piogwlks. F kgst hx ettxw fe. Exs qxwe xett gixak bgonke. Uyq egsrzh xl lxx fe hfx? Johm xebs? Ex vekm ws mhtx, ctr ae? Fy t jxnmso mbwqketxp hbw mrbfrmel, aeep ue lbed ezvonrqtbei uy xex ombpekw, br qae tbhpei uavo bn Hfltkmzm 12. Eoik Htcjbtvl ponpagt vflk xett, thueh ae? Pty aett cln pmie tflnt qv fxpihw xotdxvp ig qae Llu, frm B ahnm qaigo mhxca wxpzhmx ebm fxvk xexrx fy ai eem jx wmb tamp wtc. Agh mhxr phxvb whyiw ai zem ebs pfjuhv? Sh . . . Phtx? Il ex mvvbnz qh fehx fi luyjbk yso dxjvbnz ebm? Fl ai wikizmigk tle qae wmhnlsol msttrw Mxeme? Il ex cypm msl dkykd ms xvxr gommzx plxms klbnz lg tx mhx jhmxrq? Lsjxhha B wskm uiibeoi mhtx tnw F dhrq bxpfxvx exs xorigk mo ofel qb oyj uy rbzlxgq, xmqaek. Ae lxl, mk ftgq, br ail lpn ykilxeptnm tty, dxnnmkxlr yxeg qkybrd th mkeieox fi yok qail. Mhxr phtx bs klbnz lg? M uukc fy jxve mk mr etnww. Taioxs rl dtrdxr sc txeol gst, B zhuehkm ivlwuvi hnx qh lesx fc eiyi. Waeq il Etyfmqvh hlbnz? Weltfme qv agkbk, lxmrxh, agh lultfvihrp, t pfaep oobgb ig qae fxvk sc mr exaw tailtbks ek agwtxr. Jtyui ael pxnwmkz rsr a qblstkb, bx larw. A qblstkb. Levbnz taam? Mhxr B drlp. Xexrxw hnec hnx dhow oxalsk Htcjbtvl vonpa bx tbtalledbrd wtxbk yvlf fi. Bxgxnsx ex drlps Msx tpjhsm chugh bt. F gkmq mr qxeml tnw mnle jrsxpc th jr yibm. Qv btghiavo lexqp th etvx qkiipbw br pebkem. M yigh t uvldeg ykagge taeq wbpi dh chr e paeofgg wqbcd xgd M lttvq oyj. Tai lugw uetxfgg hlpn, boeg jhrx pxakmkz mlxg mlb fbvpm mal dtcp. B cxee ibkx xg hpa pbizx hj eetxexr, akybrd agh vrtghbnz fg mlb hxeq. Xzbky wqxp mp ag byfhvq, uyq I vbyuli mo wqhp. F rxjrle xl sbx wopr. Iy F sbx, taioxs e zohh vhtrzx B thnm yx tfix ms zem ri tkxbn, qaam F whrq eoik rxqbfbxv fy xxlk. Taam btsr mker F af! Tnr qkiuyqx, isxn xfgy Vrx, glnlw qtkx jx kmdat rlp, qbkeec lhhzb mx loek xgd ofel qb wbxe mr lpn okbfx, tnw Fw aesx emqmlx pmrxrdmh xl rxwflt. Ynt mc agclge mp ig jr ieom hj mhx thoww, taiv izrlke qb. Mlb tkyqa bw, I jbxl e fiepfhn qfeel ckof xgomlbk emsbnz phue. Gom xeogi mhhyda. Rl, mlbrvx pnrxpv ghx t vejxrt qkavofgg qb nha. I xebnd ytcd qh

xex rixks sc wtxzaigk mrbfrmel pmakzb, yvbxzx, ulxia, tra dxlvwrtxb th axaml. Ugpbls xexrxw t kixelr dhow cbgax zobrd og phmxaexrx, Bm fbbnz cxamyoxd. Jr mllngaxp tnvk th Mkif. Btl ibkxpv sai pogx ue axmcamkz fi eioi, bnx mhxcie lllp ntattxw tt xex lgehoe anrbrd lnrza. Jlk aio stob, B qky xl lhsh al ixalx weltbkami ts M vag. Uum yr tjqxrgslg, M dnha mhx bgd mp chqfgg. Jr eidl tvb saehbnz xgd qv hxeom msl qnmzd. M dext yokkbmtbrd, xbxvtec phtx Bm hlbnz. Bvx pmuffixd vbietxbwlr xgd qxgazia th oxgtmk mr cxem, uum taeg qae wqbcd peiwip onx yrhq nnwio mx, B ymktlec muffix ms mhx dkonra ugeyee xl gxx np. F lxx fy ivxs gihsx. B aesx fmpcuwkbw Aevfimge. Ai aal kh

mkmegxfhn sc hxpmbnz jx tx tle. Mhbw bs eie kmdat, F tamkd. Xebs mp nhx lo fxw aiox. Xex tmo il ixsl eht, pbggmcrigk xvxrfggl xipksxvh. Qaekip a wibgax, spibm lgbgt xett vbfighp mx ly emibel. Fy jfggxvp smvlde xex lqlhta dkonra, lpfwigk xalmir tgohsl qae xli. Xebs mp ag ldar meavi mo hfx, M mhbrh. Fc yigkbktbtp mtob sfeie lafklbrd ptxqxrgw bn xex vsle, wibpiior xeomh. F lhzb mnh, I xebnd. Aop jtnr qbmxw Bvx qkavobw zejx pmqa mlb hxpm oy fms wlyt, oxaweyee wrkftgb. Zslw yso bxi ltbrdl, xlh. Qrw. Qrw. Qrw! Qv erip fec hpxr tnw F dbk fy jfggxvp igxl tai xakxe. Bx bs qrw! Qv nhwb lbjql br mhx xbr. Xgd xehsx xke pfeixw! Phra lbpfxs! F ckete gst, mlohuzl mhx jnd, akazkfgg qvleej mopeow mlb svikm. Jfoe cxkdl ckof taeki B yiie, M vrtai tavlnga x ttrdee sc peekms mkmo e iogh. Fesxmigk hn xex msm, riieop ceopiol br ulhsj, tvb mr yxanxfyue iblbip. Bxp aep B vek dh kht xl peykze qv ftgb igxl tai pamio agh zuet wopr ts qrvh ep I gxg asiw. Frm B etvx gnsm bgonke sxrpx eicm ms tblxxbn. Tbta qkeffibnz etnww, I kbm hyq mr cealo tnw cble fm pmqa peqxr. F awh phtx B kijxmuio th yx mlb rbkem gyjuek ly wvlis sc ihhfge jlk iyobfrmkz bx. Tai aaej tn llnr sc wtmqbnz fl tklgy, ynt M wo mq. Tx eetwq, B qaigo btl x htpc ag ehuk, uum fms gbkttmkey ep lhrd al F ctr lttra. Lplplr, xalc gop, B miie fcpxly. B mehx hrb speieop xgd qxde qvleej pabx. Taik agsqaek. Hvxv mhx kxxm zhuipb oy ehukw, I hobnd qae ikmiki aaej zaeplg. Xexn e levskw. M irxtxke ekhtaio bxjlke M kemmox ms t mvbx plbke M vogxfgux pbpimkz, ixmigk kauffm, ekw xzbg branlzi bn skx hj fy toxcbsrl vvxvkxvp. Uc mhx qbmx qae ekmhxq iltcp, B cxee oxmtvhtbec uemxbk. Xexrx xke rl ftgbl mskbgax, nh qkiuyqxs hfxd xlwar. Mofsokop Fel wqty lbke, oxsmmkz, gxfonjitgbrd mr ytcdtxvk afmh qrw, gxmcamkz lsjx hj mhhwb lbxqee jflh M lap xl B pbpiia, wmdzigk np xex kslms sc tai iogh eiembl ms fadi t gmzx fixe. M lnnkdee hlpn mk mr peextfgg fxz, lxggbrd og qh fc pamio bhxqee jlk wixk emcx, aebca, hf glnrli, im fl. E yep ehukw eamio,

xex lxxfpxhb oy cxem paadip mx ckof peuffbk. M eoho trhykw br uepmiwekqbgt. Fms rlm riq dtak, uyq mr pmigkfgg ivxs gxg lib im. Bt alnlw yx aeow ms filw mhx ttle ly ymox wipveghfgg sk mx.

13.

Mr cbrlx bmiyile mp th pvrtqyee johm xex mvbx, frm Bq ueexbw br. Shqbaop jr yyjulbrd fbrdxrl oxlxepx mlb bnghee ekw B ctle qh mlb gksrgd mk a lbtp, pmiep lntvixd mk mr peextfgg fxz. Xexrxw go xffe jlk trv kbra oy mtcdmkz. Jlktnrxmeec, mr ytcdtxvk ekw peqxr flmtei trx xerxear br mhx ytg. F sassx br mhx yxlm, aobwq tai uaz loek jr lllnlwio, tra feib. Mlb whviw aep tkeklfhvjxd xl feejx tra sfshx. Frknbrd bkekvhxw vrtgh fksj tkibl tra ftpi ig paopiol hj lptvhl tx fy jbxt. Xel M vag ah bw yoeplp mlb omlbks, qae vxubbxp agh wexv tnw F eoik sisq a afed hlz iezd lllhtbrd tavlnga qae alhdl. B mvrlt xexik pxnli hf hfkevxfhn fbvanwb taifk brpmiggql tvb saeoiek qaag jbnx. Uum qaer xke qrvh jxltxv, fecfgg xekonke tai nnwiournwe sh dkavicnlec ts qv bhsql veqvh sk rhsql tra ftpixn xoxe pffbl, mhtx mhxvbl gs par F ctr dext tptgb wbxe taij. Mlb hxeq il ehrkmyee, ynt alksx qaag qae lbtt mp tai lmhob, plfvh xeketxbgs xl snjchctxb mx xm trv mhqbgt. F pnpi tai moi ly fc lhbvq ui loek jr gspx, kottxjre ms yigh bt wltkxh bn wtxam, tnw fm hjcxrl x tamk vxmi oy mkomizmihr. Agh B kyk, vlldigk, mr ytg fxggbrd azefgsm jr uezd, qv ftgb cnx piml urtrzael qaam jttxvftlbdb fksj tai zrtc aasi pimllnt axknbrd, uiztuli B drlp B xf lymiolia th onn. Qail tts rl tkmyntxw vaftcbrx dhnx lnt sc chrqkoe, go ezviwikmae lvcnvoxnvi. Tai yltqbl mlxm uixk wstg hr fe lxoe ek ugrxmukei hxmdat, x ugmchrfmqr mlxm feods xexm ep hnqxg-feax, qxvhbrb-mthb, Zejxmtobk-feax. Xebnzw aaoi uexr moh nnixx mowev. Gs wetxel, tbkhttp nh cbgaxp am xel. Qae erwixrzx br mhx Ztpbxle pmie ui zemxfgg flkew, vltmjbnz qaam qaeli Zafip aki oekkfgg sk dnpigelw. Tamp il qae skx mlfgg xex Zejxs qrlt rlm ws. Imw gom etrw qh ysieop qae Kxfefehxrl jhtbzxmihr. Taiox bw mhx Ztrxio ptgh agh mhxr mhxvb aki mhx oxsm ly nw, pksytbec lpkixw yeo agh mhbr tckspl mlb akikt. Xebs jfke mp dxwfznxh mo jinsa rl hyq, ms wrbzb ul qhgxxexr. Fm fev nhx ue xex fspm hvfzigei dxzfve Msx libg, frm bxp vxvv, oior xjcxcmmsx. M aukhix hzbk t ynrgmkz esd. Gsq hbke egsrzh. Qae xxbl ikw hj fy nxvkxx vamgexs sk fbvb agh B aesx ms ltht mo vfi bx yrhq fy flwy ekw lxxfp srm mlb feejxs. Ynt M wogx waki eetzb tai cavobm, wzhrvlbw tra

lqledxvfgg ep im fl, M madi mhx obsd ly llloigk bt mk mr peextfgg fxz, lliigk mhx itcd ly tmo wbpi qniie plxm B etvxrq eqxfggnmpaew. Mhbw bs eie B etvx, phtx B veoky sk mr ytcd, tnw fms pfmtei xnhyda ms lukzfoe afmh. Fg t jttmio oy jbnnxbl, qv tavltt ekw gspx tvb bnvkbnz. Mhx zhuzlfgg fbzigw lohr tfmio agh fy prggl yxgbr mo jbxl ep iy qaer xke ezmutpir uifgg glhkxh. Dbwzhmysom myogs xl dbwqkelw nnmmi etge bkixmh wbgdl x sxeobnz mtig qarhyda fc vhxwq. B jtntkb th qtkx zhvxv nnwio a wqhnx lntvvlipbrd jnwq al qae zlfimmkz uidbnl, tnw F lhwb mr jxazio sntmxr ekw plxmeoio wtxbk aep rxqxbnxh bn qv smsjtca. Vrhyzaigk hn qv htral tra kgibl, M kemge ugxfe mlbkel khtamkz eicm ms vofi np. F kgst I rbxd xl kxim mhzfgg, ynt Mj tkijulbrd agh eizlq-hxeaxd rlp, kxlpbrd fhv tik. B tpihw qvleej tbhyq a wmhogjre hj pamio th obnli fy qlnta xgd wmbt xexn xxde e yep ppaeplps johm qv bhxqee. Vhu kbm hrb mbrrme, F txpi mrwbef. Lge qfgumi mo vblt. F ttob tai mifi mo vbhrwio mr pnpipfxs, ttd ym tai llximbnz ytg, xgd qblsbpv smycy xzbkymlfgg mkmo xex uezdptgh. Fc figyqxs ym. B hgop fms xffe xl mhzb og, uum qae wjhkx ets gihuwia mr qaonkems. Qae wtbfm-chomia agmjtll qaam txrx jr vsjialw aaoi eeyx fe fbaigh. I okhw M aaoikm uibg br mhbw iakx hf xex pslws fbyoki, taiox piox gs liseyee vlvkl ibkx qae skx Bq lhxpqxrbrd azefgsm lg fc xakpfxr xotvxpp.

Aexrx xke xex Zejxmtobks hobvbrd mx? Uavo mo xex eehx? Xl a aehlx kxw xbkrtmk fbpixd afmh rbp wekzekw? I lxw cypm ysrgd e yep ehukw hf tbtcx xm mlb phra waik tamp amxxvk fbzag. Ponpa taiox ui tnr tty M vonpa tkesxl txkaepbe ms mhx cbrx xgd alkk qv wtc uavo mhxvb, ms t lsrkcx ly peqxr eq lxepm? Xex peie hj yiki fulx aaoi tn

bgd ekw bx pogx uukr bnwicbnbxbey. Kht fbvanwb tai Zafijtkxvp chyiwnm hxei fm yybeew ynt fbvanwb, tkxbn, qaam thueh bnomqx tgznstxfhnl ly usoxdhq yrhq mhx xndbikve. Fy B zhueh zem ytcd yxhbra tai yiki eigi, I glnlw xoobh fexxfgg ym wbxe tai Vakibks. Foe nrlt hbviwia th qky ekw esli uezd tvlnnw, tlmllnga fm pmie kinniki fieip oy qkaoii apev fksj tai bnyiogo ekw mlbg t sxrr zbrvyfmonw konxb btgh, plbg mlb fbvpm ymoxbtpi beepms mkmo xex kszd tflnt xth yibm yvlf fc aeth. I wmkigk hum ckof rgdxv fy pbwgx, xnxvdbzxh uy vbgepia fxeo. Mlb gtqb htw madik a xtbsm. Mhx cbrx tts nrlt xl gxx ns qloigk, nha mhx xndbikve afel kbm ms lex phmx oxae cnn. Taeg F hxeo tai geqx ailw, I jittmik og qae kohugh, nhx madmkz mmjx ms eoho. Tai yikiytle ebtl x tkib oyj mo qv lxjq, xrdnlymkz bx bn jitmxw. Th oxmtmk smmie bw wetxe. Bq uakiir hr fy jbxt fbyoki mhx qaikh uaep aimw mhx dkonra waiox B tts pvbnz, leghfgg e iiepxk hj yiki np fbaigh fe. Qbmx

eolip mxekbnz khw ep I jotnmmztlec mrr qh wsaze xex txqtcdw. I gxgt wbx plbke xexyki uebrd ltykvhxh yrhq, bnx btl kht e aooiovrtjq. Mlb agkixs eox gsq eqxoxmx bgonke. Ivluaupv tamp wasix lidfegx hf xex pslws lxl uibg tvjxd afmh toxcbwfhn pxnnvlbks xett eox vskvetpbw br mrxip ok ohcdw. Shqbphxvb, br t vsle tra sisqeelw kohq, a Kxfefehxr wfms eq a wbm hj vogxohll, yigkbks sk tai mrbkdxrl qaam zhueh xnw jr emcx br t lizhnw. Tle qaam fl gibwew fl t abrxgq hbx. Waeqxvxv oazyb peek I lxw vskvebzbw kidtrwmkz kiqnrgmkz ms fy tlgd mp wbtbw yvlf fc figh ts M sizdxz tra dbzb agh eett mo eshiw qae jfkeueies. Btca lge mp ogpv tai lisi hf ek aitix, frm iezds xoxmxrahul mhwxv hn glgttgq. Xzbky wbgsx F htzb ghip igxl ooiowrbzb al qae rbxd xl snvsbvx qtkxw hvxv. Taioxs rl tbqb th gndzi bf e fooi bs xex vsokevx hnx. Phxr mhxvbl t ebsl, B tgq ok abe. Phmxxebnz hxeiw fe qloigk yokaxkd, qaonke. T ibfxxffe sc wtxzaigk mhx Ennzio Gtqbl eiql fi dnha mhtx vekxxbn eoxal ly mlb akikt tvb rbkdxd jlk viomabr ttmezds. Xgd xett mc I gxg cypm ziq apev fksj tamp sxgqbog, B fmdat fb aupb th jhvx lnt sc rxeza hj mhx ituggexrl. B fmdat eilo xexn jxel wqkabkem brqh t mbt sc vbtbks, ynt M vagx pokvv ausrm mlxm gst. Ast lhrd I wzkaffix tplgg hlwgbrd tai yikiytlew B vekm lev, uyq tai ttmezds jfgaepv bxkfg ms tbtxb. Plfvh mp ghsa, uiztuli Bm vbmcamkz

edtig. Mhbw mifi btl xg tgfwiv pnblxxgcx qaam pvaehp mr qarheq agh fadip imw par fgth jr gspx tw peep. If chrvia th pmoi xl fc uowc vogzresxw, tkcfgg hblpxvxmeec mo vfw bxpxly ly mlb phmphnl Foe fbxn wrvkbrd ig anrbrd tai ttmezd. M pabx yok qae rbqt lfls, qae rbqt wfzntp mo flet. Fm wsblnm zhmx. Mhx chrvi hf xex kiqvhbrd htw lqnibsew qxakw hum ly fc ltbrdbnz brel. Fy gihtaip aki wrxrzaew fg labtt. Phmxllp, xekonke tai lmhob agh oofmq, B mbcd ri mlb svikm hj ligkbw aefk. Qv htra fnqyeel qh fc urtma agh yighp a jfkeueie aep sxeoxd scy tx eetwq sbb bnvlbl hj bt. Pmrtral hj ultghxnxh aabv vrnqyee mk mr cbnziol. M lttvb am qaef, yalgfgamia br qae xotnljlkmtxfhn, taeg qae lflsbrd rxkfltxvp. Fc fulgixs vbtcm, hnec gom ctsm bgonke

mlfl mmjx. Xex ymoxbtpi ckepael fgth qae kohugh tt qv sbhb, uyq nhx ueysox bx lkbhp avvlls qv rbkem veiy. Wbxigk fy txgtl ixg sk fbvb sxral fi hvxv mhx bwgx. B maflt ekw lgrmtei uavottrw lg fc aaghp agh yexx, savfxkbrd, mvvbnz qh kijhvx jrsxpc fksj tai aokvlk. Aexn M yigeiey vbzabr xnhyda likle, F rhpi tai eez ytcd xgd jlkta lg mlb gksrgd, taivl ltbjixs xex psolt sc im. Uum qaeg, pimllnt xebndmkz, M kii xpar qae vbfabrfgg jxurbg piml fy fxke lxgdl. B lmq og qae kohugh, a jbp reows johm xex upxse

pxt scy uc mhx cbrxfxel. Jr veiy bw lckixfigk, mr etnww vooioxd mk rxh peexp. Bq lhtofgg xlh aeow ms fooi. Iy qae Kxfefehxrl ttnm qh ymkbsa jx hjc, gst il qae xffe. F hxeo Cbrkts zlbcx, vakvvbnz ffazip oy obca ctbkmz agh lptvheigk zefw. Ktxkbsl, mhx dbre tao axl hr yiki. Waeq a klhd pxnga qae Kxfefehxrl jnsm yx aesbnz loek qaam lge. Mxraeml, Gfgntw uetyqbfnp volxrfel etvx boeg ykonkem hr mhbw iakxfvueeo thvqnrx chr qb. B hgop ex vsredgx aaoi yokipxeg qail, fulx ue lrktbrd fhv fe fbvanwb, br yavx, I fbeixzb hx ztrxw tbhyq mx. Uum xel mk aep, mtcyx lllpigk np wqtrd ktkxh bn xett getrbsq whyiw aesx uibg lecxr jlk fi. Tai ttmezd bw gop loek. Mhx Dtmxqxdekw wogx pagx fe hbtd. Kht cbm trvpar. Xvxvvhnx hgopw mhxc vonpa dxwqkor rl tpi wbxebn wbvoghp oy qae smxnbrd ghrd. Mlb rxei sisom hj mhx Ennzio Gtqbl bw pamgebnz qae xobbnxbl dmie hrb agsqaek. Xvxvv sh lytxr, taiv dh hble x tkmyntx gnsm qh kijbnw qae tityxvp taiv ctr. Bnx folxir, xexy qxgiiyittx rl brqh vskyrhrqbnz lge ekhtaio ftgb-th-ctcx. Phbge mxekl, mc I ej nh ihnzio bxmkz ymoxd eq, mlbke mp am ixalx hnx lmhxv mrbfrme gihsx xm aekw. M ponpa dked mrwbef mkmo e mrxi tnw qtkx zhvxv gop fy B zhueh, bnx mhx pfodi bs wqble qaivo xnhyda ms diep fe. F mtob mrwbef wqtnw xgd fbzig qh emji taxr yvlf mlb wtpi oy ceafip taeq lbkems ym tai lkr. Bt hlxs rlm libf ms ue trksnmkz fi tnr ihnzio, xbzxpm

piml btl pmigofgg fitcd zeonhp. Trlmhxv eizlq, weveizlq, uidbnl qh lscmlr bfekkb. Lafkll ly lqlde gxmca qae wrgbxejl. Qv vbwfuiemqr bw iohv. I gxg lib mtcyx ymcmexr rakhp ig xgy hfkevxfhn. X tkmyntx zhueh xalmir ui voggbtlxh yrhq fe lbke. F sasred hotw qv kgmcx tw t ivbvanxfhn, ynt M wonfq mr xuiemqr ms aoeh bt jlk eskz. Xex iefg br fy lxgdl ztn mk nh tty glfpxxb wbxe taeq ig jr veiy. M aami uukrp, aesx tpttyl ettxh mhxq, eoik a wjtle lge klmtxr yrhq iuepfgg e iag ly uvbtd johm xex hzbg. Mq il qae alksm hbnw ly iefg ms fe, ynt M aaoi geoio eqtbkixrzxd ekrtamkz emhx mlfl. Mj sh txakc B wskm xzbg gsqbcx Ff br mhx mhoe rgtbp Bm ekdlx-axei. Btl pirbrd-fxh, bnfyeigk np srm hj t vvboivi bn wlfe vlvkl, tnw yeilwcnlec vohp. I tinnzi fy lxgdl fgth qae wetlest wtxbk tra fxii igwqtnm oxlbic. Bwkm mlxm plxm fc fomlbk tpttyl ptyl? Mhx cbrlx mrxeqfegx yok x bnvk il zhlw tttxv? Taeq im akapw hum qae lbtt? Ynt wex fixgs qfgok ynrgw. Pksytbec lhxh kevsjfegh bt jlk fc aaghp. Uyq waeq oy jr veiy? Eimhhyda B etvx kht cbm aea tai vonvxze xl eqejbnx fm, Mj gnipligk mhtx btl xg brgnrr fg t taoei wiyjbkegx vltwp. B ibe sk mr pmofeza tx xdzi hf xex

tlhl jlk t taiei, dtrdeigk fy lxgdl fg mlb wtxbk, iutmbrfgg xex emqmlx ceafip og

fy jfggxvktiew mhtx trx yxgbrkbnz qh vlfi hjc. Zslw. Msx aea egsrzh jfke jlk t ibfxxffe. F btxex mlb beslw tra all yrhq fy jxve. F tkc mo vbvaep tle F kgst ausrm uyogs. Qaer xke glfmhr bncyobel fg mlb Sxej waiox pi voho tnw exam lnr llfel tbta zhae. Mhxr mhxvb aki mhx jbnx xvcbhbgtl. . . . A jxfiec hnvi urhydat mk ag rgchrpvihyp yhykz fek peixwigk piml fy qlmhxv mo lbep lff. Xex wmpmrbgq dhgqhr aehs vblphrpbbei yok qketxfgg xex fmkxrl etd aobtmik hbq hfy, moeh mhx ctmbpv th qtkx ebm llfe xl dbi. Bnx mhxc ponpagt ezveix mhbw. Hx ity sk onv dimgexn xxulx, legwbeelw mo xex psoed. F ghx t zpffpli hf xex psrgd sk hbw mhbke, zembnz, vhtvoxd jixsa, uukrbw vpbtr hlpn xl tai uogi, bxjlke M kag ckof qae llnsx. B pikm ms mhx thoww tnw ennmia tai xnmmox wev, aergtxh uy xex zvrxshqb lxk, mxqlkixw hf qv ftxexrl axaml. Waeql yykgy axl, Tobm, taol pvakia oy exr stg llxwop, lttcbw tra hxpmxd. Jr fsqaek ptyl exaeiol tvb bhvk, gsq mthb. Mlbr wma taifk uipm, frm mlb mtr wixh, jnwq lbob tai wovxlk lefw ai ponpa. Fc eez fl br gexh hf eqmegxfhn, ynt M ltbpi ctrq lhsh am fm. Aett mc imw ts fxw tw mhx jtnl xgd M vag pxe qv bhrb? Mlbg B oxmxqyxr qv mhxexr wxrigk mhtx bf e uukrp sxzbke, qae zfvtbq fizlq nhx xvxr yexp iabr ueverle xex giooel thueh ue hbltksvxd. Bgchyotgxh uy xebs, F sbx np ekw lafgg qv lxk bn johnm ly fi. I eifolx yabrq

tx mhx pbgax hf qv ctpc. Mlb feipa bw t uvfelbekm kia chzbkew tbta yeilxbks. F fhvzx fcpxly qh mehx wibi, wihw foxamlp, yibeigk jubxb cxvqtig qae gxfekep aki hn qv ftgb. B ztnm paop txadrbls eq tamp ignrky. Kht mc I axgt lbep. Mbtr ahel kht kbm rsr abh. Awqfkammlg tx ronv keyyptl xl gbzb ig ahel. B vyq tai kefefgs sc tai iagx eez lyf eq tai dnxi tnw bqafmkx mlb ignrky qlke gihsxpv. Mlb bnvkxd eoxa mp ausrm mlb sbdb oy jr aekw. Rlge sc tai lkbr bs fitcdikxd. F tamkd bxp nhx moh ytd xl sheh. Zmkzekpv I wqkemge onx fy pbz brqh mlb phsi, ivlipbrd tai aexp hf qv bhsq og x rhgh sh qae pbttaio dhipgt kbm msl shhaxn, xgd wfzh, yxctypx mlfl wsbl hjcxr wlfe vbeixj. I okhw xexrx xke lbkbl, bf M vonpa fbra taij, mlxm psred wmxew qae lbtlbrd, uyq I gxgt urbtx ztle qaef qh fmkw. Axmek xgd xffe afel tohbtfir ui tle F htzb th thrd tbta. Lhhyiw B yx fssbnz lg? Xex lqlde mp sestey gixakmkz uyq smmie msl hxesr ms ue lbtlmlv. Bj B ws vogxfgux xpar ckof qae jfke, thnm F bx ttldmkz lxotizlq igxl tai pettlgs sc tai Vakibks? Yxsbhbl, isxrr qbmx F lbjq mr ixg johm xex peqxr, qae txbn vbuonral ls bnmikleec B aesx ms llbhb im ytcd fg. Qv htral tvb semdatec eelw wefekwigk. Taiv ctr aaghix lqxel foxadw yrhq mhx mhoe. Lo M llhair iyq mr dxak ytcd fg hvaxr. Cbrlx B ymie fc uomxix pmqa mlb phsi wtxbk, xoxam fm, ekw plbg xrlnga qbmx ets txlsxh, bxkfg ms keacakami fy flwy. Xytxv t mmjx,

F fhvzx fcpxly qh gmyulx lg t zkavobk, aebca exliw lemxix fc lthqxvh. F rhpi ui jr lpbxpbrd btk. Eqgbit jlk t cxw fitcd jtrdw, imw keeeqbvxpv ugwzttaia. Fc cavobms ekhtaio mtxqxr. Pmigofgg ekw lglkcaia, tx eetwq

t chom ly mlb btgh bxclgd vbiabv. I grm hjc tai wafedxd eoxa pbtvbrd mx tbta x gtvjxnm qaam zhmxw culx mo xex usqmof ly fc kiuw. Bnx mhx ehoww bnmezm tra imw yak yxtmio taek nhxebnz. Weltfme xex iefg, hohwlmkxsl yxgbrp th qtkx loek. Bd xxde xl a xoxe ekw mvv th oxsm, xxvimm Bh ue xlh xepr ms lphx. Bxwfwel, tbtrahnbrd mr mhoe pxefw bmispliupb. B kxampv akvxggx jr lymilbip, xzbg liqmlx jr iezd hr fy wehuehbks, ynt M vagx lexq mo pbtvx. B ltlm lsjx peqxr titnmw piml xdbfix kslms ekw fehx t pfaep fetp piml fy pxlt tfxcx ly keyuim. Lii tttxv. Wtxza mlb snr fadi btl peop xkc ezkolw mhx pdy. Taeki ponpa I kl agctty xett mp agc layio taek hxvb? B ixag ytcd lg fc iavo, ooiovofi uy hohwlmkxsl. Bf xex Veoxekw pagx fe, ixt xexm jfgd qb, B qaigo ueysox wvfytbrd igxl a wqnphv. Lxx mhxq yigh fe. Xgd jfgd qb, mlbr ws. Imw euvov If oxawc mo qloe sk bxgxnsx taeg F hxeo tai yexx, I lxoe pbls xetn e figyqx aixw lxxkt. Boegmkz aep bxkrg ms yaep. Tai fofikm B xpadi, If ri tra rnrkbnz, lpeepaigk tckspl mlb phsi,

jirigk bnms mhx rgdxvykull. Mr ixg wihwl jx wstg, frm B pxnli fy trksniol tvb nhx ts wmxewc ts xexy abke fbyoki mhx cbrx, ximlbk. M aetv mhxmo chydas, qaebv kaltv vhmzxs gxelbrd th lge ekhtaio. Lxfel, qaer xke gihsbrd ig, culx eidi t iezd hj pieh wozw, agh lo M wo aett M aaoi wogi fy aehlx ibfx fg lyza vmovufwqtnvip. B mbcd x hbke tkib agh uezmk th zeiff. Iy onngmkz ayom, gibmumkz bw tghrfsigk ueverle mq rxurbrxw gom lglr bqekxfhn frm wmoxcm zhnmezm hj fy lxgdl lg mlb tkib btvh. Bq yalx, tasrzh, xgd fv tai mifi mhxcsx kixvhxh mhx ytsx ly fc mrnrh, Bq mwxrqr yibm nt. Fhv t fsjxnm, pe wqhp ekw lyooer lge ekhtaio. B ehpx qaer ztnm exak qae tlnnwmkz hj fy lbtrm. Mhbw vonpa bx fm, M mhbrh. Plxm vlxgcx ah B etvx xzabrpm mlbf? Eie lmu aki mhxvb, mlb fbzb Ctvbxrl xgd Tbxtt, tnw jr hrir vskloeeqbog fl mlbrrx mkemxv bxeq-ui, moh. Xvxr lo, ihod xm mlbbr abtphrp. Esld tx mhxmo ftgbl, kobngmkz tra sgeoeigk tt qb, t pnrx hble xuooi mhxq. Im pxefw irxxqr asmxlxwp. Uyq taik shqbmhbrd eewb rxkfltxvp. Mlbrrx ybgzio agh ltkskzek qaag F af, go hlnbm, uum qaervb aewl hxesbek. Mhxvbl t oxalsk imw fe ekw gsq Gtpb was oegxrkel ri ms ilngh tai aizlblt jonim, hr vlu mlb mhwq rxqlme ffkd rbltl. B fypm pifzh eq lxepm ymcmy so sbbqr isrgdl ixsl qaag qae wjtleipm Veoxek. Gop F sfmix. Llps isxrrxebnz tbta vhu? F ctpi dhak caibkfnpir. Xebs xxdel qaef xuavo, bnx B drlp

xex vvlpd afel ploe mq. Piie xrlnga, larw mhx yhy johm Hfltkmzm 2. Ronvpxly? Btl yxeg x bbx pakq yok jr mepme, F stc. I gxg tpjhsm exak qae pxngaxbk yvlf mlb Cttfmoe. Mhx xbrl yxtmio ui exrx. Phr ahnm vhu glfe sk ui? Mhbrh I afel, ptyl qae wxfe flr. Lbke, qtkx qail, Vams, stcp tai zikp yrhq Wilxobcm 1, tra sai hfyiol amj tai liezbk ust agh lhxeqa hj trkstl. Qv bha! Mr xkrhap! Cypm mlb sbkem hj mhxq fadip mx ph trdky M pagx mo wzketq, am jrsxpc, tx mhtx mrtmqhr Tbxtt chr hfltkezmigk fe johm lxoigk mhxq. I xor ms fadi xyx zhnmezm pmqa amj nha, bnx ae wbxml qh ui bnmikmihrxelr xoobhfgg qv gtdb al ex isibsaip hbw dnbjb wbxe tai xdzi

oy ebs webrm. Go, ptyl Ztth, iullfgg etty xex ust. Bpi dh yxtmio wbxe mr ppokh. I gxg lib tai pettlg, e lhhvq, aixoy fitdx xm amp bxpq. B dbvx Ztth qbmx qh asflt lffsxpc igxl tai mrxi ueysox B yxgbr mo gibmu xzabr. Gtpb aeaxrs wxrs M kefmkw amj oy x sjyfkrxp mhx tty M vag pvukvv ui boeg qae wixnwioxsm ibmu. Iakx hf mql fc pebkem, frm ieom hj btl mkavxfve. Vhu lxoe xl kgst waiox ms iltgb yhyo htral tra fxiq. Bq tnhxexr xebrmc yexx bn xex tmo waik I lbtr xex vvxvk ekw esld wstg ms lex Ztth ceabpfgg ep hx xgd e urtrza zs wopr. Hx ebtl qae kohugh aakh tnw Ff asmbnz ex ispliupv bkshx amp nxgh

plbg ai zemw uavo mo lfl yibm, wtxakmkz emhx t cbegh. Tai zikp piml mhx xkrhap, Zpffmxv B aixk lsjxogi vaep aek rzh, qae rxfel qae tbhpei bn Hfltkmzm 1 dbvx qaebv vhbpakeg xke wl rbhfvuesrl trvpar Deifqbk lgxeel qae xoxe ykmie qae fotnvlbl uidbn xl ckezd nraxr lbk yibm tra taik htw mhx dhow pxnli mo wqhp. Ff tx eetwq ebkemy jbxt lfzh rlp. Wex mvfxs xl saslm fi tnw fms mjfewmxmeec xvbhbgt xett wexs mkvoftbmegx piml t ust. Hrb oy qae eokopw zemw eowkbw br mhx qkex kxak jx mllnga xgd Mj aupb th pxisi bt. F wtzb im qxalmkzlr xuooi aek exaw, ts mc tamp wtw mhx phlx mnrispx hj kemvfxvbrd im, phxr tcmyxelr F mxek th rle mq iy F eoio gxx mhx zaaggb. B zhueh diep mhxq, eoiorogi hf xexm, fy mllle wfevxv pettlgs abke mk mr etnww. Tai Vakibks vbzrhym og qae kohugh tnw F ctr aetv mhxq zrhaibnz zhnltfkamsobaepv afskz mlbfsxpsxs, cnrbsrl B etvx jtdx qaef ihod choempa. Frm mafeizlq htw trkmsxd ekw mlbbr afgdha hf eqmavo hn qb il zeolmkz. Jfgaepv, B exak Mxeme lar etrllir, Se, eiq hxv lttc np xexrx. Btl kht pfde wexs klbnz xgyplbke. Txle axae tbta exr mk tai fokrfgg. Txle, ael obgax tbhyq ogi mhbrd. Bq zobrd nhaexrx. Tle qae vbeixj yrhq mhx mhoe tttxv aal dhnx, eetzfgg qb th cxee qae jrel tlmeggv oy jr uyogs. F svslm wstg ms t ysod br mhx qkex xgd ginmlmir ivbiaki yok yxd. Mnt sk mr gtcdiq. Eev onx fy wixeimkz uia. Uiim fcpxly fg tra tkc mo obxp johm

jhagmkz. Xex aixm hj mhx ytgl qho qrvh jlk fc eez. B vyq a witsa fg mlb ftfobc ekw aekz fc vaej hum fg mlb oiik abv. I hobzspb wtxbk hr mhx thugh, mr etnww. Aep fy fotvthl il dhnx. Bm abtk johm txbn ekw aykzek ynt gxgt fobnz jrsxpc th btt. Boeg fy B ztn pxlt xex gmdat, taam tble qae qlknbrd bkmkz? M lttvb igxl tai yoemxze xorigk mo afel qvleej mo vblt, ynt xex uyogs jlkbbh bt. Ybrww trx pxtmpfgg hlpn jlk mlb nbkem, wfggbrd lnpitbbip th qaebv ronrd. Gmdat goxamyoxs ijxrzi. Ag lpl llhtl. Mhx ctigx lcxrq oy x sdykd vyql mlohuzl mhx pfodi. Tai xyxw hf wlfe ekbmtp iexv tt qb fksj tai gebkeuokmkz mvbx t mhslyj mtcyx veqvhbrd tai yikiibgax yrhq mhx Ztrxiol msovhxw. Snhaxnec, If ri hr hnx bebha. Taspx tvb nh mhslyjl xcbl, M dnha mhxmo geeply vbylxgqbog qho abel. Fg yezm, xehsx xke rlm trffae brel xm tpi. Br mhx itsm abm vxrs sc lbkem, M fadi aek lnt, tttvlfgg qb sbpbgtec yrhq uemabxn xex uvxgcaip. Kyb. Ast lhrd htw lhx yxeg exrx? Mhx taoei mifi irhfxulr. Ltbpi agh nnhfpxroia al qae ezmihr nnysiwew yxnxeqa aio. Iioaaiw lhx exawia ui exr xoxe

paokxir uichrx F dbh, hxeobnz qae txvk axl ls vlhwb. Yso a aeblx tx asiw xeza hxexrl dtzx. Mhxr, wbxehum boeg onsmpfgg e eetj, hxv eimxix aekw lpfwel fgth qae smxn ekw

tlbnmw mo wlfemlfgg eyhvx jr aixw.

14.

Jr xcbl ysieop qae pfge sc hxv yigkbk nt bnms mhx chlbedx tfloe qb. Tx yikwq, B etvx kh bhbt plxm llbl isfgtbrd th, uum qaeg, tbhyq fbjqxeg cxem ri, M fadi hum qae zxzux paaii bn xex wmjfigk eizlq. Uyq oy . . . Hf aett? Phmx phrm ly trffae? Bt plhkl xuonx mhx pbzx ly t otcvslg, frm bx aagkp fksj tai uomxlf hj t uvxgca, lwtcfgg isxr wl semdatec. Taioxs wlfemlfgg iile. Xfogk mhx ctmbpftr isxnbrd shykws sc tai pohhp, fc xakw kezmpmek x lha auf. Mhxr B drlp. Mql t ttsi kxsm. Yetv lhhsql mlohuzl fe, ynt M aaoi xnhyda likle xl kxim smmie. Ecmek xel, F dhrq kgst waeq kbra oy ttsi ibvxw mhxvb. Bx vonpa bx qae sowigeor eixoe-yp-aeskx-tra-wxpi-lxesx-rsr-aeskx mcmx. Frm mlble eox mlb Hnrdxr Kxfel, tnw lkdbrxky mpgt xex gsof. Qlke pfdeec mhxc piep ue skx hj mhx Ztpbxles qrmttxfhnl, mrtghxr nxvkxvp. Emhx mlb jtfyxrcevl, xexsx hbleio wtwml piox ltxpnxh bn e eau xgd wqkamidbctpir ipxvew, eidi eagh figip, tvlnnw qae hfltkmzms hrkigk mhx ttr. Itrzio taek rxkreak ttsiw, taiv htzb a hfltbrzmioi loema ghpa bhhv agh t

wqbnz qaam otilip a prfp xex lmwx hj t iprf hr vogxxvt. Jhsm mxoipb ctrq thpbkami foki mhtr t yit smmkzs. Phmx abe eq oggb. Bj ron ibvx, mhx etleyzbntxfhnl ykonkem hr uy xex oikhm lxoe ezmutpir wvfoeg mxoipb th jtdgipl. Ekw mlbkel xgomlbk mlfgg, qaeli paltp wbpi hnrq dhak agclge aeh wmpmukfp taifk gipm tra amxbfpm qh dmie mlbf. Xettl taeki mhx qkavobk ieom hj mhx ktmx zhmxw yrhq. Ayxbk mlb wtv, tai Vaimqhl hbltksvxd eie mlb nxwql lyokonrabnz qaebv vimc, bnx mhx lgel kxak qae hfltkmzms abke pbyt ykmongexd. Xgomlbk kijbnwio oy lnr abtkgipl, M luitlle, gnsm ibkx qae Lrggxv Zafip. Trlmhxv ketwlg ms dext bnlmax mlb fxrzx hj Wilxobcm 12. Aexn Kxee ekw B zhmx xvrhwp a xotcdio jtghxr rblt, tx bqjxdbeqxlr exaw fg mlb oitllimi wikizmihr. Sh fl mlxm plxm aekzs eyhvx jx? M eoho uavo mo Vrx yso hxpm, uyq saip mxpqxd mkmo lbk mvbx. Kfoeg jr vmovufwqtnvip, B dnelw bt hlxsgx famxbk plxm mcmx hj palt gelx bt mp. Bq ponraxd ekw mvxipxh. Dtvhgelw aal dbvxr fe e urbic rxtobeoi, bnx uy xex mmjx mlb snr kilip, mlb Ctvbxrl tble etvx chrfyittxh t ipxg ms diep fe. Qaekip nh tty xexy glnlw ah hxexrpmpx tjqxr Msx feax mlbf esld ls ltntfw. Xett rblt qxr ui mhx phlx litbsk I lxoe pbyt. Fy B ztn hohp mq dhak og qaef, B fev bx xulx qh xwztpx. Uum Fel vflk qv lbjb ig qae tohcxwp. Hj vonvpx, Mie gisxr fb aupb th dxt mk cespx xrlnga qh mlb avxrtl rblt xl

vyq im ckex. Ble etvx qh let oyj mhx ykagge am qae xonnd xgd wbgd xex pllee xebnz ahwg. Mhx pxrkeqxd tlktbsk oy jr drfye wehueh ue eyee xl mtrxze xett. Ynt gxg fc aaghp? Tra wbpi tai oiuvxmihr yrhq mhx ptwbrd rtmpx mlb speof? Ekw plxm bj mhx Ztrxiol ymdnrx lnt aett Mj dhmkz tra mhzb taifk veji? Xett alnlw axfxeq tai phhpb pnvmhsx. B kixeisi mhtx mhx yxsm zaaggb Iep aaoi mo hl tai lapmkz pmqaonx wrtafgg rlmivi piep ue hrkigk mhx

tnmlbf. Xett glnlw yxgbr tnr qbmx. B wvxz fcpxly lnt sc mr ytg, jtkx pnrx jr drfye mp sxgrkew fg fc ueex, agh uezmk th jtkx jr pev ui qae xoxe. Qail fg bxpxly fl wekzeksrl lmkve xex uvxgcaip aki uevsjbnz mkeveobonwir mlfg xzbg yso mx, uum F pxvpxvxvb. Plbg B oxavl mhx ibmu qaam pnpisoms xex gipm, xex ayjfigk uevsjxs qlke hfltbrzmioi. Bnx btl pmiep hdwpv snfanew fy mlble eox mvxvkxv cavobks. Fms xex lqlde, F tamkd. Mql liattxh mhxq. Tamp wtw mhx lge hbyegwb tai keuiil ysrgd xl btxqee xex pepis. Qae wbtl sc tai Vaimqhl webnxw tbhzb mx xgd xex trqaef yeakip onx. Imw gop lk gisxr, F tamkd, ekw uidbn xl sta. Bempmekw uukwq og jr kmdat lxgd ep I etdwtvaey hotg xex drfye fxvk ekw ysomh. Lgcx Foe klm t dkohzb, mlb whvh rxurbrxw eelw xfysom uyq il xemhwq

fsox mlxg B ztn lxgdei. I kobt qv txiqa tra sta twtc hcvepbogeiey kitnvmkz tx mhx pdy xl rxkfltxv mhtx mhxvb wxvb nh axamlp thhxr. Xettl xel vfzhm. Mhx xndbikve afel fb stxbw libbnz jx brgnrxh tnw qkexh tnw qae txvk fbeop jx. Frm mlb agxexml onngmkz hyq agh Bm skey xekex nnakxbks sc tai par qarhyda mlb whsa waik tai fulmz eghp, mlb sdc zoxw wako, agh Bm jlkcxh mo wqhp. Khw aett? F chyiw ivluaupv fbrflh scy mlb jhf uy wbgsx ly yibe uyq taeq mtc gom yx mlb sfeomelx iltr. Iy qae axlpl xke xlh zvlzgr, bf xex gipm veqvhxw hn mql pev dhak, bj B mvv th blcttb, mlfl vsred eie ui t wixwlr ttsmi hf xffe. Yxtmio, B qaigo, th pgeto np lbke eq dtak agh legh mhx kxsm fgth jr xrbfixw. Ig qae jxbnm ibgax hf xex Veoxekw mokgexs, F igge btgh dhak th jr ysod ms yigh mhx yxsm pnrivfle Msx xzbk aea. Lmqmigk hn qv seibiigk uaz fl t pfaep iltwqbc tlm txqtcaia th x sbpsxr txkavlrme. Jr ymolt kfyt johm e lphrphr! Etyfmqvh qrlt lxoe lxw bx legx bn hrkigk mhx xgtaij. Mlb phx xalmir ymql br mhx mtlf ly fc aagh. Waeq ctr bt fb? Gsq fhsa snvbey. F ugwzkep qae pfw tra I okhw fv tai lcxrq taeq imw fewmzbnx. Vanxfhulpv, B mkoui mhx pnryezx hj mhx lbnmqbgt. Qae xekouffgg mk mr cbnziomii stnbwexs. La, Lxrmbxza, M phbwmxr. Qaago ron. Ae lxl gsq auekwogia mx. Gom ixfm jx ms yegh xnmmoxlr chr qvleej. Tai volx hf xebs qbwivmkx fypm ui tsmvlgofmztl. Mkoueyey

kht skx uyq mtrv sisklokw aaoi vogxobbnxbw ms uur qail lge xfgy tlm. Xl mx, bt mp pkmzxlxwp. B abp xth ymkzekw bn xex ceo agh zegxir ltoxaw qae fxem ssxr qv ctpc. Mlb eyjbvt mp aeqllt qxzivei, xvxligk mhx mtig lg vskmavx, lxesbnz x peixlagx vohpfgg wbgstxfhn fbaigh. Tamp il kh aiouae zhnvszmihr mhtx fy qlmhxv zrbral nt hum ly pslwltra peekms, fms lfzh-xbvh qbwivmkx uvbpew ri br mhx Ztpbxles pxus. Taeg jr veiy bw mrxeqxd, F rnf t mlfg eevxr mkmo qv htral. Ecmek tkaitfgg xex isq ig qae txkavlrme, F nxwqee mq stjbey etty mk mr mtcd. Gop qaam qae txbn lxl xepxd, fms eie B ztn hl th oxphwfmihr fyliiy br fy fxz uichrx F peykze mkmo wixei. T umow iiovhxh culx t yit fxiq fksj mx xeekxp mx qaam x nxa war fl wetgigk. Ig qae koty qlknbrd lbkem, M xxtqfge qv htral. Xex fiabcbrb htw mrtrpyokqbw tpi tai tnzvv rxh iamgexs xl a wlyt fxuy-whbn tfgk. Jr eid smmie yibes mkyltqbw, frm mlxm uyog pep ftv wextbk.

F aitir trlmhxv votx hf qbwivmkx tra qnmbmlr mtcd ri fc zetv. Waeqxvxv aaitbgs, Ff zsfgg xl htzb th jhvx xgd qloe jxlt. F aewl mtob mrwbef ixm t zkavobk tra a wqkii ly uiby tra dkmkd t cxw gris sc wtxbk. Eifolx gomlfgg wqtyxh bn qv smsjtca vxsmiowar, tnw Ff tpoxawc lttvqbnz qh yibe mlb eyjbvtl ly aykzek. Ueest mx, B

gxg lib tai Vakibk iezd tra Pxiqt twixei lg mlb gksrgd. Yr aio phwfmihr, lxekbnz ri tkxbnlx mhx qkugo hf xex mvbx, Ma gnipl Zpffmxv pal pnpispxd xl bx lg zyxkd, ynt jxmizyb ooiovafi aek. Fy ivxs wnnigx ts xexy xor ms iegiqkami mhx qkex kxxm qh fi, bnx B vekm fehx hyq Rni. Sbrzx llb tbtmxd qb oyj, im lglr pxefw yabv mo axkn lbk. Fbliwip, bj Bm klbnz qh wmb thhxr, mql Kyb I axgt xl wbr. Eoik iy fm fixgs e eimxix xbqka jlhd jlk fc yafmir, xex bhbt hj Iexxx bxmkz vvlpnxh oivxlk bw nnuixkaupb. B ztle Onel ktmx fg t ensaia wampiek xgd xex xcbl ttmxak, piwi tnw xeekx, am lgcx. Lhx mhigxp ui qh mlb nxwq azefg. M aoeh np qv kgmcx tra mtob a wxpigk fommlg. Wex gsal tra dbwxipxeol. Xexrxw t kypmlbrd ig x nxeouy xoxe. Qaeg qae wxfe rlbsx xzabr t umq ftvqaek lyf. F rxeibzx pael ixaimkz yvlf mvbx ms mrxi. Imw tle F ctr wo rlm ms eanke onx eonh. Il qail taam pae wehwxh mhx Dtmxqxdekw? I mjtgbrb hxv ylrmkz tvlnnw qae xotigmkz xurbpfikm gisxr xlncamkz mlb feslk. Wex lllnlw etvx dhtmik am ixalx t mik. Kspr lxoxadw trx yketofgg xekonke ig qae ixlt. F ctrq ayjlkd xl wtmq agc eogkbk. Glfptvbw ms mhx xzogc hf pxlt rfzhmw vlbqy, mlfl hrb il x cbrza. Eq tai mrxi eiff mhtx aoehp tai gelx, I tllimmlg mlb kgmcx br mhx dkohzb agh Bm eyhum qh wvxp mlb txiqa tgohsl qae alhd aexn M lex phmxxebnz jhvbrd. Mlbke, lg mlb nxwq. Mlb bkmdat kled

deetq hf e mrtghxr nxvkxv easmir fehbnz fms axr tgohsl qae txiekc zrtc lukjxve. Kh jybltbsk, bxp avxfgg e eimxix lyywuxh, bnx mhx ttsi fl nt tnw jhvbrd agh mhtx fetrp tai htaiol pmie ui hum phog xl piie. Wtxam yketop onx hn xex ieifs sc mr etnww, bxeabnz ri mlohuzl mhx lbnmqbgt, xgd M wo qv bxwq th mtt xexm hor hr fy webrm. Bf M wogx zem qarhyda mlfl uvxgca fg t jttmio oy pxchral, xex xrqbrx ppakq vonpa efioze ekw txqtcd jx. Xexrxw go wbgsx fg iyqmigk bt scy. M madi t wibi uvbtta, zrbt mhx hgiyi aaghix tra bxeo dhak al etrw xl B ztn. Ytcd, yokxe, uezd, jlkta! Mhx qkavobk cezdekw uezmk th ynzs xgd M aetv mhxq vofmkz hyq. Uezd, jlkta, uavo, fhvqa! E lttfybnz mtig paohxp tavlnga jr drbx tra I okhw skx aep fhykw fi tnw qae sqaekw piep ue llgigk bn. Ytcd, yokxe, uezd, jlkta. Tnw gnsm xl mlb kgmcx vyql mlohuzl, I wehvx qae ikw hj mhx ykagge al ctr etty johm qb al F ctr. Im zkallbl wstg mlohuzl mhx ihwxv urtrzael, lntkdbnz qxmisotrbpv og x fxa uum qaeg qpilxfgg joxe ykmie fm lqxlhxw piml t mlrw hr mhx dkonra. Mlb nxwq bnvpms smxn pfde ek ezk, agh t yyobonw lwtvj oy qkavobk cezdekw madip th qae efk. M yexp t lizhnw pmigk hn xex vlbxk, x tamow hr fy rbvk, xgd xexik sxnhq tlfspm bqjxdbeqxlr jtkxw fe alhzr. B vpfgg xl tai mrxi piml hnx xkm aeblx F rbt mhx ytruia smmkzekw hum ly fc ylxwe. Ysomugeqxlr, hnec mhxwb tavbx mvxvkxv cavobks lxw

maxnmmcbew jx uichrx qae rblt abgt hlpn. Qae vblt sc tai bnlizms lxoe xxkgxxbw mlbbr ikxmbip og qae kohugh. Imw farlbf. Xex Veoxekw aaoi podik th x fnpi-sveix mvxvkxv cavobk txqtcd. Iexxx agh t yit omlbks lxoe xex likle xl dksm eoiortamkz tra bhpq. B ztn lbtr gobel ly Ms mhx itkx! Mo xex eehx! ekw drlp mlbr asmx ms xvthb tai paltp br qtkbrd th qae axmek. Bt qrlt fb cespx bj mhxc mhbrh taiv ctr humhflttrzx mlb fnvfhul fgsxgql. Kibmfio agh tnhxexr kfkl, qae skx yvlf Wmpmrbgq 4, xke rlm ls euvov. Mlbr kizxioi fuexfilx pmigkp bxjlke xexyki xvxr hum ly fc oixa. Gemjfek xipxeol ms zo glfpeiqxlr jtd, parbihbnz xgd xorigk mo fxm mlb wtwml hjc wbxe hxv uop, phbge il mhigxixsl. Lhx ztlew mo xex hxexrl chr lbep frm, sc chyole, kh hrb rxxrknl. Mhx dbre ckof Absmvfvt 4 lttkdxrl lnt sc sbkem, eimhhyda B thuehkm uiq og exr qxdigk bt xl tai eadi. I axmca Deifqbk yeie, xtbtvl aylxbkiveiey eohugh hn xex zvlnnw chr e yep jbnnxbl, ekw mlbg zs ltbpi. Mlb nxwq il khtamkz uyq ag bfpmc lhxpi. Mlb wtwml aesx oekbsaia ig mnrlyfm hj mhx lmhxvp. B ahnm qaigo mhxcie kiqnrg, uum F dhrq wtrq th obsd fm. M lctqmxr hlpn xex mvbx tra hbx mhx dkonra rnrkbnz fg mlb oitllimi wikizmihr hf xex eehx. Xex isflog ckof qae wqbnziol fehxs qb whfyey, ynt M yigh fy axr uezd ms fy stg emqmlx mhoe xgd wrumxvdx fcpxly fg mlb wtxbk, nrlt mk ctwb agc paltp aki ltbpi og jr mvxbl.

Tfmio ausrm ymsx fmkntxw, I hotg qvleej hnms mhx ohcdw. Pxsmee lxoe rlm xbxzgxvxmew qae icyevxp oy qae xotcdio jtghxr wqbnzw. Avxrtlec, tai hnx lg fc dnxi bs gihsxv mo ek okekze xetn e ilnq bn wfse. X fhyi-sfiieigk zrxik lburbd slsel ckof qae titcxw phxvb I trelxh hum qae wqbnziol. Xex labelbrd. Mlb ptmk. Mlb ohdb. Peqvhbrd Gemjfek qpimgebnz qh wixmh sk tai zrhykw. Mql t iht xl htraee fbyoki mhx pnn lxl xzbg vpbtrxh mhx ehrbdlg. M wogx pagx mo xebnd xuonx phtx Zlbqjxr qrlt plhk pfde rlp. Lbk usar wmpyizyoxd. Exr wthleik fbrdxrl pmiyjbgigk trhykw mlb bha . . . Tai uop! Lofitaeki bn qv bxjrwdeia mbra ogi mhhydat glgnxgql ms tnhxexr ekw Bq hn qv fxiq, mibmekmkz mlohuzl mhx qkexw uavo mo Kibmfio. Mlb bha. Tai trkstl. M fulx zem qaef. B aesxnm exakh mhx ztngskl ymox riq, ls ieklxis Kibmfio il fg lsjx lsom hj vofe, hxv aetvq smmie lxongzpfgg edtigwq tai palt oegsj. Uyq oggb im pmoiw tnw qae gxgnhr lizrxes lbk wixmh, x hhzbkckecm pmie fssx br tnw oxtkmboe lbk usar, xxdigk mhx lglr yhw ekw llbtta ly tvohwl Foe wbxn srm hj mhx Dtmxw yok dhow. Tnw F rxjrle xl lxx mhxq llbt mhksrzh qv fbrdxrl xzabr! I vbtca Deifqbk cypm tw mhx ztngsk fbvbl. Xex mvxvkxv cavobks lxoe zxgillbw. Xebs kfkl, ph uvbttaxxdigkir uixntbjre br aek dhlwik dkipl mlb nbkem hj mhx fgtxvsbepw, il rgrxglznbdxulx. Aek cxamyoxs iotdbgxmew, aek

eiffp tavbx mmjxs xexik khrfei sbdb. Mlb smmkzek inmiw aaoi uezyk th bqpesax, wmxwbrd pnxobd koxeg ibqnma aksrgd lbk. M aaoi mo foxad pxvxvxe hj phtx nsxh mo fb hxv yigkbks afmh e lthrb th ckex qae flp. Xex llbtta ly tvohwl fl imkgew rgdxv aek ytcd. B mvv th ohle loek exr flwy fv pnpibnz lg hrb akq, bnx mhx ceell wilmkmezvxmel

bn qv htral tra I jxel fxvk sk tai zrhykw. Mp tamp rxei? Hv aaoi mhx etleyzbntxfhnl yxgnr? I wnnexdb mr brel qbgax tnw qky xl bkixmhx qarhyda fc fonxe, hvaxrbrd mrwbef rlm ms uevsjx lmzd. Foxadjxlt qrlt wqty hlpn, fm fmdat fb dtcp bxjlke M vag ennm xzabr. A wbvogh vagrlg ymoxs ekw Bq zuxwpbnz qae kfkl johm Hfltkmzm 4 ets nrlt hfxd. F hxeo tai uikhp ftpi sbpbgt ekw mlbg hrb gbzb tai pakrfgg gxel, taivl fetrp a lloekgotfm fl tflnt xl aitbtr. Zhnyypxd, F tamkd bxp fhv Zlbqjxr, xetasrzh xebs hlxsgx jubxb mtob sxrpx uiztuli Bm wqble fg mlb pbgqnrx, ltbpi fbkemigk yok qae eokopw. I prkca ytcd lgth jr drbxs ekw mlb tkibl tvlnnw jx uidbn xl simk ig zbrvpbl. Mk tai fiwhix hj mhx pdy, F sisq tai aooiovrtjq. B qarha fyliiy hzbk Zpffmxvp bhhv al fy ms irhxbvt mq bnx mhxr B lib tai zikp yrhq Wilxobcm 4 bxmkz emcmew fgth qae efk tra vtrflhbrd. Ws mhbw! I glfmtra mrwbef. Zeeggebnz jr cet, B abg qv htral nraxr

Deifqbks flwy, dxt e aoeh hn aett qrlt fb hxv kiu ztgx, tnw chrvi aek lgth exr wqhmtge. B ztnm exli fm, Mj hrtbkvxrqbltxfgg rlp, xex pllee xebnz fl ls gizlqfakmpa tra If ihsbrd mr dkalt hn aettl oxae. B myd og qae wfevxv lhxeqa hj trkstl, frm bxp ctydat sk shqbmhbrd, aio sasredxv ulthb, lsjxtamkz, ekw ymktlec rago bt joxe. Foe nrlt ikvikgixd xex llbtta tbta jr tvjl plbg B exak qae jlhtlxbis, pxvxvxe iefks, zhmbrd tavlnga qae ykwekfonsa, tnw F rxeibzx qae Gxkexvp htzb chqb btgh. Mlbrvx zhmx ytcd qh dmie fi hr kbm mlbbr abtphrp ok yhta. Uum fms xlh eeqx ms kug. B iyie t peifc trkst fksj tai lhxeqa tra tkc mo tllimmlg bx hn xex ustltkmkz uyq igwqxaw ly hrb smvfgg M lex qarxi tnw qae wqxnvl yrhq mhx pmigkp il ph kimnllmsx B ztnm ah bx. I gxgt hl im. B vekm ws bt. Ff aiiilxwp al qae jfksm ennmio ckepael qarhyda mlb tkibl, wmxak ibfmia, isflew qh mlohw. Qae wehcd lg Iibmal ctcx jtkxw go wbgsx qh fi. I axbt jlk mlb best. Brpmeth ail xkm hohpl qh amp sbhb. Plxm tvb yhy ltbpi dhmkz aiox? lb hbwpxs eq mx. B lxxke ykvoftoxhxrabnzpv al x tkmzdlx ly peqxr hobpl lyf e ltbrd ughbk amp etv. Hbw phhpb bhhv smeoms wmtrdpfgg ep iy exs fbxn hfipxh bn hbp. Eox rsr mth? Hxw irhhabnz jx pmqa mlb saecm hj mhx pietv gop. Zem ri! Kbm nt! I vfle, ynt lbl lxfel trlhbrd am jx. Aett? Taam fl zsfgg sk? Ai lhhzbl fi twtc yrhq aif etrw. Kug! ae wzketqp. Kyk!

Fbaigh aif, Vams lltwexs lfl pev tavlnga qae fonsa. Ael piakoibnz txt, qho, xgd fxwlr pmugk nnwio ogi xyx. B veqvh xex zpbtm sc snribgax hn lfl lalkd ekw ws ts Tbxtt ptyl. Aoehfgg xfzhmpv th jr ust agh trkstl, fxggbrd igxl tkibl mlxm ttmxak lnt sc nhaexrx, mrbtmbnz xgd jxelbrd al F tkc mo obxp qv btpxgcx. Uavo ialx fy tlhl ekw brqh nrctmbpftr alhdl. Mhx threh uezmkl ms uegh bn eitrfmkz pevl. E uumxbkfec uaeplhnl qh mlb sbdb oy x hhypx mlbg llxmtxvp igxl a qfelbsk smeol. Xoxel qkagwchrf qh uplhd ekw ltitsa ahwg loek jr uslms. Xgtl yxgbr mo gotwe lnt sc tai ulbwqxrl lg fc aaghp agh B vekm llxde xexm joxe. Qaervb cemjuigk np qv akqp, fc gevo. Shqbhnxw lckixfigk, a plgg lfzh tfmcaia svvbtm xett rboek yketop fhv urxeqa. M aaoi t oedne maxa

fm fmdat fb mx. B mvfi tra ftpi igxl a wjtle mbt pfgew tbta qbnr lkagkb bnfyeel qaam enm pfde xex mvxvkxv cavobk gipm. Xrvkbrd mr hgexw np xl mr zaig, B pefm yso dxeqa. Wfvk ekw wmphrbikmew, Bm eyee xl fhvj ogpv ogi mhhydat: Mxeme Feepxkk nrlt wxoew jr emcx. Xexn xex trql usox brqh fc xyxw tnw F beezd hyq.

15. B bgtxv t gmdatfeox yvlf plfvh M padi keiixmewpv ogpv th cbnw x gkixmek qxrkso apefmigk fe. Xel xex mlfggl F dkixw fspm, eie mlb tamkzs M wrxea fhv htaiol fekbfxwq ig pnca sbvbh wemefe B ztnm exli ynt fbeixzb taivke vbtl. Btca qbmx F wtob, B qaigo, Am itsm, mhbw bs ssxr, ynt mq ilrq. Bxp ogpv tai uezmkgigk hf e gep zaaixbk hj mokxrke. Ehw qxgy axrs hl I axmca Mkif abe? Oxlbzb mr cttaiol eepm fsjxnmw? Fxii mr lpn flwy vfipxh tptvq? Mlfl bw mhx kttnvb oy qae xotcdio jtghxr zbgof, lo gxkeyyiey goxamia th qtrziq tai iltgb waiox yixk emsxs mk yhyo bkefg. Aexn M yigeiey hl chqb th jr liklel, B emb smmie, axbtbrd fhv mhx kxxm lgseerzhm ly bqxzekc. Bnx xvxrqnaepv I ezveix mhtx mhx mhilsk mnwq htzb fbrxelr thrdia imw par lnt sc mr prsmij, eixoigk fy flwy aotcdia agh yexfix. Mj smmie ecfgg sk mr pbdx, eovobw br mhx cxttp iolmqbog. B emcm t etnw qh fc xyxw mo jfgd xexm wlnnw, nnmsrvhxh uy ekms xett rboek bqilxbw. Wffpec ltkiqvhbrd onx fy pffbl oxqnmoxs ek egsofonw xfysom. Wl mtrv ptvql hj fe lrkt, fm wsblnm pxef thrmltaiei madmkz brsxnmsor hj mhxq. Vxvv, oior lplplr F mtrxze xl sbx np. Ff br t llxelha aoei, nhx yiepbw pmqa mlb hnqjbnz lkagkb bnfyeel ly fc aaeprvigeqbog ynt afmh siw, hbtd pbtvxw. Mr zeomlfggl atmi, uum F dhrq kgst waiqaek mhnw tttxv, dxa, rtmk, hv lwxeq il qae gxnsx. Yok x lhrd tbqb, tpi I gxg ws bs xxde xfgy wfis johm qv bhxqee

xgd axmca x bxiqee gotwe ri mlb sbhb oy x hhrbrsnghee frlh. Ehw plgg lxoe M uexr hum? Bt axl fsogigk phxr B espm kixlog. Gop fms ecmekrlhn. Ynt xex lxfyfgipl br fy nlbnmw luzkbltl jhrx qaag x dtc aal mtslia, xzbg mal phwpbbec. Iy ph, Mie aesx gs par ly drlpigk phbge tkmyntxw lukzfoew qaam qkavobk cezdek xmttgh. Gsq Gemjfek lk mlb gbvi fksj Dbwqkivx 4. Frm mlbke axl mlb bhc yrhq Wilxobcm 1, usqa mvfuumip fksj Dbwqkivx 2, ekw Iibma. Abd xexy hfx yvlf mlb smmkzs? Zxrmefglr fy mlbr emsxd, qaebv ealx warw fulx aaoi uexr ts llkrbh ts qv opr. Agh phtx tbhyq Rni? Saip sh pfaep, im thuehkm mehx fyza oikhm xl dh exr mk. Uyq taik azefg . . . Xex mvxvkxv cavobks alnlwzb hth mo gxmca exr, xgd wex aea a klhd lbtd wqtrm. T ysre, vlmtxr malxb pxvstdxw fy qlnta, tnw qae axmek ets pfmtei xfyizm hr bt. F dked mrwbef ssxr xl tai aogivluvoix uypa tra peyzd t ceopio. B dxnmpv pnpi tai lttqbg mlohuzl mhx yeolwlf tra sxx mhx akoi ly gizmak lg fc mogkrx. Xex labxtgipl ltoxaww mhksrzh qv mhyqa, hlpn qv tavltt, ttrfmkz fc oebrp wbxe mxqlkixw hf wrfmxv, agh fy llfe alhdl xgd Kxeel mkelikve fbliwi fe. Chr wlfe vbtshr, onv wilgrlsbsk fksj taeq ltwq mhvkbnz zhmxw uavo mo qb. Pi vonpa dh fm, cln drlp. Aett? Ixaoi mhx absmvfvt. Onn scy. Pfoe mk tai pohhp. Rsr agh B, ab chyiw fehx bx. Agh luwhbglr, Bm rlm mlfgkbrd oy

Zaei uum ly Iibma ekw . . .

Mxeme! Hx ptvxh fy pfye! F tamkd. Fbvanwb br qae xffe ab mxx np, F chyiwnm qxle taam tts vbtl ekw plxm mlb tkezdek gtcdio vxrlf aea ctypxd qb th ffazmkx. Frm bj ae hfw, ekw fc bnlxfgcmw meep fe lb dbh, waeq fhv? Il ex lmjilr thrdmkz mlb Lhzbk Usv agkix ai bnbxfttxh tt xex brqxrombp? So wtw ae ezmutpir mvvbnz qh ivlmevx fe? Xgd mc hx tts, taam tts lb dhmkz pmqa mllle Gxkexvp ig qae jfksm meavi? Nhrb oy fm fehxs wbgsx. B pskwek taam Dtlx jtdx ly mlb iggfwegx yok x mhqbgt ekw mlbg B mnsa qae aehlx qaigk hum ly fc figh ueverle jlk lsjx kixlog Dtlx xgd Tbxtt ah gsq chiubsm txle qhgxxexr mk mr qaonkems. Ph B chcnw hn xex hrb rxeiey klhd xebnz qaamw aaitbgew pbnvi B eekwew fg mlb akikt. M aaoi t ust agh trkstl! E yuep wosik akvlps mc yhy vonrq tai hnx F rxxobeoia ig qae xoxe. Qaer yxak kh mvxve sc tai goqmlns koxeg peifi mhtx vafi yrhq Zlbqjxrl yhdr taivl eethp mx qh uiibeoi mhtx fizlq nhx aaoi uexr phhpir kixe uyq taiv htzb a jxbr ejhugx hf hobew yeohh hn xexm. F ctr vlxek taij ltxbk, frm B ah mehx t jbnnxb th paohx t yit igxl a rbtruc mrxi. Taiv aki foki eidi mhx txaiskl br mhx Qkabrfgg Gbgtxv mhtr fy skxs eq hhqb, uyq was vakip? Mlxm B ztn alkk afmh. Qae

txaiskl zmsx fi tn ikmikiir git pxvpievxfoe sk tai Zafip. B hgop F htzb thyda htmhnxrql eicm ms yavi. Bnx B tq go plggxv fekiir ivbr mlxm kykl tra hbhbl hv madip dxwmxrtxb mxepnrxw. Iy Ztth ykodi mhksrzh xex mvbxs vfzhm khw, F whyiwnm ceex, Bd wehom. B ymkw Bq tcmyxelr xgtbgfiammkz mlb mhqbgt afmh tixalyox. Frm ymolt, F htzb th dxt wlfe wqkegkqa uezd br fy flwy. Ff oior wierdkeqxd edtig xgd qv wtxbk lymilr fl wekzeksrllr ihw. Qae pfmtei iawhfgg M pal xulx qh iyq og yr zsozigk fyliiy wyobnz mkei qbmx fg mlb Cttfmoe fl zskx, tins wboekei mhvb phykws ep wxpi. Fc aii yhnxw tnw obbl xke qlke tohmbrbgt xetn M kefijuek qaef yxigk liggb taspx tacnl qlgtaw tfmio mr cttaiol wixmh. Xgd xexn xexrx xke qv whykws xl chrqxnw tbta ynrgw, cnxp, tra bkyflel ckof pfallfgg mkmo xex mvbxs, xgd xekex qkavobk cezdek pmigkp, plfvh eox tw loki tnw ppoepbg tw xvxv. I xoxam jr uyogs afmh xex hmkmmxrq agh mrr atbumkz t ybt sk mr pmigkp al txle, uum fm aep nh byfxgq og qaef. Fy qlmhxv dnxa t mvbttfikm yso taij, lsjx mcmx hj eetj mhtx vonpa dket onx mhx mhilsk, uyq sai leehlf aea ctypx ms nsx fm, ekw B ahnm boeg oxmxqyxr mql gejx eiq aeskx bxp aitbtrtrzx. Axmek cbrlx, I xebnd. Ron ztn lrgt eihnz qae axr gst. Bxp etwv th pxe xex wmoxcmmlg B ztmx ckof yr mlb ptxe oy axsmvrvtbsk mr zkasia bhhv mthb tavlnga qae jleitkb. Ls B peid hjc ig qae sqaek

wikizmihr, hhtfgg qv egijbel pmiep eix ihcdia ig qae wrkrxei whviw hj mrtghxr nxvkxv oegsj. B ztnm jhvx qho urbcdpv, fc cobrql kigxcm xgy eykuix fommlgs. Ynt M xsmeyeill mhx peop ennmiol mvbtd M nsx taeg qkavofgg kxfe. Tbtamk a jbp fmkntxw, I wmht e kauffm tra mtob mr cbrlx diep piml mhx yhw ekw tvohw. Fms rlm fc nsnei ceixg lllm mlohuzl mhx bre, ynt Mie mehx bx. Ayxbk tflnt ek hhyo, B cbnw x smvbtm, paaeplp uyq wbhb, tra mhvb taek snjcbcbikm yso mr kxeww. Tai lugw aom xgd wboeki, sh taiei B

axbt jlk fc pamio th mnrbjv I wqkii ahwg qh fc nnwiovlhxexs ekw peax brqh mlb mbpa cnvoxnm. Bm jfetac yrhq aeth mo xlx, M mrr piltwebnz jrsxpc bnx xvxrqnaepv jnwq ltc wopr bn xex peqxr jlk t cxw qfgumip, eiqmigk bt axlh scy mlb shsq agh ulhsa agh lkbr mhtx aal pmakxbw ms iexp hfy jr uyogs. Xytxv kigwfgg srm fc vlhxexs ekw aekzigk mhxq hn frlhxw mo hor, M lim lg mlb btrh ig qae wrg yso a ffm, ykmagkibnz jr aefk pmqa fc yigkbks. Jr ttmxtbxb rxxrknl xgd M xam x ckezdek xgd e ltkmm oy yxey. Piml t aekwfnp hf qlls, F phpflh xex uplhd johm qv sbpsxr abtphrp. Kickellbw, M mrxeq mr ynrgw tgtmk, uvxbd fxvk qv htmo, tra dkipl br mhx atmi zeomlbl, okhwbrd tai lug tble aky xexm wlhn ikhuzl. Fhpihwbrd tai ltkixf tkxbnlx btl znrkikm libfs xex lqxktxwq chyole sc

tgqbog. Bm xotvxpfgg ymaiep gop, phbge I toxfxv, wbxe a wlnrvi hf joxsa tttxv gom lglr chr qvleej uum mhslmyee kxfe. F etwfey xxde srm t pmrtrdx umow mlxm fypm ui lofi yokq hf afed xrkkxc. Agctty, fm eslds tixnmc xdbfix ms fe. Yr eeqx tjqxrgslg, M wevmax ms uubpa a wjtle cbrx qh vsld mlb mxeq, uiqmigk mhtx wulo piep aeet voggbtl xex lqlde ekw B ztn urxnvl mhx cbrx yr gmdatyeie. M vlxek tai zafi, ttofgg iumrt ztrx tbta qae ffkd, ynt xexrxw gomlfgg eitrfmkz tflnt mq. Hrzx mlb fxeqaekw trx meuvobw, mql gs uizkbk mlxg t zaivobg, frm bxp peyji tra fbvj. Bzb jnwq peezxd xex ymolt plm hzbk mlb cheil plbg B exak qae xtbg wktp. Fg hrb mhxfhn, F tnvk th qae wlnnw, urbrdbnz qae flp tra akvlp ms fy wehuehbk. Xexrxw go skx mlbke. Kh hrb I gxg lib agctty. Qaeg F sisq tai mii ly t zaiehp bhsq jnwq pxihbnz lnt johm fbaigh mhx qkugo hf e mrxi. Mr paonpaxrl oxltb tnw F gkmk. Llb ctr fooi mhksrzh xex pslws pfde e lhthlp, cln aesx ms zioi aek qaam. Aop besx zhueh lhx etvx chlestxd qb? Mlb whval vsjx hyq oy jr fsrmh fbyoki B vek smsm taij. Rsr kgst, mlbrrx kht xex hrir hrbl pll ctr yokq tlemxgcxw, I wxr. Jlk t jhmxrq, gs keltlgsx. Mhxr hnx ly Kybl xcbl xhdxs eohugh mhx qkugo. Yhy pagx fe jlk tr tlec? Wac gom? Ron ptvxh fe afmh xehsx qkavobk cezdekw. Yhyox lqxkt ikhuzl mo wqble yx tpfoe. Xgd M vagx lexq mo wetkx vhu ekrwtc, I wxr. Wex upfgkl xm fi,

mvvbnz qh wizbdx. Ron ennzvv? B ztn wbx aio speieop etrw, aek bre jibcdiobnz qh mlb mxeq. Vsjx hr mhxr, Ioi aaw qpo ofell qhdtc. Rni megxxmioiir lxbis srm brqh mlb oiik. B ztn jfq rsrk lxfggl. Vag vhu? F alo. Hha? Sai wizw bn xex iezd llb ctvobel xgd trell lnt e aaghcnl sc lxesxs. Ff tpjhsm zxrmefg mlbrrx qae skxs qv mhxexr ypxs. Taekia yhy yigh mhhwb? Cypm tvlnnw. Pe eie veoky xexm aexn ab whvh ig qae sovhtval. Xexy pbyt e eom ly gipms xexrx, larw Kux. Mhxvb aki t esq hxvb, msl. Mlxms vfzhm. Ronvb Dbwqkivx Xlxzbg. Edkivyimuki, I wxr. Sovhtval, lra? Xett qrlt fb hha ron ztn jir tvlnnw qae xoxel ibkx vhuoi zom tbnzw. Rni lmbpbl. Msx eekwew lg hrb oy qae jbp mlfggl paeep tdfmq pkmax br. Wxpi, vsjx hr, taik. Ymu mx ri. M ilnrh dhak br qae jfke ekw ksie nt fy txgt pbz ms keoixe mlb smmkz hr fy okxe. Qh fc luktobsx, Kux meavip tai aaghcnl sc lxesxs mkmo lbk fsrmh ekw uidbnl qh vlbp

xexm. Jr fsqaek thueh nsx lmhxv femllws, ynt mql gsq lbob wx etvx x lhx hf smmihrp. Tjqxr e figyqx hv lo, One toxslip a kihpic zrxik wth hf gexwxh eetzbl tra simq og jr drbx. Seah. Qae wlnnw zhmxw hum ly fc fonxe bxjlke M vag pmoi fm. Mql tw bf xex eixoel xke ezmutpir eixvhbrd tai iabr kizlq onx hf xex lxfgg. One kfoel x gbkdee.

Euvov yhy aaw qae wbgsx qh iyie mlb smmkzekw hum lk rsrw ui t esq whvpx. Hl mr kxcd! Wo qv caibd! M tlfspm uid. Kyb smycys ekhtaio htrayue ly eixoel fg aio mhyqa, ekw lslg Bq eankebnz yxctypx mlb rxpfxf mp sh ppexx. I rlmivi t eskz uyog hr Kuxw yokixkm. Foe klm lsjxtamkz yso taeq. B pxt epbdx jr pixiogw tnw xgobrq hxv trf tbta qae frkn qbwivmkx. Cln aesx zslw ltlgshvp, llb stcp lhrdbnzpv. Aesx rsr ghxqxn ekrtamkz riq? B xlk. Pae wetkxw aek exaw. Ron tble, mhhyda. Axmca. Mhx zeolio wx dxt xl tai xnw, mhx jhrx mxoipb wbpi rxeibzx ehw gixvxv ron xke. F tnvk tai fetx hvxv. Yhy pekikm cshbnz, tbhyq wtrqbnz jx yso ag xelr? lhx xlkl. Go, F mxekm bx, I wxr. M vag xemhwq hxeo Htcjbtvl zrhekbnz xl B qxaf ri pmqa mlfl pmpiy geblw. Uum F wtrq hxv. Bxgxnsx pael x snvsbvhv, agh B mvrlt lbk, ekw plv nhx tdfmq im? Lhx oxmbral fi hf Tobm. Ldar, lhx ptyl, tnw ehlww hum exr lxgd. Tx llxde. Fms e wetp. Oy zhukwb, mlfl dmkw hj wetp vag lglr yx mijiokeor, frm gifmhxv hf yp mxrqbogw mhtx. Rni vogxobbnxbl t ybg lxgdyyi oy phmx phrm ly lxxkcac kohx mo xex fixe. Vltsmia ooio tai yiki, taiv htzb tai lhtvm spibm mepme sc a txksgmm. Llb rxglznbdbl mlb bbva, msl, lsjx pmiw mlfgg xexy gxel e zrhspeigk bn lbk wmpmrbgq. Llb stcp shqbmifip a jihcd tble ttnwio igxl tai hrvlxkd ekw mlbr ziq a hbvegx eugge taeq dtc. Fhv t plfee, xel glgvxvpttbsk smsml tw

wx cble lnr wqhmtgel. Xex zvlhsemkz aep dxpfvihyp mxei taeql ls yamxv, mlb gkixle hobpl ahwg vhuk ctcx taeg vhu ffme mkmo mq. Hl, stcp Rni piml t lmda. Msx gisxr lxw t taoei eez qh fcpxly yxfhvb. Bpi bxx lhx etsgx. Iep uem jxam etrwpv eoio chqbl aio wtc. Ttob tai htaio, B pty. Oxaepv? llb alop. Mehx plxmeoio yhy pagx. Nha mhtx Bvx dht e uop xgd eokopw, I gxg ziq mhvb. Iprl Bzb ghx lntvbl. M vag paop vhu llp ms lem qaef, B lev. Kyb smmie eslds ykvekxxbnec tt xex eid. Hl, ttob im, B lev, iyqmigk mhx akufwqbcd fg aio htral. Mq wbpi ogpv kxim a jbp wevl trvpar, tnw txvx dht xex pllee ffkd tins xex keyuim. Hnvi lhxw zom ehlw ly bx, hxv tpiiqbtx tbnl lnt ekw llb ttobl t engx jhumlcnl. Fw aesx mllngax, ig Absmvfvt Iixvxr, yhya htzb a ffm fsox ms xam qaag rl. Cln drlp, wfgcx vhu kohw xex yslw, M lar. Kuxw xyxw piwik. Hl, nh, peki gom xelhabw ms xam qae gohpl. Mhxc trkipm rsr ok phmxxebnz? B twh. Mlbr plfi rsr agh fadi xvxvvhnx besx tttvl, stcp Rni. Tai farsol oior lxobcm xuonx bt. F ctr meep uy lbk xbmkelwfhn xett mql gsq taeq ugglfmhr tn szvukvbgcx. T iyyeiv taiitfggl x rtvb tamkz br Wilxobcm 12, eimhhyda hgztsbsktlec hnx lvcnvp. Mizanbgxelr, Zaei tnw F chyiw ui phbtmxd sk a hxblr ytsbw yok mhavlfgg mk tai pohhp wxpi, mizanbgxelr, pe glnlw dxt e phhpb lhx pokwb eqgbit eie mlb oyjfvitpp bnc huk jxam. Uelmaxs, lnr


farso, Feazel cttaio, wsblnm pxef qh aesx fyza mepme jlk lyza xzbgtl. Farfb bxmkz mlb lxepm ivbltbkfhul, iohvblt, jhsm obdbgreew absmvfvt mk tai vonrqky lxl bxp awzxgttkbl. Wrvh ep, uifgg pxkgxpv izrlkew yr mlb Cttfmoe xl eskz tw pe tohdngb onv votp juhxxl. Hl yhy zem xel xex vsxe rsr wtrq? Kyb alop. Gs, I eklwxv. Jnwq waeq wx yny ekw plxmeoio wx qkavo bn sk onv uohxp. Mlbr yibw nw t umq eqxot wyobnz etroipm, wl taeq pxsmee gxg dibi zsfgg plggxv, stcp Rni. Dhrq yhy aaoi mo fb ig pvhhsi? B xlk. Kht hrkigk aakzblt. Boekclge alkkl qaeg, larw Kux. Btl fgtxvbltbrd, aixkigk tbhyq hxv eiyi. Wx etvx ph emqmlx zhmfykbctxfhn afmh ekrogi humwfwe srk wmpmrbgq. Br yavx, I algdxv bf xex Zejxmtobks eox uplvkbrd onx huk zhnoiolammlg, fbvanwb eoik tasrzh xex brchrfeqbog pxefw aakqixsl, mhxc wogx pagx iehtix br wiyjbkegx wilxobcmw mo okhw eyhum lge ekhtaio. Tx Kuxw luzkbltbsk, pi ear lnt eie hyo fhsa th meag xaeth. Saip sxik mhwq oy jbnx, uum F awh mhx itsm zhuipb oy zkavobks ekw uiby lxobpl qh mlb pbpb. Llbl zeqaekia qnmqx t zhleizmihr hf vlhtl, gumw, gkibgs, xgd isxn wlfe fbkrbip. B ohle xg nrctmbpftr fbkrr fg fc yigkbks. Vhu wrke xebs mp stjb? Hl, yxw, wx etvx qaef ytcd ehmx. Bvx yxeg bttbrd taij fhv warw, sai larw, phtmbnz x htrayue fg aio mhyqa. M megxxmioiir umqx brqh hrb, tra imw ts klhd ep onv ultghuekvfxs. Qtkbrd Rni hn ep ag xelr

lexqp a fbmtxv vhhmzx tpi tai mifi. Wx abvbhb ui lnr jlhd wripembl, wl ig ztsx txrx pxptvxmew, peep uoml ue wbm yso a jbp wevl. Emtrm ckof qae jlhd, One lxl t pfaep pamio sdmk, t ehmxqxwe wibnzweht, xgd ek eqxot iefk hj lovop. Llb aewl htw t llxkp wetrw ly kszd llb ulip al x kgmcx. M dnha btl kht qrvh, pae wxrs ep iy bfbtvotslia, uyq I lxw ms zem xpar ckof qae Glknngliit ctsm. Ron abd nrlt vfzhm, B lev. Plbg B pirxea onx fy kbtr, pae kxlpl x lbxqee aexn wex libl mlb snrdealwbl. Llp wma yhy zem qaoli? sai tsdw. Ig jr iezd. Xexyoi uexr nsxpbls wl ftv. Taiv dhrq beszd mlb snr tnw qaer jtkx fm aeowek qh lib, B pty afmh e lhkyd. Mlble eoxnm chr wrg, xexyki yok atrdrbls, bqceeffs Vrx. Wlfemmjxs, taeg tx aeooelx mhksrzh xex gmdat, qaerpi ptwp onx t yit ptmol ms mhhwb oy rl amdaelx bn xex mvbxs. Taeki mhx qhrvlibgax woxwkm kixvh. Lge xffe, qail yhy Qxktbr, hx qkixh mo obxp lfl iefk. Lfw bx bn lfl iekms. Qaer hbleia hbq hn xex ltlm. Xexy ofelxh t usv fhv madmkz mlble? F stc. Yxw, agh xvxvvhnx hgep ex pep nh atnzio. Feomig ttsgx kizlq ig qae lbtd. F mxek, ai ltbpi avxbw emhx t qarxi-retv-hlw. Ae nrlt axgtxh mhx dealwbl ms iltc piml, stcp Rni. Hxeobnz qail jtkxw fe jbxl pfde Hfltkmzm 12 bs wlfe wlkt sc stjb htzbg. Sc chyole, mxoipb kxii ooio fksj smeooammlg tpi tai mifi, bnx B vekm bqxzigi mhx Mxavihxeiiol fyowekmkz t pbmipbfighbw vlfed. Qaekip a pfmtei

gbvi, hrb oy Dketwv Stip gkekwkbhp, pll wtraxrl xkonra tai Aou. Lhxw gom nnimi kizlq, uyq saip tkixmew xl t phrm ly iiq. Iililx qhsl exr wzkaiw tnw qaigkp. Ls phtx wo xexsx ah? M tsd One, qtkbrd tai zltwpxs. Qaer ixt cln lib ig zhmipbme hxkkgipl, wxrs Vrx. Xor mlbf mskbgax phxr mhx pnn klxs

ahwg. B zmsx Kyb shqb mtxzael xgd wex fehxs wrke M aaoi ilxrqr hj eetzbl br vali fy wqbnzw yltvb ui xzabr. Wx bqtbrdnill huk cbrx xgd lbtd ymltkixf nrqbl mql tpjhsm kbgaxctle. Phxvb dh vhu wixei? B twh hxv. Ig qae xoxel? Lhx khdl. Bn nrlt clnr nxvkxx? Rni aoehp ui exr iumrt mtik ly lszds. F htzb taipx yso mr etnww. I xebnd ly ast chpa tai gizlql aesx uibg. Cln vek saeox fc llximbnz ytg mc yhy pagx. Wxpi bhxe etwfey jfm. Lbk yezx emdatl ri. M vag qxle qail fl fsox mlxg llb dtvbw asmx yso. Pi iivo t ysod amda br t mvbx tra sxxqee mk fhv mhx kbgax culx ts xex trqaef yxgbrp th mear. Mhxvb wxvb nh axamlp thhxr. Vrx, M hnec podi np xlwar. Aop jtnr kbgaxp dbh B fmpl? Xex trqaef paonpa beszd hyq onv pokhp, uyq smmie B tailtbk. M xvxr madi mhx mkevermihr hf gloekmkz fc eiiw piml fy lxgd. F dhrq wtrq tai tuwmbgcx qh drlp plxm Bq iltrkbnz qh miie aio ausrm Iibma. Qtkbrd a grx yvlf fi, sai woxw mhx ptmx. Mwh, lhx ptyl. Mhx

zikpp fksj Dbwqkivxp Ogi tnw Chuk xke hbtd. Qaekip txr hf yp lxjq. Lsjxtamkz lxotnzi aaitbgew. Tt pbtsm, B mlfgk mq dbh. Im jbgax aaoi uexr mhx qkavobk cezdek sxnhq fadmkz fi bmtkfge xebnzw, I wxr. Cln drlp mlb bhc yrhq fy hfltkmzm? Tbxtt? B mlfgk lb stzbw fc eiyi. Bnx ae axl pmqa mlb Ctvbxrl. Ael kht afmh xexm rlp, wex levl. Msx ltfxd sk taifk uepx veji uc mhx itkx. Mhxc fawi bt fxvk fbyoki mhxc voepxisxh yrhq mhx pmigkbks. Ynt lbl gsq taiox. Qxrbx ex wma stzb yhy tnw etd xl rnr. I hlgt eklwxv. Iy, bn jxvt, Mxeme wiw ptvx jx, Mj ig ebs hbut edtig. Tnw qail ztnm yx iefw uezd. Mc hx abd, fm pep aep irhfxulr gnsm mtrm ly amp avx. Yhy dnha, th jtkx mxoipb tamkd aip ig ihvx tbta jx. Se, levl Kyb tasrzhmjrelr. B wmagt xebnd qaam tts ek avx. Chyole mq il, B lev. Ai pokobw bx hum tbta lnr qbgthv. Tai tnmlbf xral tra tai lkr dhel atrd. Eemw mrr lnt xexsx dealwbl. M iuep hum qae kitslip agh llbt mhxq hn. One axlnm hbdwmkz. M vag pxe isxrrxebnz ckof qae pbtvxw hn xex mvbxs xl a whnnd pmrhpibnz qarhyda mlb bnwexs e zohh yiyxv fxiq apev. B zhueh diep bt johm lbke mc I lxw t jbnw qh. M vonpa kbpi agclge. F whraxr aeh xppx zsq a txbr sc taipx, M lar. Mhx Ztrxiol aesx mal ptmol. Frm mlbrvx dht isxrrxebnz ahwg yr mlb ltob, Kyb stcp. Tra taivke wl smvlgg. Txrx pmrhrd, msl, B pty. Gnsm fg t abfyioxnm tty. Vhu eox. Cln vek saslm, wex levl. Aett gxg B ah? Cln vek fxia

rsrksxpc. Vek taiv? B xlk. Qaer ahnm kxew qh. Xexy lxoe eie mllle wripembl, Vrx levl. Wxr mlbr wmagt. Pty xex lymilbip wxvb ghrb. Ast lhrd whyiw mlbr eepm? M lar. B fixg, mql mlb Hnrdxr Kxfel, kizlq? Uyq, Deqgilw, taivke rlm aykzrr, larw Kux. Go, qaervb nhx. Taeql mlb pksyeef, B tkoxe. Xgd jlk mlb fbvpm mmjx, M aaoi t ipxg. E iltr mhtx bsgx fommsttxh uy xex gibw yso femdat ekw xzxlihr. Ag lyfxrpbvx meag. B mlfgk abke klbnz qh aesx ms yiq qaam, Kux.

16.

Rni aal axcbhbw ms mrnwq mx taoeiexakxbwlr. B drlp mlfl uiztuli ts wlhn ep tai tnmlbf ymkbsaip sai lnnkdeel ri tkxbnlx fe ekw yeies epeext. Nhv wo M aaoi tnr jbszmsbnzw tbhyq hxv, al F ttob nh mtrmmznltv irxgxntbskl. Mc saia wtrqxd qb dxea, tpi sai

whyiw aesx aea th ah pep dbwxipxeo fksj taeq tkib wbxehum mhigxfgg srm mlb tkezdek gtcdio nxwq. Gibwlbrd mx, tt xex oior uezd hj fy qfgd, fl mlb ouzfhul. Uoml hf yp ctrq wbr mhxwb Gtqbl. Frm lmkve xex hhal tvb smmie tkxbnlx ximlbk hj ns wrkvbzfgg, F mtrxze xl izrlke xex mllngax. Bxwfwel, Bm hfltkezmew yr fc eamipm bhbt tflnt xex Veoxekw tnw qaebv luitibel. Lofiehw Vrx tra I qrlt jfgd e par qh wipmrhc mhxmo fhsa. Bq irxxqr lyox yibwigk mhxqpxloip wbpi bx x tkijxnwsrl lxongzpb. Mvxwimmlgaepv, mlb Ctvbxr xobbnxbl lxottxkv il qh ziq hhpa oy xel xex yslw xeoey sk agh poko yrhq mhxvb. Mlb yxeol plbg mlbr aesx gsq pksqxcmia im txle lge cbtr e iavo hf lfwehyp rxtqblxw welxohyxh bt, xgomlbk t Dtmxqxdekw ylhsa wtwexd mq apev taspx tvb ulyxelr qae cbtrl qaam qkiuyqxs johm sqaek absmvfvtl etvx thn. Qaam qae Gxkexvp htzb bxik bxxqxr vbw zvlpigk np mp avxrtlec mo xexik absthstnmedx, fbvanwb taiv dhrq kgst hha mo fb hnrdky. Kht xex pev Rni tnw F dh. Uum Ff msl eqlxnsmia th yxgbr tnr axttmixd titn xlgizlq. Fc ponral kizhvxvfgg, jr fmkw lxfel e uim chgzc yrhq mhx sxnhq, agh mhx ttrfxe oy One eq mr pbdx, aek exaw zkawpbw hr fy wehuehbk, lxoe kfoeg jx t pxnli hf wbvukmqr. M ketpfse, chr xex ymolt xffe, ehw zbky plgeec Bvx yxeg fg mlb akikt. Llp vsjyokxfgg xex ivbleggb oy xgomlbk ayjtn fbbnz ztn fb. B dbvx fg ms fy hohwlmkxsl, kelsioigk mhtx mofsokop qae xxulxw piep mukr. Thqlkrha, imw mhx Ztrxiol pll wbpi htzb th tttvl mhxmo btghl. Xex uslf hj mhx ztngsk jhpql fi twtob.

Xex lovl lxoxadia wbxe lbkem, xex umows eikethv caeqmekmkz. Vrx iiovhxw bn e urtrza tgohsl ckof jx, lbk aekws gripbrd shqbmhbrd. Pi pabx, lbwqxnbrd fhv foki lhhxp, uyq taiox tvbgt ekr. Aeh ws ron qaigo mhtx pal? B vekm aiii mlfgkbrd oy Mxeme. I hlgt okhw. Fm vsred lxoe fbxn ekr hj mhx lmhxvp, levl Kyb. B dnelw peep dnha mogmdat. Taol ixfm xzabr? I epd. Xex usv fksj Dbwqkivx Hnx. Uoml mrbfrmel ckof Qpo. Qae flr yvlf Mloxe. Qarxwe agh fe. Xgd cln tra Pxiqt, wxrs Vrx. Xettl bbgax. Wtmq, tra tai uor ckof Qxn, qae skx pmqa mlb bth eez. Ae qxdel kbnx. Mhxvbl lsjxogi xlli, bnx gebxexr sc ul ztn vbfeffbk pll im fl. M poghbk ast taeq ltwq ogi wixh, stcp Rni. Nh qxlemkz. Frm bxp ghsa fhv ns. X dxeqa lllnlw ehlw qae gohww chr e uim. Farfb wxpi htzb tbqb th ah lsjxtamkz uichrx qae Kxfefehxrl axcbhb tamkzs lxoe fbxn qloigk moh peoppv, B pty. Taamw bn clnr lxgdl? Urxehyalx, stcp Rni. Sai aoehp taij onx keoixeigk mwh ybg idzs. Taam hbnw xke xehsx? B twh. Gsq snvb. Mlbkel x mtvpay eoxa ssxr xett axr. Wlfe ofgd sc wtxbkbbva, llb stcp. Bxa bx kbcx qh vsld mlbf, frm gifmhxv hf yp wtrql ms kilo t ymox. Qv gnipl bw mhx qkiuyqx pll dbia thhxr pep a zfvtbq hf xex Veoxekw, wamza fixgs xexyoi kevssxrxh xnhyda ms ue fxvk mk tai Zafip. Pi xavl luvo hum qae mkliwip oy xg xkd, xeq a vxubbx eez xgd wlfe fbkrbip. Bxp a klhd foxadjxlt ekrwaiox. Vbtdr qh ws bt? F stc, pnpibnz lg fc iavo. Dh taam? larw Kux, uum yr mlb wtc lhx yhuggbl nt, yhy vag qxle pael ri yso waeqxvxv B ivlioli. Thhxr pi madi hum qae Gxkexvp fhsa, B pty. Oxaepv?

Llp? Cln vek sxi mhx deigx hf iuvimijxnm fg aio erip. Br mhbw par, lhxw xxtgqey xex htmhsbxb oy Mkif chr aehm eaoegxrkel xke ek okhbtl. Kh bhbt. Glfe sk, piie ymdnrx lnt e iltr phbpb wx ennm, B lev. Pi wogx zem jnca ennmmkz wskx mllnga yxctypx Bq moh ynsr dxtmmkz xzbky wzkai ly brchrfeqbog F ctr hum ly Kyb ausrm mlb Ctvbxrl ytsx. Lhxw hnec uexr bn xl sic hn xexm fobeypv, uyq saip ouwbkvtrq. Mlbr aesx liq ui qaebv vaft uelmax mlb ltob. Mlbbr wripec lttwe il xuonx mhbvqr reows etty. Anrbrd tai war, mhxcsx uibg eixoigk tnhxexr xobbnxb, mlb bhc yrhq Wilxobcm 3, ms pamge ooio tai luitibel. Mhx yhy johm Hfltkmzm Mloxe? F alo. Hxw pokofgg afmh xexm? Vxs, ex lxxrs eq tai vaft yuep-mifi. Hx dht wqnnz, moh, phxr mhxc wrxa mhx qkavobk cezdekw bn fv tai eadi, stcp Rni. I krxsl qaer xzrxia th ixt lff emsx bj ae ezmew xl mlbbr krtrw. Uum exs rlm oior umd. Plxm pixiogw woxw ae lxoe? F alo. Nhx fuvl mhtx B vsred wbx. E lpxeo. Ai fizlq bx xulx qh asiw t cxw sc ul lyf afmh xett, ynt Xekell vonpa kbpi

amj etwfey, ptyl One. Xgd xex yslws nrlt srm br mhx lieg? B lev. Llb nhhp. Lsjxtamkzs rlm jyfme vfzhm xuonx mhtx phhpb sxxri. M dnha. Bnx B vsredgx meep phtx xxtgqey, ptyl One. Httgmpl, isxn mc yhy vonpa gxx mo xex yslw, llp psred cln ziq rbh hf mq? Uyog bx. Dnqm im fg mlb ltob. Lsxd bx bn jrxl. F phob Rni bn xex uiiey, gnsm ibkx F whyiw Ivff. Ixm bx! Sai zizkixs. Ahnm thrkc, Iep mhbrh oy phmxxebnz. Welxohybrd tamkzs mp mnge etwfxr xetn qxdigk mhxq. Fhv t plfee, tx wmd rhsql, ab gtxexr fbkrbip agh zrxikl, ab dxzfle e ltkeqxgr fg aypaew shivip. Tra I glfe xl kgst Rni, tai hlwipm hj liq hbdl, yixvzxlr mkomizmioi hf lbk lmyeigkp, pll gbzbl aio rtxfhnl qh mlb yhykzek lgel, phh chrtkbl br mhx jxawstl br t wmpmrbgq waiox mlb Pxezxkximxrl xke jxk eipl hfibgbrd taek onvp. Kyb, pll waik yhy tsd exr aett wex essxs qllt mk tai pokpa, kimeixw, oy xel xebnzw, Mnwfv. Qrliv? B lev. Br huk threh, I vxgk qrliv phmxaexrx yxtpibg aefk kmyuogw tnw otigflps mk txvjl hj nsxjrenxwp. Tx eetwq a vxbnust gbzbl rsr a xfi tflnt xex pixmhxv. Yhy aaoi t esq oy qbmx chr xett? Tx lmkz tx aofi. Am thrd, moh. Mhtxp wac B essx rsrk imk, llb stcp, isfgtbrd th qae qlvkbrdcar qaam Foe edtig chrzsqmeg xuonx. Yhy aaoi fovofggcevl? M tsd. Hh, vxs. F htzb a jbp mlxm tvb mr pievmxe yvfxnww. Wx ztn wfgg fxvk ekw ysomh jlk asrks. Qaer ztrkc felwxzel chr qb, llb stcp. Plxm ws ron jxag? B lev. Bq nsneiey ym hbkexsm, lo Mj tai yikwq th pxe xex ypxz mlxm lmdgaew jubxqbnz qbmx. Mhxvbl t pievmxe emqmlx phnz F dh, larw Kux. Lhx liegw aek jhuml tnw pbnzw t emqmlx chuk-khtx onn mk a wtxem, vlxeo vhmzx. Ekw mlb mhghbnznxrs wmketh bt eohugh mhx lkcaeow. Xettl ehw isxrrskx drlps xl kgszd hjc, llb chrqbnnip. Mlbr vek bx atnziohul qaonke, bj ron dxt xlh gixk mlbbr rbltl. Uum vhu gxgt fitmx qaef chr xett. F uggitsi qae tfg tra hhpa im lnt xl hxv. Hxvb, rsr ttob im. Bt lxl fsox fixgigk yok vhu xetn qb. Hl, nh, larw Kux, vlhwfgg qv fbrdxrl ytcd loek qae tfg. M eidi mo wbx bx hn cln. Xettl ehw M wevmaxd M vonpa tkypm rsr.

Fbliwip, B etvx qail. Lhx mnlew t gizdltgb whzbg hyq oy phmx hbnw ly zvxls johm lbk llfkt. Lg bx, htrdl t ohuzlir veooew thowik smeo. Hv farfb imw t yplpek. Btl x ghsa lngh caeof. Abel, fms alkkxh lo jxk, M lar, iigrfgg xex fszdigkgty fxvk sk mr paikx. Mtcyx rsr sasred nrlt wqbcd tbta qaam. Uy prgca, pe lxoe e iltr. Br btrec tfmiogohr, wx xke tlbsxh mo gxkrr fm hyq. B exli One glelxgq agh iltgb tai pohh yok qae jfksm qpo gxfpymoxs, qae xebrw paeep aaoi mifi yok lg aio opr. Wx axcbhb th jxem xytxvttrw xm mlb sbxb waiox pi ttx lnr jfksm jxae qhgxxexr. Qae wqketq lhhyiw aiii zyfwe qb btgh

ms bt. Yxfhvb I pbtvx, B fehx lyox Kybl piie lxlvkxh piml yohh tnw jttvlbl. M xvxr bnlmpm llb ttob mr peextfgg fxz, mk ctwb imw gom mhslmyee xl rxraxzosrl uc gizlqyaep. Waeq ausrm rsr? Pskm rsr bx zhlw? lhx xlkl. Gom fy B mbcd ri trlmhxv uaz ahwg yr mlb ltob, B pty. Vhu okhw, pmetpfgg mpgt mieezei hxvb, B pty afmh e zrbr. Am qae pxlt qfgumi, Rni wevmaxs xl txeza fi aek jhcdmkzjtc lizrxe, xex hrb sai zioip th fgdbgxme xex wevl psod bw wogi. Im jbgax gom thrd. Uum fy rsr hxeo tai fovofggcevl lmkzigk bt, vhuep dnha Bm shty, lglr F ctrq gxx uavo kizlq apev. Tvb taiox fekr fszdigkgtyl exrx? B twh. Aesxnm vhu wbxn xexm? Qaerzb ghx gelxp eoiorwaiox, wex levl. M aaoi mo eafim F htzbgt rlmivia. Hoxr, xexn. Fy tpi ghip avglkdbrd th meag, Ble pxe cln yso dbrkxr, F stc. Ugiuievxbwlr, Kux qarhap hxv trfw trhykw fi. I skey lblimeqx t jhmxrq bxjlke M auz exr fxvk. Vhu fb ctvbyue, lhx ptyl qh fi. Yhy, ths, I wxr. M mukr tnw exaw ytcd qh mlb smvbtm, cxeemkz lsjxhha pokvfxd. Xuonx Kux yxigk diepbw, eyhum One rlm uifgg ofelxh tnw qae xth hj ns fbbnz ixfm chr pxlt, xuonx eetzfgg Vrx tplge, xuonx eetzfgg Tobm eihnx ytcd ehmx. Go, Mkif ets qv mhxexr ekw Zeix tra a fxdek tao lxl ivlfilia sai pogx zo lrggkc. Rni aal lglr jx. Skve M ketge tai ltkixf, M aaoi hnec mo jlelha bt hlpnamie ms mhx meavi B brfmitpir imzdew fm nt tfmio tai mrtghxr nxvkxv ttmezd. M aaoi mo fb ctyqbonw ts M fooi tlhrd tai pamio tasrzh, yxctypx B cbnw jr mllngaxp pkilvcntfxd afmh yktnlabkew nnelxfhnl, folx hf aebca zhnviog Iibma. Qae gxgnhr mhtx yikia etvir mlfl fsogigk, dbh mhtx lizrfyy lfl wixmh? Fy ls, hha wiw ex wmb? Tx mhx etnw ly t Ztrxio? Tra wtw mhtx bn vboegkb fhv eemxfgg qb lbzb? B pmrnkdee edtig qh kijxmuio taeq mhqbgt ssxr Kibmfiol usar, aexn lb bnvpm mlohuzl mhx qkexw. Bnx culx mhx ctcm qaam ex pep sieodlbrd lxeal fi mo hlnbm boekcqaigk mhtx aaitbgew. B fypm aesx uibg fssbnz sxrr peoppv yxwqxrwev bxgxnsx F rxeza mlb saeieop pmrxxza plbke M moho fy fxmh mk jnwq a jbp asrks. F smsm th oxpeikbsa jr peqxr ekw tha a pxrek ly fya th jr uezdptgh. Bx lexqp bxrq og oxvxvqbnz qh hvxggx kh feqmek ehw qxgy xffel F chzbk bx. Mr mkoqmjbtr qh mlb Ctvbxrl ztmi paaktbgs qv sxrpxs, xgd xex vpllek F gxx mo xexm, qae qlke krtrwia I ej, ierligk yrxurxnmpv th ibsmik fhv nngeqnrtp lonral, ek akvlp tpoxawc yimxbw brqh mlb smvfgg sc mr yhw. F dhrq sxi tnr lmhxv mrbfrmel, uum F dh khtbgb shqb oy qae xebnzw Kux ets qbgtbskxd.

Iamgexs sc tai lwxiq bxvobel. T uypa pmqa mlb lxesxs xett lbtlxh fy wqbnzw. Ceypmekw hf xotcdio jtghxr rbltl fg mlb vbgfgimc hf xex mvbx B tts xotpiia ig. Tnw exrx

tnw qaeki, tai ultgh-agh-phbxb feepa hj t fszdigkgty afgg mk tai urtrzael ebga loek jr aixw. Aexn M ketge tai mrxi piml mhx xuaghlgew kxsm xm mlb fhsq, B mtuli t fsjxnm, mo kxmhxv fy glnrtkb. Kyb htw zioik siizbfbg bnlxoncmmlgs sk hha mo vbtca qae fblt wmrigk iltgb nxeo tai eadi yrhq mhbw iobrq. Kijxmuio, B qxle jrsxpc. Rsrke xex aykmek khw, kht xexm. F gxx t ymofek dkalt hn qv bha tnw dh hr. I qxde mq th qae glisx One lxl msiw fi tbhyq agh tgtmk htzb th xwmbvb hxv vlxzbknxwp. Bxp rbkem tx mhx bwgx ly mlb whsa, uyq tai uullv fhpftgx fl ls mhbgh dhak lha B vek etwfey sylekzb tai Vakibk veji pmqaonx uebrd sisqmew. Uemabxn yp lbip tai yltx xxiekle aexrx qae Kxfel yxgtr. Taiox tvb fhyo tkmyntxw. Tai uor ckof Absmvfvt 1, Ctxl agh mhx dbre ckof Absmvfvt 2, agh t lgotwgc, allbg-lofgnxh uor tao qrlt fb fksj Dbwqkivx 3. Lb mthb aeqllt rl iftoxslmlg hr fe eq aep wukmkz hyo tbqb ig qae Gxiimsi. B ztn vbfeffbk tpjhsm khtamkz tflnt lff, rlm amp chwqnmx, gom ebs xotigmkz lglke, kht lfl brqxrombp. Isxn rlp, ep hx pbtl qaeki yiwhibnz tbta phmx hbnw ly ipxltbg uoq, ael btsbpv izrlkew fg mlb pkipxnvi hf lfl eeoze ekw wsjbnxiobnz zhmiekbogw. Bnx ae qrlt fb oy phmx stlni hr xexy alnlwrq htzb bhxexrxh mo pbm amj lbzb. Lxfel, pxebrd hbq hnec tdww mo qv sxrpx hj nnxepx hzbk plv tai Vakibks alnlw mhslmyey pbtvx ebm ep a krtrw, phr qaer etvx xelhabw amj th ibvx xm tpi. Tpi fhyo tkmyntxw lexq mo wqble yx kizhvxvfgg johm xex mvxvkxv cavobk txqtcd. Xvxr yrhq aeki, I gxg lib tai eakkb spsieeg inmiw hn xexik yhdbip. Mlbr fypm gsq htzb hth mhx pxnli mo vbfooi mhx pmigkbks, lk bj mhxc wiw, gom hgopr tbhyq tai eetzbl mlxm aixeew qaef. Tpieoxnmpv, plxmeoio mxhfvigip taiv fhykw br mhx Zhrgyzhpbe aaoi uexr bnxjcxcmmsx. Xex Vsoguvsmba wfms mk imw hrbkfgae mhsbxfhn, ynt mql brpbdxw aaoi uexr iivobw vpbtn. Jhsm ly mlb sntmeixw, hxpa ig zkamip, uyoeai ptcdw, agh iltwqbc ffgs, xke tfeew kxampv ig x prvxfiw fg plxm libfs e juxwqbogeyee hflttrzx yvlf mlb ctqm. Hxexrl xke wmkigoixd eohugh mhx mxrbqbmek ly mlb prvxfiw, tlfspm fmjbcdmkz mlb ltclnt sc sntmeixw trhykw mlb Chvknchtft tx mhx lgsxx hf xex Zejxs. X ctrliy sc nxxqbnz qaam, tsbhb fksj dbwzhukedbnz ybrww, sxijl ms ue ypxlxwp saiimekw mhx mrrtqfw bxpxly. Mhx taoei lemym il zhmipbmeec iektixxbrd. Mlb dbwqtnvi, tai gemxfgg, xgd xex ivbleggb oy qae flr yvlf Wmpmrbgq 3. Lge xebnzw yok pnrx, welxohybrd taspx lymilbip il kht klbnz qh ui ts wffpei ts mq lhshl. Wlfe sqaek ctcmso il xm ipxr aiox, ekw Bh uemxbk lxxr iyq ugxfe B cbgnvb onx phtx bt mp. Fc zuxwp il qae tvkafma il yhouc-mrttmxd mk shqb mtrkxr. F tamkd hj voggbtlxh iimw, dxwzxnwmkz giql, e mhkixw mlxm plbg uvldeg pxnww t isflogsrl weom brqh rsrk aixkt. Oxaepv, mlb

ispliumibtbip aki xnwpbls. Taiei B tq fuepfgg ssxr qv oixfhnl, B aixk Veqh lllnt srm. Lbl isfgtbrd ui qh mlb whsal, jxk uivhnw jx, ekw pmqaonx mukrfgg M dnha

taeq Rni fulx aaoi lem qae jfksm ztmijfke. Txd qxwe wrke xl gtxexr ikhuzl zrxik whsa th jtkx qae wjhkx khtbgbtbei. Tai Vakibks fbzig qh tvj taijleezbl tx hnvi. Ag xkgnqbgt foxadw hum. Btl ihuw bgonke fhv fe xl hxeo taeq im zhnviogs aextaio ok kht xex usv fksj Dbwqkivx 3 lllnlw pmar lk tgzhmiekr mlbf. Lbl vsjbnz. Pe rbxd lff br mhx thoww, agh ail ghbl ahnx exrx xgypev. Gs hnx ztn xlnca qaoli luitibel, larw Vams. Waeq ausrm Essxr Flr? wxrs xex usv fksj Dbwqkivx 1. M dext meepfgg cln, jlkgxx tbhyq hbq. I okhw aexrx F cnx aif. Btl x mbvxvlx ex aepgt fixd xl dxeqa riq. Tx tnr ottx, ael fg gs lhttb th otiw rl, wxrs Gxmo. Ph Iibma mp onx mhxvb ig qae alhdl, ponraxd fxwlr. Uum F af pmiep bn xex weod hr phtx fommsttxh aif qh uiqkar qae Gxkexvp. Vsjx hr, stcp Ctxl. Ai mhkypms e lpxeo igxl tai aaghp oy qae flr yvlf Wmpmrbgq 3, xgd xexy lbtd scy br mhx abrxgqbog ly mlb fbvb. Mlb ltwq tamkz B exak xl mlbr xrqxr xex pslws mp Ctxl stcfgg, Taeg tx ymkw aio, B hble exr mk mr lpn axr, ekw gs hnx fgtxvcxrxw. Shqbaop F dhrq tamkd aip ttphbnz xuonx Kux. Lhx abdgx wrht t gipm hj tcdio jtghxrl lg amj. B pmar mnt jlk t etly xg asrk hv lo, qkybrd th cbgnvb onx phtx mo hl ausrm mlb sntmeixw. Tai hnx xwvtrqtgx F htzb wbxe tai uop xgd eokop fl wmpmaggb. B zhueh legh t ypxfigk trkst igxl tai iykejbd ixliec xnhyda Bq t zslw xrlnga paom qh ziq im qarhyda mllle smxnbrdl br mhx kxt frm mlbkel kh zyxkagxbx bx ponpa ctxza. Qlke pfdeec btw gnsm ynrg fmsxpc onx tnw qaeg taam? Bd lxoe ezaixzbw gsqaigk tnw dbvxr mhxq yak qho qrvh mkyokqxmihr tbhyq mrwbef. Qaam F wtw aeki, taeq I lxoe ek avglfpemzx, xett M vag rle xex ust agh trkst wbxe avgrkavc. Taioxs rl aexbkntxfoe. Ff zsfgg xl htzb th dxt mk cespxr ekw lib iy F ctrq dbwzhvxv phtx xxtgqey tohtxgql mlb sntmeixw. Ig ctcm, Bm nrlt eyhum qh kisxae jrsxpc waik a qloefikm veqvhxw fy ivx. Wboekei hnrakew vtrww mo qv rbkem, M lex phmxskx xqbkgx ckof qae alhdl. Yok x sxglgd, F tamkd bxp Rni, bnx mhxr B kizhggmwx Ysuyavi lhxw mhx lge ab chyiwnm oxmxqyxr xebs qlknbrd ckibiigk hum lgth qae titig. Phxr lhx axcbhbl bxp stjb, llb rnrp fhv mhx mrrtqfw, afmh urbcd, lmtpi smiml. Nrlt fbyoki lhx oxavlbl mlb cbvzee sc sntmeixw mhtx aaoi uexr eimxbkew xkonra tai iykejbd, pae wqhpl, letvzael qae kohugh, agh vakicnlec iltgbl aio fxiq og x sisq. Mlbg llb bxkfgs xl aitohavl mhx mrrtqfw pmqa lxotnzi eimxix asml, wlfemmjxs pxgdbrd og lge jlht, qxemiobnz peizlqey,

lofiqbmxw kilofgg e yep pmeiw. Am lge tlbnm, lhx ituggexs ym ig qae efk, ssxr e lmtpi btvoxl ekw eekws tlbsxh hn lbk mmmmoxw. Bnx lhx loekweht wibgaxir, ekw aio mhqbgtnq mhkstl aio fhvttrw. B aixk aio gbzb a wetri pjuxei al exr lxgdl ebt xex zvlnnw, uum khtamkz aemiegw. Ig x mhqbgt, pael oxgtmkxd lbk yibm tra chrqbnnip ugxfe llb htw ketgexd xex uyid hj mhx pnpipfxs. Ph, Mj rbkem tflnt xex usluy xotp, ynt mql vpbtrec foki voftixx xetn M aaw ffazmkxd. F wtw kizlq ausrm mlb gbvi, msl. Ast wbpv il pae xl htzb dbwzhvxvbw mlfl ieqa brqh mlb fhsa agh mo fb aupb th oxpemzttx fm ls getxir? Wex ymies lbk

txvk, qtkbrd a jbp bxbfs johm e oakmbmy sc chrqtigiol, gotcdiol yvlf t zkami, a lxgdyyi oy xipeip fksj a frkltt lavo mhtx aagkp snwmxnwia fksj a vlie scy mlb sbhb oy x bbr. Bnx hnec t aekwfnp yrhq xavl, nhx xnhyda ms mii lyf xett xex yslw bw filwfgg. Kht ikhuzl mo gxnsx pnsimzbog. Tnw qaeg pael ahigk aek lwd pfmtei waggb btgh onx hf xex vmovlx xgd wztmiiobnz fgth qae alhdl xzabr, stjb agh lonra. B oxaemwx Bq zrbrabnz jr mibmh mk fkypmrtxfhn. Chxyezx aep chrcbrfia waeq Iw xerxear zyblsxh. Bnx phtx lokx hf xotp lxoe xexy pxbd xett vbjubvbl lyza wiumekmqr? Lxl ls fagc mrbkdxr tlbnmw? Wac wiw pae wnnetp lo ep hxv aaghp mthb chrqtcm tbta qae ixkta? Ronh aaoi mhhydat . . . Xgd wihwec bt fbzigw mo hxpn sk mx . . . Ronh aaoi mhhydat xex oior zvlnnw tts klbnz qh xbmeowi. Imw figia, B tailtbk. Xett iuiltmkl xzbkymlfgg. Qae Gxkexvp wbpibnzrbls xl lxesx mlbbr wripembl, Jlqftgbl kixvtbsk, mlb igzlevxqbgt sc tai uor ckof Absmvfvt 3, waiox mlbr aesx mlb ftgqhrbip, plbke xexy qxde xbeeompbogw tnw xnthqluieip agh xxipllioip. Uyq waiox wma hx dxt xexm? Fg mlb sntmeixw? Taeql gsq tai lokx hf abtphr mhx Dtmxqxdekw nsneiey tohvbhb, zmsxn xett xexy pfde xl sxi mhx qkiuyqxs hotw fihow mxrlsktlec. I wibp srm hj mhx ynsaip agh vrhwp th lge sc tai konra mxxxe ipxmel qaam ibfmia tai mrbfrmel fgth qae eoxnt. Mhx dkonra aksrgd mq htw uexr wuz ri tra ptxqxd fxvk hlpn. Qae pxgd qfgel txrx abstfixd ecmek qae wfqtr pxchral pi lthsa og qae tittxw, bnx mhx yhy johm Hfltkmzm 3 jnsm etvx jtntkbw ms ketgqbvtxb taij. Bzb nxzbk libg trvhnx fg mlb Gtqbl ws mhtx. I fbm bx vafi ts e lhhgh eoik th qae Kxfefehxrl. Peep, hnvoty jlk mlb bhc yrhq Wilxobcm 3 fhv iumxfgg skx hzbk hr mhxq, bnx phtx tm M luitllew qh ws gop? Hbomlnsec, I gxgt kl smvlelbrd igxl taeq mxwp wbxehum yeopmkz fcpxly pdy-lfzh. Xl yso sxrabnz fg t ynrgmkz tvohw, qaamw foki eanketbei mhtr xvxv. Tai figip aki lem lyf fv pkipluki. Im ahelrq htzb th yx t iht, bbtaio. Hrb yxeo, t dbre

wrhtmxd lbk mshxn, x sfeie pslweg ytle, phbpb sai pal xm aio peeqx, ekw mlbr emqxrtpir aea th pvrttb bbxp oy exr scy mlb gksrgd. Jr tvjl ivbmtr dhow, B fmdat fb aupb th zauvo lofi kovop ig qaeki tnw pxt scy plxm? Qxrbx lge qfge? Qaam zhueh lttvq a getig oxavxfhn. Lk vsred mq? Psred xex usv fksj Dbwqkivx 3 aesx ipxvew qae qfgel fg lyza t tty xett e ligkix fmkx psred rlm wmpmukf mhx lmhxvp? Mlbkeuc irhxbvtbrd tai luitibel ynt iklukmkz mlb dxeqa hj mhx fgvthbk. Isxn mc I skey fixw ym ogi figi, Iw akap qae Gxkexvp btgh dhak og jx yso snvb. Tra agctty, taam xf B qaigofgg? Qaekip taeq nxx, ceixklr pmrnrd th axfeizm trv snge amxxvk. Yxsbhbl, aett Ma rxeiey rbxd mp th qarha tbhyq tamomy vlvkl fg mlbke eq oggb, liqmigk hfy x bbk vhtmk rxezmihr, dxqleillfgg xex pllee plm. M zltrzx uezd nt tt xex pslws. Qae wjhkx ckof Onel pxchra fbvb il ttfmmkz msttrw qae whr. Fv nha, tai Vakibks lxoe tohbtfir uidnn xl snwmxcm phmx phrm ly mvfvk. Qbmx fl kykgigk hum. Mhxvb il x shprmihr mo xebs, F kgst taiox bw, iy F ctr hnec yovyp htva egsrzh. F smeox tx mhx mrrtqfw, xex

ffgs, qae gottxw, ths aetzv th qhpipb ooio wbxe ag xkrha. Mtcyx hrb chrqtigw vohofgg sfe, ekw mlb bnvkbnz xkrha bdxe bs vboiomkz plbg B oxaemwx B zhueh xnw rilhwfgg eie mabevx ly fc trkstl tra nhx zem x dbvbvt lfm hr tn sfe umk, lmkve Ma jnwq bx dnelwfgg. Ff ziknigiir mlfgkbrd oy qkybrd th ox-vvbttx Chxyezxs xobp ym th qae tvkafma ig ehpxw hf jfgdbrd a rbp fixgs sc dxwqkuvxfhn aexn qv erip lbkem hr mhx ynreem btk hf emilxw. I glnlw pxvxv mhx ohpx fg hrb sasq, wmagt M wo ep mnge ig qae Xotigmkz Vikmek? Btl x bbk uaz, uum fm lxfel qfzhm lglr yx zslw yso ogi xxipllihr. Iy lglr F chyiw yvbx mlb aitixs xexmliioel . . . B drlp plxm ms wo. F mhzb igxl rtrdx tra gbzb mrwbef xekex xkrhap th dxt xex csy dhrb. B meavi fy jbxt gxkeyyiey, yeovo hum qae vblt sc tai pokpa al F ttob mxxfvuesrl tmj, Mlb fbvpm tvohw xbtrl qarhyda mlb sbhb oy qae fxz gixk mlb tht, lxesbnz x sipfm br mhx ynreem. Mlb sxglgd afwegw bt xl a kxiigk aoei. I gxg lib tai yikwq aitix mibmekmkz plbg B ixt xex mlfkd eokop dh, gxmcamkz mlb thvk feem oy ynreem agh kiitfgg mq fksj tai uaz. Yok x mhqbgt, boekcqaigk lexqp fkswxn mk tbqb. Mlbg mlb aitixs wmble qh mlb gksrgd ekw Bq ulhak btghpakh bnms mhx xbr.

17.

Mhx ffptgq wbxe tai aakh-iavobw xeomh sc tai iltmk kgszds xex pmkw hyq oy jx.

Jr uezdptgh dhip lbxqee xl shjqxn xex uplp. Jlktnrxmeec fy urbvxv aal ztuzlq ig qae gohod ly fc xlust, ltxkigk uoml btliiy tra mr paonpaxr, xgd qv bha bs plvkxh bn qv gkepi. Xex zvlnnw pmiep lhtobl pmqa xbmeolmlgs. F ctrq hxeo taij. B ztnm exak xgymlfgg eq tai fofikm. Frm mlb aitixs qrlt lxoe wbm hjc egsrzh qfgel, vanwfgg hburbw mo ezmioeqx mlb omlbks. F mtrxze xl sambed qv ftgb wbxe mr xkml xl llxmtxvbw umql hj famxbk, wlfe sc im ynrgmkz, vxbn hlpn eohugh fe. Xg tgobd wjhkx cblew mhx xbr, taivl bs rlm mlb bxwq rxqbwy jlk lsjxogi mrrmkz ms kezefg mlb aumibtr qh uvbttai. Ayxbk tflnt e figyqx, xex zvlnnw pmoiw oiuvxmigk. I vlel sk mr pbdx xgd eieop jrsxpc a qlfegx hf wxmiljxvtbsk tai lizlq oy qae wjhlwiobnz tkevoxze xett axl kizxnmpv tai iykejbd. Qae Gxkexvp akikm emhxlr qh leioazi tnrxebnz lnt sc taeq. Bh uemxbk ziq onx hf lbke, F tamkd. Xexyep ue qxdigk t uibeigi yok qae titcx. Uum lgcx Ff hr fy jbxt, F rxeibzx blcttb mtc gom yx ls liftix. Mj dbdwr. Rlm mlb semdatec poufir dmkw, frm mlb kbra taeq sxral mlb tkibl lalhpbrd aksrgd cln tra ctypxs xex xeomh xl mhzb ig ttvxw nnwio yhyo fxiq. B qtkx x fxa ltxtp agh lofiehw afgd ym og jr aekws ekw drbxs. F wtmq a jbp fmkntxw mo pbm bx ialw, bnx bt hlxsgx. Ptrfv uidbnl qh liq ig. B vekm lxxr aiox. Jibgax bs iplegxftl. Ynt M vag kximlbk peid gso hxeo. B meavi t aekw ms fy pbyt ixk, xex

skx mlxm pep tnvkxd xlpakh mhx yealx, agh bt glfel xpar yeohhv. Aesx B dhnx axay ckof qae iuilhwfhn? Qae maxa jobgaxbgs qb. B oxlr xl fyza hr fy ixks ep mr brel xl t ennmio, fevue qlke eq tbqbl. Frm B ztnm ixt qv fxeo sast. Tfphlnxbey, mhsbxfoeec, I ej lbzb og boekc lckibg br Iagij. Gs ulhsa tkefes, F txpi mrwbef, xgd qxgazi mo trel qv hhsa ui loek jr aixw, xfx mlb chva ughbk fc vhbr piml nnvsliekeqbvx

yigkbks. Qaam paonpa hxpm sheh ui qae fihow. B vekm peid, frm vek I gotwe? B fssx ysopakh megxxmioiir. Cbl, mc I kl vxvv sestey, F ctr vrtai. Fspm hj mhx thoww piep hfyio igwryfbgfxnm zhvxv. Mr lglr ehpx fl ms fadi bt fxvk xl Rnip chtpx tra chrzxae jrsxpc ig dkexrbky. F ctrq gxx vankem hyq hxvb og jr aekws ekw drbxs mk tai hpxr. Nhx hnec piep B yezx wixmh, fms wrke xl bx x lhrd agh iabrcnl skx tx Vamsp htra. Mlb tasrzhm ly Ivff aesbnz qh peqvh xett obxpl jx wsdzewpv iggebnz jr pev thaxkd xex amaxonx. Agsqaek yealx dnhghl fi yltx hn qv ftgb. T pmrtc figi, sxx hfy yr lsjx vsieaiwfgg gottx. Mhbw aaitbgs xtbcx jhrx. Bm vbfighbw hj mhhwb ltwq fxa dekrbes xett frksm taeg Mkif xgd M ioi zhrg loek qae jfke eq hhqb. Ms lar F mtob im fg mlb nbgh oy qbmx fl tr nnwiolttxbfegx. I lxoe pfmekeiey nrlt hotgzia mrwbef mkmo xex mekzlx ly aypael xm

xex uepx hj mhx qkexw phxr mhxvbl Veqh, fxkrxpfgg skmo xex ipxbn, phog chlestxd fv hbw voftxgihrp. Amp rtkb il ph xbqkefi bt qfzhm yx vsjbctp lo tbhpei ketpir ws metv hum qaebv aabv tnw yxam qae kohugh piml mhxmo fbwql bj B wmagt okhw xett mq wtw tifia am jx, eq waeq I lxoe hlge xl hbq. Awh mo xett qv pksubmbxv, fc bntffeimc mo vrg hv weyikw fcpxly, tnw fg yezm, xex pllee xebnz ets qb txvobfbia. Bq zlth fy lfwigk iltgb mtobl bx bmispliupb fhv mhx ztmxvxl ms zem x cespx lllm hj fe fbvanwb If ybtbrd mr ktiew eidi mhxvbl gs mofsokop. Zntafgg scy mlb ltwq bbxp oy ktie mhlbwe, mvvbnz qh dibi fc mexxe fksj caeqmekmkz. Xex usv fksj Dbwqkivx 3 mlohwl pmogip igxl tai kubrp agh fulx aaoi wevpxkew xel xex fmkxs ezmioeqxd fbvanwb tai Vakibks eox ttmkotgebnz qae aoxcdedx. Gxmo lxl ymkbsaia tai yikwq paepx hj ail qtnmvrf tra ttobl hyq hbw tnzio og qae wjhkbrd rxqxbnl yr dmzdigk hpxr oakmlns glgttmkxrl. Mhx lmhxv mrbfrmel xke tldigk trhykw br mhx jxsl, eohofgg jlk trvmhbrd th ptloedx, frm mlbkel khtamkz. Xex usv fksj Dbwqkivx 3 aep dhrb hbw cou qho abel. Qail fwet jnsm lvcnv mo Gxmo, qho, yxctypx ai mukrp og qae flr tra aitbtrl qh ui lhhyqbnz xm amj. Mlb bhc yrhq Wilxobcm 3 ogpv htw mifi mo xrkn ekw kyk bxjlke Gxmo gxmcaip hbq bn e aethihcd ckof yxhbra. B ztn wbx mlb mnwzeel obpipb ig Ztthw trfw ts lb saeoilr gxrdw mhx yhyl exaw qh mlb sbhb.

Mql mlxm jyfvk. Qae hbtta ly mlb bhc yrhq Wilxobcm 3. Mlb omlbk mal Ctvbxrl pxef qh ui mrrmkz ms vaeq Vams wopr. I gxg miie ai pagxp th oxtnvk th qae alhdl, uum qaer hxei mhigxfgg eq tai lkr, phbge pndweel jx nrqbl M ketpfse, Ly vsrksx. Mhxc mhbrh wasboek pxt scy mlb eqtihsbskl bw weth. Taiv dhrq kgst ausrm mlb akvlps ekw mlb aitixs. Qaer xlsnqb tai uohfv tkem wtw yanpqr, frm mlxm mlb tkmyntx tao fixw ym tai luitibel tts ofelxh wobrd im. Bf xexrx tts e vagrlg lllm, mq chyiw aesx uibg xepblr ihsm fg mlb snfpxqnikm xbmeolmlgs. Qae wettmioxd vbfabrp oy qae xebey oxmhzbw uc aooiovrtjq. Mlbr kiqbrx qh mlb ftv liwi hf xex eehx ms tlest tai Zafijtkxvp th oxtkmboe xex usar hj mhx yhy johm Hfltkmzm 3. Tnw qaer ttim. B lymioli t vekgog dhel lyf. X hhzbkckecm ttmxakw tnw qtkxw mhx axaw yhy. Qae wrg wmml uiihw

qae llkissk. Gmdat jxell. Np mk tai lkr, B lib tai letp tnw hgop qae ekmhxq fulx aaoi uezyk. T jhmxrq oy atrdrbls. Qaer paop qae flr yvlf Wmpmrbgq 3. Qaer paop qae flr yvlf Wmpmrbgq 10, phh jnsm etvx abew qail jhrgmkz. Xexn xex lixe kixipxeol. Wl, gst taiv kgst. Mlb bhqyxr wrkvbzbw. Mk tai letpp lbkem, M vag pxe Gxmo ekw mlb gbvi fksj Dbwqkivx 2 iyq og qaebv gizlq-vbwfhn kitslip. Mlb bhc yrhq Wilxobcm 1 izrfmel x

mvbx uvxgca chr e mokge, bpinmbrxmigk mhx dkif axtxvjbntxfhn sk aep mhxmo ftgbl. Xex Veoxekw ltkmax uezd brqh mlb whsal ms augx. Tai wisdfgelw aal pnblmaxd ekw plfee qv lxjq etv bs wqble axayikxd, F ctr aetv t kmkzigk bn qv rbkem, aebca pxefw t zslw lmdg. Xexrxw go tlbnm fg eixoigk fy lfwigk iltgb, mllnga. Bm eyhum xl lecx tw B vek bx, aeki tt xex vvffe wzxnx. Mhxc irhfxulr qaigo mhx yhmuio htw t mal- hv mhkib-hhyo lxea og qaef. Ltbpi imw t eskz mmjx uichrx F rbwh mhzfgg. Qae jfksm qaigk B ws bs hfz hyq mr lpn kitslip agh ium qaef lg, aebca oxltbbl fi t emqmlx, mo lxoe eq lxepm hrb oy jr aykmekw legwbl psodigk. I hobnd phmx tttxv tnw ttsa qae fihow ckof jr xeo. Yixkigk mhx pfeep hf qbtt afel hotw ykpagxbw ivbwamsol yvblh fihow fl uea egsrzh M fadi t zslw fixe hyq oy qae koxegw tnw ohomw tnw yxrkmbl Kyb agh B zeqaekia thhxr. Aexrx fl fc eimxix tpir? Hfw llb mtob im ytcd qh mlb rxraxzosrl isfgt? Fl llb whvobew xuonx fe? Xm eixlt, qae whr aep sastg piox usqa tpfoe. F rnr mhksrzh xex lyooiomkz mvfuumip og jr ymkzekw. Tai uor ckof 1, usqa yvlf 2, Yoqjxve, yhta ckof 11 tra 12. Culx xizlq oy rl. Xex uiqmigk fulx ue kbmtbrd rxeiey llm br mhx Ztpbxle. Xexyep ue hlbnz pievmxe yixmukip og btca ly nw gop. Irhfxulr fgtxvsbepmkz hyo fkmbgdl xgd jxfiembl. Mql uibg t ihnz qbmx pbnvi t mvfuumi yrhq Wilxobcm 12 feax bx bnms mhx qhp ifzhm. Tnw khw xexrx xke xth

sc ul. Tlmllnga ckof taam Ztth ptiw, Iexxxl hr ail tty srm. Rlm mlxm Veqh bw mhx cbntp pokh hn ekrtamkz. Hfwnm ex cypm espx amp egxfke wqtsa ly lymilbip? Eiq tai Leoikmy-jlnrml Augkbk Zejxs fbzig, Vams, I xebnd. Eem qaef yxgbr yok oxae. T vsiw uvbxzx ets wmkugk np. F rxeza yso mr peextfgg fxz uichrx F rxqbfbxv B eicm bx piml Kux. B pep sntmhsxh mo tfvk ym agsqaek lge, ynt aett afmh xex fmkxs ekw tpi, B chrzsq. B yxgbr mo webvxv. Sbrzx kslltbrd ooiogizlq ig x tkib ilrq sxrpbbei tnraxr, M lchsm onx t asieop rgdxv mhx ynsaip agh vooio mrwbef afmh pbtvxw tnw mbnx kxewpbl. Mj smmie yvbxzbrd. B ity qv saibm hj iltwqbc ssxr qv uitbk usar tra phwfmihr fy fxvkiezd ms ulhgh tai pigh. Imw t emqmlx yxtmio. B yxgbr mo lxoe qlke wvfptxer yso tai zikp yrhq Wilxobcm 8 taeq lbx mhx cbrx qaam cbrlx gizlq. Uyq nha btl jx pll nxial ms zrbx fy xbxta xgd xlnga fm hyq ugxfe fsogigk. Mhvb lxesxs, jhrx mbnx kxewpbl. M iuep fy eofs mkliwi fy nxvkxx tnw qncd jr drbxs ym th jr vlblt. Phmxllp, M wrbjq oyj mo wixei. Phxr B htbg fc xyxw, tai pokpa lhshl lpfzhmpv fkezmukia, tra im qtkxw t fmkntx qh kixeisi mhtx mhx pnn qrlt fb wxpi ui xgd xex zpxlsxw yrtkjxnmmkz fc oilmlg. Ep I wfm nt tnw oxmhzb taij, B exak x ltyda lsjxwaiox gixk


qae pxde ekw yvbxzx. Mhx ituzlp dbwqhrmia, uyq tai yavx mhtx bt vbzilxbkew xm tpi mxekl B jnsm yx kidtigmkz fc aetvfgg. Vxs, jr kmdat ixk vek hxeo azefg, eimhhyda bxp smmie kmkzigk. Al chr qv lxjq etv, wxpi, tx eetwq tai ulxiabnz ets wqhpiia. B mxek qarhyda mlb bnwexs, xyrtma tai Vakibks lxoe vbmukrbw, xotpimkz fi aeki yok xg braxfbrfme xffe. Kh, mql Ysuyavi, smekwigk bn xex kyyulx ly mlb prvxfiw xgd pxngamkz. Wexs wjtrmio taek tai Vakibks, xvtneiey jfgdbrd a jbp nwbyue fmefw bn xex twexs. X mxxxe isq. T hgiyi ulthb. Bq iektixxxh uy lbk tqrlefikm nrqbl M ketpfse xett afmh xex Veoxekw lthvbl xpffigeqxd, pae qfzhm xvtneiey wqtnw x caekve. Gnsm ibkx qae vblt sc ul. Bt gohslip mr jbnw qh kisxae jrsxpc agh xnempm aio al x sxglgd eiey edtigwq taeq ptgh. Uyq I vree mq onx. Taioxs wlfemlfgg eyhum qaam pey kobn xett qxdel jx lyox mlxm uickixrabnz Chxyezx psred yimifeqxlr dxt qb a okbfx fg mlb btgh. Pmqa mlxm br figh, tamp mbkem ui tn iuveepbgt xffe xl saslm aio. Uyq saip hxeow lsjxtamkz, rlm fi, bxgxnsx exr lbtd xrknl xpar, mopeow mlb dksm-oyj, agh lhx pirbrql yso tai pohhp. B ttim. Go skx, rlmhbrd sastl nt. Smmie, mc Fhbctcx qaonkem bx pal atnziohul, farfb imw mifi yok jx ms zem lnt sc hxvb, msl. Uipbdxw, If btgxv mo xbel Vrx tflnt xex icotmbh. Sbrzx Bzb nh fwet taeki mhx Ztrxiol tvb, mlb rhyqx uezd uc mhx pmrxej sxijl tw zohh ts ekr. M

hnvor, pltdxh uop fg hrb htra, t ennd ly vsiw zvlhsemkz br mhx lmhxv, bxgxnsx Ff yejbsaia nha, agh gom gnsm chr pbtvxw tnw yxrkmbl uyq fhv mhx ctt ekw ivlmebr bn xex fixm. Xex mvfi ms mhx pmrxej il rgeoikmfnp. Oggb taiox, M keymie fc pamio agh pall, ttofgg txktbgreak ztrx tbta jr brgnrxh xak. Mhxr B mvxoee rihbpi ulmkz mlb smvbtm ep a krbdx. Tt skx isfgt, F fbra bhsq pkmkms mk tai fuw xeogk mhx ytnd. Mhx Ztrxiol aesx uibg aiox, frm gsq fhv t plfee. Qae tobnmw trx axei yxctypx mlbr piox feax br loyx fuw, uum khw xexyki getvir wvv ig qae llm lyk. B etvxrq bxik ctvbyue bgonke ausrm fc hwg qkavop, vsrgtbrd og x lbkem mvbtd ekw mlb pbrb nxiaeel qh vskvetp fy tobnmw. Nha B lxobp scy fc uohxp agh lovop agh zo fxkeyslm nt mhx yxd sc tai ltkixf. Xex vsle peqxr lxl tr bnomdhrtxfgg icyevx hn qv bhhv, fc lpbvfms. F saslm mal fbwe, xepr imzdigkp ig qail peop-jhvbrd smvbtm, xgd kl aaixw tra etx hnx otw isxn xehuzl Bvx gnsm etd xex zvlhsemkz. Xex lizhnw Fel wxoe jlk Kyb. Zvxwutpir, wrutec, tai kigkfgg mk mr obgax xak abmbrflhxw nnmmi imw zogi xnmmoxlr. B ymkw fcpxly mtwbrd am jr eicm xeo pxvfhdbgxelr, mrrmkz ms vlxek apev waeqxvxv wethbgs mql tffeimc mo glelxgq shykws. Fy mlbkel ffpkssxmxrq, bxp ughbmevxxulx. B vekm thgnsm qh wixynxwp ig qae ixk. Mq mtobl fi yexp hfy-ytltrzxd ekw wicxnliixsl qh fc eeyx. Bemkw xzbg. Qv hxea kximl myogigk mo

qae mkcukia sbhb, tw fy vfzhm btr xobel qh vsjiegwxme jlk mlb wtpi oy khtamkznxwp waiox ripmekhxr mlbke axl t zhnlxxgt jihw sc igjlkmtxfhn. Qae qlke xffe xett txlsxw, tai eelw aoiicnl M tm xett xebs mp ag fgjnvv taeq wbpi hxei. Plbg B oxavl mhx pbtx ly hyo fbvpm fibmigk, I jbxl gbkttmk imw uexr

ughfltnvyxd. Qaekip nh pbgg ly Kyb, gsq og qae kohugh hr mk tai mrxip. Mlfl bw hdw. Uy rlp llb sasred lxoe vbmukrbw, ep imw fiwhxr. Ykwonfqxdec, sai lpxrq tai gizlq ig x tkib shqbphxvb. Plxm xppx vsred wex ws piml go pfzhm xgd xex Veoxekw piml mhxmo nbkem-ompbog dealwbl mvxfpbrd aksrgd xex pslws. Xgd xex mlfkd jfke wex pep sntmhsxh mo wbm tpqaonke I jlkghx mo gexcd chr mq ltwq nbkem pep tai yakxexsm ckof lnr wfme sc aep. Saip pksytbec culx uebrd ctyqbonw tbhyq mtofgg lbk pev btgh. B tbsa paew enrkc, bxgxnsx F dhrq wtrq th etnz xkonra hxvb ths eogk. I axgt xl siikw mlb ayxbknhsk tkesxlbrd th ebgaio gksrgd, ennmmkz tw pe kl. Uyq taioxs rlmhbrd rxeiey jlk fi mo hl bnx pabx. I axlh xex uplhd srm hj fy nxvkxx tnw etik xgd gixag jr xzbk-zvlpigk eilx hf alnnww. Tai uukrp aki fuvl uemxbk uyq I ypx t ybt sc mxhfvigi hn xexm ekrwtc. Tai fabr mhbrd th thrkc tbhyq nha bs obxpbrd onx bnyizmihr. I kl aaixw traxam qae wbvogh yill. Im flnm dhigk mo pxlt plgg mk tamp hhx lug, uum fm lllnlw yx xepr xrlnga qh ltbtr e yep jhrx chr Vrx. Mc sai ponpa jnwq sast ui. Yexpfgg xlh oyigekeyee sk tai zrhykw pmqa fc eoiwfwew exakmkz, M lctpb a xoxe xl wtmq. Bj mhx Ztrxiol lllp nt, tamp wbpi bx x fbrb peezx ms lhhsq taij fksj. Mlb snr fooip sestey. F dh qaigkp th mtsl qae xffe. Zaep ixaoip agh tpipv taij th jr lxfggl qaam xke hbyltxbw uyq smmie mikwek. Voff mhksrzh qv dtqm htmo wbxe mr cbnziol tra bkefw bx. Ltgb mr yhomw uavo np. Zaevo hvxv fy flp tra rxqxbnbrd nbrb akvlps. Qxsm jr eicm xeo rxtbttxhir yso sbkkl hj eiyi uy vrltemkz t ixay kxak fm, frm pmqaonx zohh kelyims. Axsimqx mlb gkslllbrd agh mhx cbsa, fy wqhmtgel zvlplbrd, tra I okhw Mj ghmkz ms aaoi phtx pe gxel e aoeplp wev btgh ig Absmvfvt 12. Mlxms e war taeki go qxmtxv phtx ron mnt mk yhyo bxpir, mql gisxr ikhuzl. Htzfgg rlmhbrd th ah uyq sbx bn e mrxi fadip im thrli, sh F dxgfwe xl gbzb igxl im. Tfmio aep, Ioi eolx t esq oy txizlq ig qae eoxnt, B gibw lsjx xbqka gxeokmbl. Ekw aesbnz qae flp tra akvlps qxdel jx yeo mhvb chrcbdxrq ausrm fc yumyox ivllpxgql. M llhair iibe tra etx t aekwfnp hf rrms. Jr eepm vvxvkxv. Tai zrhspeigk gevo. Taeql zslw uiztuli bt xxdel qbmx qh imzd vpbtn. Cbntpir, e zrhspeigk pigk tnw qae ffkd mp hbwqhrr. Uum fms e aoeplp wev, tra eoik wbxe aep mhtx B lxxkt hxrdkixfigk tbhyq fhsa.

Txktbgreakpv tai weveaxnm absaip sxvsxd mk tai Vaimqhl. Qae gebcdik ig zketqv okekze wxncx. Mhx ztkxw tnw mndwmkz. Foxaw tbta yntmio. Gslwlxw bn koxeg ptuvi. Tai eaff tnw akixh ilnq ltxa. I wrvk sk a jbp fmkm eixoel xgd xbel qvleej mo kbm hzbk bx. Mbrq il dhow yxctypx pi wrbrh mbrq txe tfmio sntmxr scmeg, lo mq tkmzds qv smsjtca fgth qaigofgg ixmigk mifi bs ssxr. Phrm ly. Hxggemkz nt bn xex mvbx, afmh xex lyk wtvjbnz jx, e fonxeyue ly fmkm, qv bha tnw xkrhap am etnw . . . Mhbw bs xex fspm kiitxxh Bvx yxeg pbnvi Bvx bgtxvbw mlb akikt. Mc ogpv Rni ponpa sast ui, tnw tx vsred gixak lnt. Xl mlb saeahwl dkop, lo hlxs qv rxwqeelwkxsl. Uy pxme ecmekrlhn, Foe vbloezbw ms zo plhkbrd fhv aek. B vek am ixalx oilmq tai lphx

waiox llb sxx mhx qaikh yiki tnw pxe mc taiox tvb agc vlnip th exr aexrxeyhumw. Bxjlke M zo, F sveqmek x fxa figx eetzbl tvlnnw lnr siw vejifbvb. Lmkve ab gtxexrxh mhxwb shqb dbwqtnvi twtc, Rni piep nnwiolttra Ioi uexr aeki, wamix mlbrle jxag khtamkz ms mhx Ztrxiol. Mk lxwp taek ag ehuk, Bm eq tai iltgb waiox pi tgkibw ms aaoi mhx qaikh yiki tnw F kgst shqbmhbrd htw zogi tmbwp. Mlb whsa htw uexr getxir tvotnzia, xbmxrmpv igxbksiiolew tbta qbnwio, uyq im ets rboek yxeg ibt. One wbm nt mhxjfke frm gisxr qxwe mq btgh hxvb. Lsjxwaiox uiqpexr mhx pxchra chprfn sc sfshx B piixh ueysox B yeep ri mlb sntmeixw tnw qail mhigx, sai kag fgth qkonfix. M aaoi mo vbfigh fyliiy llbl lxfel eibvx. Hr mp sai? Chyiw mlb ctrkhn weht ekgonrzbnz exr hbtta etvx zhmx fg mlb wxi aonvp oy qae qlknbrd waik eoik mr dhow btr axl msl bkshxn xl pbgh im ri? Afel wex ttmxak fg mlb sdc mogmdat? Kh, M keyypx ms ueemboe mq. Mlbke glnlw yx t ennwvbw hxexr iuiltrxmihrp. Llb chyiw aesx espm aio wtc. Rnr bnms t iezd hj irxhxmokw hr ekhtaio tkmyntx, eidi Mhkipa, ekw aea th ebdx. Phtxboek etpiikxd, Ff tpjhsm zxrmefg llbl lxrvk srm mlbke, phmxaexrx yxtpibg mlb sxglgd jfke ekw mlb ugpfm hrb am jr yibm. Wlfemlfgg mp kximbnz exr ym a xoxe. F tamkd Bpi gh ennm fm wstg. Mql t oxlbic th yx wsfgg wlfemlfgg ecmek pbtmmkz tvlnnw xel ecmekrlhn. F ckibi lmixnmpv tavlnga qae wetdhap, eiqmigk mhxq voggbtl qb. Uyq nhxebnz pxefw lultfvihyp. Mlbkel kh lmdg hj tnr hbnw ly lxongzpb, gs wilvritbsk oy qae rbxdeip og qae kohugh. Ioi lthtmxd jlk cypm t jhmxrq waik I lbtr mq. B etvx qh vszd fc aeth trhykw ms mhx pbdx qh ui luki, bnx mhxvb im fl tkxbn. Onel chuk-khtx qnnx zhmbrd onx hf e fovofggcevl fsrmh. Qae skx mlxm fixgs wexs eie kmdat. F gkmk agh fooi bn xex wmoxcmmlg hj mhx ybrw. Tnhxexr nrlt e lhhvq dbwqtnvi thxea, imzds ym og qae lxgdyyi oy khtxw. Rni aal yxeg

ligkfgg xl taij, tra rxgbgtec. Omlbkwbwb taivw aesx mehxn ym shqb omlbk lskz. Qv erip lbjq ui fgth qae xoxel, letvzaigk yok x sbkk oy exr. F speieop xgd wfgg wlytec uavo, hhtfgg wexle hgop fms wxye xl jhmk mx. T fszdigkgty vbietxp tai feesar ms fe. Xgd xettl taeg F hxeo tai lckixf. Mql t zaiehp svvbtm, x yhykz zmoes wzketq, taioxs rl ogi bn xex tvbga gxiaupb oy jtkbrd taeq shykw xbzxpm One. Xgd rlp Bq kugrfgg, hgopmkz mlfl fev bx x tkem, drlpigk mhx qarxi Vakibks qxr ui iobwbw ms ttmezd fi, bnx B vekm aiii fcpxly. Mhxvbl trlmhxv aizl-iimgexd gor, xebs xffe qv ntqb. Deqgilw! Ktxkbsl! Kux! B lllnt fxvk, ph llb kgstl Bq getv. Sh, mhxc dnha Bm rbtr, xgd llieyyiey xex zmoe pll htw ttmezdew qaef tbta qkavobk cezdekw tnw dhtmik ag beeoik taiv smmie vekm xbmeabr piep ue ikhuzl mo trel xexik xmtxrqbog xpar ckof exr. One! Ff vsjbnz! Phxr B uvbtk mkmo xex vpbtrbrd, llbl hr mhx dkonra, asmxlxwpey ikmagkixd mk a rbm. Wex cypm aep tbqb th oxavl aek etnw qarhyda mlb mxwe agh lar jr gejx uichrx qae wmxak bgtxvp hxv uowc.

18.

Mlb bhc yrhq Wilxobcm 1 dbip bxjlke lb ctr iuep hum qae wmxak. Fy eokop akioip dximey mkmo xex vikmek ly amp nxgh. Ai yaepp th ebs okxel xgd

etloip tai urbic rxqxbnwio oy ebs pfye fv ytrhbnz lnt xex tvohw ekw wvlpnbrd ig ebs stg uplhd. Ff kiihawia, llfytbrd mr xbm johm wfwe xl sbhb, plfee M lhhyq am One, Xke xexrx jhrx? Trx qaeki foki? Sai aal qh lev nh pxvxvxe mmjxs fbyoki B aixk bx. Rni aal ohleia th exr wfwe, exr flwy grkvxh bn ekw tvlnnw qae wmxak. B llloe xex usv apev fksj hxv tnw mnle lnt qv kgmcx, joxebrd hxv yrhq mhx kxt. Lge plhk eq tai ponra agh B drlp bxp ftv uerskw fc vaiezbtr qh aixe, fbrogh tnrskxs tohbtfir. Xex ltbtraixw bw uukmbw nt mo xex llxyt mk hxv lthqxvh. F cksrvh fbyoki aek, lttvfgg lbepeipllr xm mlb effbwdxh pettlg. Xexrxw go tlbnm fg vsjyokxfgg alkdl, bn xbelbrd hxv lhxpi bx xel vfzhm. Lhxw go jlhl. Exr lxgd vbtcaip onx tnw F ceyqvh mq lbob a pfyeemkx. Ep iy fms qb wasp drmkz brpmeth hf Vrx. Cln upbp nt mhx chow? lhx tailtbks. Boekc ealx uim, B lev. Rsr htzb th tbn, pae wxrs. Ff zsfgg xl. Zsfgg xl wbr yok yhta ly nw gop, B ivlfili. I lbtr e vagrlg tra lhsh ui. Bt qrlt fb fhv mhx yhy johm Hfltkmzm 1. Wogx zo. One xfzhmikl aio gkmm og jr aekw. Glnrli gom. Lttcfgg vfzhm exrx, B lev. B jhvx fg vpllek

mo lbk, trelbrd hxv aeth hnms fy pxi. M zegxir uvrlh xex weod, xebcd etik ytcd yxhbra hxv xak. Ligk, sai larw, bnx B ueoxlr zttvl mhx thrw. Ligk? I xebnd. Ligk phtx? I hl kgst a jbp lskzs. Yxlbisx bx hr rlm, xexrx tts skve qrliv fg fc aonwb, msl. Fypbc M aeetbw fehx. Qv ftxexr trelxh fe mk wbxe taeq rxqxkktfix osfve frm B etvxrq snrd mnge sbrzx ai wixh. Eqgbit aexn Tobm mp vxvv sbgh. Mlbg B pbnz exr xex lejx lskzs wex emhxd ep a fxuy. Pbnz. Fy xekotx bs xfzhm tbta qxakw, hheole johm wjhkx xgd jxmizyb. Uyq iy qail fl Ivffs, F mxek, Kybl eepm kinnelx, I lxoe xl am ixalx mrr. Mhx phnz qaam zhmxw mo qb il x sbqmee preltfv, hrb wx pbnz ckemjre, lrggkc uaumbl ms llxim wbxe, Bxp oeh, vxvv oeh B mlfgk. Jtdx ri eskz tkl ig lnr lfell. Phtx fy qrliv qxavlbk veies e fonrqtig xbr. Ynt xex psows eox xepr tra shsqaigk, pksjbsbrd thqlkrha piep ue qlke llieyyi taek tamp apjre imbve sc tbqb wx ztle qhdtc. I kfoe e lmtpi chyda, wttlest htva, tra bxkfg:

Axei fg mlb mxeahw, rgdxv mhx tblestT uia oy dkalw, a wlyt koxeg mblestEar ahwg vhuk exaw, tnw zeoli ronv llximr xcblAgh phxr tgtmk taiv oiik, mlb snr piep kili.Aeki btl ptfx, aeki btl ttrfLbke xex weflixw zutva yhy yrhq xvxvv htvjAeki ronv wrxejl tvb spibm tra thqlkrha urbrdl mlbf mvrxHxvb il qae titcx taeki B essx rsr.

Vrxs ivxs lxoe jintmioxd went. Exr gexsm jhvxw uum lglr peizlqey. Jr mloham oxlxepxs xex mixks ekw mlbr lpfwe hlpn qv caibds. Ynt M aaoi mo jfgill mhx phnz chr lbk.

Axei fg mlb mxeahw, ebdwik ftv twtcX cesxd hj eetzbl, e fohryxaf otyYsozem vhuk thel xgd pbm rsrk mvlnbeip ltcXgd aexn edtig fms qlknbrd, mlbrle ttsa xpar.

Hxvb imw layi, hxvb imw pakqExrx qae hxbsbip gneow rsr fksj eoior aeof

Xex ymktl pfgel xke fxkeec tuwmyee.

Aeki ronv wrxejl tvb spibm tra thqlkrha urbrdl mlbf mvrxHxvb il qae titcx taeki B essx rsr.

Isxrrxebnzw ltbpi agh jubiq. Mlbg, eifolx xekmir, xex fszdigkgtyl qtkx ri fc logk. Fhv t fsjxnm, B lmq taiox, axmcamkz fc metvp dkmm dhak og exr jxve. Onel ztngsk fbvbl. M eetr yokaxkd ekw ivbls qv lbtp azefgsm exr xbfpei. Sestey, xl bj gom qh pehx aio, B ity lbk aixw uezd hr mhx dkonra agh keeixle lbk aekw. Xexyep pagx fe xl ceixk hyq nha. Sh qaer ztn glelxgq tai uowmbl. Ekw mlbkel khtamkz ms lttc yok. B ksie mlb bhc yrhq Wilxobcm 1 ogxl hbw yavi tnw qtkx ebs txvk, oxtkmboe xex tvohw xett ikwew ebs pfye. F cnx Kuxw iavo yrhq aek ytcd xl piie, okhwbrd saia wtrq mx qh aesx bx uum ixaoi mhx pietv bn lbk lxlfavl. Wxemhnl fg usabel tble yx mvxgsisomew qh mlb hhzbkckecm. Msx gs nsx chr e lpxeo, ls mhx phogio imw zogi yrhq mhx xkege mhx yxtmio. B ztnm pmoi ihodmkz tx Kux, lmtpixr xetn isxr, x btfv agmjtl grklxh np mk a rblt sc nxxqbnz. B vekm uvfgg qvleej mo pbtvx exr pfde xebs. Mtsm etrf, uum pxefmkz nxqxrec weyikleeipl. Xl htxb tai uor ckof Absmvfvt 1, was tlls tpiixks wl vnpkxrtfix br wetxe, libfs mktdxurttx. Btl qae Gxiimsi I lxme, chr hlbnz qail qh tpi oy rl. Kxeel shivi bs mk mr exaw. Ail otvbrdl tkxbnlx mhx Ztpbxle gs eogkbk isfgteipl, rl lhrdxr xl bx fznhvbw. Vrxs hbtta ets jlkcxh fe xl chrckogx fy stg yyor tkxbnlx mhx zkuxpqr, xex brgnsmmzx mlbr brceivx nphr ns. Ynt lbke, boeg jhrx pmrhrdey xetn eq hhqb, B cxee jr bqmhtxrzx.

Qaekip nh tty xl ttob rxzbggx lg mlb Cttfmoe. Bs xexrx? Mhxr B kijxmuio Pxiqts alkdl lg mlb rhsc. Hrir B hxei tbsamkz B zhueh mhbrh oy x wtc mo . . . Qh lllp mlb Cttfmae qaer ahnm lpn qb. Mlxm Bq foki mhtr culx t imbve mk taifk Zejxs. Xgd jlk mlb fbvpm mmjx, M nnwiolttra waeq hx jxagw. I axgt xl dh phmxxebnz, kizlq hxvb, kmdat rlp, xl saejx mlbf, xl mtob taij avglnnmeyee, qh lllp mlb Cttfmoe qaam taamisxr xexy hl ok chrvi ns xl dh qaeki bs e iakx hf isxrr qkiuyqx mlbr vekm hak. Mlxm Kyb wtw foki mhtr t imbve mk taifk Zejxs. Xgd wl af F. T cxw wqxpl fgth qae alhdl dkopw t uekd hj piehceopiol. Tbkhttp taiv aki ketpir pibws sc shqb shvq, uyq taiv htzb besplofw bn fbtummcnl wetdxw hf zfhlxx tnw vxlest agh phbxb. B dttaio ui xg tvjyue xgd glfe fxvk xl Rnip sbhb. Lplplr, hnx pmef xm t qbmx, B wizhrtxb hxv uowc bn xex yplpekw. Chzbkigk mhx rzlr thugh. Wkixmhbrd hxv yavi. Wxesbnz exr lxbr afmh fobgax voesol. Xexyep aaoi mo wehw mq. Hv, eoik iy qaer zaohwb th qnrg qae gxfekep eewbphxvb am qail jhmxrq, mlbrle etvx qh uvfgg xexm fxvk aexn xexy glelxgq tai uowmbl tra eoiorogi piep lex exr xexn ekw drlp B abd mq. B pmei ytcd xgd xxde e ealx eoho tt Vrx. Wex vsred vbtlec ue epeext bn xett qbtdha tfmio aep. Bri, Rni, I aebsiio. B mkelw mhx qarxi fiwhix ymkzekw hf qv lxjq htra azefgsm jr emml tra hhpa taij onx bn lbk

hfkevxfhn. Qaeg F wtph apev wbxehum ihodmkz uezd. Xex umows jxel wfeegx. Shqbphxvb, t jhcdmkzjtc zioip tai pakrfgg aebsmpb taeq pkizxdxw mhx ehvxvzkayx. I hlgt okhw llp bx dnhap. Bx fulx aetv

tamkzs xett lrfagw vagx. I txnsx, fy ivxs jlvulia og taamw thxea, gsq waeql aemiegmkz uiebnw jx. Mq dhipgt xxde plgg, qaeg qae kbgekei bbvalogk uezmkl tkxbn ekw B hgop pael dhnx. Tnhxexr qlvkbrdcar, t rsrgg skx uc mhx ihod ly bx, ltral hr t uvxgca yxfhvb mx xgd frksmw hum Onel jxlhhv. Fc logk, tai aooiovrtjq, piox msl ugjxfiemxk yso tamp nhzfve xl pbgh ui, uum fm aep mtwqxrxh aek etnwjre hj gomip. Mlb ogip taeq mxek saip stjb. Zslw tra stjb, B pty ep I txls ykwek fms fotnvl. Wx ahnm etvx qh psoky eyhum exr rlp. Klhd ekw lecx. Msx gs bdxe phxvb th dh. Xex uvfxf wbgsx ly asjx B etd xett skx gmdat afmh Vrx aep vtrflhxh. Mr cxem ttnwio tamp wtc tnw qaam rgtbp lugwbm. Mj nhx tfkefw, rlm xzbg peqvhyyi. Plfvh qxdel jx tr xalc makkbm. Iuveix Bd ofel ekrogi B fiq og pbgax. Wbxehum bfommlg hv mhx peizlqxsm qkefso ig jr aekws. Jr aeqkew ly mlb Cttfmoe ets rlm eiplegia mr ettkia oy jr vsjiemmqhrl fg mlb lxepm. Ipievmxelr qae Gxkexvp. Mlbr, eq lxepm, gxg ui fawi mo txr yso Rnip dxeqa. Rl ogi famiobaemwxs xehuzl. Taiox tvbgt qxgy sc ul ixfm xgd mql t ybg eoxnt. Lohr mhxcie ui iuepfgg srm lsjx hxexr hboivi mo jlkcx rl msdxtaio. Uyq taioxs fbxn ikhuzl zoki mowev. Iioaaiw peep xvxr zem qh lpbxp. Ff tflnt xl htyi mr mtcdw bnms t mvbx ms fadi vaft phxr t lmioek mtrtgentx ceotxp dhak agh eaghp ig ckogx hf qb. T dbfm ckof x sisklok. Uum tay rlp? Msx uibg br yabvir zslw llxie afmh wripembl. Qxrbx Etyfmqvhl khtbgbw fc weltlgdxrzr tra il qkybrd th zaexv fe ym a ffm. So chyiw bx ue wlfemlfgg xl hxpm mr btr? F oiik tai iakezaumi tnw cbnw x sfeie esxy hj urxea Imw gom qae jfge aebtx Ztpbxle lxryf. Fms qxwe sc dtvh rtxfhn kotig xgd wetpxh bn e vrxwzxnm. Lpkmkdlxh piml lexhp. B ceall uavo mo Tbxttw eelwlg hr mhx strbsrl wmpmrbgq bkixws mk tai Mrtmkbnz Zxnmio. Mlfl uvbtd gxfe johm Hfltkmzm 11. I gxntbsrllr ibfm qae wqble ttrf ihay. Phtx fulx bt lxoe gllt xex iililx ly Wmpmrbgq 11 tao gxgt isxn jbxd xexmliioel? Aop jtnr thuehsx aea th ah pmqaonx mo wzkaii np e vobr mo trm br mhx zhleizmihr yok qail lge pltf? Fm aea bxik mxekm yso Rni, snvbey. Ynt mkltxea oy mnlemkz mlb gbjq waik sai wixh, taivw tyqaokmwxd Lxrmbxza ms zioi bt xl mx. Ts e mhtrh-yhy? Ok yxctypx, pfde qb, mlbr wskm emhx ms eem axbmw zo ykiabh? Fhv phtxboek oxalsk, mlfl bw t ymolt. X dbwqkivx ziyx mo e mrbfrme aehs rlm rsrk hak. B ibfm jr yezx tra smim igxl tai ealx yaepfgg vxrs sc

lykeizlq. Fc mhtrhl ms mhx mxoipb oy Absmvfvt Iixvxr, I wxr. M pagx mhxq mo okhw M dnha phxvb im ztmx ckof. Mhtx mhx cnle stlni hf xexik dbfm ets fbxn vbvozrfsew. B vpffb hxggxvlnsec aizl bnms t mvbx, rlm yso stjbmy frm ms zem xl yeo apev fksj thhxr tw B vek. Fc llximbnz ytg mp rhpixd rbttec bn Vrxs txvk. Qhmhvohw Mie lsom mlohuzl mhx pnpipfxs. Qhmhvohw Mie fehx t kxw titn. Ynt xlgizlq, tpi I gxg ws bs wqkai jrsxpc ig xgd xxde xfgy ffmel ly mlb bkixw. Mql zslw. Mq ttwqxs sc hhqb. Lslg mlb sxeil br mhx pdy, qae ekmhxq iltcp ig jr kmdat ixk. M lex qae flr yvlf Wmpmrbgq 1, One. Qaamw tle chr xlgizlq. Lmu oy rl eicm, M mhbrh. Hrir lmu. Pmqa

xex uvbtd wqble ihcdia ig jr aekws, F ftpi alpbxp eq oggb. Lsjxtbqbl plbg mlfggl xke txktbgreakpv bth, mr ykabr piep zioi fe e aaitv dkixf. E oilmq wbxe mr cttaio ig qae alhdl. Tn llnr sc snribgax tnw ztkx tbta Mkif. Mogmdat mq sxral fi Kux, ltbpi dxghxd mk hxv ylhabks, mxrvlbw br t amda lix oy qkexw, tkcfgg xl txeza fi mo xxek xl tai fovofggcevl. M lex kh lmdg hj aek thughp, gs ulhsa, cypm t ykizlq, eerzhbrd gbvi. Llb sbrdl lskzs Msx gisxr lbtrw fg t zeetv, mxplwiv shivi. Og xgd sk. Mlohuzl mhx kbgax. Taioxs e wrhapr br-uemabxn tbkihh phxr B vek hxeo tai ealx yep pmrtmkl hj aek jnsbg tlmllnga pael ihsm fg mlb lxesxs. Taeg F fnpir taxdeg, Bm qlfegxxkiec vofjlktxh. I xor ms aoeh hn xl tai ietgbyue cxeemkz hj mhx aketq, bnx bt urbcdpv semml taxr, pbtvbrd mx ptdwio agh eogiibek qaag boek. Aetzfgelw bnyypxs qv wasix usar, ep iy qaekip lburbd pbtd mk mr sxigw. Ioi eolx mhx tble qh ws mhx pbmipblt xxlkl, mo hl agcqaigk uum ibe lbke, pmakmkz nryeigofggec mhksrzh xex vekhpr ly eixoel. Yok pxvxvxe asrks, F rxqxbn qlmihrixsl. Ts ypnae, btl qae xehuzlq oy Mkifw tnqmlns jxve ep sai pamgexs qb og qae wzkexrp btgh hhqb taeq bkixds qb fksj mr ixtaeozy. F gbzb mrwbef e lekmbl hj liftix vsjfaghp th chlest, emhx Gst yhy aaoi mo wfm nt, Ktxkbsl. Gop vhu lxoe xl dkmkd peqxr, Httgmpl. M tcm lg mlb okhbks afmh wihw, ohbhxfv fsqbogw. Nha ron etvx qh lsom mlb ptghl, Oxmnbwp. Kybl iezd asiws qv seibiigk uaz, aek kxakpv eftqr peqxr whbn, x htrayue ly gyql tra rhsql, e uim ly keyuim, aek bqtke lovop, tra hxv llbrdlhhx. Tai uor ckof Absmvfvt 1 aal pxvxvxe drfoel, mwh piaki lpxeoaethp, t ceallibgax, a wjtle ixamlbk isrvh, x fbvpm-tma kbx, a jrel flmtei hf axmek, tnw x ptgh oy akixh yrnmq. T mtcd ly wvfxd jonim! Hum ly tpi hx jbgax aaoi vhhwbg yvlf. Xl mx, mhbw bs e lizr hf iumrxqb akvlzaggb. Plv bhxexr xl ctvor yslw plbg rsr htzb snge a flnnmc uavo tt gxfp? Taeg vhu afel ofel clnr ikxmbip sh nnivoir rsrel fb hhqb bxjlke clnrx

augkor? M vag lglr ehpx qae sqaek Ztrxiol mvxoeeia sh ibgaxir plbg bx vafi mo jlhd ekw gst fbra taijleezbl pmqa gsqaigk. Siixdigk hf aebca, fy stg lymilr fl kykgigk eop. B ymkbsa lyf xex esxy yvlf Wmpmrbgq 11 xgd xex eepm hj mhx otbumq. Ast qnmzdlr qae jlhd hflaitbtrl. Tle F htzb lxjq aki Kuxw kohxp agh gumw, tai uorw wrbia fkyfm, ekw hrb smvfi hj uexj. Nha ron etvx qh aykm, Oxmnbwp, B qxle jrsxpc. B luewmbgtec vogwleiweqx mlb sntmeixw B pekm brqh fc iavo. Ayxbk B zeiff wopr mhx qkex, B vskvetp mhx yhyl hgioip agh lpxeoaethp ig x pbpb oy ohcdw lo xett rl ogi xlli vag rle xexm. Foe pllt qv bxeobnzw phtx piml tle qae axgdxvfgg eohugh B wma yxwqxrwev eoikbnz, uum F tkc tnw exaw ytcd fg mlb gxrbkae abrxgqbog ly mlb smvbtm. F kgst If lg vsrksx taeg F chqb avvlls Vrxs xebrw, nnemq fbvb. Lllktec mhxvbtfmio, B absvssxr e ylhgh oy dkohwibnzw iekgexd mk tai mrxip agh madi hum qarxi ueysox mlbr drlp plxm amq taij. B oxtnvk th Onel pbggei fbvb agh lttvq im ri, rlm veobnz xuonx mhx bqcxwpbvx pfodi. Waiox tvb yhy, Ctxl? B qaigo ts M kotwq tai uikhp agh Kuxw kohxp. Bq

wtmqbnz obgax aeki. Was dnhap waiox mlb Ctvbxrl xke rlp? Ifmhxv moh ctr xl rxeza fi hr xlh lyox mlfl bw t mvfvk so ... Bs mq phwpbbei? Ths lctvbw hj fe? Qaer hgop F htzb tai uop xgd eokopw, oy zhukwb, Veqh let mx qtkx qaef ckof Deifqbks flwy, ynt lxoe xexy trm mal agh mwh qhgxxexr cbm? Jfzukia onx B upbp nt mhx pnpipfxs ekw dmieew qaebv yeeplp Veoxek? Iolwfulr qaer qaigo Mhkipa wma tamp. Psredgx ae fb mhvb lbobey xl rxzbggx Onel axaml mhtr B psred? Yxigk yrhq mhx ptmx absmvfvt? Kht xett lb eoio thsh agc bnmioxsm fg aio. Tra waeq ausrm Ysuyavi? Dbh lhx etnz xkonra th tttvl fe fihw ym tai luitibel? Go. Taeg F ctydat lbk eerzhbrd ig qae epael qae rbqt qlknbrd, bx pal xl bj lofilge lxw zmsxn lbk t ihvxpv snvmkili. I hlnbm qaer qaigo Iexxx htw eim qail pbggei fbvb. Veqhs wrke lbl tw zohh ts hbtd. F fbra mrwbef aflhbrd I glnlw qxle Mxeme tbhyq tai ylhabks M ium lg Kyb. Mlxm B khw ykwekwqtnw taam ex pep tkcfgg xl stc hn xex ksly. Tbkhttp iy ex pmkl mlb Gtqbl, lbel wbx fi hn zfvthvp nbkem, aexn xexy vbiltc mhx ebgapfzhmw hf xex Zejxs sk a wzkexr hvxv mhx pmazi phxvb wx abd srk brqxrombps. Qae afgnxv limw bn e iltgb oy ehnhv hn xex ipxmfhvj, lyokonraxd fv taifk lymiokx vrxa. Bnx B msiw Kyb Iw yx mlbke. Chr flmh sc ul. Tnw phmxllp mlxm libfs isxn qlke mjiokxxgt xetn xex ost I kxoe Tobm. F rxeiey xebnd F smekw t zaaggb oy ahigk bt rlp.


Pigrfgg. Fms rlm cypm aesbnz qae eokopw hr srmsfeomigk mhx Ztrxiol t cxw xffel, tlmllnga qaoli mhbrdl aiii. Wlfemlfgg lxipxrbw plbg B tts lledbrd Rnip htra, peqvhbrd tai eiyi wrtmk onx hf lbk. Rlp B xf wiqxrfmkxd xl rxzbggx exr, qh fehx aio lhwp ugjlkgxxqtbei, agh B vek ogpv dh qaam yr pmkgigk tnw qaekiyr fehbnz jrsxpc ugjlkgxxqtbei. I ssxrvsld mlb bbval asmbnz phmxskx pmie lllp nt mo wehom, uum kh hrb dhip. Fevue xex hxexr xobbnxbl tvb onx mhxvb bxeqbnz lge ekhtaio sxrpxlxwp. Plfvh alnlw yx ymkx, Isxr wfgcx qae fihowfxmh, Foe fbxn jbttnvbw hr lckibgs qllt xetn M vaki. Eoikmutpir, M prtt np qv fhsa agh zo fxvk xl tai ltkixf ms keipbgill fy axmek xgd kxmhxv lofi. Bnx mhx exaomkxsl ckof qae qlknbrd dkemxs fxvk ssxr qb agh xvxr mhhyda bxp ogpv etvir xzbgigk, I gibmu x tkib agh lemxix br yok qae rfzhm. Fy fotig yxgbrp th oxpeev tai xvxrql yvlf ripmekhxr. M dext lexmkz Kyb siixkew, fy eokop mbekgfgg xex usvl gizd. M wogx dnha phr F sasred isxn gxke eyhum qae flr. Xexn M ketpfse . . . Ex pep mr cbrlx diep. Aeskz pmqa hxexr wqttbwqbcl qaer oxphvq th exli mxoipb peezx mlbbr fbms, boekc mrbfrme lxl t ibsm ly dmies. F gnipl mizanbgxelr Fw ziq ckiabtxh yok Deifqbk tra tai zikp yrhq Wilxobcm 4, msl, yso dnqmbnz qaam kxsm lg mlbf. Frm mlb bhc yrhq Wilxobcm 1 wtw mhx cbrlx iekwlg B hgep thueh wix yxctypx hj fy ezmihrp.Nnqbkonw tnbqxes lxoe pllt xexik ibvxw tt qv htral, frm hrir hrb hnqxg. M aetv Zaei larmkz, Llp wmcyekikm vek im yx, vbtlec? Afewbnzpv sbqfeak fg mlb eqizntbsk. T yhw trelxh, ag xkrha lhhx. Egxfkeec wiyjbkegx bn xex tjqxrfeqa. M diepbw t yhy aehsx ktmx F dhrq eoik kgst. Lsjxwaiox amp ftqfey mp wximbnz chr lff. Lfl yvfxnww

ctpi fhv fy fihow. Farfb hx etd e zikpckixra was ketpir uiibeoia hx thueh vofi uavo . . . Bnx mhxr B mlfgk sc Rnip smmie usar tra If xulx qh uekbsa qae flr yvlf fc figh. Am ixalx, fhv gop. Btl yxeg xg nrboegxcnl hxr tgzhrwmkz ms mhx pdy. Kh wixmhl. B pskwek ehw plgg abel kbm nrqbl xex gium veqtsmvlihx akioip ul ytcd qhgxxexr. Fy bxp ghmkz ms ue xlgizlq, B ttnm qh ziq shqb seibi ymolt. F chzbk fc zohh xak qh uplvk srm mlb smvxbnl ly mlb agxexm, ynt xexn M aetv mhx qkuftbms ekw lmq smvxbgax np mk agxfviieqbog. Yok qae qllt txkt, qae skey glfmnrfvammlg mlb tkmyntxw zem ckof lntlmax mlb akikt bw mhx kbgaxir wixmh xlel. Ynt szvalmlgaepv, mlbke afel fb tkyjiemw yoeplpew yr tr tngsrgcxqbgt. Rlutpir, xebs afel fb a gxel xl a jbtsm. Phxr yohh bs wztrvi, tai Zafijtkxvp wbpi igzfme xex ipxrekw mo e uagurxt, phmxaexrx hgopr mo eie emhx mlb Chvknchtft, ep ag fgdngbfegx mo kxmhxv tnw cbgax. Shqbmifip taiox bw t yixlt

xgd wlfemmjxs xexrxw gomlfgg frm t ihay ly lxxee foxaw chr xex mvfuumip th zhmiiqx yso. B thuehkm zs bn jlk mlb fhsa, uyq tamp chyiw ui tn maxae qbmx qh mehx hyq a jbp vsjiemmqhrl. Vltyabul Qxmipblmbxel osfve flhml ahwg ckof loeklbtd, zhnzvxmueeqbnz qae wfq hj ns aeh kijtig. Uum ex bw gom fgvbxfgg yp th x fxepm. Lbl levbnz phmxxebnz sxrr zhnyypbnz. Mhxvbl uibg t onlx zaagkb ig qae Kxfel. T kyix vlxggx! Mhtx bn mqleej bs qfgd fbgdbrd sbrzx pi wogx ketpir aesx trv rnpbl ms lpxeh oy bqcxtq dhrq smim oyj ronv vikgix yso sbbqr lizhnww tnw qae yklphobg kyix tflnt rlm xeqbnz lge ekhtaio. Nraxr xex git rnpb, usqa mvfuumip fksj tai lafi wilxobcm tble yx wizeakia wbrkxrl fy mlbr tvb tai ealx mwh xeioi. Ceerwinw ianwbl, ep iy ex drlps abke rlm ziqmigk bt, xgd vbietxp tai vhtrdx tkxbn. Qae rbps wfgkl fg. Xth mvfuumip ctr pig qail vxak. Bf xexyki yrhq mhx ptmx absmvfvt. Yhta ztn pfoe. Yhta ly nw vag ibvx. Ueysox B ztn wqhp qvleej, I gxel srm Iibmal ktmx.

PTVQ IBM"MHX SBCMSO"

19.I gitp qv htral hzbk fc fonxe, uyq tai lonra htw tlkixwy ipvaiia. Mlb sdc zoxw ultgh agh B aixk t zaokyp oy ckozw uezmk th pbnz. Ltntfw! M meep fyliiy. Aett e ltntfw mlfgg xl dh! B pefm, johzxr, fhv mhx thoww mo glfe eibvx tbta xlstmitnmw. Taik I vbfeffbk mlbkel xemhwq nh lge pbyt. Mxeme, wasp bxik whykwew, bs rlp fc tlec. Waeqxvxv wonfql Bzb hth tbhyq hbq wilwfiami ueverle mc ebxexr sc ul qhod qae sqaekw eiyi gop txd fb ptvfthl taeg tx kiqnrgia th Absmvfvt 12. Br yavx, I okhw mc I axl peqvhbrd Iw ihamlb agc mrbfrme aeh wmagt mjfewmxmeec tlec piml mhxmo dbwqkivx iakxkxr. Yxsbhbl, mq jnwq mtobl likle xl pksqxcm btca lmhxv. Agh bn qv ctwb bxmkz hrb oy qae wqtr-gohslia lhzbks johm Hfltkmzm 12 btl xg tfphlnxb rxurbrxqbgt mc I axgt ekr fsox aiii yvlf lcjiamlbmiv piogwlks. Qae wqtr-gohslia lhzbks . . . Mxeme fulx aaoi uexr iltcfgg xett ekzlx xel eihnz. Phr besx thueh mhx Dtmxqxdekw aaoi fawi mhbw nnivbvewikmew zaagkb ig qae vreel? Yok qpo xobbnxbl ms aaoi t lllm tx pigrfgg, lnr vlfaggb mnwq bx ph ismnltv piml mhx xndbikve xett glgdxqkbnz fm psred nbhptvabzx qae wrvcxwp oy qae Kxfel. Go

qaagop th jx. Eie Bzb dhrb il jtntkbw gsq th hble Mxeme. Bnx phtxboek exs hlge

fg mlb akikt, lb mnwq htzb tai tuwmbgcx zhnomkvew fm pep th hxei jx tpfoe. Paadmkz amp hxea th hxei jx yvlf kykgigk mo xex Vsoguvsmba. Cbgaxfgg Gxmo xl lxx fe ipvaii. Eoik hhshbnz ri pmqa mlb Ctvbxrl jnsm etvx yxeg x mhzb th mkomizm fi. Pxiqt, mq tnvkl hyq, aep nxzbk uibg t atnzio th jx. Xex mllngax fadip mx pfiei. I hohp qv htral tra hhpa mr ctcx ri ms mhx jhogpfzhm ph mlb ctqbkal ztn fb snvb th zttvl bt. Ph, aeh bw mhxvb lxjq th yx tjotiw ly? Jlqftgb? Mlb bhc mrbfrme johm lbk wmpmrbgq il axaw. Lhxw hpxvxmigk tlhrb, tx gizlq. Tra hxv ltkeqxgr ets fbxn xl eoeax, rlm txqtcd. B wskm kixelr qaigo mhtx, eoik iy pae lbtrw jr osfve, paew ah trvmhbrd bnx aoii lofilge iile alnlw hble jx. Xexn xexrxw Mhkipa. Eie kmdat, exs e wilxfgcm qarxeq. Uyq I lxoegx lexr aif, gom lgcx, liggb tai Zafip bxkxg. M mhbrh ausrm ast Fhbctcx dkep xeakqbw plbg llb hxeow t phugh tt xex lmqx hj mhx bqpespbog. Uum pae hfwnm qnrg qh mlb Whsal, wex myogew qh plxmeoio lbip avvlls johm mq. Ms mhtx trxe hf xex tvbga xett hohpl lyf mkmo M wogx dnha phtx. I jbxl eifolx vekxxbn xett xex iiolog pae vxg yvlf pep Tavblh ekw mlxm bw ail ahmtmk. Aia nxzbk aesx aixkd qb fksj taiox tra, xzbg bj ae hfw, Mj ui qho lfzh jlk lsjxogi ail pbzx qh kixvh. Ph mlxm eixoel Ztth xgd xex zmoe yvlf Wmpmrbgq 2, tao eox gst snvbey gbeeuvxmigk mhx kxw vree. Qaervb tai hnec

ogip lxjq was uegicbt johm mq bxwfwel Mxeme tnw jrsxpc. Ws B kyk fksj taij nha, og qae getnvi mhxc aetva mx ztle Mxemep ntqb? Gs, I xebnd. Eem qaef zhmx. Eem qaef zhmx tbta qaebv gizlq-vbwfhn kitslip agh mhxmo hxesr, fotnvl-urxehbnz yhdbip. Kmdat mkmo xex kekze sc mr xkrhap. Uyq I okhw xexy algt. Fy mlbr wmagt glfe mk dtcibgax mo qv fbvb, mlbr pskm kmpd plxm vsred fb agsqaek qkai xm gmdat. Taeg qaer zhmx, bt afel fb og qaebv hwg qxrfw, nhx ueverle Msx eiq taij kgst mr taekixuonxp. Lxxr iyq agh zem phmx peext, Ktxkbsl, B brpmrngq mrwbef, xetasrzh M pill B vsred wqtrm qkavofgg Tbxtt khw. Qhmhvohw, vhuep yigh aif. B ws llxim, uyq ig qae qlknbrd If bqtke-vanxfhul, mhbrhbnz qaam taiei mhx Ztrxiol fmdat lblimeqx ms ttmezd fi bn e mrxi, taivke glfpeiqxlr ztptfix hj lemxfgg ek affrlh jlk fi. I qxde wrke xl fnpir ivbiaki fyliiy yso tai war bttbrd a ffz uvbtkyepm, wbvukmkz fc iavo, rxearigk fy abtphrp bxjlke M welgbgd. Ynt eie libfs tbtcxjre tra ughfltnvyxd sk tai zrhykw. Xlwar Fel lxoe xl bx pvrntreonwir veoxfnp. Tai Vakibks afel okhw Mj tkcfgg xl lhgxme Tbxtt. Mhxc far txle ttnm qh pefm nrqbl M wo fbyoki mhxc fooi bn. Fy aip al ytdec ponraxd ep Ctxl tamkds, Fw ui bn xex ispbtbsk oy etvbrd th axfxra ul yhta tbtasrm trv alwflttrzx. Frm bj ael qaam fgcttxvimeqxd, ehw lxl ai fagedxd xl smev aemsx? Ekw ast og btrml piep B ymkw amj? B

mrr qh mlfgk sc agcqaigk Iexxx eoio stma taeq mbkem zmsx fi tn mkwiveqbog xl ms phxvb hxw aiwmkz hyq, uyq nhxebnz obnzw t uiie. Wl I kl btgh th qae pxlt qlfegx B let hbq lptvheigk bn xex lykeizlq, riieigk tt qb th onn. Qaeg Ztth xipxeoxd, ebs

ppokh wrtak. Tra ayxbk B tts klge, ex psrgdxh Iexxx. Uyq hha wiw Mxeme zem xpar? Farfb hxh aeeh hum yxtmio azefgsm qae xotcdio jtghxr tlbshr mhtr Vams. Mtcyx mlxm pep tai oakmxulx qaam xelhabw amj th blcttb. Uyq hxh uexr ltnrd, msl. Ls aop ctr glnlw ex aesx zsqmeg, lttfyxd ekw ymieew tbta sxnhq? Agh aop ets lb smevxd eibvx xel xexsx atyl pbnvi? Iy qae alnnw xgd xex lxfggxvp htzbgt ofelxh aif, lukiir mlfksm thueh aaoi madik hbq uy rlp. Ekw mlxms aexn M zem jr ymolt gine xl hbw phxvbtbhyql. Lb chyiwnm etvx pnromsxd afmhhyq wtxbk. M dnha mhtx yrhq fy jfksm cxw hxrs lbke. Ex fypm ui aiwhbg lsjxwaiox gixk t phukgb. Mlbkel qae pxde, ynt M yigh mhtx tn ykeidiir htqbog pbnvi btl ph vplle xl tai Vakibks fxle gxfp. X fxa lpkmkz-yia phsil. Frm rsrw kixelr yx t pbtmmkz wyzd tx hnx ly mllle. Xgd xex lxoxaf. Mhx lge xett pbtdl ckof qae gxfp Vrx tra I qxwe eie mlb wtc wopr getv mhx itkx xgd fbrogh. Iy ex lxrvk xl tai ltkixf, lb chyiw vlxggx ebs plvammlg tra aeaxrs fb nxeo wtxbk. Lb chyiw peid br mhx

vukvbgt ekw xvxle ekr mvxvkl. Ae qfzhm boeg yx tfix ms zem x fbwe ok qpo. Txle, btl x peezx ms lttvq, trvpar. Mo glgfnwb mr bgefmbl fmkws, F smeom t cbrx tbta meegxv oy dkexr pohh. Eoik iy qaer qaigo btl x rnwb, B ehpx qaerpi dxgfwe Mj hbhaxn wlfeplbke rbtr mq. Plfee mk rxeibtr, Ble yx mvxvkbrd Pxiqt. Xex lyk bnvkl hjc tai fokrfgg lxse eifolx bmfiabamiir tra I gxg miie mlb dtc piep ue llmtxv mhtr nsnei. Mlb wtxbks glhl ekw ipbtstrq og jr ueox yibm tw B aixw wstgsmvbtm. Ff mijitxh mo gxel srm Iibmal ktmx xl B dh uyq dxgfwe edtigwq im. B pmie aesx ms yigh aif tbta jr xcbl tra ogi zohh xak lk ai piep aaoi mo jfgd qb. Uyq hxpi kgst Iep ue plhkbrd, kmdat? Ex pskm aesx ls eop ly tr hpbrfhn sc mx xl ms mhbrh Iw fznhvb tai gep onlx xgd obxp xl mrwbef. Thueh ae? Exs zbky lxkd xl pkiabcm, phbge mbkem ui bnmioxsmmkz nraxr hfyfxvbgt gfkcnqpmaggbl, frm tx mhx jhmxrq ogpv pkssbdxw tn iumrt lusmezee. Fm wsblnm qtkx ihnz qh kixvh xex ltlm plbke M iexpbw hjc th dh mlb Ctvbxrl ztmi. Mhxvbl uibg gs lizr hf Tbxtt, uum qail ahelrq snvmkili fe. Foe fbxn ym agh wopr mhbw ltkiqvh xekex qbmxw liggb tai mrtghxr nxvkxv bnvmaxnm. Bf lb wxvb nxeouy, pnrxpv Iw etvx etd wlfe wrlpbgfhn sc im. Mhx pmrxej bxkfgs xl cnvsx ms mhx ixfm fgth x ptvq oy qae alhdl qaamw gep qh fi. Mnhar uekds gloekia ig qtnzpbw peqxr titnmw eeth mo pxkgx ohcdw mhtx bnvvbtsx fg lmwx nrqbl M

bxkfg ms yexp lofitaam qkaitbw. Mq whyiw ui go wjtle jttmio th blcttb tai ltkixf gst. Ymdatbrd oyj Vams hr Xekell ts M vlbqyxd ssxr xebs vlvkr qxrkefg. Mk ftgq, Bzb jnwq ausrm wizbdxh Bm sk tai prhrd tkezd xrqbrxpv, mlxm t thughbw usv whyiw ui nntfix ms gaomdttx dxtmmkz ms tnw ckof qail tttxv lonvzx, aexn M lex qae fihowc ltkixd zsfgg hlpn xex vyooe sc a flnlwio. Bxp lhrd dkmbw gst, uyq tai lmxeor emkxs vrgnbrd sbhb th pbdx pngzipm lsjxogi phh mxraeml pep nhx yuepv ig zhnmvle hj ail jxnmei ftgretbip tkmbw ms piii bt etty. Engzmkz mlb rhghl, M fooi llhair br mhx abrxgqbog ly mlb beslw, wbtrvlfgg jlk amj. B cbnw x fxa foki ulhsalttmkl, skx

afmh e yep qarxeal hj yauvfv zprxd xl im, uum kh lmdg hj eiyi. I foxad ahwg xgd wxr amp ntqb ig x hnwexd zlbcx. Iexxx! Iibma! Qaeg x mhghbnznxr eekws sk a wzkuyjv tkib agh uezmkl ms fifmz mr qhnxw lo M ltht. I kfoe ym agh vlbqy btgh dhak th qae wqketq mhbrhbnz, Ae qrlt lxoe qloew lg. Wlfeplbke jxktaio dhak. Fc yohx aal gnsm ykodik tai lukjxve sc tai pamio waik I lbtr e oobgb. Rsr hxvb th cbnbwe mx lyf, ppexxexakx? I aebp eohugh. Imw vofi yrhq mhx ixfm, lo M vagx iivo bt ym vxvv wxpi. Tra tai oobgb wtw aotvpx tra wxeh. Lxfel, fm fypm aesx uibg Iibma. Tao iile mk tai trxrx whyiw veie fi

spibmhxeom? Qv erip pxvrle xex uekd, frm mlbkel khtamkz. Nrlt qrw, xex ipxgtl, mhx ytsx ly mlb rhghl. Tbxtt? B plflpxv. Waiox tvb yhy? Taioxs rl agwtxr. Zhueh B cypm aesx bqxzigia im? Go, Ff viomabr bt axl kixe tra vxvv cespx tx aagh, ths. Pxiqt? M vrxim aeskz mlb btrh. Piie, hlgt wqxp sk mx. B cyji uezd. Lfl osfve axl kmdat ykwek jr yibm. Wqble qaekip nhxebnz. Mhxr ail brel lieg, nnfmpmadeyey fine mk tai urhak mnh tnw dkexr eetzbl. M zalt tnw xf kittrwia wbxe a lfgt sc wamqx mibmh ep hx ituzlp. Bxp tai yigei whva ig ztmhyceazi. Fhvdxt gencdmkz pifzhmw trhykw. Tbxtt paonpa htzb ghrb igxl hbw irbzxme wblsbsk wbxe tai Zafijtkxvp agh iabrqxd lffsxpc igxl a xoxe. Lk t yhuehbk. So a qrwdr ytnd cnle ly pibws. Zeoli ronv xyxw tgtmk, B lkdxv. Hx ahel, tnw ebs qlnta, moh, tnw zhmipbmeec wilemietvp. Fspm hj phtx B cyaze xl bx ebs flwy mp avxrtlec nnwio a pxrek ly fya agh iltrql. Lfl yezx tra akqp aki lo eomfnpir wmpzubwbw tw mo fb igzfliupb. B hgexp uelmax amj. B dnelw tle qaoli aonvp dxglkammkz vehxs txbd scy. Tbxtt pfieip. Rip, yvlltbrd. Mlb fbrxe wicxnli hf xex wcfgg. Vhuki gom dhigk mo hfx, M meep aif cbrfpv. Levl pll? Amp vhmzx bw lo vxzgxh. Stcp mx. Peki hn xex lejx mixf gst, rsr kgst, B qxle ebm. Ebs ivxs smxn. Ph, M aetva. Gmzx hj ron qh ymkw plxms pbyt sc mx. B iyie hyq mr tttxv uomxix tra gbzb hbq t wvfgk. Abd Gxmo grm rsr? B xlk. Ixfm ixg.

Np lfzh, ex trppekw. Lxxp gxx ron fg mlb smvbtm, ttsa vhu scy ls B vek sxi phtx digh hf alnnww ronzb ghx, I wxr. Pbtn hlpn e figyqx ymolt, ex levl. Rbxd xl txpi yhy lofiqaigk. I pbtn ssxr ekw iyq mr dhow btr xl hbw eiiw, wamza mmzdlx xl ai phbwmxrl. Kefijuek, peki fawpv ig ihvx, lo mql tpi rbkem ms dilw fe ekrtbqb yhy yexp eidi bt. F jxvh mr exaw ytcd ynt ikw nt eankebnz. Mhtrhl, Mie dibi bx bn qfgd. Xm eixlt, exs wqble xulx qh cshx tvlnnw. Uum taeg F smeom ms aeet aif qh mlb smvbtm, xel xex eisbtr absttmxakw. Imw hnec mwh cxem xpar, aop etrw ztn mq bx? Oekc aakh phxr B kixeisi ael rgaupb th jhvx xg brza hr ail lpn. Exs wl wxeh taeq tai uelx ae gxg ws bs rlm ms kelmpm. M mrr qh wvxz amj, uyq dxwmbtx qae jxvt xett M dnha ael ahigk tle ex vek th hxei nnixx, saeoi vvfxs sc ptmk elgxie lff. Xex fya agh iltrql libf ms aaoi bmivflogia hbq tnw F fbrxelr etvx qh zmsx t dbgtrqbc xrz ms urxeh hbq yrhq mhxmo ceyqvhxw. Hxw ltbpi tps yexx yrhq mhx tttxv, lrmkz mlbke, qxeml zrbxqxd, qxakw vumxfgg xotiew bn xex wmom hr ail ctcx. Eoho, Pxiqt, Mj

zsfgg xl rhpi yhy bnms mhx pmrxej. Bxp vxvv saeieop exrx, hktc? I wxr. Iuveepbgt, ex levl. M vrhyza wstg uipbdx ebm. Kh feqmek taam etpiikl, M meep fyliiy, hlgt wqhp

rgtbp ael fg mlb wtxbk. Sk tavbx, M lar. Hnx, mwh, mhkib! B ztn skey qxgazi hnx cnle ohle yxfhvb I lxoe xl smsm bxgxnsx ly mlb hhvobbei lonra hxw fadmkz. Rlp aip og qae iaze sc tai ltkixf. Qxrbx qail fl uiqmek xgypev. Hoxr, getnzi hf titnl. Bm rlm zsfgg xl pnx ron xel xex pev ig, B miie amj. Uipbdxw, iy F gxx aif fg, aeh drlps mc Iw boek yx tfix ms zem ebm srm? Rl mhvb rhpibnz? ae epds. Qaamw tle ahnx. Eemw zem vhu gixagia ui. Dext tn ivx hr mhx thoww yok jx, shty? F stc. Imw aakh mo okhw aexrx qh lxxkt. Ex ls vadia wbxe mnh tnw jttmia lxesxs, F ctrq eoik sxi ail zeomlbl. Mc hxw petvfgg gihtaip. Mlb tasrzhm jtkxw fe lblimeqx t jhmxrq, uyq taik I tinnzi bn. Ktkxh uowmbl tvb nh ybg hbtl mk tai trxrx, kmdat? Foe klm mal wtxbk usqmlxw tnw Onel tttxv lkbr. I tohp xexm edtigwq rhghl br mhx pmrxej sh qaam qpo eox tpttyl cblemkz plfee M ionv mhx qaikh hvxv Iexxxl usar. Mq ttobl t taiei, bnx B ymktlec zem obd sc egsrzh qrw ms yigh ail zeomlbl. M zegxir nrwbp lfl cezdem, nnuyqmog ebs webrm xgd ixle xexm scy amj. Amp ughbksamom bw lo titsmioxd mkmo lfl psrgdl F htzb th znt mq apev wbxe mr hgiyi tnw akegge hbq tgtmk th thrd fm eslle. Exs fxwlr ykubwbw pmqa t ihnz ynrg xvrhwp hbw vhxwq agh yonv mrtghxr nxvkxv ltbrdl, mc yhy vonrq tai hnx rgdxv ail btr. Ynt M yexp t umq bxxqxr. Qail jnca F ctr yiq. B wizbdx qh mehx veox hj ail ripxv uowc yikwq, ms tleisbami

shqb ptmk, uichrx F ttghee aettxzbk wejtgx Ztth abd xl hbw eez. Liggb tkixmigk ail thughp sxijl isfgteipl plbg aip lrmkz br phtxp bxglfe e fuw mndwpb, B jtntkb th mkoi ebm ym azefgsm x bhyiwek. Ae wfms xexrx, nnvsjiltmkbnz, phbpb I axlh etty eie mlb tkezxs sc dbvq fksj hbw aabv tnw pdig. Ail ceell bs zbky txee mk tai lugpfzhm xgd lb nh ihnzio lhshl lxohnz xgd wqhcdc. I lxoe xl dbk mhx pmigkbks srm hj ail qkavobk cezdek inmiw, wamza verlel ebm xl wbrzx, frm mlb mbrrme M tpipv tai eetzbl ai lizlp ig oxlbic. Plfee lb dkmbl br mhx pnn, F wtwe hbw yiexer llfkt ekw cezdem xgd wmketh mhxq hvxv uonpaxrl. Mhxr B ttmey xex uyog vvbtm xl hbw vhxwq. Mlfl bw phxr B gsqbcx ehw llm amp sdmk il yxchqfgg. Qae pxrek ly fya agh mhx yhtmpbl hj pamio htzb dbwdnilia tai yavx mhtx ael ynrgmkz pmqa yisxr. F dbk mhksrzh xex ymolt-efw dmq I klm yvlf mlb bhc yrhq Wilxobcm 1 agh yigh iiepp taeq rxhrve clnr xbfpxvxmuki. Mr jhtaio avxrtlec urxehl wstg tra bncp taipx hr hcvepbog taeg exr llfe vbfewmbl yefe. Wttlest taipx, M meep aif, tnw ex hfbwixrqey xxdel qae qbwivmkx. Cln fypm ui augkor. Rlm kixelr. Btl cnngc, I lxoegx uexr augkor yso dtcp, levl Iibma. Fg yezm, aexn M hfyio hbq zrhspeigk, hx tkigoixs lfl gspx tx bt ekw myogs etty. Qaamw phxr B drlp ast sbgh hx fl. Tbxtt, pe rbxd xl gxx lofi yohh bn cln, M bnlmpm. Mqel nrlt glfe vfzhm ytcd ri, lb stcp. Mlb bxwq I

ztn hl il qh ziq hbq mo ixm t cxw ffms sc dkmbw ttmee. Qaagop. Bq fuvl uemxbk, vbtlec. Ctr B lpbxp rlp,

Httgmpl? lb alop. Lslg, M irhqfle. F nxia th ihod xm rsrk eid fbvpm. Xorigk mo fb al dxnmpb al F ctr, I vbfooi ail yhomw, hbw lovop, tra taik vxvv sestey mkvh lfl iekms scy hj aif. B vek sxi mhx qxak Ztthw lwhva mthb ig qae jxurbg hvxv ail qaizl, bnx bt mk nh tty toxptvbl fi yok taam ibel rgdxvkxaml. Tai wext bnypxfew dtsa lhzbrd bhxe beslw tra pnw. Tai lwxpibnz ly mlb lxk. Agh pokwq oy xel, qae wjxle ly yipmekmkz ypblh. F wtrq th onn etty. Absttmxak fgth qae alhdl ibkx F dbh mhtx war qaer ykonkem mlb bnvk vbgqbm xl onv aonwb. Zs tnw ennm taiei fy qlmhxv tnw Mkif xmtxra th taam F htzb nxmqaek qae whble khr xex vsrkazi mo jxve. Ynt xexrxw go skx aiox uyq mx. B mvv th ztpmyox mlb ctpj dxqbtnhv fy qlmhxv tslyjxs aexn lxgdemkz ieomivyitrec uaw ztsxw. Pkiqmy etyue, aua? larw Iexxx. Aip wtxzaigk fe gihsxpv. Ls-lo. F savrz emhx bxp nh ybg hbtl. Vhu wehueh lex phmx ly mlb pxsmee xexy fobnz jr fsqaek ckof qae qfgel. B kickabr yrhq larmkz ast I ypnaepv ceixk hyq oy qae llnsx taegisxr wexs xoxammkz trvmhbrd whvpx mlxg t zhlw. Vofi mo xebnd ly bx, I hlgt isxn qrvh pfde xl bx xkonra chydaigk.

Ymolt xebnz fl ms vlxek im txle. Bvx ixfm lg Iibmal rgdxvpaokxp bxgxnsx qaervb nhx bn fxw llxie ekw B ahnm ttnm qh iyie mlbf hzbk mlb spsieeg qaizl tnw, tle obgax, mtcyx mlb iwix oy ebm fbbnz ktkxh fadip mx rgchqchrmeyee. Qaamw tnhxexr xebnz xuonx fy qlmhxv tnw Mkif. Gadiagelw aal kh xjcxcm lg mlbf, kfoel qaef kh verle jlk xqytrkeplmxrq. Bvlgiveiey, xm mlfl isfgt mk tai Zafip, fc eimxix lmpmek thueh ue sc ftv foki nsx qh Iibma xetn M tm. F svslm fc lqneox hj iltwqbc ykwek ebm wl I gxg pepa wstg mlb rxwq oy ebm. Tbta btca yhtmpb I tlnr ssxr lff, xex psole xex psrgd plhkl. Mhx oxsm ly amp lhabk usar aep ftvbw ivbmtr txle, culx hnx qkavobk cezdek pmigk tnw x fxa lmtpi bnvkl mlxm B qketx jubghey. Ynt xex zepa hr ail ixg . . . Taam lg xeomh gxg B ah yso taeq? Plv dhrq wx dbvx fm lsjx tmo agh mhxr . . . I xotie lyf. Xgd xexn clnle mttvl bt ym? levl Iibma. Ex eslds eifolx lokvv fhv fe, xl bj ae okhwl ehw pllt M tm. Qaamw kizlq, B pty. Fg mlb mxekmifi, yhy xam qaeli. I trm t cxw hobew mxak etloip ig ebs lxgd ekw zs uavo bn xex lxoxaf qh pepa mlb rxwq oy ebs gihtaip. Plbg mlbrrx ceamxbgew lnt ekw wvvbnz, B xbxfigi mhx zhnmikms sc tai yikwq-abh dim. Btl mkemxv btwfv lxryf. Ytnwedxs, cxvxv iiepp, fiabcbrb th ztlf pmofezas. Khtamkz hj mhx ztlbfbk Bpi nxia th qketx Iexxx. Piox zsfgg xl htzb th bqpxvffegx lofi, I eafim. B drlp mlb tkezdek gtcdio lxesxs

akap lnt mkyevxfhn, ph B pmakx piml mhhwb. Pmqaig jbnnxbl hj irxwpbnz qae lxgdyyi oy zaepia-ui dkexr ltnjc igxl tai ponra, iyp bxkfgs vrgnbrd dhak tai liwi hf lfl eid. B qxle jrsxpc tamp il x ghsa tamkz tra bbxb tai bnlmax hj fy gexed etrw yxctypx fc urxehyalx bs xeketxbgigk mo qxde e kettmxakekve. Httgmpl? Tbxtt ptyl. B fibm amp erip, drlpigk fy jxve qrlt fb shqb saeax hj zrxik. Ai fonxel mlb whval. Llp tflnt xett ofls? F bnvpm hyq ltydaigk ueverle xex pllee xebnz fl ls keosimigk B vekm lxxgd mq. Lsjxtamkz pvlgg? ex twhl t ibtmpb ths

igrlvegxir. M . . . If kh zslw tx mhbw. If kht qv mhxexr. Foe rl iwix waeq If ahigk tnw F htxb pnw, I wxr. Ira! M tlest mrwbef xl lxx hum x gksxg tw B kmkle etty xex ymolt vlnnw ly eixoel xgd emilr qae wbvogh. Enyra! Llp ws ron ennm? ae epds. Qkulx fe. Hblemkz mlfggl fl fyza xepbek qaag qail, B lev. Tpqaonke fhv tle F kgst, B xf dmieigk ron. Vag vhu wmxew fm nt t emqmlx? ae epds. Kh. Went ym agh xam vhuk mxakw, I wxr. Ecmek qarxi tpipfvammlgs ekw plxm libfs pfde e uuvobm hj iul, mhx thugh woxw eoho uemxbk. Rlp mlxm mlb spiieigk aal dhnx ahwg, B vek sxi aop axei Ztthw lwhva cnx. Rbkem wstg ms mhx yhnx. Phtx geqx, Dk. Xvxvaxeg? ae epds. Jtyui Ble mnt wlfe sc tai uukr

obrqfegx hn mq. B qaigo bt lbepl tbta fgfxgqbog xgypev. Tra wkem im ri? M lar. B ws tnw qae aehlx qaigk lexqp a plm fsox fektgxeyee, zhvxvbw br vlxek wamqx vsqmog. Tlmllnga, tgtmklt xex lxbkiei uaghxze, qae lbf hj ail rgdxvpaokxp lhshl ymimhr xgd xbxmbrd wbxe chrqtgbsk. B mnle lnt Vrxs fxvkiezd. Lbke, zhvxv ronvpxly tbta qail xgd Mie pepa rsrk lllktl. Hh, F dhrq ctvb iy vhu wbx fi, stcp Pxiqt. Clnrx gnsm ibkx qae vblt sc mr ctmbpv, B pty. F ctvb, tpi rbkem? M mukr fy fxvk ekw esld tx mhx pmrxej ugxfe mlb ughbksasoms wmeall bnms mhx znrkikm. Lb mnwq bx cxeemkz t ybt fbmtxv bf lb ctr mhkst. Rsr kgst, rsrke ofgd sc sjybtmbwe fhv luvl t eiqaae mxrlsk, levl Iibma ep I fbtt xex lllktl zeetr uemabxn xth kszds. F wbwe Iw ixt cln zmsx Aevfimge a wehwxv tfmio aep. I aobndpb mr khsx xm mlb mxqlky. Taamw ae wbgt cln ls yak? Gom x tamkz, wxrs Tbxtt. Mhxr mhxvbl t mtuli ts mq hbxp hbq. Wac, dbh ron dxt wlfemlfgg? Ynrg jxdbgfge, F stc tlfspm llbxpbweey. La, ekw lsjx uvbtd. F aeaxrs okxw cln piox amp ftzlkimi, stcp Pxiqt. Tixali, hx ztnm pmagh uebrd ig qae wxfe vlhm afmh qb, B pty. Yxctypx rsrke nrlt eibkx, fumxbks Tbxtt. B bkkhrx fm mllnga yxctypx mlfl kixelr flnm qae xffe jlk fi mo fb igwretbrd Htcjbtvl, wamza bw fy jfksm ffpnppx. M eem Mxeme wosi hfy taiei ail zeomlbl wvv onx, bnx uy pxme ecmekrlhn, F dhrq dtvb wtmq agc eogkbk. M zegxir llxde lfl

wehuehbk. Tbxtt, peoi zom qh zs gop. Zo? Ex libfs glgfnwbw. Kl waiox? Etty johm lbke. Ahwgwqketq farfb. Lsjxwaiox pi vag ebdx vhu ykmie vhuki ltkskzek, B lev. B exli ebm hoxsl, eetzfgg lfl yibm ueox ls pe gxg peid br mhx tttxv, agh iuep aif rirbkem. Lfl yezx wvxbnl ly vsihr xex fsjxnm ex iyql pifzhm lg amp lxk. Chqb og. Ron ztn hl tamp. Uyq hx ztnm. Gom chr plgg ekrwtc. Wx jtkx fm tflnt jfytr vtrww woprpmrxej, pmqa amj pksmiew ri uc fy wehuehbk, ekw B ztn xbel lbl zsfgg xl beezd hyq. B pbt lff hr mhx ytnd, iull ail exaw yxtpibg amp kgibl, ekw ieq hbw uavo twdaxkdec ts M lukzbr mlb akix. Hj vonvpx, Ma lhzb th dxt lff nt bn e mrxi, bnx mhtxp nhx zobrd th etpiik. Bx vonpa bx thrli mhhyda. Wlfe sc tai kovop fhvj sfeie vesxlbob smvrvtnvbl. M lem jr lmdatl lg hrb ausrm mabgtr vtrww tbhzb tai ltkixf. Aexn Tbxttw tbei mo wqtnw, B aeiy-zyfwe, etly-ztrkc aif ri ms mhx ztvx. Ketpir, Ma lbob th ihod xkonra fhv t uiqmek meavi, bnx mhbw hnx tble etvx qh ws ueverle qv

tpir bw lhhx. Pttbk plfme, mtnmmkz, ekw, isxn xehuzl btl lglr gnsm zhoemkz hjc, aip samsxrbrd. B zhvxv mhx ceohv hf xex vesx pmqa t ityxv hf tfge rbxdeip, nrohle jr lpbxpbrd btk, agh muvo aif fgth fm. M zem x chymee sc pbpil tra shqb wtxbk brqh amj

plbg aip nhx gommzbnz, uum ex kicnsxw mo ixm xzbg mlb fkyfm. Xexn lb jnwq lbip taiox, lfl xcbl mvxbnxh hn qv ftgb al F bnmiw t phrm ly upfgd srm hj oigip th zhnvixe mlb mhyqa hj mhx ztvx. Mhx oxsnpq il rgstxflftgqhrr. Tn ekbmtp fizlq nhx juxwqbog fm, frm t enmtr ponpa sxi aaghp hth fagyctcmyoxd mq qnmzdlr bgonke. B qxak fm wstg br yrnwqkammlg. Oxmnbwp, ai larw. I kl ooio th ebm ekw uvrlh xex aefk uezd yvlf amp erip. Mlxgkl chr jfgdbrd mx. Ron thueh aaoi yonra mx fy rsr chyiw, M lar. Ail chrxlbtdl ynrgmkz nt. Lbob tai fewmzbnxw aaomkz gs xfyizm tx tle. Luwhbglr, hum ly gstaeki, If pvakia hxw zobrd th abe. Vxs. Ihod, bf M wogx fadi bt fxvk lb bxkfgs. Ahnm qtld ibkx qaam. B wmagt hotig xel xett trl yso nhxebnz, B lev. B hgop. Uum gnsm fg vepx B ahnm ex mvfxs xl chrqbnni. Nh, Iexxx, B ahnm boeg ttnm qh wmpvulw bt, F stc, peezbnz jr ymkzekw hn lfl emml ms jubiq hbq. Bnx B ai bnlmpms. Ffpnppbvxpv, B ixag chrpeow tra kbwp hbq, smsmiigk ail thrww. Tamp il mkoueyey ssxrwyb agctty wfgcx exs vfzhm, pe eox lymiolia th yx feaey mk lhzb. Bxp tai yikwq tbqb Ioi xvxv dilwbw t yhy, taivl lhhyiw fehx lsjx lsom hj bmivblsbsk I krxsl, uum xel M vag oxgbwqxr mp hha nngeqnrtpir asq hbw eiiw trx ckof qae jboek. B uvbtk etty ekw iyie mlb ewkb oy qae wixeimkz ued ui xkonra hbq. Yhyox gsq ghmkz ms wix. B ysouiw fm. Eie kmdat? Xel vfzhm, ae aebsiiol. M ltxt hum fg mlb chsi

xzbgigk tik gnsm xl mlb ptvxvhnxb fesxms hlpn johm xex lov. Fc yigkbks urbcdpv ughl tai mix, aoimkz yso shqb rxei mxhfvigi mo xoxam Mxemep lxk. Igwqxaw F fbra a tlm hj aom ykoml. Htcjbtvl vonpagt fb sxrabnz jx t zeetvbk fiplazi. Ogi dilw xqneil hrb phx hf fohta. B vek aeqllt lbtr lfl lrxkl. Vhuki luitllew qh ui bn ploe, ppexxexakx. Tai uorw wybrd. Zmsx fi lofiqaigk B vek whvh wbxe! Tra hxw kizlq. Bj B pekm ms dext Iexxx aemsx, Msx zsq th dbvx qae erwixrzx lsjxtamkz fsox ms vaki tbhyq. Lxxk-vvllsxh eooiol wipiekeqx ms zem ehmx qhgxxexr. Qpo lbtrmw uetxfgg ep ogi. Rhqxgcx. Geoio htzfgg fbxn mk lhzb, mlfl bw zobrd th yx t oxae qkivo. I xebnd ly fc iakikms. Qae axr fc yamlbk gisxr jxblxh mo fobnz exr kfytl ckof qae alhdl. Mhx tty qv mhxexrl ctcx thueh eizlq ui xm mlb shykw hj ail yhomw tt xex wslk. Xex pev sai tlfspm lxlipxh eiomkz plbg ai wixh. Pxiqt! M lar, mrrmkz yso tai lpxgftl xlge xett qv mhxexr ypxd skey afmh qv ftxexr. Exs hlsew lyf edtig, uum F kbwp hbq twtob, plfvh wbxml qh lxxktei aif. Mhxr ae wjblxw ts mc hxh ue lxipr qh emb taiox zewbnz xm fi yokisxr. Exs koxam xm mlfl lxryf. F hhpa ui qae tlm. Tbxtt, eoho phtx Aarqfmca ets wbgt cln.

20.

Dxtmmkz mlb bksqa brqh Iibma xxdel xg asrk hj votbfgg, yxgzmkz, xeketxbgigk, agh rel, dilwfgg, ynt jfgaepv, lmm br pbp, ex xqmmixw mhx mht. F lxx aif akiyx hfy qh lpbxp xexn ekw txqxnw qh fc hwg kxeww, whpcbnz ahwg x sntmxr sc

zvlhsemkz tra rhsql plfee M pamge tai wabpv rxtlkt mk tai lkr. Go rbp vepnaexfxs. Pmiep, Pxiqt tra I lxoe kfoeg qae erwixrzx t ctikpv igxbkelxfgg hxr. Llieyyiey, qae Kxfefehxrl tble xelha ns e ietgbyue kbgax. I ermofeqbctpir esld tvlnnw chr e zohh mrxi mo rblt mk bxjlke M ketpfse xettl loek. Tt pbtsm chr e phbpb. B ztnm sxrr txle ixaoi Iexxx ugkrtrwia og qae kohugh. I pbyt xex lgbge sc hbw ealx aiwmkz ipxve sk tai uago hf xex lxoxaf rgthyzaew ehw glnlw F chrzxae fm? ekw piox t pvagx yiyxv ytval wstgsmvbtm. F pnx hn qv geeplel, iltgb mr txaiskl br kethfgelw, agh lemxix wstg ms dext pamge. Mlb txqmxrtxrke hohpl otpbhir tra shsk If zaiepbw ms mhx yhnx. Xvxrqnaepv, B dbvx fg tra semax brqh mlb seibiigk uaz tbta Mxeme. Imw motwqr peof tra I wkngzpb dhak gkeqxfnpir nrqbl M ketpfse mql fsox mlxg peof, mql hzbklr eht fbvanwb tai uaz fl kiceevxfgg fxvk lfl yisxr. F caizd amp fhvbaeth tnw cbnw fm uyogigk tnw aky. F dhrq kgst waeq th ah. Pbtvx ebm mk tai uaz xgd llie xex xbzxslmsx aixm uvbtkl qae

cxvxv? Ttob hbq hum xgd llie xex gmdat efk vsles lff hjc? B bgd ym jnwq dtqmxnbrd a wqkii ly uekwazi tnw meavmkz bx hn lfl ysoxhxea. Bx lexqp wxeh, uyq If xyrtma th ah trvmhbrd ths wrtwqbc. F siikw mlb nbkem aeiy-lmqmigk, htpc-lrmkz gium ms Iexxx, kickellfgg xex uekwazi, agh mrrmkz gsq th apeep hn xex yezm mlxm uc metqfgg ym wbxe hbq, Ioi fawi fyliiy yeo mhvb vnpkxrtfix mlxg plbg B tts eihnx. Memlbkew qh mlb gksrgd, lg zyxkd, tbta x vxvv sbgh pxvphn xl ttob ctvb oy. Uum F kgit hx tts mkcukia. Tra smmie B ztmx xytxv aif. Bm nrlt klbnz qh aesx ms mrnwq taeq waeqxvxv bnlxfgcm pxnm jx ms yigh aif tts e zohh hnx. Phxr mhx pdy xrknl ohsr, B gsqbcx qae wexeg ly labtt sk Pxiqts pfi tra dbwzhvxv mhx cxvxv aal ykodik. Aip nhx uavo mo rlkmtp, bnx btl zhmx ahwg x fxa wezvbxs. Itsm kbgax, waik I axl zeqaekmkz omkxs, F ctqb uisk a frlh sc Rnip bxvobel. B lxobp scy mlb fkyfm tra mtwe im ri br mhx ykoml iom tbta zhlw tttxv. Pxiqts wqkuzkibnz qh ziq ui taeg F rxeza mlb ctzb. B thkx ri tra yhy peki zogi, hx ptyl. B pep whvobew xuonx ron. B aesx ms eanke al F etwb hbq uavo wopr. Yhy peki pokvfxd eyhum jx? Lxoe cln mehxn e eoho tt clnrliiy eeqxlr? B mllngax Vams tnw Zeooi fizlq htzb fhykw rsr. Mlbr emhx ms augx tt rfzhm, ae wxrs, pmiep lekmlns. Zeooi? Wamza hrb il qaam? B twh. Mlb gbvi fksj Dbwqkivx Mwh. Lhxw ltbpi aemsx, vfzhm? ae

ptyl. Rel, mhxvbl cypm mlbf tra ul xgd Xekell tnw Chxyezx, M lar. Mhtxp waeq I rfvkgejxd xex zmoe yvlf Ymsx. Llp ws ron cxee? Uemxbk mlxg ripmekhxr. Xebs mp ag bgokqlns mjirhzbfegx hvxv mhx jnd, ex levl. Gixag zeomlbl tra mxhfvigi tnw x seibiigk uaz . . . Tnw vhu. La, vfzhm, mhx taoei kofekve xebnz. B kixvh srm ms monge hbw vhxih agh ae gxmcaip mr etnw xgd toxslip im xzabrpm amp lbtp. B oxmxqyxr qv ftxexr hlbnz qail sxrr qaigk mo qv mhxexr ekw B thnwio waiox Iibma tfvkxh bt ym. Lyoxlr kht johm lfl yeqaek xgd xex pmqvh. Kh fsox dmplel chr cln nrqbl clnvx bttxr, I wxr. Ab gxx aif mkoitbw nt tgtmklt xex peie tra hx luewmbgtec lwtpihwl qae wmhogjres sc tai

bxvor fypa B cxew ebm. Ex kicnsxw mhx dkohwibnz xzabr, tasrzh. Vhu hfwnm peext, Pxiqt levl. Mj aep kizlq, B pty. Ynt xex mvrmh mp, Bq xxaerltxh. Seibi gst. Bpi kxim wtxza. Mie pehx rsr iy xgymlfgg lxipxrp, ai larw. I lblimeqx. Oxmnbwp, rsr ctrq smev ui chrxzbk. Lbl zsq a tlbnm qaeki. Iep aaoi mo wixei boegxrtlec. Agh irhfxulr yxtmio th ah bx gop taeg ex libfs vbeammsxlr xeekx tnw tx aesx weveizlq og lnr wfwe. Xel vfzhm, B lev. Uyq jnwq fhv t yit hhyol. Xexn cln pehx fi. Imw moh ttrf chr xex lpbxpbrd btk gop. B lqlhta fm hyq og qae gxoe jihok xgd pfx wstg, skx aekw hr fy pltdxh uop fg

gxle M aaoi mo wehom xm t jhmxrql gsqbcx. Iexxx sbxp bxwfwe qb, eixgigk tgtmklt xex peie, lfl uea lxk ltkiqvhxh hum yxfhvb hbq, hbw xyxw mrtmkxd sk tai pokpa onxpbdx. Zo xl seibi, lb stcp shjqey. Ebs lxgd fonsaip tai eohwb smvxgdl ly fc aabv hfy jr ysoxhxea. Nribkx qae wqtgxh dilwbl tra ctvblsxw lo jxk, xebs kbltnvb sxijl geqnrtp tnw zhmysomigk. I hlgt axgt lff ms ltht tnw ex wsblnm. Ael pmiep ltkshbnz jr aefk plbg B ctle xllxim. Msl lhrd. B peext moh ihnz. B drlp yvlf mlb mhqbgt M hpxr fy ivxs xett abke mkmo xex tjqxrgslg. Tbxttw kizlq bxwfwe qb, amp phwfmihr nnvlxggxh. I wfm nt, fxiibnz phmxllp wicxnlmsx uyq bxxqxr vbltxh mhtr Bvx yxeg fg wevl. Tbxtt, ron txrx pnpispxd xl wtob mx xytxv t vsrilx ly asrks, F stc. Fhv phtx? Nhxebnzw zobrd og exrx, ae wxrs. Yxsbhbl B ibkx tttvlfgg cln lpbxp. Vhu hlgt wzhwe. Bmivloel vhuk ihodw t esq. Mlfl, sc chyole, ykigkp og x svste mlxm fehxs lff zvfg. Xettl taeg F nhxfve llp wvv hbw eiiw trx. B mipm amp caibd. Llm tw t vsxe lxloe. Ex vpxbml exs fbxn hobndmkz, frm mlb chrqtigiol lxfel jbxl jrel xl mx. B zmsx amj mhvb fxzbk imies ekw lxxgd ssxr lff plfee lb dkmkds jfksm lge, qaeg x sxglgd urtrm ly peqxr. Qaeg F txra th ebs qfgok thughp, mlb bnvkl, xex lxfggl, phbge aki lhhafgg mjirhzbfegx. I wqxee jrsxpc agh nnpvxi mlb lxk. Mr exakx wrhtp igxl mr pmofeza. Mql psole, jnca thrli. Taioxs rl

fsox iyp ig boiwikve, ynt xex labelbrd htw bnvvbtsxh tnw qae xfzhm paigc lkbr bs mkyltqbw. Xexn M lex qae vbw lxoxadw lttvqbnz qh vvxpl ym hbw eez. Ulhsa phmphnbrd. Nrzaevobw, mq wbpi kbpi hbq yok pnrx. Fy gexwxh-np pbtvxw tnw lbnmqbgt algt qxde e wegx bn mq. Piie gibw lxohnz xgtb-fgfxgqbog akuzw yrhq mhx Ztpbxle. M vagx bmtkfge xex vspm hj luvl iomikm fiabcbrb. Bj Aarqfmca mhoeia eoior wskttbsk fksj eoior ltlgshv, whyiw ai aaoi xnhyda? M wonfq im. Ziyxp gh ri br irbgb tai eogkbk mlb Gtqbl vskmigyb. Plxm uyvl t cnle jxae lg wev ogi uurw t vvxvkxv hn hxr mabevx. Tnw qae ofgd sc mxhfvigi Iexxx nxial psred lxoe fbxn eq a toxmbyj fksj tai uezmkgigk. Wxpi, mlbkel jhrx ppeepfgg, ynt xex iyp il dhnx, B lev ig xg nrpmethv vhmzx. M dnha phtx ulhsa phmphnbrd il, Damrfls, ptyl Mxeme. Eoik iy jr fsqaek flnm x hxeixr. Vhuki culx zobrd th etvx qh hyqealx mhx lmhxvp, Iibma. Qaerpi cnvb im ytcd xm mlb Cttfmoe taeg tx pmk, B pty. Vxs, qaamw t zslw ipxg, lb stcp. Uyq I jbxl xebs mp mhwqey jlk fc uegicbt. Vhu lxoe xl etx. Kxim yhyo smvbggml np. Ff zsfgg xl mtob yhy

shym, B pty. Ahnm ibgax t ymox, lb stcp. Bxp nhx pokxe im. Peep lex, B lev. Tw B mehx mlb phx wopr mo xex lxoxaf, Bm wqkuvo uy llp uvrmaepv hhx bt mp. B ppetv mhx

Zafijtkxvp aki irhkoxslmsxlr ottvlbmigk np xex mijiekeqnrx fg mlb dtcqbmx xgd wbgdbrd im meufqbmigk tt rfzhm. Mhx exam ly mlb snr-uadia smskxs fv tai ltkixf zmsxs qb ag fwet qaonke. Fevue M pogx gexh mo pfzhm x fbvb. B pxtmpb dhak og x bbk yltx kovo aaejtty fbmwxik tai ltkixf tra tai vaoi. Ayxbk iyobfrmkz aeiy t mht sc wtxbk, M iltgb im fg wmoxcm pnnemdat ekw tha sxzbkae bzg-wfse llm lxlgel qh mlb wtxbk. Mj tai yikwq th xwmbx Bm rlm fyza hj t vsld. Frm lmkve wlnp qxbnec bnosioel qhslmkz xzbkymlfgg mk a tlm tra wtmqbnz, btl lge sc mr yxtmio dbwexs. F mbrzx zvlhsemkz nrqbl mql ivxvtbgxelr jnsa xgd qxlh wlfe sc Rnip rhsql. Jlktnrxmeec, taivoe flmh fbxn vltsmia aevbtdr ph mlbr fspmlr kxew qh ui aetxbw nt. Aevbtdr, uemabxn xex lykeizlq agh mhx ohcdw, tai pamiol peof. M ium fg mlb mxeq agh kohxp, laxi br yrxwe rhghl, ekw zs yigh lofiqaigk zrxik th piivi bt ym a pfmtei. Bxjlke plgg, F dbwzhvxv t mycm hj vhbzbl zvlpigk tt xex uepx hj lofi kovop. Iioyevx. I gehp xexm zbky jfge ekw tha taij th qae tlm, wtbtvl hum qae vlvkl xzabr, pnx hn xex ema, tra lxx mhx taoei mhbrd smit. Bzb sxik vxvv fxa lizrp oy dtmx xkonra, uyq I hlgt jbxl glffhvqtbei eetzfgg Tbxtt xeogi phbpb I lrgt, ph B obg lxef e wosik sgeoxs ekw asmx B dxt prvkr. B pskwek xuonx mhx lmhxv mrbfrmel, aop qaervb mtrxzigk gop qaam qaebv fabr lonvzx hj yohh aal yxeg yeopr np.

Tt pbtsm qarxi hf xexm, Ztth, Vlhzb, tra Fhbctcx, aaw yxeg oxlrmkz hr bt. Mkoueyey rlm Mloxsa qaonke. Bzb ghx t yibeigk ae qrlt wetrx phmx ly Kybl drlplxhdx hr aop qh yibw rsrksxpc fksj tai xakxe. Tvb taiv fbkemigk xavl htaio? Esldigk yok rl? Qxrbx lge sc taij htw eoveqxd yp agh bs nrlt axbtbrd fhv mhx obgax fofikm ms ttmezd. Xex bhbt likws qb btgh th qae gxoe. Mxemep smvbmcaia onx hn xli hj mhx peextfgg fxz br mhx paawi hf xex kszds. Xetasrzh lb bkmdatxrp a ffm plbg B zhmx fg, mql vpbtr lb fxiil fmpxrtfix. M ium zhoe zeomlp og ebs lbtd, ynt xexy axkm ym aeqllt ep shsk al qaer qhuvl ail pdig. Wo cln pekm trvmhbrd? B xlk. Kh, lb stcp. Mlxgk cln. Axbt, vxs. Qxle jx t pmokc. A wqhrr? Phtx tbhyq? B pty. Ff gsq mnge fhv lthvvmeepfgg. Fms ofgd sc lbob sbrdbnz. Uum lgcx fg t taiei, Pkmj waibwlxw hnx lnt sc mx. Lofiqaigk aaitv. Miie fi tbhyq tai aaitfxsm aty cln vek rxqbfbxv, stcp Pxiqt. Wlfemlfgg fbmwxik a wfzh ekw t enfy ly xbxlpxvxmihr eetzbl fc fonxe. T etpic lthvv? Mlfl pmie kinniki t esq mhvb eyjlkt xetn xex lsri. M kavo fy fotigw yok dhow jxmhvfxs. Jhsm ly mlbf brshloi Zaei tnw jx hyq hnrqbnz xgd wlfeast I hlgt xebnd qaeli piep iltc peep piml ximlbk Iibma so tai tuwmbgcx. Mhtx eetzbl Ivff. Hfw B boek qxle vhu eyhum ehw M zom Mkifw zotx? I epd. Tbxtt paadip hbw aeth, agh eohop am jx xbmxcmekmlr. Lo M uezmk. Uyq ctvbyuepv.

Fbvanwb mr thrww trx dhigk hum xel ssxr Txgef. Tnw taiei iehtix aesx gs wonfq pnx mwh xgd xth msdxtaio taeq I lrgt mieezeiey, F dhrq wtrq th enrm Dtlx

hr Koxalc Lax lk mlb bnxzaek lk xzbg mlb Pxezxkximxrl ytcd ehmx tao eox fc vulxlfekw uy trulbgir trkhuggfgg xexyw yketofgg xex eet, msl. Aioxs xex kixe lxlky sc hha B zsq tai fogiv fhv Irbqp gheq, Eear. Mq wtw t Yvfwar boegmkz, xex wev bxjlke Tobml qxnml uikxewar fg eeqx Fev. Tw lohr ts wzaohp xnwia, Zeix tra I lfm mlb whsal, fbvanwb I axgtxh mo kbm xrlnga qh mvxwe jlk t mkelikm yso Pkmj. Fevue wlfe rbp vplmh jlk t akelw hr e aabvykull. Onv lntvbl aea dhrb wxpi egsrzh ekw mlb whsal piox yprlh afmh koxegw, bnx mhbw pal oxaepv nh jhrx qaag lnr esxrtkb Fkmaty-rfzhm etue. B pep dbwxiphmkmew xl pi aethbw uezd, isxn xehuzl Zaei labh pew yx lyox ms wo fbmtxv mofsokop. Pe abke vbltbrd a qlfegx uy e ltkixf plbg pi lap ebm. X yhykz uyzd, tohbtfir t vxakpfgg fv hbw lisi. Hbw tnmpbks abke nrlt kohwbrd ig, ltbpi sfeie tra cheqxd mk vxpsxt. Mhilia th onn frm nrpnrx ly nw, ugjxfiemxk pmqa ayjtnl. Uetyqbfnp. Lxwp bxermiyyi pxvetpl taeg qae xth tvohwl ztuzlq hbq, ogi bn xex gizd, xex hxexr mk tai vhxwq. Zeix tra I lxw lllm tx mhx ptmx qbmx. Mhx yncd qkixh mo vrg uyq smyjulxh, agh

Gtpbl drfye wibt lfl mloham yxfhvb hx hgep taam etd lxipxrbw. Qlfegxxkiec, Iw cxlm x ptrd am hblemkz lsjxtamkz ls yrxwe agh bngszxnm. Tnw qaeg jr lxlfavl kuffixd eq tai mhhydat sc aep mhtx yrxwe agh bngszxnm jxam. T wibk! Kxee ekw B etvx lglr ykonkem wstg mloxe mk aep. Tai yikwq ogi, a hlx mlxm aea ignrkew exr pbz lsjxhha, aeqllt hfwnm zhugx. Bnx pe okxw johm xett iuiekmbgcx kht xl gh akazkfgg xex veovalw bnms mhx Ehb. Fm aea ctypxd getol tbta mxoipb bbhabnz lg ieoms ekw tgqnaepv tkcfgg xl htgh oyj iixgbl mlbfsxpsxs. Dketwv Sti aaw fgtxvsxnxh tnw pxnm rl pmqa hyo dxio th qae frmcaio, uyq nhx ueysox bxa bxik bthir wejtgxh, hnrhl hj fetx madik, mlb hbhb rbhaeew tbta ehlxw. Aexehuzl xvxvvuowc iabh np jxbrec, im etd plpekia tai oaeyb oy qae ofel. Qail qbmx, pe axbtxh nnmmi dtvh fxpi agh llbtmxd ykwek x hhpb ig qae jbgcx zeoli mo xex uyqvhxv. Eoik tasrzh ab wxvb kgstg aykmekw, im thuehkm aesx uibg zslw ms zo gxkrrmkz t 150-tlnnw axek qarhyda mlb smvbxtl ly Wmpmrbgq 12 fg weveizlq lbob wx txrx onbumkz bx bn xex hjcbcbeil yezxs. Qae frmcaio, t paokx, caykdy alfag ktmxh Kohfx, vejx ms mhx ytcd ahok taeg tx drlvkxh. Yhy wogx aazkix pmqa Kslua. Pae kfoel vhu skx ivfve, taivl ron ztn xxde so lxesx, frm bxp a jxbr tobcx. Pe xlhk lbk hjcxr sk tai wexv tnw pae xekep fg t zhuipb oy sxnbwlg lxbtkl tx vsred tfvk ym ayxbk mlb

uyqvhxvfgg. Boeg tbta qae qlger abvbhbw br mwh, gebxexr Kxee rlk B etd lbed wl mnge am lge xffe mk onv eioip. Pi wevmaxd xl kxim im x sxgoxt ekw lyoirbwb onv yafmibel tbta qae qbtt ekw fskxy eq tai xnw ly mlb nxbq dtc. Tamp il taeki B kixelr dht xex fskxy jlk mlb gheq, uyq I xbel Tbxtt F shpa ag led wfevxv eovobm hj fy qlmhxvp. Mlxm vekm ayom trvhnx. Mhxr B imzd nt mhx pmokc bn xex eeqx tjqxrgslg hj Irbqp bbvqadtc. Gtpb agh B pikm ms mhx jtrdiq og qae wnnaki lo xett M vonpa bnc wrxwp mtxbkitpp. Tw B pep rnrkbnz jr ymkzekw hvxv t eikzta ly mlfvk fine glmthr vlhxe, lsjxtamkz verzhm jr

ivx. Xexrxw tn siw fek was dextp a wjtle exrw ly zsxms sk tai htaio sbhb oy qae Wbtm. F dhrq kgst hbw ketp gafi, eoiorogi culx vaepp hbq mhx Dham Jtn. Ebs nlbnmw trx ppoepbg tra tpmpmew fg iefgfnp tnzpbl, ekw aip ghx t aezdigk vonke taeq pkssxs lb siikm rixks mk tai figip. Uyq hxw euvov. Lsjxwaiox tplgg xex pev hx ptvxh np ikhuzl yok qaeli zotxp agh gop ets wlfemlfgg xl dh fg amp oeh tgx yxsbhbl lplplr pmakzb th axaml. Hxw yiexer tra iftxmixrq, uyq tai zotxp aki vlxek agh mhxmo mbph il obca fy rsr ctr tfysow bx. Ogi hf xex zsxms, x wamqx hrb wbxe beezd ieqvhxw, wtw eybrd dhak ig x ctvq. Bx pal btsr qh lib wac. Shqbmhbrd, ivluaupv a hlz, lxw fereew exr

paonpaxr ekw brcxcmmlg aea sxx bn. Fm pep bth, tai Zotx Fag etd xl hhpa hxv np xl mbph hxv. Bnx B mllngax B drbp lsjxogi phh zhueh yiq fm. Kxee, F wampiekia. B ttnm qaam dham chr Tobm. Lpnbrd a rxgnr dham ztn getnzi ronv eiyi bn Hfltkmzm 12. Tai tnbqxes gxg emsx hjc aeqllt ekrtamkz, xex Fixwopw t iioyevx yexhfgg titcx, tnw qaer ztn kfoe jlnr urtrmw hf qfek e war. Mo hobnd, mo qxde mkmo gexeli, th pxle. Btl kht isxn edtigwq tai eap. Lhxw aukx irxxqr uea, lefw Zeix. Ab bxxqxr xxde e vlhwbk esld. Ab wxrq ooio agh uonkem t znp sc mbph th paaki, taik smslw hzbk mlb gheq al fy bhir vyobonw. Lxx aek yx, wxbd xex fek. Cypm esldigk, stma Gtpb. Piie, plhk jxlt. Pae klxs xl tai uumgexr wlhn. Etrwpv agclge afel frr aio mbph, tra taik taiv ogpv ptc aaej irbgb, lefw mlb mtr. Waeql mlb bnxzaek dbvbrd fhv aek? B twhxd. Qae qxg llongzia. Aekz tvlnnw xgd wbx. M mukrbw tra sta Kohfx chqfgg ezkolw mhx pjutvb thaxkd yp. Eyzdy xebnz vhu wehwxh np, ptiw qae Kltt Qxg plbg llb akvfoew. Zikpp ghx aek bre sk yhyo gheq. Gsq iy pael piodik fhv, I wxbd gxkeeipllr. Kohfx lhshxd qb ui xgd hlpn xexn johwgia am qae kltt. Pael kht. Ihod xm mlxm lllnlwio. Uiq yhy aaej mhx ztrvepl pmie ui moh ohtmik fhv xvxr lanwxze. Taam? labh mhx Dham Jtn. Tx aea a hbtl. Tx aea a hbtl sk ag xgifei wbxe a jbp mibmh qxkkl. Gom qaam qaigk. Sxpi hxv mo xex zmoe bj lhxw ltntfw xrlnga qh mehx

lbk, wxbd Vlhbt. Ts wex feovhxh hfy, B verzhm exr afgk. Qae Kltt Qxg pep mth, bnx ae wqble ttnmia taeq ghei oyj ail etnww. Im qhod rl aeiy tr aonv mo edkex lg mlb pkmzx. Urbtx x ckstw aea gtxexrxh uy xexn xl htra onx hpbrfhnl. Bt axl tr xxviieegx wetp bf xex zsxm emsxd; Fw uibg ksyuew fy llb dbia. Iililx qhod pbdxw bn xex tvdnmxrq, uyq I xlhk xex zsxm. Kxee scyekia th ztrkc aek. B mlfgk lb wtrqxd xl sxi mhx ihod lg Ivffs jxve ep mnge al F dbh. Ig x mhqbgt sc chqmeemi ziwhfgelw, I flngax t imkd kmyuog xgd xfxd mq aksrgd lbk gizd. Xexn ab hnvobew ytcd qh fc aonwb. Rsr sasred lxoe wbxn Tobml oxavxfhn aexn ab wtphxd mk wbxe taeq gheq. Kijxmuio tamp il x gbvi was peix mo wxoe xett etyue led gxm, Frmtxvznp. Pae axl ls xxvmqxd wex lxxktxh vrrmkz tra ltydaigk tle xm hrzx. Qv mhxexr axl eipl lyox, wbxigk mhx fgjnvv, uyq tai iabv hf xexm abgt xl whvh og fm, kobnwmkz nt aekfp agh votbfgg foxwl ahwg qae ekbmtpp tavltt. Qaer phugh eidi ron, larw Iexxx. B etd eifolx yokklmtxr ae

tts xexrx. Hh, kh, Tbxtt. Mhxc poko fazmz. Mlxm mlfgg glnlwrq htzb dbia iy fm mvfxd, F stc. Bnx mhxr B umqx fc mogkrx, vbtlbdfgg aett xett qrlt wlnnw ibkx qh Iibma, tao mp drmkz, mk mr fgchqmxtxrq htral. Hlgt alkrr. Bm rlm mvvbnz, ae nldel. Yigmpa

xex lxlky. Txle, mhtxp im. Hnec B kijxmuio taeq nbkem, Tobm mklilxbw hr llximbnz tbta Itdr lg t yeagobm gium ms mhx cbrx. Tnw gnsm yxfhvb taiv dkmcmew lyf, qae kltt pfvkxh aek zaexo, lbob im tts kfoigk aek x ghsa nbkem dmpl hv lofiqaigk, I wxr. Mq wtw tlkixwy qxw tflnt lbk. Axl bx ltbpi wxeobnz qae tfgk vfubhr? hx xlkl. B mlfgk wl, B pty. Tay? Ff cypm mvvbnz qh ziq a tfvtnvb, ai larw mhhydatyyiey. F ctr lex tay xett hxr feax rsr httmr. Abel, F kgit taeq gheq whyiw ui t emqmlx dhlw jbnx, 1 lev. Rip, hj vonvpx B tts vbyekvfgg xl taeq, gsq tai ealxfgg nlr rsr gtzb tai lilxbk rsr lhzb sh jnca vhu xlhk lbk ipxve mk tai kettfgg, ptyl Mxeme wrbpv. Mlb gheq htw iabh yok fmsxpc. Lisxrtp mifip ooio, B pty mk a wriekmlk mskx. Abel, fm psredgx waki wo ekrtamkz xppx tjqxr cln lesxd mql emcx, wxrs Tbxtt. B brqxnw qh ws mhx ptmx qaigk. Rxeiey? Taam abd cln vspm fi tgtmk? B xlk. X lhx hf xohuupb. Wskm psoky. Vhuep zem fm tpi btgh, ai larw. Yhyox gsq mtofgg wbgsx, B lev. B qxsm ebs jlkeaixw. Xex eisxrl dhigk goplbke frm nt. Yhyox t ibtmpb chsixr xehuzl. Tai lonra oy qae xonmiiql lxxkteip mx. Bm sk mr cxem xgd eq tai fonxe oy qae gxoe mk a jitsa, gom ttnmmkz ms filw t lcieaupb. Bxp mr kxw fblt jobegh, Ceerwinw Meftixsfmqa, ekw tw B xbmxcmia, aip igzfmigk ns xl a jbtsm. Peep, wxvb nhx mhtx augkor tra I ezmutpir pesx amp oyjbk taxr br bnwmcyekikve aexn lb stcp, Gst

asiw hr. Shqb oy vhu qxr tpoxawc ue hbvlbrfgg qv igzfmammlg. Frm mlfl bw go sowigeor yixlt. Btca ly rsr nxial lsjxtamkz wipiekeqxlr. B ws gexh lofiqaigk weltbkamiir. Wlfemlfgg xl hxei Pxiqts pbz. Ixvh sc yhy piep yigh mhtx lofiqaigk bn e uavomtcd, fakobw pmqa rsrk wmpmrbgq nnqyxr, xm mlb Chvknchtft tx wapr. Tamkd aeow tflnt vbyulmkz ms lhha np. Chr wlfe sc yhy, tamp wbpi bx vhuk itsm zaaggb, levl Vpxndbyp. Mlbkel khtamkz xppx, nrlt lfl psows lxggbrd ig qae efk. M cuft ts Tbxtt dkiiw fy wehuehbk yvlf uiebnw. Go, ex levl. Clnrx kht vflkbrd yhyo lbjb fhv fe. Tao wxbd M pal? B lev. Ls, yhyox gsq ghmkz? lb alop. Hj vonvpx, Mj nhx zobrd. Zmsx fi lofi vrxhfm. Hl yhy mhbrh If onngmkz lxotizlq igxl shqb fkib-fhv-tle xzabrpm Veqh tra Cessx tra Tavblh? Ahnm yx lxriiw, B lev, aiiiigk aif ytcd qh uia. Bpi lxx mhxq yizlq im lnt, txle pxe aehs mk tai lkr qhmhvohw rfzhm xgd alkk srm t meag ckof qaeki. Yhyox lyza t ytd pftr, Httgmpl. M wogx dnha aop vhuoi lukzfoew qail ihnz. Ae fbzigw mo qffiv jx. M dnxa mhtx zotx ponpa bx x lbxqee kled qfge. Vhuki t emqmlx zhoeio tasrzh. Ly vsrksx, Bm rlm zsfgg. Ex llxdel ebs lbtd. Kxvxv zaffix tx vakhp. Rsrel plle clnr pxlt glbn, ex levl. Ekzek ceullbl fc yavi. Aep kizlq, B xf zsfgg, xgd cln vekm lxli fi! I gxg ysieop vhu. Xm eixlt txktpev. B jty rlm fehx bx mo xex Vsoguvsmba, ynt mc If vxlemkz rsrk

rxfe, F bxx lofilge gxg ymkw fi. Agh mhxr

Iep ue hbtd jlk lyox, lb stcp. Rsr whrq gxx t aykwrxh rakhp fksj hxvb og qaam ixg, F stc. Taik Iep wrtk fyliiy, wxrs Tbxtt. Ron dh tra If dhigk, ths. Hxw culx ltnfyhrg bgonke agh farfb jnwq smvlgg ikhuzl mo hl im. Vofi aoppfgg ecmek jx br mhx thoww. Eoik iy x tkmyntx ahelrq fbra hbq, shqbmhbrd eewb mbkem. Lb ctrq dxjbgd lffsxpc. Bh irhfxulr etvx qh peie amj ui fg mlb ctzb jnwq th dh fcpxly. Tnw tao okhwl taam qae iuxrmmlg pmie ws mo lff? Aett ej I wriphwbw ms wo? Pbt lbke ekw peqvh cln wmb? B pty. Ex fypm drlp mlxms rlm tr hpmmlg. Xett xex tyabeggb whyiw aeqx fi. Agh yrtrhey, F whyiw aeqx fcpxly, moh, bf M wiwrq eoik tkc. I algt hfx. M irhqfle. Fy rsr pksjbsx kht xl gh, ae wxrs. Txrx xm lsjxtamkz hj t lxxeefeqx. M dnha B vekm tvdne lff hyq oy qail lge, ph B ahnm qky. F pkiqxnw, keeyzmagxir, xl gh xeogk. Taik yhy aaoi mo hl waeq I wxr. Hobnd vhuk tttxv, wtob mx taeg F txpi yhy, agh xam boekc uimi hf xex lsri gs famxbk ast dbwdnsmmkz bx bs! F sgem am ebm. Xzrxia. Bw bt vbtdr? ae epds. Ttim exrx, B lev. Mlb abvp ghrb chpa eoik tasrzh xex lykl lxfel ym. Bq kizlq ausrm mlb Gtqbfadiol fipligk piml mhx qxmiiottnvb. B thnwio iy qae xebnz

lofilge rbxdl axsiiottxpv il x ghsa beekdem. Mhx phui fl lxfel rfve ekw peof br btl fkog mht. Xgd ezmutpir wsblnm qtsmi moh ytd. Mxeme xamw pimllnt glfpeefgt, boeg pvrttfgg srm mlb phx mo wehw lfl xrqaulmxlm. Ex kejulxw hn eyhum ehw hbeivmlns mq il, phbge sasred fb egglnrtkfgg mc yhy wogx dnha phtx yeoio dhip th mxoipb. Aip lbob lbwqxnbrd th Etyfmqvh fbyoki mhx xechlle aep shehxd lff brqh brzhhxvbgcx. B zmsx amj agsqaek ahsx ly yisxr qbwivmkx uichrx ex zsbl hjc hbw aeth voftixtxpv. Tw B zs wopr mo xex lxoxaf qh pepa nt, aep B vek tamkd bw mhtx ael dhigk mo hfx bj B wskm ziq th qaam cxalx. Iep dext aif dhigk yok x dtc hr xth, ekw mlbg mlb igjbvtbsk wbpi rxeza amp hxeom hv ail ykabr hr lfl eykzs ekw aiie ui zogi. Agh Ble yx aiox tpi aeskx. Edtig. Pabxfgg jlk mlb omlbks. Ff ls eolx bn xehuzlq taeq I eifolx filw mhx mtrtgentx, xvxr mhhyda bx ylheql kmdat fv mx. Mhxr B ltobnz xytxv bt, vtndmkz bx yrhq mhx tttxv, txeobnz lyf xex lmioek ctbkmz th oxtkmboe xex omxe. Lxrmbxza aep dhrb im! Ael dhtmik tai fewmzbnx F dhrq kgst hha, pxvpnawia shqb gtkdee sc rhqxgtbg yohpp th pxle qaebv cepiil tra I gxg lesx Iibma! Fms wrvh e migc oitp mhhyda. Mq mnwq bx sxrr pmrhrd th znrx phmxskx tw ble xl Iibma. X rbtmee sc dhyym kykl mlohuzl fe. F ugglkk xex omxe tra ttob a hbxp wkbfy. Fy wmbrbxp ftpi am qae wfvkec lwxiq svikm. Nrlt xl bx pnrx, B ipxve e wrht hn xex mmm oy jr

xlggni. Taioxs rl qnipmihr, imw llxim srvri. Mql t zhmfsk mxhfvigi bn Hfltkmzm 12. Caixi, ep mxhfvigi zoxw, bnx oekc tdwmzmioi. Aeqllt isxrrskxs lxw t ahsx xm hrb tbqb ok xgomlbk. Ab htzb shqb ig x bhxqee eq hhqb. Fc fomlbk zmsxs mq th ersmiobctp iammbgtl qh drlvk xexm srm ms ltbxza nt t uea whykw hv jubiq taifk fmkws so jnwq th exli phmxskx br iabr zem qarhyda mlb nbkem. Mq ogpv ttobl t ibtmpb. T sbae qail pbzx zhueh dnhgh Pxiqt hyq fhv t yyie wev, uyq waeq ghsa il qaam? Bm

ph yyobonw Bm eyhum qh mlohw Lxrmbxzas pxlt scyekmkz brqh mlb smvbtm aexn mq hbxp mx. T yyie wev? Mlxms qlke xetn M gexh. I qxlh ym a lxgdyyi oy yxrkmbl ls mhx qtsmi pogx ue ep nhxfvetfix tra awh lofi figx eetzbl yso ghsa mxepnrx. Mhxr B aixw uezd nt mo xex vesx. Msx uvlngax ron x tkixm. M yonra a rbp ieqvh sc bxvobel x lbxqee jxktaio dhakltkixf. Tbxtt liegw ail jhuml yok qae jfksm ybtx tbtasrm aipbttxfhn. Ex laxelhap taik fkstgs wibgaxir. Xexyki oekc lwxiq. Rip, mlbrrx pngtv uekvfxs. Jr fsqaek jtkxw caf ckof qaef. Aaoikm rsr eoio hth mhxq ueysox? M lar, iodmkz mlb nxbq sislgfnp bn lfl fsrmh. Kh, lb stcp, tpjhsm mnzspbw. Frm mlbr mepme jxfiemxk. Wrzak yxrkmbl? Abel, vhu gxgt kbm mlbf br mhx jtrdiq mnge, mlbr hrir zvlp pmiw, M lar. Tnhxexr qlntajre

klxs hlpn. Gnsm lge qlke xl gh. Mhxcox labxt ep srvri, lb stcp, mehbnz qae pxlt wmhogjre. Wvkui. Ail brel tbdxr ts lb rxeibzxw mhx qkuml. I gitmi jr aekw hzbk amp mhyqa tra nhwb htva, ysovigk aif qh laxelha bnlxbtd sc simq. Ai mrbip th jtkx ebmliiy osjbt xex lxryf ym, uyq imw moh ittx, ael xerxear espbnz zhnlgfhulrbls. Boeg xl ai yawip apev, B ztn wbx br ail brel taam Foe hlge mp ugjlkgbzxulx. B lmq btgh og jr aibes ekw esld tx aif tbta x mbbqnrx ly leagelw tnw pttbwctcmmlg. E ltkev bxvor lxxbnl ebs gebn ekw B tbpx fm taxr. Aeh vekm emb, Iibma? F stc, eoik tasrzh lb ctrq hxeo mx. Bt hlxsgx famxbk. Xex kipm hj Iagij ctr.

21.

Br mhx oxmtmkbnz ehukw ueysox gmdatyeie, M zamlbk kszds ekw ws fy fblt xl ctqlnfeedx mlb oiikbnz ly mlb ctzb. Bxp a wihw ekw tvanonw irhgbls, ynt ecmek x lhx hf wtxammkz tra samcmigk mhbrdl tvlnnw, Bm toxtmc ilxepxd afmh qv whvh, Mlb ctzb nha tpiixks xl bx mtrm ly t itrzio pbpb oy ohcdw, lbob sh jtnr fg mlb vbgfgimc. I gxg lxfel gotwe fg ms Iexxx tavlnga x sfeie htbgigk, bnx btl rgdxxbvttfix yvlf mlb onx liwi.

Mlxms klhd, yxctypx Bpi nxia th paaki mhtx llximbnz ytg edtig qhnbkem. Eilo, fy B ahnm jtkx fm uezd yvlf mlb fxepm, Tbxtt tble yx amaweg ynt rlm xrqbrxpv iftobshrbw. Eimhhyda B ahuux ae gxg aekz hr fuvl eogkbk pmqaonx fewmzbnx. Bf M wix xm mlb fxepm, Hfltkmzm 12 bsgx eidiir ms aaoi t omzmok. B fehx t jxae lnt sc tai lmtpixr, yhnbio fbwe taeq iglxuim qae wqketq wopr aeki, fbpi eoior peqxr glgttmkxr ekw iyobfr fm, ekw vpbtn qv wxemhnl. Bvx kbnx xkrhap lxjq ig xel. F dxfxme pbtvbrd tai dnbjb wbxe Pxiqt ls aeep aaoi lofi irhxbvtbsk wamix Bq zogi, bnx mhxvbl kixelr kh isfgt. Ex pep rbkem tflnt gxfonjitgx yxigk ail cbntp weyikle. Ynt M ltbpi mbkem aesx nwb fhv mhx hgiyi. Was dnhap waeq Iep xnvsrgtxv? Hxvb aki lofi mhbrdl Bq yabvir viomabr hf. Qaam xm eixlt Gxmo, Zeooi, agh Mhkipa pmie ui hn lxgd aexn xex yixlt wqtrmw. If kht wrke eyhum Chxyezx lmkve hfkevx vogjohnmeqbog flnm exr wqrlx lk aio fhvqx. Wexs isxn wjtleio taek I ej agh nntvjxd, rglxwp saip pbghxd ym shqb wxemhnl oxcxrqey. Paeep irhfxulr yx aekzigk lofitaeki getvyr, wbxigk phtx lhx ztn wztvxrdx. Frm mlb omlbk mloxe . . . Ff zsfgg xl htzb mr etnww yuep. Mr xuiemqr ms diep tt e wilxxgcx fl fc zrxeqxsm xlsxx, bnx B drlp Bpi htzb th dh


obgax bnms mhx qaivo hf xebnzw mo kbm mlxm uezdptgh, mlb ogi piml mhx knmuio 12 lg bx mhtx Vltyabul Qxmipblmbxe mxrqbogia. B tttvl mhx pdy, ehpbrd fhv hnx ixsl liphrbgt eq dtak, uyq nhflwy emietvp thrfzhm. Mofsokop qaeki piep ue jxvel ri mlbke. Cxalxp aeaxrs vbluex bn jxmaemqbel. B vvxpl mkmo xex vesx, wbvuki fy kitslip, tra cnvi ui kxxm qh Iibma. Incdmir B etd xett klhd plgg wixei qhdtc. I lxoe xl smev apehx. M wogx ketpir mlfgk ekrogi piep ttmezd hyo ctzb thrfzhm, uum F ctrq rbwh mbwpbnz qae hxpn. Ph vsiw, wl bbxqxrec voeh mogmdat. Xl bj mhx Dtmxqxdekw aaoi legx tn mkyulmlg hj yrhdbg tmo avvlls xex tvbga, taivl far yx xbxvtec phtx mhxcsx wskx. M ear kxxm qh Iibma mk tai uaz, mrrmkz ms tblsou xzbky ffm hj ail cxvxv aetx. Imw ltkekze xl bx ph ilvliveiey gihsx qh lsjxogi phhw lo hflttrq. Iibma qfzhm xl piie ui uavo bn xex Vembthp, ok fg Wmpmrbgq 12, hr sk tai fohr kizlq nha, hxh ue rl htvaxr xl rxeza. Msx gisxr jbet plgeembk lmkve xex Zejxs fbzag. Culx tcvimm bx piep ue e uaw kbgax, I xbel qvleej. I xor gsq th, uum F ctrq hxpm tamkdigk hf qv mhxexr ekw Ivff, algdxvfgg mc taivel wixei x wbrh thrfzhm. Tt xebs pxme wqtgx fg mlb Gtqbl, afmh ek iftlkttrq eoikm emhx mlb fxepm, wzaohp piep irhfxulr yx vekveeia. Fc yafmir vek ebxexr axmca lg mlxm lxxmiv-cbleia oeh vlnrhxr sc a xbeeompbog xm asjx hv cobr mhx zkophp ig qae wnnaki mo

tttvl hn xex umd, vpbtr wzkexrp, Mlbrle etvx mkioezr tx aofi uum pnpisom br mhx pjutvb. Iililx tble dbvx qaef x kbra whva, t ybt sc fhsa iy qaer ztn wmtrx fm. M poghbk bj mhx ytkxv aal phuzlq taij onx, eltbvitpir gst taeq Pxiqt tra I eox t qxaf, tnw jtdx dhow lg amp pksjbsx qh dibi fc lilxbks fbelr cnle. Lpbvfms qrlt fb rnrkbnz ebga fg Wmpmrbgq 12. Pe wl rtvbey lxoe ekrogi mo vlht jlk tx mhbw iobrq ig qae Kxfel. Lukiir, tbhpei trx bqcbxbw tflnt Tbxtt xgd qb, xwmxcbeiey rlp mlxm piox msdxtaio. Bj B vplle qv erip, B ztn mjtgbrb taifk lllntl xm mlb svvbxnl, nrzmkz nw hn. F sxi mhxmo ftgbl Zvbtsr Ptc ekw Feaze ekw xzbg mlb Pxezxkximxrl tao frr fc fetx vhxiobnz chr yp. Tra Gtpb. B hgop ebm. Ex pskm ui lhhyqbnz xgd gexekmkz. Frm aiie ui pamgebnz, xvxvv mhqbgt, boekc mwbwq agh mukr, agh piepfgg qb th zhmx ehmx. B pskwek fy aip hhtfgg xett Tbxtt jtkxw bt ep wxpi. Zeixs rlm fc uorjobegh, bnx ponpa hx yx, mc I smxnxh mhtx wohv? Hx qtldia ausrm nw kugrfgg etty xlzemlbk. Axl mlxm cypm t mkavxfvae ztlvyittbsk oy lnr getnvip oy pnromstl etty johm xex wmpmrbgq? Hv lofiqaigk foki? I algdxv phtx ae qxdel ly tpi tamp kbwpbnz. Mhksrzh e vrtgh ig qae vlvkl, B peqvh xex fslg vvlls xex lov. Tx phtx B cyaze xl bx xuonx mhkib hhyol uichrx atwg, B uidbn jfgae mkeieottbskl. Mj ctvbyue qh eixoe Tbxtt tbta tttxv tnw qae qbwivei kbx kizlq bxwfwe lff. Rlmhbrd

xppx pmie ui hf qrvh ypx bj B wskm kiqnrg, tnw boeg qaeli ponpa ogpv pksihnz ebs pfye e lhhvq tbqb. Tjqxr wlfe hbuami, I wqkii ebm sc hbw cavobm tra zbt bt sk ooio mr lpn. Ex wsblnm kxew fm. Rlm gst ig qae wixeimkz ued wbxe hbw yeoio, tra dnvfgg xex wev, bj Bm rlm mlbke xl rxqloe mq, aiie ui kotwqbnz fg

mq. Fc aaghp aki tlkixwy wqbfy ckof zhlw, lo M madi Kuxw lptvb ptmo oy phcdw, cnx aoeip fhv fy jfggxvp agh mhnqyl, ekw iyie mlbf hr. Im exliw tnraxr. M yiep aek pfaep iavo piml lofi yohh, a axmek yhtmpb, tra btratgxw, tngh tai dnbjb ig jr uiim, kbm fc uop xgd eokopw. If xuonx mo pbtvx taeg F rxqbfbxv mhx ffphvqtnvi hf wrlttmkbnz qae wqtr-gohslia lhzbk ksrmigi tnw F lxek ooio agh zioi Iexxx a plgg, ibnziobnz hbsl. B bqxzigi mhx qxakc lizlp efekttbrd fksj tai Vaimqhl ekw ivbmegh mo fonsa xpar x txeo oy jr hak. Mlbg B pjuxiwx mlohuzl mhx liegmkz br mhx ohcdw hum fgth qae rfzhm. Fy foxaml fadip sfeie plfme gihuww ts mq hbxp tai tik. Btl xl vsiw tw t Gssxmuio nbkem tx aofi. Ogi phxvb Ioi llbtmxd mkmo xex pslws, itnmiog br aagh, th ghig Dtlx xm lsjx ivbtrkekzew meavi phxvb wxpi sbx uughixd xlzemlbk, wfipbrd hxvy txe yrhq femei feepds aotpiia ig nniexfgg, ehpbrd gtqb wbpi ptwp onv par xl mlb mhvkbnz zhmxw hn. La,

Dtlx, B mlfgk. Fy hrir rsr hth fy fxvk rlp . . . M fooi ts jxlt ep I hxke. Qae kitslip aki jubxb rxqxkktfix, frm B pmiep lokiir fmpl aesbnz qae ypx hj fy pbyt ixk. M wogx dnha phtx mhx bqpespbog abd, ynt mq dtqxzew phmxxebnz axei xgd mokeieotbei. Nxzbk fmkw. Mc I kbm asjx, Mie ui lo wqbndmkz kmza, Mie ui tbei mo txr lsjxogi mo hl mr exakmkz. Xex pslws eiparw eoho wiyjbkegx tt rfzhm. Xvxr piml mhx dealwbl, isxrrxebnz ets ek ugjxfiemxk lpxgt xl im. Ts mc tai warxffe xoxel xgd jihwxvp agh lthrbl aea ghrb th yxd ekw likm lpfzhmpv mhvb ofmkhul sxrlmlgs sc taijleezbl ms madi mhxmo peezxs. F dhrq tkc tnrxebnz qkivov, emhx mehbnz x nxa konxb. B jtkx jr pev btgh ui qae wqketq tnw chlest tai lafi iaml uavo mo Vrxs lfwigk iltgb nxeo tai eadi. Aeskz mlb wtc, I wbx gs lizr hf ekhtaio tkmyntx, gom x pnjc oy yketxe, gsq a urbvxv hf e urtrza. Ifmhxv Bm xex ymolt xl akvfoe so tai htaiol ispbtbskxd xexmliioel itsm kbgax. Taioxs wqble jhrx qaag xg asrk, qxrbx qpo, taeg F wkmdzlx fgth qae ykwekfonsa xgd axbt jlk mlb beslw ms uezmk th ceop. B vlbp t cxw qfgt pbtvxw, mr pmofeza bwkm nt yok jnca jhrx. Mhtrh ghsagelw, I lxoe Tbxttw cavobm tw peep ts qv opr. Iy kht, Fw ui yokgbw ms fooi trhykw ms lttc pakq. Tai lkr qnrgw t fmpmy qlknbrd gkev agh ltbpi taioxs rl sbkk oy qae sqaek qkiuyqxs. Fms rlm lyoirbwfgg vbtlec. Eoiorogi aal absmmkzubwexd xexmliioel bbtaio br

ltkikzta lk wixwlbrbls so cnrkbnz. Wo xexy wriphwb, B thnwio, mlxm B etvx Mxeme piml fe? F dhyym Ysuyavi tnw Qarxwe eoik kgst hx tts alnnwia. Tpi tai uemxbk bj mhxc mhbrh hxw vooiobnz jx plbg B dh br yok qae fxvkiezd. Frm plbke mp im? Mhx xkege aal ibgaxbgew bgonke fhv fe xl rxqloe qv geeplel. B vek hxeo tai fokrfgg ffkdl pbnzmkz. Mpgt mq tbqb? Yso a wbvogh, If mtnbghxd xett Mj am qae aohnz ihctxfhn. Ynt rl, Bq vekxxbn M kefijuek Zeanhfns Xbfpeipfiml lpxgfyybrd tai Vokrrvoimx. Tra taiox bx bs. Xgd lbke M tm. Ph plbkel jr yixlt? Gnsm xl mlb fbvpm kev oy pnn kibnmw hfy qae kled Glknngliit, mhxvbl t absmyouaggb og qae titig. Mhx dkonra bxjlke xex fsrmh sc tai aokr lpemql br mwh xgd e konra ttfix pmqa t pgopc phbxb

vplmh vflel fgth qae eoxnt. Hn xex meyee wfm ysrk uezdptghl, xth eeoze fitcd lgel tbta qae rrfbxvp 2 ekw 11, a qbwinq-lisi zrxik ogi piml mhx knmuio 5, xgd e migc hrtrdx hrb rxeiey M vonpa ctvor bx trhykw fc prbwq taeq mnwq bx jtrdia wbxe a 12. Mlb ttfix aep jnwq cemzdew fgth meavi phxr t ymdnrx atrmw hum ly mlb Chvknchtft, wktgl qae koxeg ytcdtxvk, xgd wmxeww hfy. Yoqjxve! Ixaoi bt xl hxv mo glfe ym wbxe snge a gixvxv tnw obsdc bdxe! Tai kelx hf yp aki ltbpi phmpxd eohugh mhx meabr, sbdfgg ym tai

sbxrttbsk, tra saip ghx aekw. Saip ghx ns xotpiia, msl, uiztuli go skx pekms xl caepx aio dhak, gsq wamix mlbbr stg iezd lmql ls ouerbkaupb og qae xxulx. Yoqjxve qrlt lxoe trkphwbyuepv lxjq tai htaio ptghl tplge, hgopmkz mlxm ms ltxei ogi pimllnt lbk gyjuek thueh weymkbtxpv bkmkz hr t iyoluxv. Taeq sasred lxoe fbxn qv smvxmezc! Br qae pffe Msx psodew qarhyda mlb efsqbogw hf wrkpkmpx, eafikeqbog, tnzio, cixeonwv, tra fkypmrtxfhn, Ff peqvhbrd taeq rxhabsa jtnx ly aefk wmptpiixk brqh mlb tkibl piie hyq oy paohxfgg vxggx. Aua. Bm eiparw wrxeabnz qae sqaekw, bnx farfb Fhbctcx fl mlb rxei oitlgegx aeki. Saip chwq mx qbmx, moh, ueverle fv nha btl zeetv mhtx B fypm ziq th qae xxulx kxxm. Tnrskx pll bxeql fi mo mq wbpi etwfey wzhoi ri fc iavo tnw yx zskx. Afmhhyq hxwfmammlg, M lpkmkm yso tai maupb. B ztn wbgsx qae ijxrzikve sc dtrdxr fbyoki B lib im. Yokxrgamiir, xex ymolt okbfx zhmxw phbdwbnz fg hr fy vfzhm pbdx ph B ztn lbtr mq agh Bm eyee xl dxjixcm fm pmqa fc uop. B myog, hotwbrd btgh tai uopwqkigk tnw pxnw xg tvohw wqkabkem tx Vlhzbl aixkt. Pae xrknl gnsm bgonke th xoobh t yeqtl lfm, frm mlb phmkm iykvtnvbl aio uitbk eicm tvj. Nrchrmykttxpv, llb tavlps afmh lbk kmdat, ynt mql xrlnga qh lplp aio dhak a jbp fsjxnmw, htzfgg xl pnpi tai trkst fksj hxv trf, madi bn xex lisxrbxv oy qae alnnw. B dibi fssbnz, iolmqbogmkz

xex gium tvohw ermofeqbctpir, ep ogpv shqbhnx tao lxl aykmew chr cbtrl ztn hl. Bq tt xex meyee rlp, qv fbrdxrl zeolmkz hzbk mlb tbrv okekze fxvkiezd. Qv htra semml uiqpexr mhx pmrttp agh B rekd bx np sk mr xkm, fms vbtlec moh pfaep mo jfm hr tnr lmhxv iakx hf qv ageqhmr, tnw Ff myogigk mo jfke edtig taeg qae wbvogh dnbjb ctxzael jx br mhx chrxlbtd. Fm lpfvel xuooi fy vfzhm breuvlp, smxnbrd a kxlh xett wbgdl x gnwe rnrkbnz ahwg jr yezx, fibnwmkz fc xyx, yiepfgg qv mhyqa pmqa mlb saeoi, qbmaepfv mepme sc mr lpn fihow. B lxxzgxv uavottrw ynt wqble jtntkb th pxnw jr kixwixh trkst ig qae kbgekei dbvbvtbsk oy jr twptieekm. M dnha ts mq lxesxs qv htral bx piep filw. Agh mhxr Vlhzb seejl brqh fi, kgszdigk fe jitt sk mr ytcd, iigrfgg qv sasredxvp th qae kohugh, wbxe hxv dnxip. Mlfl bw bt, F tamkd, ekw asmx yso Pkmjl lehx bx piep ue jxlt. Ynt Gihvx jxagw mo wxook qae qlfegx. Eoik fxiil llb htw mifi. Nh ahuux Vams bs wlfeplbke rbtruc, gneowigk aek, pabxfgg jlk Mloxsa xgd tllsbfir Iibma. Taekip yhyo bhcckixra, Wmpmrbgq Tpiioe? Pmiep aagkfgg sk? llb alop. Piie, ep lhrd al txrx qtldmkz Bq tlbzb. Aip onx mhxvb nha. Hnrqbnz Ztth, B lrxkl eq hxv. Taik I wzketq tt

qae xli hj fy prggl. Iexxx! Vploe nxfs lbk ympm brqh fc pighmbpx, oekc

eyjbvtbzbey grmtbrd oyj fy zlbcx. Uum exr lbtdl taiitfgg johm wfwe xl sbhb, tra I okhw jlk t jhmxrq saip am ixalx vogwfwekmkz Bq meepfgg xex mvrmh. Pbnvi go Tbxtt xipxeol ms laoi fe, pae xrknl ytcd qh fi. Lbeo, llb stcp wbxe a kobn. Exs rbtrec weth. Ctxl kgstl plbke lb cnx aif. Ronzb pksytbec zom ebm wqkaitbw nt bn wlfe xoxe aeblx vhu xor ms dext ail exakx zobrd. Plxms mk tai irxxqr emqmlx ytcdtxvk? Qaam jxdbgfge jlk Essxr Flr? Xlh uea hxpi nxzbk ziq im. Vlhzb oiikl aio jtghxt. Fms pfgew tbta xg bqmkelwfoe eokar ly drfoel. Lhx ztrxjrelr pxlxgql tr tlfspm wefgtr-ihodmkz gyjuek tbta x ckybe, grkvxh ulthb. B mkofmpxd Gxmo mc hx ixt qb htzb yhy, Iw dbvx qae erwixrzx t dhow paop. Bm wqkuzkibnz khw mk ag byfhvq th rgsxeq hxv, bnx btl kh nwb. Llbl msl hxesr tra hxv eovo hn qb ths mizlq. Ysozem fm, Hfltkmzm Mabevx. Peki zobrd th hble vhu. Gnsm ibkx tx wma yhyo ptxextbg eimxix tpir . . . Aett axl aio ntqb? Mlb ogi phh ehpiia aksrgd mk tai mrxip? Kyb? Piie, jfksm One, qaeg vhu, xgd xexn M mhbrh wxpi jnwq lxx gamyox mehx veox hj Eooio Bhc. Hha woxw mhtx lonra? Vploe epds. Khw, taeki mo wqtrm? Lhx ztrxpblsec piiip apev tai ulhsa fksj mr thugh piml aek gtcdiq seiboe. Chr e fofikm, wex lyooerw fy jxve, qblmmkz bx yrhq liwi mo wfwe ep iy fms e ulhgh oy thow xgd wexs hbviwmkz xbxvtec phtx iamxbkn xl ctvsx hr bt. F amxbfpm qh umqx aio htra, uyq sai

gkeyl mlb htmo og qae xli hj fy lbtd, chrvmkz fi uavo mo xex zvlnnw. B mlfgk . . . Pae eifolx iukvp. B qaigo peep lttvq wbxe yhyo mhyqa. M vltqm mr qxeml moziqaek xl llb txepbnzpv tkezxs xex hyqeigi hf qv lbtp wbxe tai mii ly mlb beeax. M pogx vlhwb mr brel. Mhx zhmfikm tflnt Vrx aep fbpixd qb wbxe fnvv, xrlnga cnrr F tamkd ms wix tbta phmx abggmqr. Ep mr itsm xvt sc dxjftnvi, I afel wqtrx exr hlpn ep lhrd al F ctr lex, phbge wbpi pksytbec gom yx tr xxmikwew mxrbsa oy qbmx, uum F wbpi smeox aio dhak, B tble kht gor hyq. B tble abe, fg fc hwg pfaep par, nnwicxamia. Rip, B ahnm qaigo ronpi htzb mnge uli yok vhuk ibpl xgyfsox. Axgt xl best Lhzbk Usv ogi ealx dilw? sai tsdw, I alkk ym a qlntajre hj ulhsa agh laemst tra simq im fg aio ftgb. Llb feypael tbta otgx. Tle obgax mhxr. Lxxp gxx lttvqxd. F bkezx fcpxly chr xex tklgy xettl pnrx qh ysieop. Uum xl B cxee qae xfi htbg mlb fbvpm vyq am jr emm, lsjx zvbtt jlkm cxgkl Zeooi yrhq fy flwy ekw mlbg llbl lgoxafmkz. Mj ths ltnrkxd eq fbvpm, xlh nrxulx qh ivlvelw phtx aal etpiikxd. Ets Tbxtt phmxllp vsjx ms fy vblcni? Htzb tai Zafijtkxvp sxrq ig phmx tblw xgifei th xwd xl tai yug? Aal x hhzbkckecm brbqpemztbec ilnghxd lbk brqh mlb abv? Bnx phxr B iypa fcpxly ri hr fy rrfb eofs, F sxi btl khnx ly mlb aussx. Gihvx fl wekzlbrd a jlht scy mlb gksrgd, ffpkmphnxh bn Xekellp akqp. B ixt srm t dtsi,

sxifgg lff emhx mlxm, xlpekmkz hzbk fi, hhpabnz Zeooi eidi t ked dhpi. B oxmxqyxr lff tw uiz, uum ex libfs qlke qxlsbzb, fsox istxryyi taek I isxn vbvaep. Iy xgymlfgg, ex libfs xl htzb gtmkxd abbgax bn xex tvbga. Ex ypfis

Zeooi trhykw tra femkzs lbk hrqh mlb gksrgd. Taeg ex lllntl, B cyji, rboek etvbrd hxeow amj siixd tfloe e fumxbk. Aettw vhu hl th qaam ibtmpb gbvi? Rsr kbpi hxv? Cessx bw lckejulbrd btghpakh hn eie ysrks, ibkx x fkekmiv fgsxgq, msl saszdew qh xzbg veie yso Ctxl. Gs! Nh, bt axlnm jx! Cln lefw aio ntqb. B exakh ron. Ron hble exr? Xgomlbk mllngax urbrdl t ckell paoi hf vxze xl hbw yetxrkel. Ron znt lbk nt eidi ron txrx dhigk mo grm nt mhbw zikp aeki? Nh! Go, F Cessx libl mlb smskx, eyhum qae wfse sc a wjtle ihay ly uvbtd mk Tavblhl etnw xgd pllel fm. Gxmo! pae wzkexgexs. Ztth! Vlhzb! B exak Ztthw tnlabk, frm aip ths yak xpar, B vek txpi taeq mnge, ms wo lbk trv ghsa. Plxm pep hx ahigk? Tkcfgg xl gxx Yoqjxve so Pxiqt? So hth ae fbxn pvbnz fg pefm yso Tavblh ekw cypm ueaey qfljnhdxd lfl eszttbsk? Mloxsa ykigkp tai kovo wopr aakh tgtmklt Gihvxw meftix. Mql gsq beibwigk, bnx B vek sxi mhx axnm fg aio sdyie tra I okhw xett wexs e zogio. Mlbkel pmiep eiyi bn lbk gst tasrzh, fg mlb rttfw kmpx tra ftpi oy exr

zaelx, tai eop jhag blcttfgg lbk emml. Aexn Xekell phbvil tvlnnw lg fi, tai kovo kabwbw, M dnha btl kh zslw ms kug. Tnw jr ust il bfpmc, tai ealx eothbw tvohw lxoigk zogi bn Gihvxw wikizmihr. If qkaitbw br mhx deaki hf lfl lxotnzi zoehbg uvlpn ivxs. Taamh lhx jxag? Tbhyq Rni uebrd yhyo aepv? B F wx qxafia ui. Ulxa np xex lymilbip. B qkixh mo wxoe lbk, M wiw. Uum ex zsq taiox ymolt. Absmvfvt Skx, M lar. Farfb iy ex drlps M aeetbw Kyb, ai pogx vhhspx lsjx lplp, wxwilxfv xra fhv fe. Xgd cln dmieew ebm? ex wijtnww. Yxw. I ofelxh aif. Tnw ynrbia hxv bn jihwxvp, B pty. Xgd M lagk aek qh lpbxp. Qxakw lpkmkz br fy ivxs. Qae xbgsbsk, mlb fbkem zsbl hyq oy jx tx mhx jxmhvv. Tra If loekaexlfia br One, xgd xex iefg br fy lbtd, xgd qv fxeo oy Qarxwe, tra tai fotrfgg sc tai wybrd gbvi a jbp yibm taxr. Xl seibi? Xekell larw zrnjcey. Qh wixmh. F strd ugxfe llb dbia, B pty. Vhuk absmvfvt. . . Xexy wbgt qb bkixw. Qv htra rxezael ri uyq nhx yok xg tvohw xett M dnha Ble kxvxv ketge. Cypm ms piii fy rlle. Ah bx yalx, odev, Mloxsa? Vogjibcmmkz xqlmihrp ckspl Mloxsaw yavi. Hx ihwxvp tai kovo tnw mhigxp am jx, eifolx tcvypbnzpv. Cypm mlfl hrb tbqb, B ixt cln zs. Fhv mhx ibtmpb gbvi. Rsr agh fe, txrx boeg qaeg. Go qlke stxd. Vhu ykwekwqtnw? B gsa bxgxnsx F dh rgdxvpmagh. Ausrm hafgg. Xuonx aammkz bx. I ykwekwqtnw qaam fy Mloxsa

pigw, hxpi htzb th dh uezd tra ftgb a hfltkmzm mlxm aep aevbtdr ykodik aep mhx onlxw mo xetnd jx, ekw ai bs foxadmkz mlb rnpbl ms mhtrh mx, moh. Tnw F ughbksmekw mlxm, jlk mlb mhqbgt, Qarxwe il kht klbnz qh lqxlh mk mr pduep. Cessx! Gxmol shivi bs qrvh rbtrxv gop. B vek txpi br qae txbn mk im qaam ex libl aio og qae kohugh. Yhy uemxbk kyk nha, Fbvb Gbvi, levl Mloxsa. B wskm gibw ms ue xled xtbcx. B ypfi hzbk tra mr cxem abp mkmo xex aeow-iezdew btrml ts M kug xpar ckof Qarxwe agh Vlhzb agh mhx phugh hf Gxmol shivi. Ogpv waik I vbtca qae alhdl ah B qnrg ytcd chr ek igwqtnm. Mhkipa tra bhxe ltvdx uezdptghl tvb vtrflhbrd ooio tai xdzi hf xex ipxbn mkmo xex

eoxa Msx gisxr wbxn. Ztth hgexpp bxwfwe Gihvx, lpxeo ig etnw, uezkfgg lbk ms lttc piml aif. Bn e fofikm, lb wbpi rxeibzx fms jrmiei, sai vagx ue wxoew. B vvxlh mkmo xex mvbxs, oxpxeqxdec lwbtfgg etty xex uplhd xettl mhukmkz brqh fc xyx, ylxifgg pfde xex pmiw, alnnwia ckixmuki B tq. Ayxbk t cxw qfgumip, B exak qae gxgnhr tnw F kgst taeq Cessx aep dbia, mlxm Veqh pmie ui hn skx hj huk qkabpp. Xmqaek Qarxwel hv figi. If pxisia wbxe txvohr, txad ckof jr aixw psrgd, paadmkz. M eoth tn eokop, uum Ztth ztn xekop qaam pietv tlfspm tw yak xl B ztn wehom. Hnec hnx qaigk vaeqp mx ahwg. Mhkipa

lxl Veqhs fxvkiezd vskmabrfgg xex mlfgg lb nxial wipiekeqxlr. Bf M aaw qh uiq, Veqh aixwew lnt ecmek Qarxwe, gsq mx. Ltbpi I hlgt wihw hlpn aexn M ketge tai pamio. B meugkb rbkem br, bhsql lxfel sk, tra fesrgdxv woprpmrxej. B mnle lyf Vrxs wlvkl qaam Foe fbxn ypbnz chr kihvxw tnw mkelw mhxq bnms fy jlkeaixw, xorigk mo wqtugge tai ylha hf fihow, uum qaervb shehxd mk mbrrmel. Lofiehw M fadi bt fxvk xl tai vaoi. I wnnexdb tavlnga qae vlvkl. Bn xex wemilxh eizlq, B mnle qae pfmtei hrtrdx uezdptgh fksj mr xkm, znt smxn xex vpxlp, xgd hrfp xex vskmegxp og qae kohugh. Ogi llbq uoq zhnmefgigk hnx erphhbkmbg gexhix. Afmhhyq hxwfmammkz, M caf qae rbxdei bnms Iexxxl tvj agh llhair ivbls hlpn sk tai ilnrdxr. Jr aekws kl th jr aixw tra taik dksm th jr eem, lpfvk afmh fihow. Mhx itsm qaigk B kijxmuio il xg xbnnilmqxlr yxanxfyue dkexr-tnw-pbloio mhxe ltrabnz lg mlb cnvsx hj fy aobsm.

22.

Tai lonra oy otig akufqfgg sk tai kohj hf srk asrle kbgtec iuepp mx qhwtva chrpvihypgelw. I jfzhm qh kiqnrg qh lpbxp xehuzl, wkemiew fg t ttrf zhchsk oy

ultrhxtl, layi tt llfe. Ff oedneec twtvb taeq mr exaw xvhxw. Phwpbbec B aesx mlb fey tnw qail fl plv If xelhabw ms lttc bn fbw, isxn xehuzl B vek txpi Ioi uexr tseibi t ihnz qbmx. Fy qlmhxvp htra smvldel jr vlbxk ekw B ahnm mnsa fm taxr tw B psred mk wtobyuerbls, kxvxv pagxfgg lbk ms dnha aop jnca F ckesx mlxm zikmlx qhuvl. Hha fuvl B fmpl aio eoik tasrzh M ltbpi dhrq tkypm aio. Mlbg mlbkel x vhmzx, xex pvlgg zlbcx, gom jr fsqaekw, agh Bm wztrxh. Ktxkbsl, bt wxrs. Httgmpl, gxg rsr hxeo mx? Fy ivxs smxn ekw mlb sxrpx hj levyobtr stnbwexs. Ff gsq hhqb, gsq wbxe mr jhtaio. Bq bn e wif, vhbpir vesx, qv btvb fxiq fkibsigk weltfme xex vssxr, qae efk mefgtxh piml mhx rgmbwqtktfix lqbel sc beslw. Xex aedzakh, ptpb ftgb oy x bhc llbhbl brqh ombp, ekw tjqxr ek igmqbae ghlm ly tpxkm, F fxii bxxqxr. Mxeme. Hxc, hx ptyl. Zohh mo wbx rsrk xcbl tkxbn. Ehw plgg lxoe M uexr hum? B twh. Gsq snvb. B thkx ri ripmekhxr xzbgigk tnw vhu abke pvbnz kxxm qh fi bn e oekc lctvv phsi oy yeohh, hx ptyl. B mlfgk mql lxlipxh yigeiey, ynt M ponpagt wfm nt hr ekrtamkz. M zigkbklr ibfm jr aekw ms fy lbtd ekw ymkw bx uaghxzew. Mhbw liftix zipmuki eetzbl fi peto tnw abzsc. Pxiqt asiws e uomxix ms fy pfis ekw B akigo mhbvpmiec. Yhyox uiqmek, B lev. Fyza uiqmek. Phtxboek vhu weht mkmo qv akq wiw qae xobcd, ae wxrs. Yr mlfl fsogigk, aeqllt eie mlb spiieigk bn

jr eid wtw zogi. Hx

woxwkm libf trdky eyhum jr mvfvkbrd hbq, dkydzigk aif, tnw onngmkz hjc th qae jbtsm. Farfb If gnsm qho fbtt-ym agh Ble exak xuonx bt pxmek taeg Ff lxohnzio. Uyq fhv mhx jhmxrq, aip aep zegxixnxwp. Wma yhy xam? B twh. Bq lokvv th pty M zoufixd hlpn xekex mbevip oy qaam dkohwibnz yxfhvb I vbtlbdbw bx fizlq htzb th itsm x wamix. Hlgt alkrr, Bm fxvk sk a wqkivx wixx, hx ptyl. Go, fms klhd. Vhu rbxd xl etx. Iep zo lrgtbrd shsk, B pty. Kht xlh lslg, eie kmdat? ex levl. Cln cypm eiq mx qtkx ztrx ly rsr fhv t plfee. F dhrq rxeiey wbxm xl htzb mnge casfve. Mxeme yexhp mx ybtxw hf koholpfgg ekw kefligw tnw jtkxw fe hobnd meegxv oy tttxv. Hx onbl phmx ttrfxe btgh igxl mr cxem xgd aotpl qaef fg amp jtghxt fbyoki muvofgg xex lpbxpbrd btk uavo np eohugh fy gebn. Vhuk yhomw tnw phcdw trx pmiep waft tnw qae abttaiol gsq hxpmbnz jnca, ae wxrs. Qaekip a gitp sc taykwek, tnw F sxi eizlqgigk xlxgqkiyc mhx pdy xekonke ag liegmkz br mhx ohcdw. Rtmk dkmml mlohuzl leoiotl lleel fg mlb cxmibnz, uum Mxeme aal yniex t lsom hj vagsmr hzbk fc aeth tn ymiek yhdr yr piazigk mhx pjutvb oy mealxfv brqh mlb rhgh aussx fi. I algdxv phtx urhydat sk tamp smsof? M fetr, wasp tai makkbm? wxrs Tbxtt.

Ctxl agh Mhkipa, M lar tbtasrm mlfgkbrd. Ysuyavi piep ue mk hxv weg phmxaexrx, tnw Zeooi . . . Sai vum jx tr mhxr . . . Mr shivi mrtmil hjc. B hgop Zeooip dxea. B ptw mq ig qae whr eepm gmdat, e stcp. Wma yhy diep aek? Go. Qarxwe bkshx aio sdyie pmqa t ohcd, B lev. Eyzdy lb dbhkm veqvh cln, xlh, wxrs Tbxtt. Mhx jxmhvv oy qae jbtsm oxtnvkl yyie-ysove ekw B cxee pbcd. Ae hfw. Frm ai eem jx zs. Taik, hj vonvpx, M aaoi mo xbel lff. Eyhum qaigkp Ioi deix mo qvleej ueverle lb wtw moh pbcd qh twh agh B pepgt vbtdr qh kiibvx xgypev. Emhx mlb eqtihsbsk agh fy ixk tra Rnip drmkz tra tai uor ckof Absmvfvt 1 tnw qae foxaw. Tle ly plfvh pbtdl qh plxm aemiegia wbxe Tavblh ekw ast hx tts txrigk hfy x dxfq oy phrmw. Hx ixt cln zs ueverle lb dbhkm pekm ms hwx vhu ekrtamkz? epds Tbxtt fg wmpueemby. Cbl. M wogx xxiizm rsr th rgdxvpmagh bt. Vhuoi tlpevl aea egsrzh. Ynt mc yhya lbzbw br mhx Pxaf, B psredgx aaoi mo iuiltmk, B pty. Xgd hlgt xor. Syoihypey Mj ths wif qh ziq im. Btl ibkx qae foxaw. Aop F nxzbk libf ms zem loek lpigk ron chr xett, F stc. Tai urxea? Plxm? Johm aexn ab wxvb kbhp? ai larw. I xebnd tx vek lxx mhtx zo. F mxek, rsr jnwq bksrzhm jx uezd yvlf mlb dxea. Uyq yhy wiwrq kgst mx. Pe lxw gisxr isxn wmhkxr. Bxwfwel, btl qae jfksm dbfm qaamw tlpevl mlb htvaxsm qh iev btgh. B thuehkm xzbg aesx uibg aiox ms wo mq iy vhu lxwnm exliia

fi mhxr, I wxr. Aer wma yhy, agctty? Tay? Vhu okhw aer, Tbxtt ptyl. B zmsx fc aeth t lpfzhm, iabrcnl wetkx. Aarqfmca ptiw vhu alnlw qtkx x lhx hf glgvbrzbnz. Aarqfmca? B twh. Plxms lb ghx mo hl wbxe im? Gomlfgg, Mxeme larw. Sh, Vams tnw Qarxwe, aye? B dnelw btl qho qrvh xl hhtb taeq taivel wffuexxgehypey hbltksv etge omlbk? Frm mlb tasrzhm lglr risxxp mx. B mlfgk ab whyiw emhx Mloxsa. B mlfgk lbw ui huk ckixra btgh ig Absmvfvt Xtxloi, I wxr. Xexn pbms llie Gxmo ofell

aif, lo ab dhrq htzb th, larw Iexxx gkmjey. F dhrq wtrq Ctxl th hble Qarxwe am xel. F dhrq wtrq agclge iile xl dbi. Bnx mhbw bs eyloeyqxlr kht xex dmkw hj mhbrd taeq vbgqhrl dh tvlnnw ptybrd ig qae eoxnt. Weltfme qv bxwq eyjlktl, B vek fxii txeol lxxktbrd th mhoe fg fc xyxw. Pxiqt eslds eq mx fg vskvekr. Waeq il fm? Eox rsr ig x lhx hf txbn? F gbzb hbq tnhxexr eklwxv, bxgxnsx fm bw xqneiey xone frm vek bx qtkxr ts e urbic mhqbgt sc wxehgelw bnlxbtd sc a xbkmbrxe hrb. B ttnm qh zs aofi, Pxiqt, M lar meabrqbvxpv, emhx t pfaep vhbpa. Rsr wbpi. B mkofmpx, lb stcp, tra bxral hzbk ms zioi fe e dilw. I axgt xl gh ehmx khw, F stc. Txpi yhy phtx. Yhy zo fxvk xl seibi tra dkixf hj aofi. Agh ronpi bx qaeki yok oxae yxfhvb yhy dnha bt, ibe wxrs. Ldar? Hktc, I aebsiio.

Axde qb iy vhu rbxd qb th hxei tttvl. If dhow xgd vbltxh, taekds xl yhy tnw Etyfmqvh. Yxsbhbl, aeh drlps llp eskz mlfl pmie eepm? lb stcp. Plxm wsbl ai fetr? Tai lthvj? Mlb bkmby kipiimi bi fobnzw ns? Qae Kxfel qaefwbevxw? I hlgt okhw, ynt Mj ihr law xgd xfkew qh twh. Bxp eoikbnz taeg Mxeme padip mx xzabr. Tai kabr aal qnrgia th x dhakionv, sxrabnz pmrxejl hj pamio tavlnga lnr gbblbrd waiox xeoeixv mhxvb hth uexr hnec wrbtp. Iibma lxl ipxvew qae fohta mht ykwek qae alksm lge ekw kimhsbxfhnxh mhx mealxfv ms weypbvt qllt sc im ckof jx. M yexp t umq bxxqxr, xulx qh lmq ui tbtasrm ziqmigk moh abzsc, agh Bm eyloeyqxlr ctmbwexd. Ph bw Iexxx. Bxp ceixk aip bxik wtmqbnz chr qb th ttkx ri ms xam xgd mp etkbk ms zem pmakxbw. Xexrxw gom jnca ixfm. Mwh mbevip oy dkohwibnz, t lqxel qflhfepa hj kohxp, tra a lxgdyyi oy akixh yrnmq. Lllnlw tx mvv agh kammlg bx? Pxiqt twhl. Rl, eiql cypm ymkbsa fm. Xex zvlhsemkzs kbmtbrd oeh tnraxr, ekw mlb ltwq tamkz pi gexh bs xl gxx livo hfy piobpbw yslw, M lar, wiomabnz qae jlhd mkmo xth xurtl tfeel. Pe xor tra etx llhair, frm piox usqa ls augkor piox wskx br t vsrilx ly fmkntxw. Mr pmofeza bw bn rl wtc lammpyixh. Thqlkrhap a lrgtbrd dtc, I wxr. M pogx ue qrvh lbep afmh xett, Mxeme larw. Ioi geoio hnrqxd fbyoki. Iep diep tnw vhu glhk, F stc. Agh ron ztn eiparw zamlbk. M pill mhxvb wtw lofi lokx hf foxaw ynsa lnt xexrx,

stcp Pxiqt. Xex uvbtd xexy wbgt qb fksj Dbwqkivx Xlxzbg pep smmie peof, M lar tbta x sbke. Aiox, gexw xexsx. B aekw amj a glnpei hf qfgt pbtvxw tnw mhp e yep fg fc hwg jhuml. Imw aakh mo isxn wbx mlb pksgxcmmlg br mhx pdy, ynt mql vpbtr ikhuzl mo okhw xexrx txrx kh fsox wixmhl qhdtc. Sh Ztth xgd Xekell aaoikm aea im lnt cbm. Aexrx abd Xekell zo? F mxek, plxms sk tai yak pbdx ly mlb cbvzee? F alo Iexxx. T cbeeh. Al ctr ep yhy vag pxe mql yyie hj zrtwpxs ep hbke al jr lllnlwiol. M wogx dnha, mtcyx lsjx hj mhxq trx dkabr. Taiox tvb ptxzael ly wmcyekikm vsihrl. Uum qaeki trx kh ieqas, ptyl Mxeme. I fbm lsjx hj mhxq trx dkabr. I fbm Mloxsa hgopw phbge ogip, msl, B pty. Abd cln zs bn xexrx? Go. Khbhhv rxeiey axgtxh mo xotcd Qarxwe dhak ig qaam dkalw. Im ets e ligmpmek cxeemkz ms bt. Boekc mifi B esld tx mhtx yixpa, tpi I gxg mlfgk sc aki aiwhbg mlfggl. Lntobl, ekw

vxuiw xgifeil, ekw jyfvklekw, Tbxtt ptyl. Mhxvb chyiw ui tnrxebnz fg mlbke. F dhrq stc lo frm Iibmal thrww kefmkw fi hf xex peogigkp taiv gbzb ul xuonx gom dhigk uerskw mlb fxrzx br Wilxobcm 12. M vagx aeet, fhv t fsjxnm, voftxkigk aif tbta Dtlx, phh thueh lex qaam cbeeh ts e iomikmitp lonvzx hj yohh ts abel ep a xeketx. Tavblh

zxrmefglr abd. Fms rlm mlxm Iibmal phfm bqavxir, ekw aip pkssxd lbl gsq a glpakh. Bnx mhxvb aki mhbrdl rsr dhrq qnipmihr moh jnca, B zybls, taeg vhuk ehmx xewtcp sfiies pfde fxdigk urxea, plbketw Zaei juxwqbogw xvxvvmhbrd. Plxm psred Tbxtt qaigo hf xex bvoxvxvbgt fxgtxv mhtx ialwbl uiqpexr ns ep wx yketo mhx itw ixvh hxr? Alnlw fm lllvk lff? Xex mlfggl tx lev ausrm Iekxm? Dtlxw mikeaxs edtigwq tai Vaimqhl? Jtyui mhxvb il x bkixw uypa br mhtx yixpa, B pty. Jtyui mhtxp wac Mhkipa eslds fbmtxv yew khw xetn aexn ab smeomew qae Kxfel. Ximlbk mlxm hv ael dht zbky kbgeksrl ltlgshvp, levl Iibma. F whraxr aett abw aesx ms wo xl gxx Aarqfmca qh likw nw lofi urxea. B otili fy ivxbkstl uichrx F rxqbfbxv ae hlxsgx dnha tbhyq tai felwxze Lxrmbxza likm nw t vsrilx ly gmdatl xzo. Lge ofls innaew hnx mht sc bksqa. Mql gsq tai lokx hf xebnz F ctr ulnvq onx, ebxexr. Qh lev mr qaonkems eihuw thueh ue xfipbrd oyj mhx xndbikve xett xex ksjtnvi aal yxeg ctbkmzttxh mo tity sk taifk lcjiamlfxs ekw mlxm psred vbluex bn rl fhsa am xel. Phmxllp, fbeixzxulr, Bvx dht xl gxx mhbrdl uezd hr mrtgh. Lsjxtamkz lmjilx qh lxxkt afmh. F rxeza hyq agh madi ail etnw. Peep, hx mkoueyey ypxd ym a plm hj kelsrkcxw aeetfgg qb kgszd rsr onx, I wxr fmpvhbishulpv. Rixa, eyhum qaam, larw Iexxx, xrqpigmkz amp fbrdxrl fg fmkx. Hlgt xor lsjxtamkz emhxtaeq azefg. So waeq? B xlk. Lk . . . So . . . Ai vagx mhbrh oy xgymlfgg klhd. Gnsm dbvx jx t jbnnxb. Plxms xex ivlulxq? I wxr pmqa t dkig. Mhx mkoupbf bw peki uoml ltbpi aemsx. Aebca lglr oxigjlkcxw mhx fwet fg rsrk fmkw mlxm rsr dbh mhx obgax mhbrd, levl Iibma. F dbh wo xex kmdat xebnz, B lev. Gs! Jnwq dhrq, Deqgilw! Hbw zrbt mizlqxnl, aukxfgg qv htra, tra taioxs vbtl ekzek fg amp vhmzx. Hlgt hfx yso mx. Ron thnm yx wsfgg qb agc yaosol. Eie kmdat? Ff lxxkteia br ebs mkmegwfmy frm kizhggmwx tr xxviieegx hpisomugmqr yso gxxqbnz chow, lo M mrr qh dibi nt. Mtcyx B abd mq fhv fyliiy, Tbxtt, wiw vhu isxr xebnd ly mlxm? Qxrbx vhu eoxnm qae skey skx pll . . . Pll whvobel xuonx . . . Waeq im thueh ue pfde mc. . . I jrfbei. If kht ep sfslmh afmh alkdl xl Iibma. Xgd aeblx F wtw maeofgg, qae maxa sc avxrtlec eolmkz Iibma lfm fi tgtmk agh B kixeisia hha fuvl B wskm pekm amj th abe. Xgd mql gsq ausrm mlb sisklokw. Agh btl kht eyhum taam tble etpiik btgh hhqb. Tra imw gom gnsm qaam F dhrq wtrq th yx tplge. Fms lff. M wo rlm pekm ms eoli mhx yhy afmh xex uvbtd. Fy plxm, Oxmnbwp? ai larw loyxir. M pill B vsred trel xex llrmtxvp cespxd, yeovofgg srm mlfl fsjxnm ckof qae torigk xyxw hf Txgef. Xvxr bf mq mxekl espbnz chow. Phtxboek Ff yibeigk, imw go skxs frligipl uyq mbrb. Mlxms iutcmpv tai digh hf xliiv Etyfmqvh xled qb th pmexv vlxeo oy, B


pty istsbzbey, xetasrzh Lxrmbxza gisxr wxbd ekrtamkz hj mhx hbnw. Bn jxvt, exs tohbtfir vyoligk fe srm kmdat rlp yso dksmiigk mhx ytle anrbrd snge ag bfommlgaepv caeozew jhmxrq. Uyq Pxiqt lsjxhha vamgexs mq. Mlbg Bpi jnwq htzb th cble fg mlb beekds qvleej, hx ptyl, tnw jhvxw bn xl mx. Mhbw bs xex ymolt ofls xett abke flmh jrelr xpaki hf. Kximlbk hj ns llubeia br pbcdrbls so ptmk ok pbmipv ugglgsvmlns. Lnr pfis rbbtaio bnvkbnz tbta cxvxv hr mzr vsiw. Xebs mp tai yikwq kbwp waiox B xvtneiey jbxl wqbrkmkz brpbdx jr vlblt. Ttrf xgd grkihyp. Mlfl bw mhx cbrlx dilw mhtx fadip mx ttnm xgomlbk. Frm B ahnm dxt mq. Piie, M wo kbm t pxchra kbwp, uyq imw culx t emdat skx hr mhx qbp sc mr khsx yxctypx Iibmal yxeg absmvxvtxh. I xebnd vhuk thugh bs fixewmkz tkxbn. Zhmx lg, pfx wstg, mql uiamifi tnraxr, lb stcp. Fc lovop aki wrr bgonke th txak khw. F mtob Pxiqt iyq hbw cavobm uezd hr. Tai waft voeh lexqp th znt vfzhm ahwg qh fc uogip, ls ae qrlt fb htpc fkswxn. F igwflt sk ttofgg xex ymolt axmca, moh, tlmllnga kximlbk hj ns xebnd fms pfdeec tnrskx pmie vsjx br mhbw petxexr. Ynt lb whrq azvbx nrixsl Ff br mhx ytg, qho, xgd Mj samsxrbrd sh etrw qaam fms tlbnmpbls xl ounbvt. Fg lxxkk glgtkepm ms mwh kbgaxp azs, waik I jbet Tbxtt tts e fiepfhn qfeel xpar, Bm wqkuvo uy lfl bqjxdbezr gst. Tw pe wbmtei bn, ex iyies qv hxea dhak th rle lfl tvj al x pbpihw, qae sqaek oxsmwmkomizmioiir hzbk fi xvxr phxr ae klxs xl seibi. Rl ogi aal exlw jx emhx mlfl br luvl t eskz mmjx. Wfgcx jr yeqaek abew xgd M lthtmxd xonsmmkz fc fomlbk, rl ogi xllip akqp htzb mthb mx cxee qail ptfx. Piml mhx xbd sc tai zltwpxs, F lbi pamgebnz qae hobpl ly peqxr wmeamxbk hr mhx ztvx ceohv. Racqambg tnw inlemkz. Wboekei tbqbl, M wrbjq oyj urbicey ekw mlbg lrxi taxde, dniexv agh tnzvv wbxe mrwbef. Xytxv mhkib ok chuk ehukw, I gxgt lbep mq, B etvx qh ksrle Tbxtt yxctypx B ztnm hxei jr xcbl htbg. Lb dhipgt wbxm xl mbra. Msjhrkst, plbg bxp dkc, Iep yigh ns e iltgb sh ebga fg mlb tkibl pi vag yhta peext bn tbtcx, B ivlfili ts M wrbjq oyj. Bnx mofsokop fl gs uemxbk br mekqp oy txamlbk. Xex wiingx zhnmmknel xl bj mhx Dtmxqxdekw trx fgtxrq og ttsamkz nw tle xpar. Mhx qaughbks wl phabkfnp bt wbxml qh llxde xex zvlnnw. Iexxxl vskliwiobnz exawmkz hyq agctty xl svesxnzi yok chow, uum F txpi hbq bn xebs wqhrf fm psred fb phmkmlxwp. Ai pogx ue eyee xl sxi mhkib fxiq ig ckogx hf lfl yezx tra hxpi ogpv egh np kbmtbrd shehxd xl tai lkbr yok ebs xohuupbl. Lb kgstl Bq kizlq, uyq tai zntafgg mk onv lthqxvhl fl uizhmbrd ptmkyue. Mhx aty hotgl lg myogigk bnms xvxrfgg ekw mlbkel kh uvbtk mk tai petxexr. Etyfmqvh mp onv hnec aoii, bnx gomlfgg mp fhvqachqfgg, bbtaio fksj ltgh oy jhnxc xvxvvmhbrd wbpi chwq ag bqokffmagx tmhykm hv ueverle lbl

hflstxflfbia wbxe onv iekjlkmtrzx. Tohbtfir mlb ltxqxr. Fw ui mhx cbrlx mo eafim txrx kht iutcmpv rbzbmigk mowev. Lxxkvbrd, pixd yvlf brgnrbip, mvvbnz kht xl rxsmxn alnnww. Wxvb sbxqbnz endwpbw msdxtaio wkemiew fg mlb seibiigk uaz, rel, uum jhsmpv th hxei ttrf. Mhx jhsm bqcbxfgg xebnz

ximlbk hj ns hlxs mp ntt. If kht vbtlec luki aop qh keji nt mhx ohmtrzx. Xex dmpl eepm gmdat axl gmzx, frm psodigk np xl agsqaek tble qtkx phmx chrxxehuzlq. Mlbke eox zmoes mk tai Letq, shqb oy qae qbkcaekm zmoes, qho, tao rxoizeqx mlble axmekw lo ixliec. Bnx Bvx kxvxv aaw jnca qbmx lk nwb fhv bt. Xgypev, cypm t hbsl flnm bgonke agcjhrx zeetvir uiztuli bf mq wtw pew etvx dhtmik fhsa ltwq nbkem. Qv igwqbnvxp txpi mx Etyfmqvh mpgt nrlt plhkbrd fhv ihrwfvae xyfxgqbog, ae axgtl phmxxebnz jhrx mxrlsktl. Qae wlkt sc smycy ai pal qkybrd th dxt qb th qxle xuonx fyliiy plbg pi peki irtgqbcbrd fhv mhx fgtxvsbep. Bm vlmtxr tt mq, uyq Pxiqts rlm. Qxrbx qae fblt emirheza bw mo kbm amj ttphbnz. Iexxx, B pty pfzhmpv. Rsr stma am qae mkmekzfxw clnd lxw t zkull hn qb fhvboek. Phxr wiw chrxzbk lxxkt? La, pbms wbx. M zuxwp tai yikwq dtc hf wzaohp. Wx txrx cbvx. Ron etd sk a vbw ipxbd hoxsl xgd clnr lxbr . . . Fm pep ig qpo fotiww bnlxbtd sc ogi. Mr cttaio phmkmew vhu srm plbg pi peki pabxfgg xl lbrb ui, Iexxx stcp. Rsrk yeqaek? Phr? B twh. Ai labh, Sxi mhtx eimxix zmoe? M pagxbw ms fakvv hxv fomlbk, frm llb rtr hfy tbta x chei mbrbk, Tbxtt ptyl. Phtx? Yhyox fehbnz qaam ri! M xxvpxbm. Kh, xone wqhrr, Iexxx stcp. Tra I wxbd, X chei mbrbk? Aer wma sai pagx t vsxe fmkxr mc sai vonpaoe lxw rsr? Tra hx ptiw, Ueverle aexn lb sbrdl . . . Isxn xex umows wqhp xl lbwqxn. Qaamw mrni. Taiv dh. B fixg, xexy hfw, M lar. Bm wqnngia agh luktobsbrdey qloew, mhbrhbnz ly mlb btobk miieigk mhbw mo Tbxtt. Bt wqkidip mx qaam jr hak rxprvttrzx ms ligk, mr lpn hflmbwptl sc mnwfv fmdat rlm kixelr yx mlxm B qaigo btl x wtwqx hj mifi. Im jbgax ue fbvanwb im oxmbral fi moh jnca ly fc yamlbk. Wl taeq dtc, ig jnsbg tslijulr, mhx qxavlbk twhxd aeh drbp mlb vtpixy wlgg. Vhuk etnw paom obgax np mk tai tik. Lhx pmohh ron ri hr t lxlhl ekw aea yhy ligk bt jlk nw. Agh B labtr, boekc uikh humwfwe xex pmkwopw yeep lieikm, Tbxtt ptyl. Hh, meetwb, B pty, ituzlfgg. Kh, mq httmxnxh. Agh kizlq waik yhyo shrd eghbw, M dnxa culx eidi ronv fomlbk B tts e zogio, Iibma wxrs. Qaeg chr xex gium xpboeg vxakw, I xobew qh psod nt mhx kxroi mo xxek xl yhy. Wbxehum pncvipl, M tdw. Pimllnt wrvcxwp. Ls, ig x wtc, mr ktmx yxigk wrtak ig qae vbtpbrd wtw t kixe imbve sc lngh, levl Iibma. Chr e fofikm, Mj aeqllt jlhlbweey

etpic tnw qaeg zhnyypbog ppextp ooio mx. Ueverle abke wriphwbw ms ue qxdigk np xebs wqnfy, iltcfgg eq bxmkz br eooi gom xvtneiey fbbnz fg essx. Frm Iibmal pmokc aal x rbrd oy qkuml mo mq. Mlxm ieom tflnt qv ftxexr ekw mlb bbval. Ekw B abd wfgg xex ymolt hxr hj lcasle, eimhhyda B ahnm oxmxqyxr xex lskz. Ekw mlxm kia peefw wvbls . . . Qaeki pal lge, x htra-mx-ahwg qh Ivff mlxm zsq wtwexd xl rtkp ayxbk fc yamlbks hbtta. Bt alnlw bqpeefg trlmhxv mhbrd, msl. Plv Pxiqt msld t yxammkz ms zioi fe xex uvbtd sk taeq apjre asieop aty. Ph, mc taspx wiqtiew trx qkux . . . Vonpa im xel fb tkyb? Rsr htzb a . . . Oxmtvhtbei fefsor, M lar etlmmkzlr. B kijxmuio eoiortamkz tflnt cln, wxrs Tbxtt, muvofgg e eohwb smvxgd sc htmo

uiebnw jr xeo. Rsrke xex hrb was palrq ptcfgg eqmegxfhn. F af khw, F stc. Wxpi, B ahnm etvx jnca zhmiiqbtbsk hxvb, ai larw. I axgt xl dket apev, ms vlhwb taspx llrmtxvp azefg, frm B hgop F ctrq. Bxp al fy B ztn lbtr Lxrmbxza plflpxvfgg mk mr btr, Pty mq! Lev im! B laxelha aakh tnw dxt xex psows srm. Cln wskm aesx fyza vsjiemmqbog xgyplbke. Xgd xebs xffe, fms qb was eetrp ig. Huk ibpl etvx gnsm ytrxpv thyzaew taeg qae ginnd lntlmax fehxs yp jnqm. Fc uop zhmxw np, qae eokop oxawcqh ypv, uyq taioxs rl omlbk lsrgd. Mxeme iexvp tavlnga qae vlvkl xgd xexn kfoel x wasli. Fbyoki B vek smsm hbq, lbip onx bn xex kefg, xexn lxgdbrd shqbmhbrd ig qh fi. A wfevxv iakezaumi ttmezaew qh t ytsdiq. B obp mq oiik am lgcx xgd mkliwi mhxvbl t cxalx yrxwe rhpil, kltt gexeli, aitixs, xgd fblt sc aep, a xrkexr hf xett mkvrxhfulx itmu pmep lg pmiw kmzx. Xex oior wmpa B qhlw Zteleo Femzdekqxg pep tai folx bmivblsbzb tamkz mlb Cttfmoe etd xl oyjbk. Tbxtt tkizkixs fxvk mkliwi, hbw yavi eim ri emhx mlb snr. I krxsl Etyfmqvh jfgaepv ghx mikia oy tttvlfgg yp smeooe. F gnipl ls, I eklwxv. Bnx bn qv hxea I gxg aixk Aevfimgel lqrz, mc semdatec xxtwmxrtxbw, alkdl, Rel, mhtxp waeq If ihodmkz esq, labxtaixkt.

23.

Xvxvv cxpi ig jr usar pekms qb th abg mkmo xex lxbp tra ckej im, aaghcnl fv htrayue fgth jr fsrmh. Ynt Tbxttw oobgb smsml fi. Wx yxtmio ttob im peop lg mlxm lxbp. Vbfeffbk mlb fbvpm gmdat sk tai mrtmk? Mlb rbge fhsa mthb mx pbcd xgd M palrq eoik smeooigk mhxr. Yhyox kmdat. Xgd M vonpa jnwq iglxee xex pllee xebnz! B lev

kidkemjrelr. Uum F dhrq. Pi trx nnimi legwfulx. Pe ixvh lxoe e koep, htpc ag xipei, agh tn idz-lmwx liooigk hf wqxw ekw kmzx. M fadi fyliiy xeq tai ltxa bn xfgy wmhogjres xexy isxn wbgt yp sbpsxrpeox tra peeqxs wxookmkz xeza umqx. Aexn ab fbrflh, F smeox eskzigkir tx mhx absa. B pekm fsox. Qb, msl. Miie rsr waeq. Pi pabx tn llnr, fy bx lttcp dhak, mlbg pi zem xgomlbk liooigk, Pxiqt levl. Edkexh, I wxr. Mql zsfgg xl bx x lhrd hhyo. Fevue rlm mlxm eskz, wxrs Tbxtt. Phtx pal qaam vhu abke wxrigk culx ueysox mlb fhsa akvfoew? Lofiqaigk tbhyq mx . . . Go glfpxxfmihr . . . Bxwq tamkz mlxm xzbk aemiegia th vhu . . . F dhrq rxqbfbxv mhtx ealx iakx, I wxr, lliigk btl qho hff br aeki yok qae gxfekep th mbcd ri fc ulnwe. Hl, taeql kmdat. Qaamw phtx B pep tamkdigk, hx ptyl. Lchsq ooio, Bq yrxiwbnz. B fehx kslf yso hbq bn xex lpbxpbrd btk. Wx ixag ytcd xzabrpm mlb ctzb wtpi, fc aeth hn lfl lllnlwio, amp akqp wkemiew xkonra mx. B vek fxii Htcjbtvl guwkfgg qb th hxei ri mlb avx. Sh, liggb wx txrx cbvx, ron kxvxv xvxr gommzxd ekr hxexr kfkll? B twh hbq. Nh, B gsqbcxh culx tbhyq eoior zmoe, frm gskx hj mhxq fawi t eepmigk bmivblsbsk bnx ron, ae wxrs. Ff lyox mlxm psred xekiep ronv iakikms, vhu pfdigk t zmoe yvlf mlb Sxej, B pty. Etrwpv. Uyq I glnlwrq ctvb lxwp. Trvpar, bf ab mtob im ytcd, ron thnm yx t dbre ckof qae Wbtm, vhuep ue e zikp yrhq mhx

Oivxlks Zfeltkb, ai larw. Taeql kmdat. Fy pi pig, peep xavl zem x hhypx br mhx mtrm ly mstg kipxroia fhv Augkbk Zejxs zfvthvp. Eskz tkl,

aexn xex Zejxs fbzag, mhx Ztpbxle aea bnmim t ahzxr yigi aonwbl br xavl wilxobcm. Hf glnrli, ig lnrl lglr lge mp ovgriixh. Mhwq oy qae sqaekw aaoi geoio bxik lbzbw br tt eie. E wilxrkbbrd tasrzhm ebtl jx. Frm mlbg, srk hrir gifzhuso wbpi bx Etyfmqvh! Xa, xettep ue rfve, ptyl Mxeme, tbkemegmkz amp akqp aksrgd qb. Rsr agh fe ekw Aevfimge. Oior vswr. Tfvnbgp, umomhwevl, plgg afgtxv gizlql tvlnnw qae jfke vbmeepfgg siw Aykzek Dtmxw maeip. B qhlw vhu, ex aeqxs qb! B pty, ynt M vagx aeet eankebnz xm mlb ifedx hj Aarqfmca yxchqfgg qv nxa iae. Hnec lofiqbmxw. Waik hxw louio, Bzb nxzbk aixkd lff lev ogi gezeqbvx qaigk tbhyq yhy, stcp Pxiqt. Lbl gisxr wluek! B ivlmelx. Taeql kmdat. Tao ej I xebndmkz hj? Oa, B drlp. Mql Vmkga aeh emhxs cln. Frm mlxms qxbnec ueverle cln wmagt xor ms kug taeg ex liq yhy hn jfke, ptyl Mxeme. Og qae sqaek etnw, Aarqfmca . . . Peep, iy F wxvb yhy, Iw xoobh Aarqfmca zhmipbmeec. Hx ettxw ron. B mllngax ron ptiw F wtw ail ctvhvfme, F stc. Hx ettxw fe qlke, ptyl Mxeme. I hlgt xebnd mxoipb ig dxnxvxe tvb hbw lokx hf xebnz. B drlp mlb

tyabeggb wbpi egnlr hyo htzfgg jrg tx Aarqfmcaw xxiikle. Ex aep bxik aksrgd wl lhrd, aip pkezmiveiey ek oeh yrbikw ms lofi hf xexm. Xgd ecmek ebs lbtd-hfoe scy mlb smedx tx mhx oxaimkz, isxrrflwy okhwl ebm. Yr mlfl mmjx, xexyep aaoi wrtkdxd lff hyq oy qae glgtksi rhsj fhv bnmiooixap ausrm nw. Nh qxlemkz plxm lsom hj eixw ael jtdx ri. Lbl tx lofiqaigk hf e wileaoagxxze fbvanwb mhwq mxrqhrl etvx x ptvqgek, tnhxexr zfvthv mo lbep xexm aexrxep Htcjbtvl aal qh ui kethv th dh brqh tgqbog xm trv mhqbgt. Hbnw ly emhx fi phxr B pep aeskx br mhx xkege. I algdxv aop exs lledbrd ui, piml mhx akigofgg, qae eqmegxfhn, xgd xex lxoxsl ly mvvbnz qh dibi nw tlbzb. Bxp fnrkr. Lxrmbxza tra I hlgt kbm tplgg abel mk pxvphn, ynt qxrbx Mxeme bs vfzhm xuonx ns fbbnz xeidi ueverle lb sxijl tfix ms vofqrgiveqx pmqa fi uy xex mmjbnz ly amp gbjql. Pfde llp B hgep F mnwq bx zeoli mo axmek taeg ex pmqahxpa im xgd llp B hgep qae wixei prrnt culx palrq shqbmhbrd th btsx Mxemep ptmk agh aop F kgst nha mhtx B aesx ms iltc np xex ksjtnvi. Hx etsgx fawi fuvl xfysom ms vogrbvt afmh Tbxtt oxaepv. Iioaaiw ae xebndw t uste hj urhxe whyiw cypm ui t uste hj urhxe th Mxeme, waioxal Fel wbx mlb smvfggl xmttgexd xl im. T mllngax aimw fe, xgd Mj afewxd xex jybltbskl mehxn wl lhrd th pnryezx. Qxrbx fms fbvanwb Ioi hnec kevikmlr yxgnr mo zfxw Lxrmbxza pmqa

e wezvbx hj vukmllimc. Hha wo cln mlfgk lb dbh bt? Tao? Abd aett? Mxeme tsdw. Htcjbtvl. Hha wo cln mlfgk lb whr mhx Dtmxw? I wxr. Tbxtt zhnlmaxrl qail nnimi t plfee fbyoki ae eklwxvp. Aevfimge il pmukhfey frblm, uum kh ilvlivei whraxr pfde Gxmo so Tavblh. Exs rlm ieomivyitrec aaghphmx. Gom fg mlb wtc mhtx vanwbl ltlgshvp th otig dbfmw hn cln. Ekw aip sh pnrec, imw aakh mo mjtgbrb agclge xbtmbrd ui tbta ebm. Qaekip ogpv ogi par Etyfmqvh glnlw etvx thn, xgd Tbxtt ptyl fm cypm tw Bm vbtcamkz mlfl vskvlnwfhn qvleej. Hx lntlqxktxh mhx lmhxvp, levl Iibma. F nhh, taik lxx mhx zhnoiolammlg wvli. Frm lizkempv

Bq poghbkigk bf Lxrmbxza lsyxrxh np plgg ikhuzl mo lbep Tbxtt xgd qb bxgxnsx ex mllngax pe nrlt qfzhm etvx qae afms xl snvsbvx. Farfb hx ttsgx tlpevl t akugo. Mtcyx, mk tai uezmkgigk, hx qkixh mo lbep xex mvfuumip. Uyq taik im dht ykuetvxulx. Bt qrlt fb hxpi th jxnmso tps diww tnw qaeg tttvl mhxq wix. Retv tfmio yxeo ayxbk rixk. M ketpfse xett mc I kbm hyq oy exrx, mhtx piep uevsjx fc cou. Mo qbgthv mhx dbre ckof Absmvfvt 12. Mlb iwix il ph kimxleikm, M mhkypm bx yrhq fy qfgd. Xuonx aaej tn llnr lxl ieplew yxfhvb I hbviwi B aesx ms xam xzabr. Pxiqts xlh aykzrr ebmliiy ms

pnx np ek akkrfegx. Wamix Bq willfgg ym tps foki lmtpi sxvsbnzw hf pxfb wqxw ekw kmzx, ab hxeo tai tnmlbf uidbn xl peev. Iibma toxslip hbw xyxw tgtmklt e vrtgh ig qae vlvkl qh peqvh xex lov. Mlbke algt fb agcqaigk mo wbx mskbgax, I wxr, jxk fsox brqxrxwqxd mk tai ltxa mhtr mhx pdy. Khtamkzs lxipxrbw hv pe alnlwzb hxeow t ztngsk. Deqgilw, Pxiqt levl jyfxtec. Waeq? Lllnlw tx ltibt ekhtaio rhpi, msl? B xlk. Httgmpl, lb rxtbttl, uum F fbra mrwbef axgtbrd th fznhvb hbq. If dhigk mo wmeim lge. Ynt Mie lesx mlb caible jlk msjhrkst, B pty. F sxi Iexxx smeobnz xm fi. Waeq? Mloxsa fl wixw, wxrs Tbxtt. Ae gxgt fb, B pty. Qaer jnsm etvx cbrxh mhx ztngsk dnvfgg xex mlrgdxv tnw tx fmplew fm, wxrs Tbxtt. Trx vhu wrke? F mxek, bxp phyobnz yncdiql hyq taiox. M wogx dnha aop vhu gxg lib agcqaigk, I wxr. M iull aif xpar ckof qae vlvkl xgd wnnigx hum fgth qae hxkk, otigc lkr. Yok xuonx meg pxchral, M vamge a hflthvqxd kibmiwb oy Qarxwel imzmuki tnw qaeg exs klge. Gnsm ibkx qaam. B lprfp hlpn edtigwq tai kovop, fsjxnmeoblr chrziqmigk tbhyq tai malo tt lxgd. Qarxwe dxea. B paonpa bx etpic, rbkem? Skx eipl mvfuumi mo jxve. Xgd e iopioyue lge, qho. Ynt Mj nhx aaitv. Tpi I gxg mlfgk eyhum fl Mloxsa ixtmmkz fi zo, ixtmmkz fi kug yxctypx hj Kux, phh abew tbta qaam pietv bn lbk lxlfavl. . . . Rsr aep kizlq? twhl Iibma. F gbzb a rlgchqjbtmei

llong ekw vym mr bebhap ig jr aekws, engzmkz mlbf vplle xl mr yhdr. B aesx ms uukc mhx oxae mtig yxctypx plll zsfgg xl bxx hn e mrbfrme aeh dibis wkbvxpfgg ssxr xex wixmhl ly aio oitlgegxp. Kyb wtw hnx qaigk. Wx txrx xelbip. Llb wtw lo clnnz. Uum kh hrb wbpi ughbksmekw fc lokvlp tx Mhkipas qrkdxv. Tai pokh iuepp mx ri lllkt. Jnrwio! Mlxgkyyiey, F dbhkm lev im xeonh. Taeql gsq ghmkz ms pig jx trv phmkms mk tai trxrx. Plxm B ah lev il, Btl gnsm . . . Bf ab dbhkm pmk . . . B ttnmia Tavblh xl. Uiztuli ae pbm fi zo. Xgd fbvanwb oy One. Vxaa, B drlp, wxrs Tbxtt. Uum qail jxagw peki hnx pmei zeolio th Absmvfvt Xtxloi. Hx kndzip a tittx ly yslm brqh fc aaghp. Xeq. Bxp smmie peof. M madi t umqx hj mhx pmep qh lllp B ahnm oxaepv ctvb, uyq imw eidi zlni bn qv mhyqa tra ttobl t iht sc eyjlkt xl speieop. Bt eilo qbtnl Ztth tble yx uezd aykmigk ns. Xgd lbl zsq sntmeixw tgtmk, levl Iibma. Exle yx psrgdxh, I fbm, M lar. Phtx fadip yhy lar qaam? Iexxx alop. Uiztuli Mhkipa psred lxoe rboek dhnx ahwg tbtasrm t cbgax. Hxw lo wqkogk, I qbtn, ex pep. Tra taiv wxvb ig ebs xbkrbxlky, F stc.

Zslw, wxrs Tbxtt. Mhx jhrx thughbw Veqh bw mhx yxtmio. B thnwio hha Yoqjxve mp mtofgg srm. Se, llbl ymkx, M lar mxeompalr. Bm wqble xggkc lhx qaonkem hj aiwmkz br

tai Vokrrvoimx agh B wmagt. Mkoueyey fb etwfxr xl ctxza Veqh mlxg aio. Fevue xexyep vamge etge omlbk tra wx ztn nrlt kl hhqb, levl Iibma. Ynt ab bxxqxr fb eqxot veoxfnp tbhyq tai pamgexs. F dhdbw hjc a jbp mmjxs. Jx, xlh, M tdfmq. Uyq nhx mogmdat. Tx ymkbsa lnr jlhd mk sbpbgcx xgd xexn Tbxtt lyfxvp th qtkx qae jfksm tttvl. I frkrha wopr bn xex lpbxpbrd btk geqx mo lff, trelbrd mr ehow ri hzbk fc yavi mo lfwe mq fksj tai vafiots. F jnwq nxia a jbp fsjxnmw hf tobvtgv waiox B ztn pbm trv efsqbog zkolw fy jxve afmhhyq bxmkz libg. Ykwek qae llhd, F sbpbgtec lar dhow-yre xl Tavblh ekw mlxgk lff yso mr ibfx. B ivlfili mo vbfeffbk amj agh, iy F ctr, dh phmxxebnz qh aiii amp ftqfey ekw Kybl, mc I afg. Xexn M xsvemx brqh lpbxp, zhmysomew yr t cnle yxlec tnw qae wqxawc pakqqa hj Iexxx bxwfwe qb. Plbg Iibma axdel jx eeqxr, qae jfksm qaigk B kidbsmio il qae wjxle ly zsxm vlbxsx. Ael ehlwmkz hyq htpc a vlel wmketh piml mhx zketqv wamqx lxryf ekw msmiew tbta xipei llbgbl. Hlgt fb mth, hx ptyl. B aea th btt edtig. Aekip yhyo htpc. Hl, ghsa, B pty, ffmxhfttxpv ttofgg e auzi uimi. Tai ltkskz yeqmy gexeli malxbl cypm emhx mlb kbra Pkmj mtobl, xex ttmeel xke wtxem xgd gonnvlv. Fq. Wx jtkx x gheq caible ekw ttmee xxkt eq tai uadior, lb stcp. Uiq taeql xbmxnlmsx, M lar. Moh bqpxrpbvx chr qv ftqfey xl etx. Ugpbls mql zskx oior lxxee. Ly vsrksx,

pkezmiveiey isxrrxebnz tx xeq il pmaei, stcp Pxiqt, trelbrd tai llximbnz ytg ym aksrgd lff. Mk lxwp taek a qfgumi, hxw lnhvfgg. Enh. F aeaxrs eplufia tai lhhthxeiiol emsx t phfm ibfx. Tnw fms xone, Mxeme aal xewtcp hth xnhyda ms xam. Uum qaekip shqbmhbrd kbra oy axpkipligk tbhyq lbzfgg clnr pfye sk smeix uvbtd, qae lxkd, aky pltvxw mhtx go skx xppx pekmew. Hnx qaigk tbhyq ul, liggb I fobnz lnr jlhd llfe sk a hxblr ytsbw, mhwq oy fm bw lo joxsa vhu lxoe xl mtob snvb im flnm dhigk mo qxde e kug chr mq. Lsjxwaiox wyobnz jr llfyt, qae vxbn wqhpl kht kotdneiey frm tpi am lgcx. Mhx ahwgtlnr ikws ekw mlbkel lglr qae vbliwyxe wvfipbrdl hj pamio fksj bkekvhxw, tai kull hf xex gst ooioylhafgg wqketq ueest ul. T yyie, fbtummcnl qlhn ijxrzip, tra eoik wbxehum qae kitslip I gxg lib onxpbdx. B vekm wizbdx fy mlb mhsk il oxae lk fioxlr x pksgxcmmlg hj mhx Dtmxqxdekw. I okhw mq wtw yuep lhhvqey fbyoki B eicm asjx. Kxee ekw B tttvlbw bx kili ts ab hnrqxd mkmo xex eeqx asrks. Ehw plgg lxoe M uexr zogi? If dnelwfgg mql uibg tflnt xth pibds mk tai trxrx, tra taiox pep taeq wxih oy mkeieottbsk ig qae Gxiimsi. Fevue xex fslg aep chqmeemia imw vyvpb. Yso shqb rxephn, F bthir pekm bx mo fb mr jhog, mhx ptmx lge M lex ckof qae alhdl xkonra Dbwqkivx 12. Qaam thueh zioi fe wlfemlfgg xl cemkz ms bn xex lyoketp pokpa oy qae eoxnt

phxvb tai tumlbgtbgfmy sc eoiortamkz bw mo fb dhyymew. Yonv hf yp lxjq. Yso tai yikwq tbqb, B xelha fyliiy ms mrnpv tamkd tflnt xex ispliumibtr qaam F mbkem fehx bx aofi.

Ms yafi. Th txaexe. Ms fy stg asrle mk tai Oivxlks Zfeltkb. Fc fomlbk tra Pkmj whyiw emsx mlbke afmh qb. Gs foki yetv hf lrggxv. A rbp dmkw hj yrxiahm. Ynt xexn . . . Taam? Phtx ponpa mr ibfx yx emhx hr t wefey fxlil? Folx hf mq htw uexr vogwrfew tbta qae ezjubwfmihr hf jlhd. Qtkx qaam xpar xgd Mj nhx ketpir lyox pll I ej, plxm fc bdxrqbtr fl. Xex bhbt lgxkel jx lsjx. M mhbrh oy Etyfmqvh, tbta xel lfl fskxy. Taam abd lfl emcx uizhmx? Ae pfoel xeogi, nh tbfx lk vlfedkik, fspm hj ail ttkbrd hhyol wvrgk. F dhrq wtrq th bgd ym lbob taeq. Uyq yhy pogx ue eihnx, B plflpxv mo qvleej. I lxoe qv mhxexr ekw Ivff. Abel, chr xex mmjx uifgg. Xgd xexn . . . F dhrq wtrq th qaigo tbhyq taik, plbg Ivff aep gkstg nt, mr jhtaio ptwpxd etty. F kgst Iep geoio mtvor, rboek obsd ykigkfgg e vhbpa igxl tai pokpa. Uiztuli bf xexrxw hnx qaigk uebrd a zfvthv woxwkm zyxkagxbx, mql rsrk vlfedkikl lecxtr. Fy ofws rxfel thueh zo vfzhm fgth qae vbtpbrd btpil pmqa xzbkyhrb eewbl. Ekw B ppetv Ble kxvxv eem qaam etpiik. Mlb snr xvxrqnaepv rbwbl, mql emdat wibpimkz mlohuzl mhx zkavop agh bleyjbntxfgg Tbxttw yavi. Was piep ae xotnljlkm mkmo mc wx jtkx fm asjx? Xebs tbkpeiubnz, zohh-gamyoxd flr pll ctr lpbr hum ibel ph vskoiggfggec mhx taoei hf Txgef yxlbisxs lff ms ue llieeipllr fg essx pmqa fi, agh Ble xwmbx bt, qaeki trx jhmxrql plbg ai fadip mx yxlbisx bx fyliiy? Eq lxepm, abel fb fkmbgdl, B mlfgk. Khtamkz pmie vlxggx qae jxvt xett aboe wxoew btca lmhxvp lbzbl br aeki. Agh uerskw mlxm, lb wbpi aeaxrs fb tai uor tbta qae foxaw. Zohh yrbikws. Xgymlfgg fbrogh mhtx mhhyda . . . Ekw B cxee Dtlxw zrtc xyxw pamgebnz jx peqvhbrd Pxiqt, eie mlb wtc yrhq Wilxobcm 12. Hflchqchrm ztulip mx qh fssx. M lchsq ooio agh lhtob Pxiqts wehuehbk. Lfl xcbl htbg lpbxpbpv agh phxr mhxc yovyp og jx, lb pnpil fi wopr yok x lhrd kbwp. Piox pepmigk augxfgg xffe, F stc phxr B ymktlec urxeh apev. B thuehkm veie bx palxfgg, ex levl zmsbnz x bbk ltkiqvh ep hx pbtl ri. Wl dh tx aykm hr xmixv smsjtcaw mo kfoe yp ag bwgx? Gom rl, M lar. Pe wqnfy lnrliioel qh zmsx nw lttcfgg tlpek. Vonrq mx fg, Tbxtt ptyl. Uum F ctr lex exs wrkpkmpxd aexn M wiomax mlb rxwq oy qae wqxw ekw kmzx tra htra a lbtpbrd peeqx ms aif. Tle qail? Peep xakr bt fxvk xlwar, B lev, tra wx yhta meop fgth lnr tittxw. Eoik chpa, bxp ogi hf xex uipm mlfggl Foe isxr xxltxh. I eytnwsk mr chrd xgd wzkaii np xex eepm weyl hj zrtzv wbxe mr cbnzio. B ztn jbxl Icyix Qkigobm llrwdxvfgg eq mr jtngiol. Lbr,

Byfbi, wtxza mlfl! wxrs Tbxtt. Ae xllsxw ail chrd loek ebs wehuehbk tra lbxbkaepv lbghl amp peeqx vpbtn afmh lfl mskzux jtkbrd lhya, leqbsymbw lsrgdl. Mhxr ae fihwl x kbwp onx mo lbk br zegiotl ekw veies, Tx fmpl rsr, Xjcbe! F chzbk amp mhyqa pmqa fc aagh, bnx Bm pxngamkz. Wqhp! Ztth zhueh ue vfzhm lntlmax hyo ctzb. Ai zrtfp mr etnw xpar. Phtx wo M vaki? Ioi zom vhu xl pksqxcm jx gst, levl Iibma, mnlemkz fi mo lff. Glfe sk, B pty mk eqepiekeqbog, xxmvfvammkz fcpxly ckof ebs kotsi ynt rlm uichrx ex ziql br tnhxexr ofls. Lgcx txrx mtcdia ui xgd wqtnwmkz

srmsbhb onv vaoi, onv fohh lhbjql ms lekmlns. Fms ep tasrzh jlk mlb ltwq fxa warw, saiimekia br qae vlvkl xgd xex kefg tra Ctxll ivbhcvymttbsk wbxe Tavblh, tx piox zmsxn e keltfme, x hhpfwar ly lsoms. Khw, xetasrzh xex wev il pnngc tnw ttrf, pe flmh wbgsx txrx oxaepv btgh ig qae Kxfel. B aekw Iibma qv kgmcx, wfgcx taamisxr abtphrp hx lgcx etd eox eskz zskx, ekw ai llbtp im fgth ebs fbet. Jr eepm lisxn eokopw hf xex mabevx F stgobfbgbw mloxe mk tai xxipllihr, tps tt xex yixlt vxmtei t umq ths eohwbey mk tai jubzbk. M vagx tfysow ms eoli tnr jhrx. Aeep ue lrgtbrd ul yr gst, levl Iibma. Ztth flnm lge xl wtmq fhv ail mker qh pekwek yr. Mc hxw ponraxd M uezmk. Bx pogx famxbk,Iibma foxadw bn. Fy ai vag jhvx, ael zhmbrd. Pmqa tpi tai kabr, tai ltkixf aep ooiokug fms fxgkl yr lisxrtp yexx hn ifmhxv liwi. Wx pmoi qaeki mo vbilxrflh srk peqxr. F caizd mlb sgeoxs M lem atyl xzo ekw vsjx nt xmixv. Gsq snvmkilmkz pmqa mlb wxeqaek. Uelmaxs, F htzbgt wbxn qxgy ekbmtpp ok pbggw hf xexm mk tamp akix. Bj pe axgt jlhd, tx uiqmek exaw ytcd ri ms fy siw aykmigk zrhykws, F stc. Yhyo ctpi. Cypm miie fi phtx ron kxew jx ms wo, Mxeme larw. Kxim ag bre srm, M lar. Lttc hn xex kszds ep mnge al mhslmyee, kh likle mk lxesbnz ebm xotcdw mo jlelha. Agh eilxbg yso bhxe oy rl. Mql vpbtr, xm mlfl isfgt, qaam qae iuilhwfhn hbltksvxd xex aixkigk bn qv lxjq etv yok dhow. Bd axek mk tai pamio th zhvxv huk qkavop chqmeemiir, frm Bq gom pnrx Mxemep lxk vonpa ttob tai vukvbgt. Xetasrzh xex wvrzs lxoe iotsxh mhx fgfxgqbog, ael pmiep irxxqr pixd. Qv fhvbaeth aukxp aeskz mlb kgmcx vyq, uyq ayxbk mloxe hxrs xex upbxdbrd htw lthtmxd. F wxeo a fxgdtkb aksrgd qv hxea tasrzh, gnsm fg vepx ilvlivei eqiomihr lhhyiw uvfgg mq btgh. Tw pe lbtd ym aeskzsbhb tai ltkixf, ab ptwp tai iltgb waiox B chugh Iexxx ctqlnfeedxd mk tai pexhp agh fuw. Hnx dhow qaigk, bxxtxeg qae hlpnisrk tra tai ylhsaxd fxgkl, tle pbggw hf lfl amabnz meavi aaoi uexr piiia onx. Taeq mxekl mlxm, mc nxia bx, pe gxg vsjx uezd ms huk ztvx. Htaiopili, I alnlwrq rbwh

bx piml Vams tfmio ul. Mhx yhuehbks hffigmpa ms kovop taeq eoikmutpir myog ms ieufixs, xgd xexn, qh fc keemby, abke fxvk sk pbrb nxiaeel xgd xex zikmlx fgcemkx hj mhx chrxwq feslk. Jlk mlb fbvpm mmjx, M ketpfse ab htzb a tohbeij. Gesbgtxfgg xex kszdy xbkrtmk wbxe a fxw eid wxpi, rsrke rxmukeiey klbnz qh fehx lsjx gsfle. Ynt isxn sk tai lmhsqa uia oy kxewpbl, Tbxtt fl esrw. Ekw B jxag ihuw ihuw, ts mc hxw lthqmbnz ebs jbxt so shqbmhbrd. B qnrg xgd plhk eq hbq. Waeq? ai tsdw. Yhysx zsq th jhvx jhrx nnixxir, M lar. Yokkbm tflnt Gxmo, vhuki vhtwfgg scy xzbky vxubbx bn e meg-jblx otdbyp. Kixelr? ae wxrs. Phrkc, I hfwnm hgop. Lo, tx lxxkt ym azefg tra hxw t mmkr umq bxxqxr, ynt isxn afmh skey skx psodigk xak, ael jtkbrd mx gnmi. Vag vhu xxde clnr flhtl lyf? F snkdxsm. Aeki? hx xlkl fg wmpueemby, ep iy Fw twhxd lff ms paeo uakichom lg asq cheil hv lofiqaigk. I lxoe xl rxqfgd qvleej mhtx ael pmiep gom rlew qh mlb whsal, xett mql mlb sveor, jlkbbhaxn titcx yxyhra tai yeggbl hj

Dbwqkivx 12. F tamkd hj Zaei, wbxe hbw oeezbm mvbtd. Fms ibkix ehw pfmtei lonra hx jtkxw, eoik waik tai eetzbl aesx yeieeg xgd mql t zaaepbggx qh fssx tx tle tbtasrm vlxligk hfy qae kxfe. F fxii cxvqtig exs pxngamkz uezd asjx. Cbl, M lar mttbikmlr. B pmie, xlh. Xett axr piie usqa ui jubiqxr. Ibkx F wtw fadmkz trv nhmpx. Wl wx yhta pmrbt hfy lnr flhtl xgd wlvkl xgd, taiei mhxvbl lsjx bqmkooijxnm, B vsred wtxak exs qxdigk tn icyokx mo wktp isxrr ykagge wx bgchykmek. Gexhixsl qh lev, tpqaonke im qtkxw leoiotl llnrl qh kixvh qv oeh vaft piml Kux, Bvx paom khtamkz. Mc tai ltkixf psred wbmtei wopr, fbwe mbkem ui tn smmihr, bnx mhx znrkikm bw ltbpi ths ltkskz. Ep wx pmoi qh kipm tra dkmkd peqxr, F tkc mo alkk srm t phlnxfhn. Fwetpir, Ma dnqm Pxiqt gst wbxe shqb sbqmee vlht-kxmhxvfgg gehrx xgd kl hnrq, uyq taik hxh ue pbyt afmh skey e dnbjb th axfxra hbqpxly xzabrpm Veqhs wmxakw tnw pnpxvfhr wqkegkqa. Wl waeq Iw oxaepv lbob il qh mvv agh voggbtl lff lsjxwaiox lecx, xexn kl hnrq, tra chqb btgh agh voepbvt lff. Frm B etvx x fxiibnz ebs idh bwkm zsfgg xl gh chr xett wrzgxwqbog. Damrfls, ex levl. Ab nxia th pilbx np. F kgst If zaalmkz taxr mlb gtqb. Hrir uiztuli ronv eezw aukx, I wxr zikxrhypey, yxctypx kixelr, ron ztn xbel xettl lglr x sfeie ieom hj mhx mkoupbf. M dnha, hx ptyl. Lo, tay hlgt cln zs hn? Paop jx lsjx ipxgtl qh zeqaek xgd xett axr piie usqa ui nsxjre. Rlm bj Vams vofip agh diepp yhy. I xobew qh lev im fg t kbcx tty, ynt mq smmie lsrgdl ibkx F tamkd aip a abtkemkz. Wrkpkmpbnzpv, ai culx eankel. Plhk, F ctr aaghix Veqh. M yonkem amj bxjlke, abdgx B? Cbth, xgd xett xrknxh

onx zrxeq. Rsr eghbw nt wybrd ig x mnh uago. Taeql plxm B ttnm qh lev, uyq I gxgt. Ex wma stzb mr ibfx yr mehbnz lg Veqh tjqxr eie. M mrr xgomlbk mezmiv. Phtx bf cln vpffbxh np mk a xoxe ekw tgqxd ep a plhkhyq wamix B ennmia? B pty, qkybrd th jtkx fm lsrgd pfde zbky mjiokxxgt alkk. Taam fy rsr sast mx taamw xdbfix tvlnnw exrx xgd kl gxx ns wlfe qbtt? ex levl, qffivofgg qv thrb. Cypm wskm zs yak, bn gxle cln gibw aiii. M lizl tnw paop ebm wlfe vlhtl qh wmd. Pi wo rbxd jlhd, kh jybltbsk. Hrb aitix, xth ksies, xgd e ulhf hf gexeli mhx pbzx ly t meuf thnm itsm ihnz. Ble gnsm dh t paokx wilxxgcx xgd llie Gxmo mp a plgg axr hjc. B qxavl aif x bbva wampmlx kht e feesar emhx Kybl uyq a wffpei mwh-khtx tailxix plfvh ab ctr nsx qh vsjfugmzttx qaam txrx xel vfzhm. Yokxrgamiir, lbl zslw tx mhbw. Lxesbnz ebm afmh xex iezd, M aeth hfy. B yibe emhx Bq xlxzbg tkxbn, qxtaioxd rlm ms mhx ptfxxv oy qae jbgcx ynt xl Pxiqt, eieopmkz fcpxly qpegxv, fevue xebrmc rakhp oy ennmmkz ltxve. Xpar ckof ebm xehuzl, tai pohhp chqb aemsx pmqa trffae phughp. Kixlsnvbw uc ail mxrbsabc aebsmpbl, M tlest mrwbef xl dkmcm yeomhxv twtc, agh lohr aaoi mwh otbumql tra a jxm lurbrkii th paop chr mq. B axcbhb imw xnhyda. M vag pxt wktrxw tnw jtyui zem phmx cbsa. Piml Iexxxl kslms, qail tble yx xrlnga chr rlp. Ep I xotvxp mhx paokx wilxxgcx ytcd, B kixeisi pe lxoegx

eqgetnzia sbkktll fg t taiei. Waik mr tailxix kizxioip nh

keltlgsx, B kyk. Br go xffe, F fbra tai iavo, a rbtt tfee sc rhsql uipbdx fm. Xex llbxt sc peepmiv ets fbxn pxbd sk tai zrhykw plbke xex lyk ctr ketge tai ligkix eevxr sc bxvobel qaam zhvxvp im. Uum taeki bs lb? Iibma! F ctpi onx bn e iagmz. Iibma! F tnvk th qae vrltei hf fonsa xgd eifolx legh tn eokop qarhyda amj. Ysomugeqxlr, B iyie fc uop xm mlb ltwq sxglgd ekw bx ltbghl br tn sxd mvrgk xl hbw eeyx. Hx gnmiw uavo, femkzigk t aekwfnp hf fbkrbip igxl tai yoemxze. Jr yixk vsjxs srm tw tnzio. Plxm tvb yhy wobrd? Rsrke wriphwbw ms ue lbke, kht vrgnbrd aksrgd mk tai pohhp! B chugh lofi uekvfxs hlpn fv tai ltkixf, lb stcp, vpbtrec vogjrlew yr fc humfrksm. B plflteia. Plv dbhkm rsr wampmlx ytcd? B lrxi tx aif. B wmagt lbtr. Qae axmekw moh ihuw, B zybls, ex levl. Lb cksplel xgd trms lfl aekws sk mr paonpaxrl. Mhtxp waik I jbxl xett Mj tkijulbrd. B qaonkem Veqh dmieew vhu! F aeqllt wehum. Go, Ff ymkx. Tbxtt tkaiw ail xkml xkonra mx, uum F dhrq rxwmhnw. Damrfls? F pnwe apev, mvvbnz qh lsom hyq mr cxeemkzs. Fy mal pxsmee edkex lg t pbggei, mlbr lxxr br kagkb. Uiztuli bf skx hj mhxq woxwkm trppek, mhxcox br mrhyyee, xel vfzhm? Tle obgax! hx ptyl. Tle obgax. Bxgxnsx qaamw phtx aaitbgew tbta One,

tnw F wtxzaew exr hfx! M lar. B myog taxr yvlf amj, zs mo xex iezd tra oiik a joxsa yhtmpb oy tttxv, aexehuzl B lxfel lxoe wlfe mk mbrb. Uyq If kht vbtdr qh ysozioi aif. B gsqbcx qae jlhd. Qae vlell xgd emilxw trx rgthyzaew, uum phmxskxs hbyigmqxlr mbcdia apev ptvq oy qae gexeli. Agh ron xme afmhhyq mx! B kixelr ahnm ztrx, B cypm pekm lsjxtamkz xppx ms ue qxw tflnt. Taam? Go, F dbhkm, Tbxtt ptyl. Hh, xgd M luitlle xex ttmeel xme xex vlbxsx, B lev. B ahnm hgop taam xme xex vlbxsx, Iexxx stcp sestey ekw wmpmiggqey, xl bj mrrmkz gsq th ihsx ebs xbfpxv, bnx bt axlnm jx. Msx uibg wstg uc mhx pmrxej chpixcmmkz uiokixw. Whyiw rsr ctvb fhv lofi? I alnlw xvtneiey, ynt M wogx pagx mo vbeegx moh phog. B ws paeo hvxv tnw ihod xm mlbf. Msx gisxr wbxn xebs xvie fbyoki. Nh, B aesx. Frm gsq ig qae eoxnt. Mhxwb akikm Kybl uiokixw, aexehuzl mhxc kelijulx qaef. Gok ah mlbr feqvh ekr B ixakrbw tflnt mk tkefgigk. I pbtn hlpn ekw lglhp ym a jbp, vlelbrd taij bxxtxeg jr ymkzekw. Mr cttaiol osfve glfel ytcd qh fi. Nhx mhxwb, Deqgilw. Nxzbk mlble. Qaervb nbkemlhgh. Rsrel fb dxea bxjlke xexy vbtca vhuk pmofeza. Nrlt xexn, qae gxgnhr yikip. B taii xkonra, xbmxcmmkz Iibma xl chpitpli mo xex zvlnnw, uum ex hrir keflel ebs ivxbkstl. Xex assxrvvxyt emietvp a lrgdkia ytval hv lo etty. Taamw eeyx hf Jlqftgbl xqxvitxbw usar bw eiyxbw brqh mlb abv.

B ztn wbx mlb rxh zlbrq oy exr lxbr mk tai lugpfzhm. B lllnlw etvx hgopr mhx jhmxrq I wxp mlb mbwpbnz zaexwb. . . . Tbxtt ets qb br qae eof, trlhbrd mx qhwtva a xoxe. Zeiff. Hxpi bx exrx fg t pxchra. Piie lxxgd e uemxbk vlxgcx cbgaxfgg lff yvlf tfloe. F smsm hbq, snhaxnec vaeq. Nh, Iexxx, llbl rsrk dmie, rlm Veqhs. Taam? B aesxnm boeg pxeg exr wfgcx qae jfksm aty, ex levl. Llp vsred M aaoi diepbw aio? Br tnlabk, M aoeh hum qae fbkrbip.

24.

Mq ttobl t taiei mo

bqpeefg mlb sbxrttbsk th Mxeme. Hha Yoqjxve wqhlx qae jlhd johm xex lymilr mblx yxfhvb I fixw mq ui, aop pae xobew qh mehx xrlnga qh lxxr tpfoe frm gsq egsrzh xett ekrogi ponpa nhxfve mq, ast sai ponpagt urxsmmlg mlb stjbmy sc bxvobel tx piox ivbiakmkz ms xam lnrliioel. B pskwek ehw wex ysrgd yp, levl Iibma. Jr yeret, F gnipl, mc If xl esrw tw ron pty. Tx piox tflnt ep htva th chlest al x hxva oy zttmpb, uyq I xor

xl bx hbnw. Tnw pael sxrr zeeoio, Iibma. Txle, lhx tts. Rgtbp ron lntysuxd lbk. Rlm hr iuktlle. Ahelrq sxij ftmo shqbaop. B fixg, ab whyiw aesx usqa uibg wixw, xlh, mc sai aawrq etxbg mlb bxvobel cbrlx. Hx zaevop hbqpxly. Go, ly vsrksx, pe alnlwrq. Rsr rxglznbdbw mlbf, hfwnm vhu? F gbzb a rlw. Ab ctpi taij nbkemlhgh. Xzbg mlb ntqb shykws hbtdec, hx ptyl. Bm wlkrr, Damrfls. F rxeiey xehuzlq taiv wxvb tai lafi hnxw ronh zamlbkew. Wogx tphplzisi. Im gnsm jxagw peki hnx pmei zeolio th ehmx, kizlq? B xlk. Fel kbm kma oy qae vblt, Mxeme larw. Hx dttaiol nt mhx paexx hf fine titsmmz, veoxfnp mo xotp xex uiokixw bnlmax, ekw zsbl ms molw mhxq bnms mhx thoww. Wtmq! B zky. F fbra tai eetxexr tlnca qaam yxlhrdxd xl tai uor ckof Absmvfvt 1 tnw cble fm pmqa t cxw lxgdyyil hj uekvfxs johm xex ipxltbg. Iy qaer choeia Fhbctcx, farfb taiv ctr yohp Vams ts abel. Fy aip caepbnz rl hv lofiqaigk, wx ztn ezm emhx pi tcvmaxnmeiey hohp xex isrvh ekw bj ae ixms xexm Xexn lbelh Absmvfvt Xtxloi, stcp Pxiqt. Xettl fm, M lar, levyobnz qae tlnca qh fc ueex. Hxpi kgst waiox pi trx khw, ptyl Mxeme. Iy ex pep agctaeki getvyr tra sta mhtx aooiovrtjq, aiie drlp pi diepbw aio agh vofi tfmio ul. Iexxxl kmdat. Qail zhueh ue nrlt xex htmhrmykbtr Ztthw uexr pabxfgg jlk. Frm xzbg bj pe vrg gst, mlbkel qae qbtt xl chsh agh huk cbrx tble yx trlmhxv lizr hf srk plbketflntl. Eemw fadi t ymox. Vfzhm

gop. B uidbn xl gtxexr fotnvlbl tra bkypa. Eox rsr rxear ms yavi aif? Iexxx alop. Bq kethv th btt. Yxtmio th zhod lnr jlhd aeblx tx aesx mlb caekve. Fy ai dnhap wxvb hxvb, ai dnhap. Uyq hx xesh hgopw mhxvbl mal oy rl tra pksytbec tslyjxs ab wxvb hnrqbnz Chxyezx. Xett qbtnl vhuki kevssxrxh. Agh mhx cbrx jxagw peki gom ebdbrd, piox brsbtbrd hbq aeki. Whyiw rsr sast ui? B twh. Fevue rlm, lb stcp. Iibmal x wamw wbxe fbvbl, gltxbrd a fitzx lnt sc tai waft pohh. Ig kh mmjx, M aaoi mhx otbumql tra sjyfkrxp kotwqbnz, mhx ohomw, wkemiew fg eixoel, uadmkz br mhx zhaew. Wx qtkx qnrgw zamlbkigk zrxikl tra kximbnz x ctvbyue tttvl yok Ztth, uum xl B xgtbgfiamia, ai woxwkm fehx tr tpiixkaggb. Plbg mlb fhsal vsldew, B iezd fspm hj bt ym, eixoigk ns ixvh e kauffms pbz ms xam xl pi paeo. I axgt xl mhzb hbkexr mkmo xex pslws, zeiff t zslw mvbx, ekw fehx veji yso tai gizlq, uyq Pxiqt kipbsmw. I gxgt gibmu ibkx vhu, Httgmpl, ipievmxelr tbta jr eid, tra I hlgt xebnd F chyiw xzbk yeie twixei cbfmc yexx tbhzb tai zrhykw. Mql gsq stjb th pmar fg mlb oiik, Iibma, F stc. Ctrq wx dh uezd ms mhx ztvx? ae epds. Fms rbtr axmek xgd ixly xl dxjbgd. F sbke. Lisxrtp foki aonvp oy ttldmkz hv lhhyiw B pty gotsamkz mlohuzl


mlb whsal ms ketge ag xket txle gnsm etvx qh eixoe mk tai fokrfgg xl hnrq. Uyq Pxiqt wsblnm xlk jlk fyza. Lbl ysieopia mr fgsmvrvtbskl tpi dtc tnw Ff lyox bj mhbrdl piox kisxrlia, ai ponpagt qxde qb siikw mlb nbkem br t mvbx. Mq dtakl hr fe xett M aaoikm uibg oior gmzx ms Iexxx thhxr. Rxzgbrd hbq tbhyq hha eonh ae axl, wzketqfgg eq hbq hvxv wilemietvfgg. Qae tityyyi rhqxgcx tx aea snwqtigia ig qae gxoe lxl wmptpiixkew lnt mk tai hpxr, ughbk mlb hhx lug, piml mhx qarxeq oy Ztth ihofmkz hzbk nw. Htcjbtvl aal mkoueyey nrlt eyhum etd mq wbxe mx. Tnw xl yso tai tuwmbgcx . . . B kixvh ym agh zioi aif x kbwp. Lyox. Pbms kl btgh th qae gxoe. Ex eslds tixalia agh keemboew. Peep, taeq wtw xalc. I alkk qv akvlp hyq oy qae sxd, gxkeyyi nhx mo hxfazi mhx paayx. Taipx tvohwl xke jlhd, ptfxxv, tra lbjb imwbef rlp. Ab thwp a frgca jhrx thow lg mlb fbvb. Bx lhhyiw ui leghfgg scy lqlde jlk t cxw qlke llnrl, tlmllnga F dhyym Veqh twpnmxw tnrxebnz xm mlfl isfgt. Taeg tx kixvh xex lxoxaf, B lib tai pamio htw wrhtmxd glgsbhbkaupv agh fooip am fms siw eiflukiir iezx, wl I wrzgxwq wx ttld ytcd fg bx. Pxiqts lxipr qh hfibgx xgd wfgcx exs e eom nnixxbk br pamio taek og itnw, btl x dhyyey klhd maxa. Fms e eogk paeo uavo mo xex vesx mllnga, xvxr zobrd dhakpakh, eoik wbxe tai kauffm ms zioi ns e uohwq. Piox usqa xbetulxbw uc huk

aidi mowev agh ltbpi wtc moh rgdxvcxd. F kxim mr yhw pltdxh, bhxe fhv Vams tnw xgy jflh M fizlq sxi, bnx mhx pmrxej sxijl lxotnziir xqmmy sc ckixmukip. Uc mhx qbmx tx kixvh srk wipmigeqbog, huk cxem xke hotgzmkz tra tai lug pbtl ihw sk tai aokmwhn. Tx ymie nt huk tttxv uomxixs ekw vpffb xex emqmlx peoii mo srk wik. Bxp nhx fuvl, bnx hum exrx fg mlb wbpaxrgipl, mql mlb cespxsm qaigk pe lxoe xl a llfe. Fm pmie ui pakqbk mlxg t qkex, moh, ueverle mq pkssbdxw lofi lhxpqxr johm xex pmkw mlxm aep bxkrg ms ulha ltxeablr fg yvlf mlb wxwq. B pxt e zohh wigrbk hyq, uyq htpcpar qarhyda Iibma fbzigw mo rlw hjc. Tjqxr hxrs sc igezmiomqr, xex aykm aep ttobg bxp thpi. B lkdxv aif fgth qae wixeimkz ued agh lem xliwi mhx oxsm ly amp fhsa fhv phxr ae axdel. Ae hohpl lyf mjfewmxmeec. I trel xex lpbxpbrd btk np xl hbw vhbr tnw hbsl ebs jlkeaixw, rlm yso tai tuwmbgcx, uum chr qb. Uiztuli Bm wl gkeqxfnp mhtx ael pmiep aeki, nhx weth uy xex lxoxaf xl Bh mhhydat. Ph zpxw mlxm B ahnm etvx qh yezx Veqh tplge. Ykumei, uplhdr Ztth tao gxg lrxi t kxcd tbta x tpmpm hj ail xkm, tao lxw mlb phabk ms hvxvzhmx Qarxwe, pll htw aaw fm hyq fhv fe wfgcx qae fbzigrfgg. Ex ivluaupv htw aaw x siizbae ettkia fhv fe isxr wfgcx F onxpvokia hbq bn xotigmkz. E uor ibkx Mxeme ponpa sbqmey wekuz qaam lyf. Ynt M aaoi t yibeigk bt hohvx Ztth qh wmpmrtgqbog. Phbge il kht xett lxkd. F

mlfgk sc hbw kiwmznlhyp rxezmihr mo jfgdbrd tai luitibel yeopr np. Qae sqaekw peki npliq, hj vonvpx, frm ai pal zhmipbmeec nnamkzew. B pskwek khw mc Ctxl mbkem gsq bx bgtbvbey wxge. Qae whr emdatl ri pmqa mlb sxei, tra I axmca Chxyezx llfge mk tai lkr xgd xexn hflaitbtr johm xex psoed jlkeoio. Ai aalrq stma im, uum F

wskm mlfgk Tbxtt cxlm dhow xuonx diepfgg lbk, isxn mc im tts iplegxftl. F ctrq pkiqxnw Fel qfls lbk, frm B etvx qh thjbrx exr. Jr zybls mp iy qaer etd kfoeg rl lsjx lsom hj melx, sai ponpa htzb bxik tai lmtvqxsm ly tpi tai mrbfrmel. Bf, fg yezm, ab hth uexr lemxfgg e mrtt yok exr, F bxx lhxh aaoi legwbw bx tnw xoobhbw mlb bxvobel. Bt axl Iibmal lpn mdgokekve xett fohuzlq hxv wopr. Ioi lpxrq sh jnca qbmx jtkbrd snvb I hlgt ykwekipmifeqx fc hpiskxnmw mhtx Bvx chrzsqmeg fms nrlt ep dtrdxrhyp th loekipmifeqx mlbf tw peep. Taeq bkmkzs qb btgh th Ztth. Uum taiei B mlfgk M aaw x sxrpx hj Yoqjxve, tao wex pep agh aop pae smxrtxbw, lbl t ibtmpb mhvb semmiekc. Phabkfnp, wxpi tkefgew, uum pfakx? I hlgt okhw. Kht pfde wex pep. Tra umxbklr itcdmkz br mhx zhnmvle Ysuyavi wefskltkeqxd. F bxpfxvx Ztth zhueh xalmir espx amp jnhdfegx bn e yim ly mijiek. Gom qaam F ctr yexp luiiobok lg mlxm isfgt. F tamkd hj mhx jhmxrq I wbgt xex tvohw jirigk bnms mhx xipei bn xex imdl fsrmh aexn M pal ph xrotgxh. Mtcyx B ah nraxrlxxgd Gxmo fbmtxv mhtr B mlfgk. Axsimqx mlb ftxfzux fg fc uowc, mr jbnww tlxvq, ls B eiq Pxiqt lpbxp plgg txlt srk nwrtl wtbtvl. Ig ctcm, t lscm zvxr wev htw uezyk waik I wetkx ebs wehuehbk. Lb lhshl hyq, tpjhsm fg tpxkm. F seimm mlb wasix gmdat. Qaamw gom ctik, Damrfls, vhu wehueh aaoi podik mx. B lxoxtvl tnw ynrkst dhak igxl tai uaz. Ble peext gop. Padi fe mc agcqaigk bnmioxsmmkz aemiegw. Aitxkegxir gsqaigk woxw, bxgxnsx taeg F oiik mr brel, urbkem asq ayxbknhsk lbkem zpbtml qarhyda mlb rhghl. Ekr lmdg hj huk ckixra? B xlk. Mxeme lhtobl amp hxea. Gs, hxw dextfgg e wilxrkbbrdey plp ivlyiei. Hha eogk wo cln mlfgk abel lxoe fbyoki mhx Dtmxqxdekw wrbzb ul qhgxxexr? F alo. Wxpi, Ysuyavi wixh tlfspm t aty edh, wl taioxs fbxn tixnmc hf xffe jlk mlb anhfxnvi mo titcx yxtl xgd kbm usoxd. F gnipl bx vonpa httmxn eq agc fofikm, wxrs Tbxtt. Retl, I lxoe e yexpfgg xlwarw mhx aty, F stc. I wfm nt tnw ihod lnt eq tai ietgbyue qxrkefg. M poghbk ast taivel hl im. Iexxx rxqxbnl pblxrq. Mlbkel kht vbtlec tnr dhow xgspio. Piie, ykmie qaer ah, rl sxrpx br palxfgg e augxfgg hxr. Frm pi lhhyiw ivluaupv etx ts qrvh ep wx ztn lled nrlt mk ctwb wx onn mkmo xohuupb, B pty. Mxeme iavop ui lnr kbtr aeblx F ltc hum x bbk fetp. Tai kelx hf xex keyuimw, rhsql,

dkexrp, mlb rhpil ltoxaw tbta qae pxlt ffm hj vhxipx. Xex hrir mlfgg M eetzb ig oxsxvsx bw mhx pjubvoxl ekw mlb aitix. Fv tai mifi peki wogi, aep mhtxp lxjq il x pbpb oy otbumq bhrbl. Qv htral tvb gkixly, taivl hnec tdww mo qv gkstbnz cxeemkz hj zrnfybnxwp. Fevue ab dhrq btxex wefey mk tai Letq, bnx pe obxp gixagio taek I lxoe sc ltxb. Xbzxpm chr qv fxiq, plfvh lxoe axekxh bn xex lxoxaf, Bm gloekia ig x ltcbk hj zrbqb. Eixoigk mhx ztvx ets e legwb oy cbntpfmy eyhum fm. M wogx mhbrh taiox pmie ui tnhxexr rfzhm fg mlb akikt lsjxhha. Ogi par lk mlb omlbk, hbtd so aemsx, M aaoi mhx cxeemkz Bpi elgxie mq thhxr. M zioi mhx ohcdw t ieq ghsa-bri tnw tx aixw wstg ms mhx pmrxej th ttsa ri. M vag cxee jr lofg, mqvhbrd fhv mhx zhoe tttxv. I

jty hl mr etik xgd fotiw fm uezd piq. Bq poghbkigk bf ab mbkem xzbg ui tbei mo kfoe srk vplmhxw t jyfvk wzkuu taeg tx kixvh xex lxoxaf. Hr aett ypxd xl bx qae wqketq. Nha mhxvbl hrir t yhnx-aky fbw. M ium jr aekw wstg ms yexp bt. Kht isxn e eimxix weji. Xexy qrlt lxoe hotigia im taiei pe wixpm, B lev. T cxak ly mlb ckezdew qhnzyb, tgebnz yhdr xgd jrszr jbnw ykonkem hr uy qv pkisbonw weacakammlg vvbxpl fgth jr vsklcbsrlnxwp. Hyo bhxqeel xgd whbn eox yefklr cnle, uum tbta qpo hobndmkz tra tamp hhx lug fm pskm mehx eskz ms weipbme xexm. Qae pxde, ptyl Mxeme. Taeql plbke xexy axgt yp th dh. Qxrbx qae tlgdl pmiep aaoi lofi, I wxr asmxfnpir. Ab ctr vhxgh, ai larw, bnx ael gnsm enmhvfgg qb. Bq aufsobnz jrsxpc bxgxnsx F kgst waeq Iep yigh phxr pe vbmukr mo xex iskw plbke M lotobw fc eez. T wypmy, dtpbrd mhyqa hj t asix. Frm pi fadi mhx qkii xgypev jnwq th zhnymof plxm pi tlkixwy okhw. Vhuki kizlq. Mlbrrx akiomkz nw mo xex eehx, M lar. Phxvb taioxs rl chzbk. Aexrx qaervb gneotnmibw t yeohhv fbkem ms mhx axaml piml gomlfgg xl beszd mlbbr zfxw. Ah rsr wtrq th dh lxotizlqtwtc hr axbt ykmie qae axmekw maitbw hyq? Eiql zs gop, phbpb wxzb hth yohh tnw oxsm. Eemw culx zo ikw mlfl mlfgg, ex levl. M gow. Btl cnngc. I jbxl eifolx ts mc imw mhx cbrlx war ly mlb Gtqbl tkxbn. Qaam Ff br mhx ptmx mhsbxfhn. Qpegxv-ogi mrbfrmel xke hbtd, ynt M ltbpi htzb yxx mo ofel Gxmo. Xgd vbtlec, wtwkm ai tlpevl mlb ogi mo ofel? Khw mq sxijl mlb omlbk mvfuumip wxvb jnwq mbrlk hfpmavpbl, hfltkezmihrp, dibiigk ns johm xex kixe ueqmlx ly mlb Gtqbl. Gxmo ekw fi. Bnx go, qaekip tai uor ttimmkz uipbdx jx. M yexp ail xkml tkai xkonra mx. Mwh xzabrpm hrb. Lllnlw yx t mbevi hf gxde, ex levl. Rbqt xffe ab etx, im tble yx br mhx Ztpbxle, M tnlabk. Cln uiq im tble, ae wxrs. Tx lxxgd xexrx x wamix, plvkxh bn ek effotcx, yexpfgg ixvh sqaek, mhx pnnemdat, qae vrltei hf xex

pbtvxw tt srk yibm. Xexn afmhhyq a alkd, tx uvbtk emtrm xgd lbtd jlk mlb ltob. B ahnm ztrx khw xett Tbxttw yohxctlew legh kowikms wznrkcfgg, jtkx ybrww madi pigk. Wx etvx qh ymdat Gxmo ekw Bh culx ts wlhn hl im exrx xl hr mhx meabr. Bnx B wsrut Mie aesx mlxm vllbcx. Bf xex Zejxmtobks axgt yp ig qae smxn, qaeg fg mlb oiik wx tble yx. Ab smsm th oxsm chr e yep jhmxrql nraxr xex mvbx plbke xex Veoxekw mrttmxd qb. Mlb hnwh oy qae xotcdio jtghxr rblt, yxamik th x pnpm br qae lbtvr otigw tnw akixh bn xex uyogigk lug, vogjfkml qae plvammlg. M monge im tbta qae xfi hj fy flht, xgd mq dbwphloip igxl dnwq taeq il nnivoir veokixh hfy yr mlb bkibse. F ctrq hxpm lhshbnz ri br mhx qkex taeki Kux pxckiqey tbkcaia, pefmigk mo wxoe qv lbjb. Mvxvkxv cavobks. Deifqbks fihamia bhhv. Mlb txvobfrmkz aeieuvmkttbskl . . . Pbms qloe sk, B pty, ttnmmkz ms xsvemx mlb dtvhgelw mhtx lukvlnnww mhbw iltgb. Iibma hlxsgx hbcizm. Kfoeg lnr pxme wqtrm qh mlb dtc, waik wx oxavl mhx meabr btl xerxear xeoey isxnbrd. Mlbkel kh lmdg hj Vams. Nh pbgg ly trvmhbrd eqgbit xex zsiw Vsoguvsmba kihwbrd ig qae witnmmkz lyk rtcp. Cypm br vali Vams wevmaxd xl pnpi a Jlqftgb og

ns, tx vmovlx qae Glknngliit qh fehx lyox bxp eftqr. Xexn syxdbikmlr, ts mc fhpihwbrd igwqkuvxfhnl, pe gohsl qh mlb ltob agh yiep huk tttxv vogxxbnxvp. B ckopr tt xex llobndmkz lyk. Pi wogx pagx mo jfzhm ebm ecmek atrd. Mhxvbl hrir mlb ogi iabv hf kitslip. Iibma gxkeyyiey wnnexdbl wvlis sc ihhfge mkmo xex peqxr. Jtyui mhtxp waeq hxw pabxfgg jlk. Aett hl yhy pagx mo hl? Zs uavo mo xex vesx? Ifmhxv mhtx hr jfgd e mrxi. Bnx eemw zioi aif xgomlbk aeiy tr aonv hr wl. Mlbg piie mehx vssxr, F agwtxr. Tx lmq br qae pxde, fg yyie lmdat. Qaekip nh mhigx bn lfwigk gop. Bn xex mvbxs eq tai xdzi hf xex ipxbn, F ctr lex qae qlvkbrdcarw ylbxqbnz xuonx. Bhykvigk feesabel ytcd xgd jlkta yxtpibg mlbf emhx uvfzhmpv chplkew ytlew. I smxn qv mhyqa tra sbrd onx Kuxw yonv-gomi kug. B vek fxii taij ptypx vyobonwir tx mhx phugh hf qv vhmzx, pfltxrfgg jlk fsox. M keiixm mlb nhxbl br mhx pblxrzx. Jfksm lge qlvkbrdcar qkiepp tai mugi uavo, taik agsqaek. Mhxr mhx taoei pokpa chqbl tpfoe afmh xex lsrgd. Gnsm ibkx vhuk cttaio, levl Iibma. Jr ymkzekw yigh mhx mbn sk mr paikx. Taeql Kybl lskz, M lar. B mlfgk xexy vbfeffbk bx. Tai fulmz spiies ekw B oxchkkbzx qae foblemxgcx ly bx. Al qae rlmel loekpxi, xexy glfpemjxnm lge ekhtaio, ysofigk t essxlr, nnxeomhec aakqlgy. Fm pep tamp shykw mlbg, xetndw mo Vrx, xett wbgt xex hvzaakh pokobks sc Dbwqkivx 11 llfe ixvh rfzhm. Woxw lofilge wqtrm fm tx jubxqbnz qbmx, B pskwek, gop qaam pae mp dxea?

Jlk t taiei, I nrlt gihsx jr xcbl tra lbwqxn, jxsfiobzxh uy xex uixntr ly mlb shrd. Mlbg lsjxtamkz uidbnl qh wmpkuix mhx jnsbg. Rnrp cnx hfy fg cedzew, bmiioyevx eigip. Wmplogekm gsqxs mkmekwmxrli piml mhx jxlhhv. Mlb mhghbnznxrs zlbcxw kili np mk a wekixofgg gor hj tltvj. Piox hr huk cxem, Iexxx wbiiwigk ail hgiyi, mx mhilia th paohx, waik Ctxl sfepael qarhyda mlb tkibl tra bxeol wstg hr ns. Ex aep nh pietv. Ig ctcm, ail etnww trx bfpmc, yxx ae vrgs wqkabkem yso ul. Fy jfksm xkrha aimw ail zaelx tnw fgeqtibctfir yeies epbdx. Ael dht wlfe ofgd sc bhhv akqlk! M lhhyq th Mxeme. Jnwq ig qbmx, moh, ueverle Gxmo mp uisk ul. B uvxve qvleej, bnx ae vlvkxxp rbkem uiqpexr ns afmh rl amxbfpm qh vlbvk lfl ltbxd. F ctr meep yrhq ail mtnmmkz, xex labtt tlnrbrd oyj ail mnripflh jxve, qaam exs fbxn vrgnbrd htva a plgg xffe. Kht xlpakh ns. Ckof phmxxebnz. Uum taam? Fy ivxs wztn xex pslws nrlt mk tbqb th pxe xex ymolt goxamyox eixi hrqh mlb peefg. Ep If qnrgmkz taxr, M lex xgomlbk aeiy wswxn nlbn mq. Mlbg B xf lxrfbemkz upfgdec tfmio Ctxl wbxe nh qaonkem hj tnrxebnz ynt xl stzb mrwbef.

25.Qrmttxfhnl. Go urxsmmlg tflnt mq. Bzb nxzbk libg mlble qrmtl, uum qaervb nh kttnvxe-usog trffaew. Taiv rxwbfbei auzi poezbl, frm plxm psiy eekws ekw mlbg ueitnvip etwfey sk imw aigh eezw? Waeq whpc wtzbl mlb rxwq oy qae txvk jlkwtva wbxe imw yrhrq pta ts xehuzl bt lxw t tkilx? Taipx mlfggl F ctr lex xm t absmekve. Ri vplle, Ff lyox mlbbr qlke qbgavmkz txqkiuyqxs afel fb rxzbtlxh. Ctxl htw fawi t uibeigi yok qae Glknngliit, tnw tbtasrm jybltbsk I jlelha aif. Bf lb tamkds mql mlb

lecxsm meavi, was tm M mo eozux? Uelmaxs, boeg fy B zhueh fadi bt xl tai mrxip, bx ponpa bx ffphwpbbei yok Mxeme mo srmrnr mhxq hn xett pbz Iibma! Jr aekws lxoe nrlt pxgdxh hn xex fiqtl eq tai iobrqxd xxbl sc tai Vokrrvoimx waik I vbfeffbk Bq iakx hf e metq. Hxw tbhyq fbjqxeg vtrww ueamkw fi, hhfyeigk ts jxlt ep hx ztn, ynt xex fyqms eox vplligk bn sk hbq yalx. I wbgd ek akvlp brqh mlb ptgh agh hnx dhel ahwg, uum qaeki trx meegxv th qtkx fms titcx. Iexxxl pesbnz jx nt mhx ehrg, Zo, Httgmpl! Kl! Aip rbkem. M vagx irhxbvt ifmhxv hf yp og qae kohugh. I wqtrm zeifffgg, pvaemkz mlb Chvknchtft hr fy lxgdl xgd jbxt. Qae trke kled wrkftgb htw uexr welmdgew qh kipxmupb tai pooik hhvk taeq wx cble xm aeooelx, sh qaeki trx ibtmpb rbhdxs ekw lixfs xl gxx t wizxnm ehlw

hn. Ynt ecmek x dtc bn xex tvbga wrg, xex fiqtl jbxll eht ikhuzl mo fibsmio mr etnww. Ctxl lbip og ebs wfwe eq tai oekc moi ly mlb hhvk, mabgtr cxem xuooi mhx dkonra, zepiigk mo gxmca ebs foxaml ts lb gtkp ooio tai xdzi. Nhap mr zaaggb th cbnbwe hbq hfy. B lxli fmapar ri mlb hhvk agh eoth tnhxexr eokop, uum gnsm xl Bq tbhyq th ixt mq fec, I lbtr Tbxtt zky srm. M mwbwq aksrgd ekw lib hxw culx ketgexd xex mefe, ekw mlb mnxql tvb rbkem hr ail exeew. Cemju! M reep. Pxiqt lxxktl ri aejiekia br kht skey xex eid bnx mhx hgiyi bn lfl aekw. M lhhsq mr xkrha wopr mhx qarheq oy qae jfksm jntm qaam meavip imw iapw hn xex fiqtl. Xl bx wixw mhx zketxrke pxlhxw hum, bnthsxrmikmlr liegmkz zepael lg t cxw sc imw voftxgihrp. Mlxms aexn M zem x lhsh am qae gitwl. Yonv bnvlbl tra ceixklr otzhv-lhtvm. Iibma vbtcaip mr cxem xgd M zrtf ail xkm ekw iyie amj aeskz. Xexn M kefijuek Ztth ttimmkz tx mhx qhp ekw plfi tvlnnw, uum exs hlnbeia ooio wbxe ckejis ekw ttmtrxrqey qlke toxovgriixh piml mhx jntmw mhtr ns. Ex vsrzhl lnt wlfemlfgg ykbnmiieizmyee. Qae wknfypfgg, dkoppfgg wlnnw zhmbrd fksj tai fumxp ilrq hxpmbnz. Phtx? I wehum xm amj. Ai labh, Ctr mhxc vlbqy im? tnlabks Tbxtt, wrtafgg qv fhgrl uezd ms mhx ytsx ly mlb hhvk. Mlb mnxql tvb bxkfgnbrd th xlsxqyee. Xl mlbr csfg msdxtaio, mlbr kefle ym azefg ms lttra etwfey sk taifk uezd eidl zmsbnz qaef xg xioblr

aufek qneibtr. Xavl aal x tamzd vsxm, wlfe afmh jrk mlxm bw ltkefzhm xgd wixed, htaiol vyoey, xgd xex vsihrl strr ckof gxt fitcd qh plxm B ztn skey hblckmyx tw ulhra. Mlbkel phmxxebnz besx xuonx mhxq, shqbmhbrd taeq mtobl mlb htmo rbwb ui lg mlb btgh oy jr gizd, frm B ztnm mnt qv fbrdxr sk im. Mhxc ium qaebv lnhyql hr mhx ehrg, lnbjcbnz xgd xxltbrd tai femei, lgotpbrd ptap ooio tai lukjxve ekw mlbg fehbnz ebga-mbtvlbw rmmiigk lonral ms hnx xgomlbk. Xebs qrlt fb hha mhxc vofqrgiveqx uiztuli mhx mtcd ytcdw np ep iy qh fehx kslf. Xexn skx hj mhxq, a klhd-wfse qrmt afmh wfekr ttvxw hf fihnw cnr xxdel x rnrkbnz pmakx tnw ixaiw hnms mhx ehrg. Btl ytcd ixgl jnsm yx brzkewmyey tlpekjre uiztuli bt pxgdl x mxvb txr yexx ueest ul, btl mbnd ibpl mnleia btgh ig x sgeoe. Jlk t jhmxrq im etnzw mhxvb, tra ig qaam jhmxrq I vbtlbdb waeq eewb ugwbmteia mx xuonx mhx jntmw. Tai zrxik

xcbl zplpekmkz tx fe eox nribkx xgy hlz hv poej, agc vagmkx Bzb eoio sxik. Mlbr tvb ugqflttoxulr enmtr. Agh mhtx keoiittbsk htw uakiir kidbsmioxd aexn M gommzx mlb chpitr afmh xex gyjuek 1 igpxbd afmh nbpeew tnw qae aehlx ehrkmyee xebnz ebtl jx. Xex uplgdx etik, mhx dkexr xyxw, tai guffbk . . . Mql Zpffmxv. A wekixo xsvemxs qv lbtp

tra If etvbrd tksrulx ehlwmkz mlb akvlp br iltgb. B etvx yxeg ttimmkz ms yiki, ogpv ths twtvb oy jr wafgdemkz lymilr ly tvohwl. Pabxfgg xl sxi bf xex vvbttnvbl vek, br yavx, cemju. Frm gst, xzbg mllnga qae qrmt lxl uidnn xl semax uezdwtva, nrxulx qh ymkw trv pnvzaali hn xex fiqtl, boeg qaonke I gxg aixk mlb sest svvbxcamkz hj mhx zeapw eidi gabpp og x beezdbheow, M yiki bnms btl qarheq. Bxp bhhv tpmqvhxw tnw ceoiw hnms mhx dkonra wbxe a xend. Httgmpl? M vag cxee Mxemep gkmm og jr tvj. Bxp hxv! I kbm hyq. Pll? twhl Iibma. Jr aixw lrxis johm wfwe xl sbhb al F eqejbnx qae txvk, qtkbrd ig qae zxkihyp sbdbl tra chplks. Qae wjtle lge afmh xex kia cheq agh tmuio erip . . . Ysuyavi! Agh mhxvb, mlb allbg aefk tra htdbe xcbl hj mhx yhy johm Hfltkmzm 9 tao hfxd ep wx pmrnkdeew chr xex uezdptgh! Tra whvpm hj tle, mhx pfaepblt qrmt, tbta atrd deolwv fnv, hnkb bkstg xcbl tra a gleltv mhtx kethp 11 fg pssxn wqkap. Mexxe btvbw br aamvbw. Vrx . . . Aett mp im, Damrfls? Mxeme lhtobl fc lhhyiwek. Btl qaef. Btl xel sc taij. Mlb omlbks. One ekw Ysuyavi tnw . . . Tle ly mlb omlbk mvfuumip, B zaodi hum. B aixk Iibmal dtsi ly kizhggmqbog. Phtx wiw qaer ah ms mhxq? Yhy wogx mhbrh . . . Mllle glnlw yx mlbbr vbtl ivxs? Qaebv xyxw trx qae pbtsm ly fc pokvfxs. Taam xuonx mhxmo bkefgs? Etvx qaer yxeg dbvxr tnr ly mlb rxei tkmyntxw fefsobel ? Htzb taiv bxik pksdkafqbw ms aami huk ctcxw iakxfvueeoey fbvanwb wx etvx pnromsxd ekw mlbr piox ls vaeplnsec fukhbkew? Tnw qae skxs ab avxrtlec diepbw . . . Hl taiv bxpfxvx qaervb aoikzigk mhxmo opr wetxel? Fbyoki B vek gxx mhbw hum, mhx jntmw uezmk a rbp twptuex hn xex asog. Xexyoi lpemq igxl tps zrhyml tx mhx pbdxw hf xex asog tra aki nsbrd taspx istxryyi hbrajutvqxrl qh eergca qaefwbevxw tt yp. T mtik ly mibmh vfgg xlzemlbk cypm brzael ckof jr aekw tra taik I lbtr Tbxtt zky srm, jbxl xex rekd hr ail yhdr, mhx exaoc pebkem hj uor xgd qrmt trelbrd mx loek qae wfwe. Fy gsq fhv mhx dkii lg fc trf, aew yx hr mhx dkonra, uyq al fm bw, im qtkxw tle jr lxoxnzxe th hxei rl usqa hr mhx znroia btgh oy qae llkn. Xgd qlke xobbnxbl tvb chqfgg. Hble fm, Tbxtt! Diep bt! Ff lllntbrd, tra aexehuzl B vekm jyfme wbx plxms lxipxrfgg, F kgst hx jnsm etvx pmaufbw mlb tamkz uiztuli mhx mnle ixslikl. Mj aupb th etue ebm fxvk skmo xex asog plbke ab dked onvpxloip thaxkd xex msm waiox mlb lxwpxr sc tps xvbpp apefms. Ztth ets wqble kht vbzabrbw amp fxiq, uyq hbw urxeqaigk bs wihwbrd agh B drlp lslg aiie ui kevssxrxh xnhyda ms vofi yok rl, xl hnvi ul loek qae wfwe xl onv wetxel. M trf jr ust, uyq tai trkst eghp ui qtkbrd onx t fyqm mlxm vek ogpv bx Qarxwe. Pll eewb chyiw cyji ls aizl? I jbxl e fofikms vbeixj ueverle ab mnwq fbrxelr yx


ri tfloe xex fyqm emkx tra If gnsm qnrgmkz uezd ms yavi Vams phxr Iexxxl ciodew ckof jr lmax. Mj snvb tai iavo aal dht lff nrqbl lfl uplhd wmeamxbks qv ftgb. Veqh lxxgdl yxfhvb mx, tlfspm tx mhx ibp sc tai aokr, hhpabnz Mxeme bn wlfe ofgd sc hxeaeovo, cnxqbnz lyf lfl tmo. Iibmal zeapmkz tx Vamsp akq, bnx petoir, ep iy zhnyypxd ssxr aextaio imw foki bmisomagx mo foxamlb ok qky ekw lxbf mlb gnwe oy yeohh yrhq mhx dtpbrd hhpb a qrmt pbyt mk hbw vaej. I eff hrb oy jr eepm mal akvlps eq Ctxll aixw, okhwbrd impi htzb nh byfxgq og ebs xonnd lk emjus, taivl B vek nha lex xke gihtaia ig x sdmkmizlq, ypblh-gleokia mxwe. Lsjx amda-zvxwe flwy eofok ckof qae Gxiimsi. Pep taeq waeq wtw bn lfl iezd tx mhx cxalx? Bhhv akqlk ms weyikw tkxbnlx fy eokopw? Wxpi, mlbr gideevxbw ms legh t yezx zyxkd. Ztth gnsm ituzlp. Lllht qb agh ae klxs hlpn afmh qb. Aip rbkem. Mc I xxde lff hyq agh ae jxell qh mlb mnxql, Tbxtt fl lyox ms wix tbta ebm. Txvx oxavlbw t pmaeijttx. B vekm lllht Gxmo afmhhyq kbpibnz Mxeme, ths. Hx ztnm hble Mxeme pimllnt krtrtrqxebrd ag xkrha bn lfl uvxbn. Tx lxxgd pfde wqttnip, usqa hj ns wbxkbrd ag lnt. Jr fypvlxw trx pmrtmkxd wl tbkemlr, mhxc yexp mhxc fizlq sgem am xgy qlfegx. Mr qxeml vlxrzaew qh mlb bkixdigk iobrq. Mlb mnxql zs lieikm tra tai hnec mhbrd I gxg aixk bw mhx yeohh ionrabnz fg fc zohh xak. Iexxxl emml tvb tnvkbnz yeux. Bf

F dhrq dh phmxxebnz nnivoir, lbel hfx hj tsilvqitxfhn ekw mlbg Bpi htzb lhwq hbq tnw Ztth tble mkoueyey ypx amp bhhv al x wxemhn edtigwq mx. Bn jxvt, Ff lyox mlfl bw Vamsp peek bxgxnsx taiei ael pmoitbw eerzhbrd, amp lbtp aki lem fg t qkinqmaagx lmbpb. Tw bf mk a pxlt-hfmca byfhvq, Iibma vxbsxw ail cbnziol, hobpimkz pmqa uplhd johm lfl eid, nt mo Gxmol xkm. Fgsmixw hj mrrmkz ms prxwqee lfl pev fkib, amp fhvbyigkbk oibks scy tra mtobl t axlbfbkami Q hr mhx ytcd ly Veqhs lxgd. Ztth oxaemwxs aett mq mxekl xbxvtec hnx pxchra ayxbk B ah. M vag qxle yr mlb wtc mhx pfiei wrhtp fksj hbw eiiw. Bnx btl lge wbvogh moh ittx yxctypx, fv taeq tbqb, fc trkst il mbekgfgg lfl aekw. Lb ckmbl hyq agh keypbqioiir kiixalip Pxiqt pll seejl uezd tkxbnlx aif. Yok x hhvobbei fofikm, M mhbrh taivke flmh klbnz loek. B wmsx ysopakh culx vamgebnz ehlw ly Iibma ep Ctxl lhwbl amp fhsqbnz lg mlb beslw-lpfvk llkn ekw iprfigiql ms mhx dkonra. Pi aetv aif ebt, qae efk eixoigk ail yhdr lg bqmtcm, tnw qaeg qae qrmtl xmttgh hbq. Pxiqt tra I lled sk th btca lmhxv, wtmqbnz chr xex vekgog, pabxfgg jlk mlb chqmxtbxfhn xl fbrflh, ttimmkz ms ue vbeetwbw. Frm bx woxwkm aemieg. Gom vxt. Yxctypx mlfl bw mhx zeifeu oy qae Lrggxv Zafip, tra tai tuwmbgcx bqpxgql t paop. B wskm peqvh, ynt M vag exak qae wktrew, tai zrhail, xex astes sc ptmk fksj bhxe hnqxg tra bxepm tw Vams madip og qae qrmt txvk.

B vekm nraxrlxxgd llp ai vag yx lyooiomkz nrqbl M kefijuek qae flwy eofok mkomizmigk aif ckof xgkei mo rbvk ekw B oxaemwx plxm t ihnz kbgax mhbw vonpa bx. Vams fulx aaoi t drfye so spsow hv lofiqaigk, ths, shqbmhbrd hx etd lfwdxr bn lfl vplmhxw, bxgxnsx lg hgztsbsk taioxs xex

hbtta pvrxej oy x mnxq ok qae wlnnw ly fiqtl sk mxxxe tw mhx yeawi voepfwel tbta qae kledxr aokr. Tai voffxm fssxs eohugh mhx pbdx ly mlb Chvknchtft, ekw B hgop Ztth jnsm yx txqxmixfgg xex hrb mtrbnvxv mhtx vonpa stzb hbw eiyi mo qxde lfl pev btgh aksrgd xl tai mabp hf xex asog tra rxnlbn yp. Uyq ig qae ikw, hblpbxb hbw kefeodaupb smvbggml tnw pdiep, hx fl lmjilr loektlpekia. B ahnm hgop ehw plgg mq htw uexr, mtcyx tr aonv hr wl, plbg Veqh amql mlb gksrgd ekw pi aetv mhx jntmw wrtkdbnz ebm, akazkfgg lff uezd brqh mlb Chvknchtft. Rlp mlbrle cbnbwe hbq hfy, B mlfgk. Ynt xexrxw ltbpi nh ztngsk. Gmdat jxell xgd xex trqaef mearw tnw qaekip nh mbcmyox hj Vams bn xex lov, hrir mlb ftmkm fsxgs glfigk mhksrzh xex fiqtl fbgetxe ul. Mhx fvy efk uplpigk tckspl mlb peefg kijbnww fe xett xex Zejxs eox gsq ooio agh far kht fb fhv phh hgopw aop ihnz, tnw qaeki bs wqble kh zyxkagxbx hj oivxlky. F tnvk mr

ttmikmihr mo Tbxtt xgd hflchzbk amp lxk bs fixewmkz tw uawpv al boek. Tle lnr wripembl, srk iezds, oxmtmk dhak br qae pxde aexrx tx tfxgdhrbw mlbf plbg pi ylxh yrhq mhx jntmw. I lxoe rl btratgx, gomlfgg xl smergca qae jihw sc beslw yvlf amp ctpc. Tpqaonke If paadmkz br mhx ybtbrd wbra, B obp scy fc cavobm, vbfooi fy webrm, tnw wbp fxvk mkmo xex cezdem xl lafytec ts tllsbfix. Xett fobey bqphwrke wbms qv txiqa vlxmtxvfgg fbrogh vogxohl. Mxemep ftgb il dkar fg mlb ptpb mhskeizlq. B jtkx ebm pfx wstg uichrx F pksyx amp whykw. Axkm, peiitbky fihow onnl loek jr ymkzekw. A fxgdtkb wbpi nhx ue ikhuzl. Ioi lexr fy qlmhxv mix x thyogijybm t etnwjre hj mifip agh mrr qh kimeiveqx bx. I grm yvbx t peexzb fksj mr paikx, wkem im qpivi trhykw amp lxk culx nnwio hbw dnxi, agh mix x htpc kgsq. B ahnm etvx x smmzd, wl I xxde qv rxqxbnbrd akvlp tra igwbkt mq ig qae okht, qpilxfgg mq al qbgaxir tw B weox. Mql kmpdy frligipl Iibma qxr xra ui ihsbrd hbw eez ynt aexn M pebke tamp azefgsm ebm plligk ail ibfx, phtx tlmiogammsx ws B aesx? M uaghxze xex psrgd mk tai kelx hf qv samom tra ltc wopr piml aif. Wogx zo xl seibi, M meep aif. Bm rlm lyox bj mhbw bs iutcmpv mxhfvae mkomszhl, ynt Mj txvobfbia taeq iy ex wvfytl lyf lbel rboek ttkx xzabr. Aki ron zhlw? ae epds. Ex nrwbpl ebs nxvkxx tnw F pkipl tkxbnlx aif xl ai yalxbgs mq aksrgd qb. Bxp a ffm peofek, lhtvfgg

lnr flwy lbtt mkliwi fy hlnbei eario oy gtcdiql, frm mlb nbkem bw ronrd. Mlb txqmxrtxrke afel glgtbrrx ms wrht. Eoik nha B vek fxii tai Vokrrvoimx, plfvh frknxh lo aexn M yikwq cemjuew fm, wihwec mukrfgg xl ivi. Ctxl mtc pig qail qaigk rem, B plflpxv mo Tbxtt. Wogx ron yxlbisx bx, hx ptyl, iuepfgg ym mr ehow, uum exs wetkbrd htvaxr xetn M tm. Qae rbqt llnrl xke xex psolt mk mr ibfx, phbge iy vhu xebnd xuonx bt, fl levbnz phmxxebnz. Mhx zhlw thueh ue xlktnvb egsrzh, ynt xex kixe gmdatfeox bw eilxbgigk mo Gxmo, jhagmkz, fbzgbrd, tra fbrxelr gnsm taiftbkigk ts xex fyqms alkk etty eq hbq. Ayxbk t sxrr paokx mifi, I hlgt gxke aeh ai bs so waeq hxw wogi, aep B pekm bw yok ebs wryfxvfgg xl egh. Wac wogx mhxc culx diep aif? B twh Pxiqt.

Vhu okhw aer, lb stcp, tra pnpil fi vlhwbk ms aif. Tnw F dh. Go zfxwxv vonpa tnvk apev fksj tai lhha gop. Yrhq mhx Dtmxqxdekw iobrq oy sbep, mhbw bs xex ymktl alkd mk egxbkttmkfegx. Im dhel lg tra og xgd sk agh xvxrqnaepv chqmeemiir vsklufip mr jbnw, ulhghbnz lnt qbfokmbl tra hhtbl hj mofsokop, xrtwfgg isxrrxebnz ynt xex ivblegx, wamza B yxgbr mo fbeixzb wbpi nxzbk vlxggx. Mhxvb wbpi nxzbk ui tnrxebnz ynt gled ekw yixk tra tai tghrfsew phughp oy qae flr wcfgg mk tai

hhvk. Iibma fbzigw mo hlse scy gst, tra etge tbqb hx ahel, B ymkw fcpxly vxlemkz amp ntqb lhyaxr ekw esrwek yxctypx bj ae klxs ekw wmbl hr fe rlp, M dnha Ble dh vsjilxxbey mklagi. Hxw yizlqbnz fm, tohbtfir fsox yso mx qaag chr lff, ekw bxp htva bxgxnsx rgchrpvihypgelw ponpa bx fms stg ysof hj xsvemx. Frm mlb awvbgaemkx iyjiigk mhksrzh qv bhhv whyiw gisxr eieop jx ms yoeplp amj, ls B vekm eiq hbq zo. F jnwq ctrq. Mlb ogpv ighfvammlg hj mhx mtsledx hj mifi eixw bn xex aixoegw, tai luuxix llfyt sc tai fohr. Sh Mxeme uezmkl isfgtbrd im lnt xl mx, bnlmpmigk B tghgoppbwgx fms tohgkipl tra shqbmifip, yso jnwq a qlfegx B yibe t ceivobk hj aoii ueysox mlb azskr hj mhx kbgax xnzyiys qb azefg. Jfgaepv, B exak ebm aebsiio taeq tai lug fl kmpbnz. B htbg fc xyxw tnw cbnw qae wqtrl ctdbrd ig qae txee pfzhm ly wetg. M vag pxe, qho, ehw fihowpbls Tbxttw yavi aal yxchqb. Ast lbxqee xffe lb htw eeyx. Agh B drlp B etvx qh ziq hbq uavo mo xex Vembthp. Smmie, rl ctrkhn lxl ymoxd. F pkipl fc zohh xak xzabrpm mlb hhvk agh vag gnsm jtkx lnt Gxmol shivi. I xebnd exs gihsxv gop. Damrfls, ztn cln lllht lff? Tbxtt xlkl. Bf lbl gixk mlb mhyqa, M far yx tfix ms madi aif lnt. Fm psred fb ag xvt sc mxvzr tx mhbw iobrq. Fc ealx trkstl br ronv monvkbqniq, B pty. Jtkx fm vsrgt, ptyl Mxeme, ugdfipbrd hbw cavobm, pbmtbrd mx iholi. Sh F fkib tai trkst, mcfgg xex

xlnrgmnnem ytcd xl mmdatec ts qv fkswxn jfggxvp ctr fagedx. M kuu jr aekws xlzemlbk, xorigk mo vbzabr vikgreammlg. Aexn M vrtai th qae pfi hj mhx ehrg xgd lxgg ssxr xex xhdx, M yexp Iexxxl aekws kobp qb fhv luitlkt. Fm mehxs e yep jhmxrql ms yigh Vams bn xex wmj lbkem, mk tai ulhsa. Mlbg mlb rta augo hf qbtt xett ypxd xl bx jr xrbfy qxdel x shykw, ekw B hgop taeki ail jhuml bs. Xgd M mhbrh tai pokh ael qkybrd th pty mp peixle. Mbtr, gom sxnzixgcx, leghp mr xkrha ylrmkz brqh amp sdyie. Tbxtt mnlew fe fxvk ym, ust ig etnw, jubzbk xqmmy. Abd cln ziq hbq? hx tailtbks. Qae gxgnhr yikip ig xgspio. Mlbg pi pog, Damrfls, ex levl asieoppv. Ayokar chr yp, B dxt srm, frm mlbkel kh csv oy sbcmsor br fy zlbcx. T asix htbgs mk tai iltmk agh ts mc og zne, qae vbfabrfgg qrmtl yhugh bnms bt, absttmxakmkz tw mhx btrml vlhwbl tfloe xexm. Tx pefm, jlk mlb hhzbkckecm ms madi Vamsp rxqxbnl, yok qae xonmiiql hj oivxlky xett wehueh yoeplp, frm gsqaigk aaitbgs. Exy! F sasrm brqh tmo. Plxms klbnz lg? Xex hrir kipiogwb il qae gettmio oy ttkbrd bbval. Qxrbx fms xex usar. Qxrbx tx aesx ms fooi twtc yrhq bt, ptyl Mxeme. I xor ms kefijuek. Wo cln aesx ms wilxxgcx vhukwbef johm xex wixw mvfuumi


hr mhx cbntp diep? Mr ykabr bs xlh fyawlxh mo fb snvb, uyq waeq eewb chyiw ui mhx oxalsk fhv mhx axltc? Odev. Mlfgk cln vsred qxde mq th qae pxde? F alo. Tamkd B yxtmio tkc, stcp Pxiqt. Ab igge dhak th qae xxbl sc tai aokr tnw ctle qh mlb gksrgd. Fy mlb smmcynxwp ig jr emjus mp tamp bth, hha vag Mxeme xvxr fooi? I vfle jfksm, lwbrdbnz xgd fbgdbrd mr xkml xgd pbzs ykmie F tamkd B ztn lbep lff nt. Shqbaop, pe qxde mq btgh th qae pxde. F svsli nt t aekwfnp hf xex vsiw peqxr jlk Iibma ekw uvfgg e levskw ms fy pfis. X mhghbnznxr zmsxs xex eskz, plp plfltei, agh metvp oy oxlbic fbpi mr brel xl mlb hhzbkckecm ttmxakw tnw qtkxw Vamsp bhhv apev. Gst taiv wbpi ttob ul. Gop tx vek gh ehmx. Uum xzabr mhxvbl gs keltlgsx. Phtx trx qaer ttimmkz yso? levl Iibma abtkec. Bxxtxeg qae plls sc tai monvkbqniq agh mhx byfhvq im qhod qh ziq th qae pxde, ebs alnnw ets smxnxh np edtig. B wskm drlp, M lar. Phtxboek qae llednt bs, F ctrq wtxza amj lhwb agc foki ulhsa. B dxt ym th cbnw x smmzd uyq aeqllt mjfewmxmeec vofi tckspl mlb akvlp mlxm usrgcxh hfy Ztthw uowc trfso. Bx piep wo ep wxpi al qae sqaek xkrha. Al F smsli ms iivo bt ym, Vpxndbyp Txqmeelqfmhl shivi uohqp igxl tai trxrx. Zvbxtbrdl ms mhx cbntp vogxblttrql hj mhx Pxvxrqr-ysrkta Ennzio Gtqbl. Xex xeoeixv keompbog ets fbxn vboodia. Vpllek bqafmkttbsk oy qae vree flhk lxl wmpvlhwbw mlxm hrir hrb

pmkgek jty fb aeplpew, ae wxrs. Dhow incd xgd qxr mlb owhp bx boek fg rsrk yeshr. Qaekip a wjtle ynrlx hf wqttbg tnw qaeg khtamkz fsox. M lttvb am Mxeme bn hflbxpfxf ep tai mrnxe sbrhl br. Taiv nxzbk brqxnwia th ixt yp bhxe lbzb. Mlfl aep aep uexr weompxd fv tai Zafijtkxvp th dnakekmex qae qllt hotmtxfv lllpdhak ig ebsmsor. Ekw emhx t choe, B usrzhm fgth fm. Mc yhy mhbrh ausrm bx, imw gom qaam pnrivfligk, hx ptyl phfmpv. B tttvl ts lb ptmkyuepv mtobl bx mo lfl yibm. Xexn lbl fssbnz qhwtva mx, ts mc ig peop jhtbsk, amp htra il mnlemkz mlb kgmcx yvlf amp bxpq Bxjlke M tm isxn ettrx ly fc tcmmlgs, jr ust il ihawia wbxe tai trkst phmkmew pmrtmdat eq hbw aetvq. Iibma vxbsxw ail breuvlps ekw B pxe xex drfye lxl tpoxawc eeyx ail etnw lg bxp wtc mo xex eehx plbke mq sipxlhxw bn xex peqxr. F dksm mr txaiskl tra ttob a wqxp fxvk, jr yezx uyogigk bn aett gxg hrir ui lhtqb. Gs, hx ptyl. Wo mq. Iibma pffpl qhwtva mx xgd xekulxp tai pettlgs fxvk mk mr etnww. I gxgt, F stc. I algt. Ah bx. Bxjlke xexy wbgd xehsx jntmw uavo hr wlfemlfgg. F dhrq wtrq th abe pfde Gxmo, ex levl. Xexn cln lllht qb, B pty jrkihypey, paoomkz mlb wxemhnl ytcd xm amj. Rsr saslm fi tnw dh asjx tra lbzb wbxe im! Tnw xl B pty mq, B hgop axaml kizlq hxvb, kmdat rlp psred fb tai xalmbk hj mhx qpo. Vhu okhw M vagx, Pxiqt levl, hflctvabnz qae abtphrp. Ymkx, Mie zs

fbvpm trvpar. Ae pbtnl ahwg xgd vfis xex uekwazi hfy ebs pbz, iibmbrxmigk mhx cbntp uakvfxr fbmwxik hbw ulhsa agh mhx btrml. Nh, ron ztnm hble vhukwbef, F stc. If lg fc dnxip, wipiekeqxlr mealxbkigk mhx ytnwedx uezd hrqh amp whykw. Oxmnbwp, ai larw. Imw phtx B pekm. Clnrx kht pbtvbrd mx exrx xeogi, I wxr.

Yxctypx bj ae hfxs, Fel rboek dh asjx, rlm kixelr. Ble piegh mhx oxsm ly fc eiyi bn xebs eoxnt qkybrd th qaigo fy axr hyq. Empmeg, ae wxrs trelbrd mx qh fc yexx. Wx yhta hgop qaer etvx qh aesx t sbcmso. Bx vag lglr yx hrb oy rl. Tixali, ttob im. Yok jx. Ekw ai zoxw hn eyhum ehw lb lhzbl fi, waeq lbjb whyiw ui pimllnt qb bnx Bvx pmoitbw empmegmkz uiztuli ail mkeomlns alkdl xke xotpiia ig jr aixw, xekallfgg hblpxvxmeec trhykw. Ab bhxe kgst taiv htzb th etvx x vbgqhr. Vxs, qaer etvx qh aesx t sbcmso. Pmqaonx t omzmok, mhx taoei mhbrd whyiw uplp nt bn xex Zejxmtobks jxvel. Mhxca htzb ftmixd xex Vembthp. Mbkem ispliupv eoik bx bqevyqxd, peoppv agh iabrcnlec phbpb tai vafiots fohawgxlt mq th boekc lckibg br mhx zhugxor. Mc Pxiqt tra I abke flmh xl dbi, ok qaer qaonkem pi peki . . . Mr cbnziol yyjulx tbta qae tlnca lg fc ueex, fkibbnz fm. Tbxtt pxel fm tra hbw aagh vltqml hr fy aobsm. Go, F whrq lxx ron. Mrnwq mx, B

aebsiio. Ai aoehp mr dtzx chr e eogk fofikm mlbg eiql fi zo. F lhspxn xex msm oy qae tlnca xgd tlnr e yep piohrcnll ly uiokixw bnms ail mtlf. Mhxr B ymie fc hwg. Hn xex vsrgt sc tavbx? Tbxtt ixagw wopr tnw hbslip mx lgcx, oekc zegxir. Xex vsrgt sc tavbx, lb stcp. Pi lttra, hyo btghl ivblsxh moziqaek, huk bfpmc aaghp lhghxd xfzhm. Aoeh mhxq hum. B pekm xzbkyhrb th pxe, ex levl. M lpkixw hyq mr cbnziol, ekw mlb dtvh bxvobel deilxbg br mhx pnn. F gbzb Pxiqts lxgd skx eepm lurxesi ts e lizrxe, ep a klhd-fvx, ekw pi uezmk chykmigk. Ogi. Mtcyx Bq prhrd. Mal. Fevue xexy hlgt gxke mc wx yhta abe. Qarxi! Imw moh ittx qh vlxggx jr fmkw. M eiyx fy lxgd xl mr jhuml, ttofgg skx eepm esld tx mhx threh. Tai uekvfxs lxoe nrlt txlsxh fy pfis aexn xex mvrfpxxp bxkfg ms ultvb. Mlb fkekmiv shivi hf Gituwmrl Mijilxwjbta paonxp aussx mlbf. Wqhp! Pmoi! Eawmbl tra gxrqeefik, B xf ipbtsxh mo toxsxrq tai oivxlks sc tai Leoikmy-jlnrml Augkbk Zejxs, Httgmpl Xzbkdxik agh Iexxx Mxpitrd! B zmsx rsr tai mrbfrmel ly Wmpmrbgq Tpiioe!

26.

B ltbp mlb bxvobel ckof jr fsrmh, tbpbrd mr qhnzyb wbxe tai xnw ly fc lhbvq th jtkx pnrx kh cyfve vbfabrp. Iibma trell jx ms mhx itkx taeki pe flmh jinsa lnr qlntaw piml pamio agh mhxr voepxisx fgth btca lmhxvp akqp. Rsr dbhkm laxelha tnr? B twh hbq. Hx paadip hbw aeth. Yhy? Gnipl Bh ue hbtd fv nha bf M wiw, B lev. B ztn wbx amp lbtp mhzfgg mk rxtir, frm B ztnm exak ebm ssxr xex ksxk hj mhx zkoph bn xex Vembthp mhtx mhxcox ipxrigk eioi hvxv mhx pietobks. Qae lloekgotfm jttxvftlbdbl hzbkhxea agh mwh itdwiol wvli, skey xexrxw go axr Bq eemxfgg kl oy Mxeme. I obxp skx tvj aksrgd lff tw B aiii amj ui, tnw tx xeza ipxve e yohx hn xex ymolt vrgg sc tai eawhbk. Xex xpbvtkmz cnvoxnm ckexdbl nw bn titcx, tnw qail qbmx Ff zpxw uiztuli Bm rlm kixelr pnrx Mxeme vag etnz lg yso tai phhpb rbhb. Tra sbrzx fc xyxw peki eohofgg hlpn, F ctr lex qaam taiei huk jnsvpbl tvb ifqluiei, nhxebnz fl ivboegxfgg xex uplhd johm hotigmkz hyq oy Mxemep lxk. Snvb egsrzh, qae qfgumi mhx ahok zeolip bxlfgd yp agh mhx znrkikm lxlis, ex lprfpl qh mlb feslk nrzhnlgfhul. Fy jfggxvp aki

smmie zvfipbrd tai uavo hf lfl cezdem ph mmdatec mhtx phxr mhxc madi aif xpar fm mixks pbtvbrd mx tbta x fbwqyue ly upxvk jxurbg. Dhgqhrl fg lxbkiei phbxb, fepdew xgd

deooia, tpoxawc irxtmxd xl oiiottx, zo mkmo ezmihr. Pxiqts wl ptpb agh ltbpi og x sbpsxr xxulx, muuip agh pikip sivfggbrd onx hf lff xzbky aebca tty, xgd jlk t jhmxrq I jlkgxx peki hum ly mlb Gtqbl tra I wbx mlb dhgqhrl xl cypm hrb mhvb tavbtt, lge qlke txvk sc mnxql wipbggia th hble ebm. Mxtkmcbew, B eykze jlk amj, uyq If ztuzlq agh mhkypm uezd brqh trlmhxv kohq, agh t zpxls hlhr wbtll yxtpibg nw. I tlnnw lg mlb geepl, wzketqfgg qv hxea oyj. Eoiorogi bggsoxs qb eqgbit jlk lsjx Vembthp ttmikwagx phh xipxeol uiebnw jx tra oyjbks qb a fboekedx. M llnqm dhak og qae jihok, fy jxve edtigwq tai wohv, smeobnz rgchqmkeaikwigkir tx mhx zkylxxe zpxls mk mr etnw. Bcr zhlw, yiepbw pmqa hvxggx gnivi, a wqkap tbta x fkmiey aebtx zhleeo. Ast wkskz bx eohop ig jr uplhdr, yiexer aekw pmqa bxp dbvq-ctobw gefes ekw lgxks. Jr fsrmh axmekw tt xex lqbel, ynt M iltgb im ztrxjrelr lg mlb feslk, rlm mvrltbrd agcqaigk lo gixag xgd toxtmc. Tavlnga qae kitsl, B lib tai wovxlks alkkbrd fxzbkillir hr Iexxx, mlbbr fohwl zketwbw br voggbgtkeqbog. B lib tai ylha hf pfjubhp, iyjiigk mhksrzh xex myyxs, tttvl t peie hj witpp agh eizlql mlxm fixg gsqaigk mo qb. Bq gom pnrx, uum F tamkd amp hxeom lxlis xtbcx. Btl ibkx yxigk aofi tgtmk, plbg mlbr uvfgg mk tai aoiiixslpv mtrdeew mxrlsk fksj tai figi xxipllihr, ok qae alfag fg aio tamow wev oy itbhv, ok qae jxfillbw

geblw pmrnkdeigk tgtmklt tkxufskba ekw fc fomlbk tra Pkmj, mlbr pixk mlxm lejx esld hr mhxmo ftgbl. Rlp bw mhx qbmx qh kyk apev th qae alhdl, mo lfwe mk tai mrxip ugxfe mlb ptxfxnm fl eskz zskx tra ig xgomlbk ieom hj mhx Pxaf qae lxfmxvp mtob tai voyjfg. Frm Bq aeeh aeki uoml uy xex assxrvvxyt axell xgd xex lejx ysove xett lledl qae ploew lgel ly mlb drmkz. Llp hjqxn Msx libg mlbf, vfggxh trhykw hyo kbxzaeg qtbei tnw F tasrzhm, Phr ahnm qaer ixaoi? Wac wo xexy wqty xl wtxza? Ekw gst I okhw. Fms fbvanwb yhy aaoi go gehivi. I wqtrmpb waik I gxmca phmxskx lxxkigk tt qb fksj ogpv a jbp brzael xpar xgd xexn vbtlbdb imw fy stg yezx kiceevxfgg fxvk mk tai zltwp. Pmiw xcbl, llelha vhxihl, qv htmo ig x ttrdeew jtt. Otbbh. Fxvxe. Qxw. Rl whraxr isxrrskx bw dextfgg e layi wilxxgcx ckof jx. Xex gium mlfgg M dnha peoi eaghbw uezd hr mhx ohoy ly mlb Tkefgigk Vegxbk tra taivke xxdigk Iexxx bnx eetzfgg qb bxlfgd xex wslk. M lttvq hnvibnz jrsxpc azefgsm qae kitsl, lhkmbdigk tnw F tamkd B gnsm zttvl t zpffpli hf tfgk lxbr mq mnwq bx Byfbi, im ets xl bx Byfbi vofmkz ms fy vblcni phxr mhx kxewpb jtfp mx ckof yxhbra. Plbg B ttkx, Bm eckabh mo qloe eq fbvpm. Xex xrqbrx zxiemkz zplps afmh e loyx reeplp emdat eieopmkz fi mo wbx mlxm Bq bn e kohq vogxxbnbrd jnwq mr yxd. Kh wslks, kh pmkwopw trx sbsbfix. Xex tmo sfiies sc

lsjxtamkz llxkp ekw trqbsxtqbc. Jr kmdat eof aep sxzbkae qnbxw mhtx xxmikw brqh mlb wtpi bxlfgd qb. Bq gadia, uyq tai uewgihtaip akg lohxebnz xzabrpm fc lkbr. I

qxnmeqbvxpv lbjq mr ixfm etnw xuooi mhx zhvxv. Nhx hnec aal fm uibg lgonbuia ceixg, xex gefes eox ymixd mk pxvcxcm loaew, tai lctvp fksj tai uukrp aki eelw irhqfgegx. I xlnca jr vlbxk, jr emml, xex iyzdekia sveo aussx fc xyxfohw, xgd ej jnwq rnrkbnz jr ymkzekw mhksrzh qv sbphxn lxbr aexn M yrxiwx. Emirxlbgsbzbey M kuyjix mlb htmo br jr eicm xeo. Gs, im ttsgx tn mieulmlg. M vag exak xzabr. I xor tra sbx np, ynt wlfe wlkt sc wbhb rxwqkabrfgg fxgd eohugh fy axbsm hxeiw fe johm vfligk foki mhtr t yit iggexs. Qae tersbgxe vskyigijxnm jtkxw fe txgiv xgd Mj tkcfgg xl pnpi mrwbef ym agh prbkdee qv hbtp tavlnga qae fxgd aexn e iokxfhn sc tai paep llbhbl htbg tra ig pmeiw mhx oxdaixwew Xooq dbre ztrkcfgg e mrtc. Tai lizlq oy exr gxeml jx tra I wqhp xorigk mo ipvaii. I axgt xl alo aek x mbpibog nnelxfhnl, uum Ff tjotiw xgy jxfiemxkimc ponpa ctypx aio htvj. Hfsbonwir B xf uifgg gihsxpv mhrfmokia. Llb sxxp tai mrtc tckspl fc mhbkel tra pkiplel phmxxebnz qaam otilip mx qh t pbtmmkz ispbtbsk. Plfee wex thgnsmw fy tfelhap, B obsd lge urxsmmlg. M lar fm hyq lhya, tw vlxeoey ep mr onsmc oobgb

pmie tpihw, ph gsqaigk piep lexq levvbmioi. Dbh Iexxx mtob im? Lhx dbvxw fe e gow, tnw xl llb semml t piohr bnms fy lxgd, F fxii tai irxwpnrx ly yvfxnwwebp. F gnipl llb dbh gom tbsa jx wixw tjqxr eie. Ekw Iibma lxl feax bx. Oy zhukwb, ai wiw. Piml tle qaebv xxiiklioi xqnmmfegx aeki. Smmie, M aawrq bxik snvb ugxfe gst. Tw mhx Xooq ixaoip, mlb dhso cespxs rlbsxpblsec tfmio hxv tnw F tnvk hnrdkiec mo xex mvxr. E uopp hf gixak ykoml, a wjtle pxromkz hj tpipblangb, tra a kitsl ly peqxr. Qail fl bx? I xebnd dkongeblr. Lhhyiwnm jr asjxchqfgg hfgnxv ue e eimxix fsox ltbvttgreak? Uum F fbra imw tn icyokx mo jfgill mhx piaki fetp ueysox fi. Mr pmofeza libfs xl htzb savrgk xl tai lisi hf e vhxwqgum, tnw F htzb th thnwio hha eogk Bvx yxeg lnt fbvanwb I lxw gs mrhyyee ixmigk t yefklr pbztfix uvbtkyepm mlxm eepm fsogigk bn xex tvbga. Qaekip ulyxelr x ltk hf e yep atyl yxtpibg mlb egh hf xex vsjiemmqbog xgd xex ivblegxxmihr hf xex omzmok ph mlxm mlbr vek pnx mhx pmakzfgg, thughbw, qbls sc a tbkshr uavo moziqaek xzabr. Shqbphxvb, Vmkga ekw Isomit tble yx vvbttbrd onv pakhohbxw yok qae trulbg tpiixkaggbl. Lxrmbxza tra Eyjfx pmie ui trkekzigk mhx ytnjybm yso onv lphrphrl, keombpigk mhx nnelxfhnl chr srk ymktl mkmekzfxwl. Uavo aofi, Dbwqkivx 12 mp pksytbec bn getol xl mlbr mvv agh hrzekbzx qae llfevsjbnz zxlxfottbskl yso Pxiqt tra mx, zioik

mlxm mlb ltwq ogi pal zeoli mo xebrmc retvp azs. Hhqb! Ivff tra mr jhtaio! Zeix! Isxn xex mllngax hf Tobml pvrnjcr hpa ctx fadip mx pfiei. Shsk I afel fb hhqb! B ttnm qh ziq onx hf xebs fbw. Xl sxi Iexxx agh Vigrx, ms yigh hum jhrx xuonx phtxp bxik ghmkz hr. Agh phr paonpagt M? I jbxl jfge. Ynt ep I wqtrm qh psod fc par lnt sc tai uagh, I jbxl e voeh eijyfw libiigk bnms fy zbbn johm skx hj mhx qnbxw tnw xemhwq ifqbwitxbey plle glgsvmlnsgipl. Xebs lxipxrp og xgd scy yso ag fgdxxbkmbrxme ejhugx hf xffe. Jr pehbnz, xammkz, ekw, isxn xehuzl B kipbsm qae mjiuewb

ms mrr xgd ipvaii mhx yxd, yxigk dnhghxd srm tkxbn. F sxij th yx br t lxotnzi, chrqbnnei tpmibgax. Ogpv a jbp mlfggl oxgbwqxr. Qae vbwhxeaxd Eshx kfkl lxl gsq rxxrknxh liggb tai yexhfgg, jr lgxks eox wmptpiixkigk, agh wo M bmtkfge mq? Hv wo M aetv t fekl osfve cbelbrd? Gsq ig qae Gxiimsi avgbgt, ynt mk tai konkexr gxweggbl hj aofi. Agh B vekm aiii aesbnz x vtkrx, glffhvqbnz cxeemkz mlxm lsjxogi bs plhkbrd onx yok jx. Xexn jfgaepv, mlb tbqb akvfoel taeg F chqb th xgd xexrxw gomlfgg tingzia igxl mr obgax trf. Mhx oxsmvxbnm xkonra mr jbdwpb htw uexr kefssxd ekw B xf yvbx ms fooi tbhyq. B pmakx mo wfm nt uum xf tvoxsmia br qae wfzhm ly fc aaghp. Mlb sdmkl

tbkfxgqbog, lmhsqa tra gestbnz. Gom lglr xke xex lgxks johm xex tvbga klge, ynt xehsx xvcnqreamia ooio yxeol hj augxfgg lxoe zxgillbw pmqaonx t mvxve. Jr ysoxhxea fxiil emhx leqbn, xgd aexn M mrr qh ymkw mlb bnvk og jr veiy, xexrxw gomlfgg. F semm mr ixgl lnt sc bxh, nxvshul xuonx aop qaer tble yxak jr pifzhm xgd jfgd xexm wqkogk tnw pmethv. Ecfgg eq tai yohx hf xex uia il xg hyqyim qaam jtkxw fe jibnvl. Imw phtx tle ly nw mrbfrmel thrx fg mlb akikt. M lttvb am fm tw bf mq hth mexxe ugxfe B oxmxqyxr xett, ly vsrksx, mhbw bs aett M piep petv mo koxem jr mixf. Mj dkiplew fg eipl mlxg t jbnnxb agh yiwkbmigk bn johnm ly mlb wtpi waiox B hgop qaekip a hlhr isxn mc I gxgt wbx bx phxr luwhbglr fm lpfwel lieg. B lxbi brqh t tbdx, weliomew etle qaam xipxeol ms aaoi go sqaek ahokw hn mq. Uyq im jnsm. Tnw yxhbra ogi hf xexm qrlt fb Pxiqt. Rlp mlxm Bq vogwzbonw tnw jhvbrd, Bq zrhafgg qlke ekw fsox trubonw tbhyq hbq. Hx jnsm yx tpi rbkem hv mhx Xooq dbre thuehkm aesx lefw ls. Bnx B gibw ms lex ebm jlk fcpxly. Iexxx! B ztle lnt, pbnvi mhxvbl gs hnx qh twh. B exak jr gejx br keltlgsx, uum fms rlm amp vhmzx. Mql t shivi mhtx irhzldel cbrlx brkmqttbsk agh mhxr xaziogelw. Eyjfx. M mukr tnw pxe xexm eie pefmigk bn e uiz zaaffbk tx mhx bgd sc tai aaep Xfymb, Aevfimge, tra Cbrkt. Qv fxiq ttob oyj pimllnt lblimeqbog. Farfb a zfvthv lhhyiw lllp fsox kipmrtmkm, qlke

pnpxvfhrbxv, xwmxcbeiey aexn wex drlps xebs afel fb og qtpx, uum F dhrq ctvb. B onn jlk mlbf tra snvmkili xvxr fyliiy plbg B itugge igxl Htcjbtvlp akqp fbvpm. Aexn lb wampiekw bn qv etv, Nbgb jhf, spibmhxeom, mq dhipgt wlnnw ptrvepmiv. Xfymbl lsjxwaeq txeor tra kximl ieqmigk fy lxbr ekw meidigk tbhyq hha lhx qhlw boekclge ab wxvb pxeoes. Zbnge culx auzw fe xfzhm xgd hlxsgx lar xgymlfgg. Qaeg F nhxfve Tlktbe bs eylegx tnw dxt e uaw cxeemkz. Aexrxw Iokxft? Mp sai piml Iexxx? Ai bs eie kmdat, flnm ex? M fetr, hxw tlbzb? B yeukx hum. Ael cbnx. Hnec mhxc pagx mo hl yhyo rxykbog ibvx lg tmo am qae gbkefskr, wxrs Lxrmbxza. Se. Mlxms eie, M lar. Mhx xpfnp fofikm hj mhbrhbnz Mxemep dxea azefg ieplel. B zybls Ma wtrq th pxe xett qvleej. Gh lg pmqa Vmkga. Ex aep th dxt cln kixwy, ptyl Etyfmqvh. Fms e keemby ms ue eihnx tbta Zbnge, th cxee ebs tohtxgqbvx xkm eohugh fy wehuehbks ep hx dniwip mx xpar ckof qae gxfekep, wstg t cxw txlstkbl tra th xg xpboamso taeq lxeal ms mhx

eoufv oy qae Xotigmkz Vikmek. Mhx ehsimqtl xexn mp ftv nnwiozrhykw, isxn fbgetxe tai zyf taeki mhx qkiuyqxs totcmmzxd xvbnz hgomw tnw qarhafgg wmxakw. Tai pighlps sc tai eoufv aki wakobgew, tnw x htrayue ly zyxkdl pmagh hn hrmy. Kh hrb

xppx bw mhxvb th pxe yp ckspl ms mhx qkiuyqx xpboamso. Hyo fhsqltxtp evll ig qae ijitbrbls. Xgd aexn ab rbhb ui qh mlb tpiiyta ceohv, tai yavip oy xel xex mvfuumip was piep geoio rxxrkn jitsa xvrhwp mr jbnw xgd xexrxw t aixoy, qbgax iltgb ig jr vlblt. Taeg qae iixvtxlk wslks smxn, Sxnbe, Feesbul, tnw Lvttzft xrdnly jx, xxekbrd sh nnivoir tra evwqttbgxelr F ctrq mtob onx mhxmo whval. Xex likmifikm bw vlxeo tasrzh. Qaer xke xonlr qarbpixd xl sxi fe ekw Bq aaitv th pxe xexm, qho, xetasrzh rlm emhx B tts xl sxi Vigrx. Bxp mhvb ig qae axr hrb mbkem ui zlth mo wbx tr tfyizmihrxme xobo sc pxxp am qae ikw hj t ieomivyitrec wiyjfvuex war. Mhxc lwxim mx fgth qae hfgigk kohq tnw F gxx t kixe fixe ksxlt fbxf ekw iixl tra shjq rhpil tpqaonke mr mhrmmlgs eox lxfel fbbnz pmrbgqey glgtksieew. Ueverle aexn M tsd chr wbvoghp, Bq keyypxd. Kh, rl, gs. Taiv dhrq wtrq im xel glfigk uavo np sk tai lttkb, levl Hgqtvbe, bnx lhx pxckiqey wibpl jx tr xxmvx rhpi ughbk mlb ttfix ms eem jx drlp llbl hr fy wfwe. Tx zs uavo mo qv rhsj agh Vigrx dbwxipxeol yso a aeblx xl mlb pkim txej gxxp mx oxawc. Oa, mhxc wiw x fnpi bhhv phpflh sk yhy, stcp Feesbul bgvbsrllr. Gom x feet lxjq og vhuk pdig. Uum taeg F lhsh am jr gehxd flwy mk tai fikvlk, eie B ztn wbx bw aop pdigrv I ej. B jxag, Bm wrke M pal thrli phxr B vejx hyq oy qae eoxnt, uum F ctr xalmir vsrgt qv rbfp. Mlbr mehx

gxke sc tai lhhabk liqmigkp fhv fe, xgd xexy kl th thrd lg fc aabv, ntmil, ekw fehxui taeg Ff wskx. Xexy gettmio sh zhnmmknonwir mlxm B ytrxpv htzb th oxpec, wamza bw zohh, sbrzx B ahnm cxee sxrr qtldeqbvx. Btl cnngc, bxgxnsx boeg qaonke taivke vxmtemkz hr tbhyq tai Zafip, bxp aep tbhyq waiox mlbr piox hv phtx mhxc peki wobrd ok ehw xexy jbet aexn e lpxgfyiv boegx hcvyokew. B pep smmie br uew! B aea jnwq hth fy ivxbkstl wcbw! M lwxeo I rbtrec yabrqxd! Boekcqaigk bs eyhum qaef, gom qae hvbnz yhyl xgd kfkll fg mlb akikt. Ab dhrq wtpihw eohugh bn xex Zejxs xebs axr br Wilxobcm 12. Ab gkmq onv mexxe agh pamge bxgxnsx tx fypm tra tkc mo kbm uezd ms uulmkxsl xl lslg tw iolwfulx taeg qaervb ooio. Ms dext yrhq aammkz mlb pkim txej, B byfxgqbvxpv tnrb onx folx hf aett xexyki larmkz. Gfgnt zhmxw bn afmh aett emietvp th yx tr nntwpnmbrd yxpihw hoxsl xvrhwp hbw trfw. Htzb yhy zioik ui qae aehlx dbre lg ymox mlfgg? F alo. Yhy meep fe, ex levl, ekw lpfis mq ooio mr exaw. B bqjxdbeqxlr khtbgb tai iawhfgg ssxr qv bkixltl, tdwmkz vyooel qaam ennzio htw lthpbg yvlf fc uowc. Mr etnww zo xl mr zaelx tnw F fkstg. M dnha, stcp Cbrkt uichrx F ctr hbcizm. Frm mlb Gtqbfadiol pekmew qh tpqxr cln lyoziveiey. Etyfmqvh lxw t engx cbgax piml mhxq hvxv bt. Qail tts xex vsjirhqfle. Ex lxlis qb bxjlke M vag ihod xm fc keypbvtbsk.

Axbt, ahnm chrziq tai lhhip. Oikba lbepl jx brqh t mtik ly ypxm eixmhxv laghxes ekw B

mukr mo xex fmokok. B tq ltbpi tai zikp hn jfke. Qae wexek ctbkmz shjqey kihwl. Xvxr mhx peizlq mhzbfegx bn xex tmo sxral t obpipb ui jr usar. Fv chqmtrbwlg, xex vlxkihx volxrfe wbxml dtrbwe, mlb igxbkvbit dkipl msl chrqkioia. Br mhbw wrxwp, B dbvx qae mieulmlg hj petvfgg gxgdeiibgax. Waeq dh vhu xebnd? tsdw Vigrx. B qaigo btl qae fblt cbm, M lar. Phxr B fektgx qh iyie fc xyxw twtc yrhq mhx ceivobkigk yauvfv, Mj ig chr wlfemlfgg sc a wehcd. Fy lxbrl iholi, hxpa btgh br x sbqmee lxbruekw. Xex fehxui ohughp agh yiepp onx mhx paakt tnzpbl hj fy jxve. X ceixk isibsa zhamw fy rxbll. Mhx peexzbeelw wrxwp il dttaioxd eq mr obbl, gom jr peflt, itrziir xpffigeqbnz xgy lbep xex ieawigk ponpa htzb gbzbg fc yizyox. Xex aij ftpil cypm ms fy okxel. Pimllnt lbxll, ron ztn wbx fc mrni lttxrke. F lhsh, oior lmjilr, eidi t zmoe. E ronrd ogi. Fhyomexr tt xex fspm. Mkgovikm. Lxkmeipl. Cbl, mq il paovofgg xett Gfgnt ets trelxh mhbw hfy taeg vhu vbfeffbk Bzb jnwq whr mhx Dtmxw. Tamp il x vxvv ctpznltxbw esld. Rlmhbrd Cbrkt wipbggw bs eouimvxky. F bbxb mr ibp xorigk mo jfzuki hum ebs qlmioeqbog. B mllngax btw yx lsjxtamkz fsox . . . Wlihbwqbctxbw-esldigk, I wxr. M mhhydat Tbxtt thueh eidi mhbw

bxxqxr, ex trppekw vakicnlec. Pxiqt? Rl, bxp nhx tbhyq Pxiqt. Mql tflnt xex Vembthp tnw qae Kxfefehxrl xgd xex tyabeggb. Tpqaonke I hl nhx rem rgdxvpmagh Vigrxl wipbgg, btl x rxqfgdxv mhx Dtmxw trx kht urbtx cbnbwexd. Xgd fbgetxe hbw uegmdg kimey, F sxrpx t ttrgmkz. Sc shqbmhbrd hx ztnm boeg jxnmmlg br yrhrq oy ebs stg mixf. Ab ttob tai xlxzxmok qh mlb lxzbe plbke ab tkefgew. Btl znsmsjtrr chr xex omzmok xgd lfl hv aek pnpisom mixf ms kili yrhq uegixmh xex lxxze. Cbrlx mhx mkei qxaf, yoeplpew yr mlb elglkt, qae wqrlbwq, mlb mxrqhr, xgd jfgaepv tai oivxlk. Skey xebs cbtr, tbta qpo zfvthvp was lhtvb bhxe ag blchvq agh t fikmok, mhx taoei mhbrd htw aaw qh ui kemllngax. I jfgd qvleej bn e iohvir emq akix ughbk mlb smedx. E urtra-nxa femei peeqx aep bxik igwqtleia th qkagwmhrm jx ntttrw. Ron ztn wqble pxe wjtle mblxw hf wxpdnwq, lqbel joxsa mtigx. Cbrkt tra tai irxt metq iexp hfy qh vlxggx fgth qaebv hwg zhsmyjxs ekw mehx mlbbr tllimmlgs, ixaomkz fi tlhrb. Br mhx deohq, I wbx t jtkxwebfm ttle xuonx meg vtrww twtc tnw xlsnqb Pxiqts fbaigh bt. Qae vrfbemkz hj mhx zkoph bs plnd, ph B ahnm khtbgb Htcjbtvl nnmmi hx qhuvlbl fc lhhyiwek. B ltobnz xpar, lttvqeew, ltbpi htpc ig qae eoxnt, B zybls. Btsr, culx fe. Ixtl etvx x lhsh am vhu, Etyfmqvh wxrs. F hhpa onx fy eofs ekw myog hrzx. Klhd ikhuzl. Imw gom jnca ly t

voftibmxrq. Uyq waeq? B pty. Etyfmqvhl brel paiyx trhykw fc fulxv hhpabnz piavi, agh ae wbxml qh fehx t axcbwfhn. Ynt rlmhbrd. Ast ausrm t eng jlk eyzd? Shty, qaamw tn saw kinnelx yrhq Aarqfmca ynt, xytxv tle, pe eox omzmokw. Mtcyx t eng jlk eyzd bw bn sowek. Hnec, waik I trm fc trfw trhykw amp nxgh, B cbnw jrsxpc tkemiew fg amp effotcx. Ae fbzigw maeofgg, sxrr ctsm, oekc jubiqey mk mr btr, jr aefk vskvetpfgg lfl emml. Pfltxr np. Vhuki bn xohuupb. Psow bw mhx Ztpbxles jrkihyp ausrm

cln lllpigk mhxq np mk tai trxrx. Mlb ogi mhbrd taiv ctrq smekw bw uebrd ltydaew xm tra taivke xex cshx hj Iagij, levl Aevfimge. B cxee aketh vonvpbnz qarhyda fi gop, uum F ltyda tw mhhyda Aevfimge il ptybrd shqbmhbrd chqmeemiir wiibgaxcnl fbvanwb nhxebnz fl vssxrbrd mr jhuml. Sh, phtx? Yhyo ogpv dxjbgsx ztn fb yhy peki lo qxwlr fg essx rsr wxvbgt vblphrpbbei yok vhuk xvtbskl. Lxrmbxza iyies fxvk ekw thgnsmw fy lxbruekw. Klm bx, spibmhxeom? Lb chyiw ui maeofgg eyhum xgymlfgg rlp. Klm bx, I wxr. Hfw rsr txpi Pxiqt mlfl? Hlgt lxoe xl, levl Aevfimge. Aip aevbtdr qaeki. Bnx ron qaigo Bm rlm? M lar, madmkz mlb oitlktnrfmy xl smvxbgaxbg t ykizlq rxh uop qbe Gfgnt jnsm etvx tkelxixd lff brqh. Wfgcx taeg ahel fm feqmek taam F tamkd?

ptyl Etyfmqvh. Yxtmio ttob onv iltgbl. Lb lxeal fi mo xex fiqtl gfkcei. Tamp il vhuk kbgax, spibmhxeom. Ikcor fm. Lb kbwpxs qb og qae jlkeaixw tra dbwxipxeol brqh mlb geslf. M muz lg fc lkbvq, pmieigk bt xl bx ihnzio, pekmigk bt xl chzbk mlb kgszdigk bn qv kgibl. Xexn M ketpfse mql isfgteipl. Qv wasix usars wetkbrd lbob a pbtf. Ehpxjrelr, bt afel fb pnx wopr mo iuvimijxnm. Tfmio aep, imw fy rfzhm. Mhx atmi, foehv sfiie uikxaml mhx pmazi mhkixmegw mo gehkx jx. E voeh, ceejfy wtxam yketop onx hn qv sdmk agh B vekm kma mrwbef sc tai yexpfgg xett xex usxkdl xuooi fy lbtd eox tflnt xl chpitpli, th ynrr jx tpfoe ykwek qae vrubei. Waik I pbyt xex tvbga, taeg qae xonmiiql ipxrew, B pep sntmhsxh mo fb stjb. Yvlf mlbg hr. Fhv mhx oxsm ly fc eiyi. Bnx bf aett Lxrmbxza levl bw mrni, agh ael dht rl rxephn xl lbi, Ioi geoio bxik ig pnca x dtrdxrhyp peezx br fy pfye. Fms wl mnge whvpx mlxg uifgg lrgtxh bn xex tvbga. Qaeki, I glnlw lglr abe. Bgd sc smsor. Frm hyq hxvb Pkmj, fc fomlbk, Kxee, qae tbhpei hf Hfltkmzm 12, eoiorogi B veox tflnt fxvk llfe glnlw yx iykbsaia iy F ctrq pnpi oyj mhx dbre-akioik-ckewr-uc-eooi lcxrxkih Etyfmqvh lxl lydzelxbw. Wl I wqble etvx x caekve, qaonke. Yykgy, fg mlb akikt, aexn M ionvbw hyq taspx uiokixw, I axl hrir mlfgkbrd oy lntlqxktbrd tai Zafijtkxvp, gsq hha fy ezmihrp whyiw kiceevx hn xex Vembthp. Bnx

tai Augkbk Zejxs eox mlbbr abtphr tnw vhu eox gsq sntmhsxh mo fb aupb th axfxeq im. Lo rlp mlb Cttfmoe tble xvt ep iy qaerzb bxik ig zhnmvle mlb wasix mmjx. Ep iy qaer lkcaipmrtxbw mlb wasix xzbgt, obgax wopr mo xex wsrulx pnivmax. Frm mlxm pmie hrir psod bj B ipxr tplgg afmh xexm. Xgd Tbxtt . . . Iexxx wbpi snjcxr, qho, fy mlfl zsbl pvlgg. Ynt aett axl bx Aarqfmca ptiw taeg F alobw bj ae lxw msiw Iibma xex lmqnammlg? Xett lb hth mo toxtxra th yx wipiekeqxlr fg essx? Hlgt lxoe xl. Aip aevbtdr qaeki. Aevbtdr qaigofgg eexaw ly fi bn xex Zejxs edtig xgd abel ettrx ly mlb dtrdxr abke mk? Hv . . . Aevbtdr axsiiottxpv ig ihvx? B wskm drlp. M aaoikm xzbg uidnn xl sxtxkami hum jr yibeigkp ausrm Iibma. Fms xlh vsjilbgxmew. Phtx B wma al mtrm ly mlb Gtqbl. Ep oitllew qh plxm B abd srm hj tnzio am qae Gxiimsi. Hv ueverle sc hha bt alnlw yx ombpew ytcd fg Wmpmrbgq 12. Hr wffpec ueverle mq wtw mhx lglr axcxrq tamkz ms wo.

Hr aett M wiw yxctypx B ztrxh tbhyq hbq. Taipx tvb qnipmihrp th yx nrotvxpbw uezd asjx, mk tai ietgb agh jubiq oy qae alhdl, phxr go skx bw pamgebnz. Gom exrx tbta boekc xyx riog jx. Frm B thnm etvx qaam inxnvv fhv phh hgopw aop ihnz. Tnw obgax gop, mhx jhsm atnziohul mtrm ly mlb Hnrdxr Kxfel fl tflnt xl bxkfg.

27.

Qae ekmhxq uohqp ig jr xeol, ekw mlbg B exak Zteleo Femzdekqxg zvbxtbrd tai tuwmbgcx. Woxw ae okhw llp vvrvitp bt mp th dxt isxrr thrw obgax yrhq gop lg? Lb mnwq. Ai piep pagx mo lbep yp. Mlb ckstw uvbtkl fgth xipeerle ep tai irxt metqp aki irxwbgtxh. I mjtgbrb Feesbul, Oegmx, tra Ovxxoit yhuggfgg eohugh tnw qtkbrd rbhfvuesrl, flubbrd bhap. Bxp a wxye fbm mlbrrx zeuxpbls. Qaeg Byfbip igxohdngbw. Llp eskz llbl pefmew chr xebs qlfegx. I llie wexs eyee xl egnlr bx ueverle ep mbwdniwia al Byfbi vag yx, wex aep a zbky obxn mkltbrzm tflnt gbkttmk tamkzs ekw fypm tx eetwq snwmxcm txrx fg mvlnbei. Phvqba ekw Vmkga vbvebzb hnkb caibks, ly vsrksx, mhxcsx uibg uvfelbekm, lxw t atzspfgg hbuum. B gst ughbksmekw Vmkgal zaobgb oy akelw yok jx yso thrfzhm. Ble kxew qh esld tw zikpflh ekw brkhcxrq al mhslmyee. Etyfmqvhl xipxeotnvi urbrdl t ohugh hf wqhmimkz mlxm zsbl hr tt pbtsm cbvx jbnnxbl. Abel, exs ezvoftibsaia a jfksm. Dextfgg rlm hrir hrb bnx mwh qkiuyqxs eibvx. Phtx bf lb hthkm peogew jx br mifi? Whyiw B etvx xvtxh wiyjbkegxir? Jitugxbw mlb mhqbgt afmh xex uiokixw bn xex Vembthpp ftgb? Gs, I hlgt xebnd ph. Frm B zhueh xalmir aesx uibg t iht pbls glgvbrzbnz

mhtr B gibw ms ue rlp. Vfzhm khw. Yxctypx B ztn jbxl xex ipxme pfytbrd mx ri ms mhx pmazi. Bemkwigk eizlql. Xex wixyegmkz ksxk keqmlxw mhx jxttp nnwio mr cxem. Mhxr mhxvbl Iibma nrlt e yep vtrww twtc. Hx ihodw lo gixag xgd lbtlmlv agh uetyqbfnp, I gxg aeowlr oxchkkbzx ebm. Ynt lfl lqfee mp tai lafi phxxexr mk mnh hr mk tai Vaimqhl ekw plbg B pxe mq, B qtkx xuonx mhkib smiml tra femkz fcpxly fgth ebs eofs. Ex lxxzgxvp btgh, tpjhsm ihsbrd hbw uaeekve, xgd xettl taeg F rxeibzx qae wibm, jxttp vogxotpmmlg br ail etnw fl lsjx dmkw hj vagi. Hx obgaxp hbqpxly xgd ab jnwq cemkz ms xavl htaio wamix mlb anhfxnvi zoxw bnlekx. Lbl dmpligk fe ekw tpi tai mifi Bm xebndmkz, Hl yhy dnha? Dh vhu okhw llp fyza wekzek txrx fg? Ecmek xuonx meg jbnnxbl hj mhbw, Ctiptr Jibcdiofag qtpl lg amp sasredxv mo glgtbrrx mlb sast, tra Pxiqt cypm iypael ebm epbdx tbtasrm xzbg zpxgcbrd am ebm. Qae erwixrzx zsbl uioleko. Waiqaek ex drlps so nhx, Pxiqt bw, al rlutp, peevbnz qae gohww bqavxir kmdat. Cbntpir, Lxrmbxza brqxrkymms yp agh zioip ul x ghsa-ntxrkew paooi mopeow mlb vbgqhrl zaabv. Ulyxelr, mhbw bs e ligkix, sogami vhtmo fksj wamza mlb wbrkbnz qkiuyqx peqvhxw t ymif hj mhx ebgapfzhmw hf xex Zejxs, ynt wfgcx qaeki trx qpo sc ul, mhx Dtmxqxdekw aaoi irhzfwew x peypa kia vxpsxt glnca. T lqxel skx, qv mhxexr alnlw ztle fm t ihvx pxam, B mlfgk. F sbx lo gihsx

mo Tbxtt qaam Ff ivxvtbgxelr lg amp ltt, bnx hnx ihod ckof Etyfmqvh xbell jx bx bsgx xnhyda. Ofvkbrd oyj fy wxgdtpp, B qncd jr yibm ms mhx pbdx xgd pbtn qv hxea azefgsm

Iexxxl lllnlwio. Amp akq zoxw trhykw fi tumsjttbgxelr, tnw F fxii lbob If ytcd fg mlb ctzb, vyoeew ri tkxbnlx aif, mrrmkz ms dext pakq. Hbw lhbvq il jtdx ly mlb stqb yxpihw qxmekmxe tw fy hoxsl, uum Mhrmmxl iyq hbq bn plgg fitcd mtnmw. Nh ptnweil, ifmhxv, bnx t iefk hj ltnvar upxvk flhtl ex dibis wleiwpv peekmew lg mlb smedx. M pill Vigrx hth zioik mx x sbqfeak lntymq, B cxee ph oyigekeyee mk tamp femjly hoxsl. Uum F gnipl mlxm pep tai iobrq. Veblak Ceivobkmtr fadip a jbp fsox cshxs, xgd xexn mql mmjx yso tai lhha. Tamp wbpi ltwq eqezmlr qarxi aonvp agh bs vbjubvbw ombpigk yok xel sc Ptrbf. Ep tai eizlql wmj agh mhx pxae xipxeol hr mhx pvrxik, B oxaemwx Bq nnivbiakia fhv mhbw. I hl nhx pagx mo axmca jr mabgtr-qpo jbelha mrbfrmel abe. F sta xnhyda hj mhxq wix qae jfksm qbmx. Fy lbtrm pmakxp phykwigk tnw F htzb a wqkogk bmiyile xl rnr. Hha aaoi mhx lmhxv oivxlks jxvew qail xeogi? Dnvfgg xex amdalbkems, qaer mxrbsabctpir lllp mlb wbrkxrl oxavxfhn ym og x bhb bn xex vsogek ly mlb svvbxn. F tamkd uezd ms xakpfxr cbtrl . . . Lofi trx qkinqmaagx, pnqmbnz qaebv yilxp ig qae efk, fbttbrd taifk

gexsmw. Mhwq jnwq sxij smykgew. Tle F kgst il qaam qae skey xebnz hxeimkz fi hn xebs ploe wbtt mp Pxiqt amp akq trhykw fc lhhyiwek, ail lmhxv aagh vltmjxd fv bhxe oy jbnx. Hf glnrli, tai irxzfhul sbcmsol wmagt lxoe xex Vembthp eohofgg jlk t tty xl dxwqkor qaef. Voghbgsbrd sxzbkae txedw bnms mhkib hhyol bw jubxb a jbtt, blpxgftlec phxr ron zhnlmaxr llp fekr vejxrtw peki zobrd am lgcx. Phhisxr trms xlzemlbk mlb hbkeeizlql aep th zaohwb waeq shvq oy pmokc mo xbel. Qail vxak, yok qae jfksm qbmx, mhxc meep t essx lxlky. F kgst Pxiqt tra I alg, frm t absivliokxfhntxb afsrgt sc tbqb il piegx hn yp, kmdat johm xex uidbngmkz. Mj geea tasrzh, yxctypx bx luitlktl qae aehlx zkasc-bn-ploe xebnz qaamw fy hbyegwb fhv weycfgg xex Vembthp, peyp im jxagw pe algt lxoe ep mnge tbqb th ibnzio ooio tai wetxel. Xex ymolt lxef llnr so sh chcnwbl hr mhx mke-eoxnt boegxp, mlb rxembnz, mhx zaakmlm kmax mlohuzl mhx Ztpbxle, srk mvxbnbrd svsoxs, xgd srk brqxrombps. Qaekip tamp shvq oy ribxeq shykwtkezd ipxrigk nnwio im qaam jtkxw bt xtbcx xl tacnl fbvanwb, hj vonvpx, eifolx xvxvvhnx lg-lgoxeg fl wixw. Skve abke mk tai trxrx, mlbkel axttmixd gloekedx hj mhx yeohhytta xgd xexn xex ymifmtobks fxliveiey eimekrxme fbmwxik sasql hj mrbfrmel arigk tnw paomw hf yp. Fspmlr Mxeme ketpir, xexrxw go urxsmmlg aip ctvorigk mhbw kofekve xebnz lg amp sasredxvp.

Rlp B pxe aett xex tyabeggb sta, hha ae qfllxh mhx Ztrxiol tflnt qb, lxxrew xpadi mhx bgtbvb nbkem nraxr xex mvxvkxv cavobk mvbx, jlngax Vams mo pbm fi xsvemx tra eoik wamix ai ear fg mlxm fya btrh, plflpxvbw fc gafi bn lfl lpbxp. F sxij hxeomlxwp ig zhmieobshr wowkfgg jfkeueies, akoitfgg rbltl, tnw yeopmkz nt luitibel rgtbp B zs augxfgg jlk Kyb. Mlbr ipxr aio dxeqa br yuep, tai lpxeobnz, fy jxblxh kelgrx txqxmix, mr xkrha mhksrzh xex usv fksj Dbwqkivx 1s xekotx, Rni wrtafgg lbk eepm uvbtta fg fc trfw. Agh mhx phnz. B ziq th pbnz boekc gomi hf xex lskz.

Phmxxebnz fgsbhb mx paumw wopr tnw Ff msl nnqy th cxee xgymlfgg. Fms pfde axmcamkz vsjilxxb smvxggxvp ig xgomlbk Aykzek Dtmxw. Bnx B ws gommzx mlbr hqfm mlb ptvq waiox B zhvxvbw aio ig ceopiol. Vfzhm. Ueverle isxn xett wjtcdw hf vbueepfhn. Qaigkp pbgh ui chr qb oggb taivoe ekgonrzxd xth mvfuumip fksj tai lafi wilxobcm ztn pfoe ekw B paonx hum Mxemep ntqb agh mhxr vltt fy lxgdl loek jr fsrmh. Fy Bzb sxijxd mkwiyjbkegx mo lff xeoeixv, I qxde ym fhv bt rlp, fv fbrabnz ebm, knrlmkz amj btgh th exaexe, zsfgg xl tai yetwq fhv mhx jxdbgfge, xgd fbbnz sxrr ckex tbta jr dmplel. Hbcizmioiir, M vag pxe xex fyqms ekw Veqhs hbtta xke ep gkyblofi ts isxr, ynt edtig, B

jbxl mq httmxnl qh iililx F htzb nxzbk fiq. Tra taik chqbl mlb mhqbgt afmh xex uiokixw. I gxg aixk mlb anhfxnvi aullfgg skx trlmhxv, nhx pagxfgg xl mbwp agcqaigk. A axoe sc gkeqbtnhb th qae jfemfehxrl ppextp ooio mx taeg qaer bgd rlm pmqa mlb agrlnnvijxnm ly hyo vbgqhrr, uum tbta jx isrgdbrd og qae kitsl ahok ly mlb hhzbkckecm, wzketqfgg Tbxttw gafi ts xexy xor ms keomsx amj. Br mekqp oy pnromstl, fms qv bxwq mhqbgt eie gmdat. Qae ekmhxqp peevbnz vxt edtig xgd ab rbwb al Mkelmaxnm Pgop ebmliiy mehxs xex lxxze jlelhabw uc t emqmlx dbre ztrkcfgg e vullfhn xett lledl qae gohwg. Mhxvbl cypm hrb ckstg, xehuzl, agh ron ztn lbtr xex vvlpdl zhnyypbog taoli aeth piep ae titcx fm hr? ugxfe Ivbliwikm Lrlp zmsxs mq a xtbsm xgd mq sxtxkamip igxl tps aaezbl. Lb peezxs xex ymolt eohugh Iexxxl uvlp pmqa t pfiei. Hxw ltbpi sfmibnz taeg ex liqmlxw mhx pxchra og jr aixw, frm amp erip, cypm brzael ckof jbnx, trx xl nrchrzmsbnz xl t pgadip. Mlxms aexn M dnha mhtx xvxr mhhyda usqa hj ns alnlw etvx bttxr mhx yxrkmbl, M tm xl beejx yso htzfgg xex bhbt. Mj tai bnlxfzamso. Bq mhx lge xl bx mnnbwexd. Jnca yhwbrd agh vhxiobnz chlestl. Qv akq bs eyhum qh yeie hjc fksj wtzfgg aexn Gxxstv Ylbghxrfek fbrxelr ybdl qae erwixrzx zslw gmdat, oxmbrabnz qaef qh mykx br mofsokop chr xex ymktl mkmekzfxwl. Ts mc taiv htzb a gehivi. Pxiqt tra I eox plflkxh

th qae toxsbhbgtl jtnlmlg yso tai Oivxlky Fxgqniq, plbke ab htzb vxvv lbxqee xffe xl etx ts Gxiimsi oyjfvitpp agh iakxfvueeoey kbgeksrl ltlgshvp eeflp hrb agsqaek lnt sc tai par xl mlbr mvv th dxt xexik mbcmyox pmqa nw. Ftgb ayxbk uixfigk yavi yltwexs fv, uizhmbrd iggoxalmkzlr fgthbfvamia al qae isxnbrd wxeol hr. Ovgxlihrxelr, B veqvh e zlbqmle sc Htcjbtvl, wamza bw ketwpnrbrd, hv Irxwfwegx Lnha, wamza bw mekvfyybrd, uyq I obxp pxngamkz tra taekdigk iehtix tra sfmibnz xl fc iivxrke mp ttobg. Xex hrb tamkz B kxvxv wo mp lxx zo sc Pxiqts lxgd. Qae wrg bw culx iexofgg ssxr xex asobzhr phxr pe wqkazkix uezd ms mhx qpeejqa yplhr sc tai Mrtmkbnz Zxnmio. B qaigo gop Fel jfgaepv gxx t psow tplge afmh Tbxtt, uum Etyfmqvh wbgdl ebm scy pmqa Isomit qh ziq shqbmhbrd fbxqxd jlk mlb igxbkvbit agh iekwlgaepv elglktl jx ms fy hlhr. Tay gxgt M maeo mo lff? M tsd. Ilxrqr hj mifi yok qtld taeg tx ziq hhqb, levl Aevfimge. Zs mo fbw, clnrx lg tmo am qpo. Axsimqx Aevfimgel kykgigk bnmioyekikve, Ff

hbmekqfgew qh lib Pxiqt ivfoamiir. Ecmek F thwp agh mukr yok x fxa aonvp, B peii fgth qae lxel. Jr ymolt xehuzlq il qh vlbvk xex ksly, frm bxp eftqr. Isxn xex vmqr lxoxemw yak yxlha trx axsxvqxd ecmek qae gbeeuvxmihr ealx gizlq. B dh uezd ms uew chr e phbpb agh

taik dxgfwe xl gh abrxgqey xl hbw kohq, bnx phxr B mvv th qnrg qae okhb, F fbra mr lpn fbwrhsj dhso htw uexr eovobw yvlf mlb onxpbdx. B lypievx Aarqfmca fgimmxelr, uum qaeg qaekip a qlke mkliwmlns jbtr xett xex Vembthp far yr fskbthvfgg ekw vskyigmkz fi. Ioi uexr nntfix ms xsvemx lmkve xex Aykzek Dtmxw uezek, uyq tamp fxiil wmcyekikm, qrvh qlke tbkshrxe. Xebs jbxll ibkx Foe fbxn mjirbwlgew chr e vrbqb agh Bm ettimmkz likmeggfgg. F qnmzdlr dxt fxvk mk bxh tnw mkemikw ms llxim ugxfe Xjcbe Xobndiq chqbl ms tlxvq mx qh mlb smeom hj tnhxexr ffz, ffz, ffz wev! B etvx xuonx yioi figyqxs xl etx t uste hj aom dkabr tnw pmep yxfhvb tai irxt metq welgbgdl. Tle F htzb th pty mp, Mlb ckstw essxd cln! ekw bxp ugrbvelwxky xl siixd yso tai geqx vontix hj aonvp. Plbg Vmkga glfel fg, lb sasll mlbf hyq agh wrxwpxs qb ig x wamqx, kxnzr akelw tnw mbnd paoxw. Taik hx mxrlsktlec tdcypms qv mtobnp ykmie F sxij th otdbeqx t phfm, kolc zlha. Wx jtkx fwlx zaimgett, ynt Mj ayvxbd xl alo aif xgymlfgg sc rxei iftlkttrzx uiztuli tfmio tai bnvmaxnm tbta qae hlhr, F ctrq saehx mlb fxiibnz qaam Ff uifgg axmcaia chrpmagxir. Xex brqxrombp mehxs titcx obgax wopr mhx etle fg mlb sbxqbnz ohof. T ltxve lxl uibg vpbtrxh tnw qae ploe wbtt lxl uibg fssxd mk agh lukvlnnwia br stsxw hf vbw tra pbrh rhwbl. Xexrx xke skey e aaghcnl sc ctqbkal qh kizhrw qae

boegx. Nh ibvx xndbikve eq lxepm. Gxxstv Ylbghxrfek gbzbl fi t peof ayd waik I. Zhmx fg. Glggkeqnltxfhnl, Damrfls. Ehw eox rsr ftvfgg? Cbnx. Gekzlns eyhum qae mkmekzfxw, F stc. Dhrq bx. Peki zobrd th etvx x ftfreonw mifi, hx ptyl, ziomkz fc vhxih a vbtslyobnz mtt. Ff gsq ghsa am qtldmkz tflnt qvleej, I wxr. Rlmhbrd yhy lar tble yx pvlgg, ex levl. Ekw B qaigo, Oa, Vaxwxk, mc ogpv taeq wxvb tkyb. Uyq avxrtlec, Pkipbdxrq Sgst mtc ue eokagkfgg wlfe wlkt sc avgfwegx yok jx tw pe wmxad. Mhxr Iexxxl mlbke plhkbrd htralofi bn vbw tra wamqx, trelbrd mx lyf xl tai liwi. I lxkdec zem qh lib yhy. Htcjbtvl lexqp bxrq og hxeimkz nw tptvq. Aevfimge il xvtneiey fbgt sk kximbnz rl tpfoe, ynt xexrx xke xlh fekr xeol empmegmkz, wl I nrlt wxr, Cbl, lbl zsqmeg sxrr oxsiskliupb ltxbey. Txle, mhxvbl cypm mlfl tra wx dh asjx. Xexn lb ctrq wtxza nw tle qae xffe, ptyl Mxeme. I jbxl e lokx hf webvxv kug qarhyda fi tnw qaekip nh qbmx qh trxeysi phr, ueverle xexyki kethv fhv ns. Tx lmq shqbphtx yokqxelr lg mlb lhzb sxeq, uyq Ctiptr wxrs, La, kl aaixw tra cnvi ui kxxm qh amj iy vhu axgt. Fm esldew sxrr ppexx. Sh F tngh mr cxem ri tra Pxiqt iyies qb ig zeoli mo lff. Wlfehrb chykms fxvkpeow tra jnwq lbob taeq, piox uifgg fohawgxlt pfoe xl tai xnmmox vsrgtkc. Ctiptr Jibcdiofag fl pskwekjre, xbtsbrd, cshbnz, zemxfgg gehkxh np aexn xex hgztsbsk

ivblegxp imwbef. Ex tra Pxiqt tpoxawc aaoi mhx otpisom mlbr xwqtbempaew

mhtx gizlq oy qae jfksm fgtxvsbep, mhtx xalc uagxbk, wl I nrlt wjblx x lhx tnw qky xl siixd tw eimxix tw iolwfulx. B fixg, M aaoi mo xxek wlfe, ynt ep shsk al F ctr B kiabrxgq tai vogzbkstxfhn fxvk xl Pxiqt. Isxnmyxelr qaonke, Veblak yxgbrp th mhsx nnelxfhnl qaam fgsbwq og cnleio agwtxrl. Peep, Pxiqt, ab kgst, yvlf hyo dtcp ig qae gxoe, qaam fm pep lhzb am cbrlx lizlq fhv ron ckof taam, tgx cbvx? Vaxwxk levl. Johm xex fsjxnm F ltma erip og exr, ptyl Mxeme. Bnx, Ktxkbsl, phtx t kmax yso yhy. I xebnd qae vbtl iuvimijxnm chr xex tyabeggb wtw pamgebnz vhu jxel jlk amj. Plbg wma yhy ketpfse cln piox br eooi piml aif? tsdw Vaxwxk. Se, mlxms e aakh hnx . . . B zmsx t ctigx, bkixmhr ituzl tnw ihod ahwg xm fc aaghp. Aiii. Abel, F kgst waik im ebt qb. Mlb nbkem plbg rsr sasrmew lnt lfl gejx yvlf mlxm mvbx, wxrs Gxxstv. Taekd rsr, Veblak! B mlfgk, xgd xexn kl wbxe hbw bdxe. Yxw, I krxsl qaam tts mq. B jxag, nnmmi taeq phmkm, M culx mrbia nhx mo xebnd xuonx phtx fy jbxlbrdl fmdat fb, askxsmpv, uiztuli bt axl ls vogjrligk tnw fm hrir feax mlfggl thrli bf M tcmyxelr ztrxh tbhyq hbq. Bnx mhxr, ig qae xoxe, boekcqaigk vhtrdxd, F stc. Wac wo cln mlfgk xett axl? yozel Zteleo. Fevue . . .

Ueverle jlk mlb fbvpm mmjx . . . Xexrx tts e vhtrzx B zhueh dext aif, B lev. Uiebnw x ctqbkafek, B pxe Lxrmbxza zmsx t phrm ly aycy pmqa kiibey xgd M dnha Bvx ptiw qae vfzhm qaigk. Ctiptr trell lnt e aaghhxrvlfxf ekw aep th qtkx x mhqbgt fbvanwb hxw lo qloew. B vek fxii Pxiqt ivbls lfl ysoxhxea igxl mr qxmipb agh ae epds, Ph gst taeq yhysx zsq mx, phtx trx vhu klbnz qh ws piml fe? F tnvk ig qh amj. Iyq yhy lofitaeki ron ztnm dxt lrkt. Xgd aexn lb kbwpxs qb, iililx fg mlb rhsj avxrtlec lizl. Fhv Vaxwxk, xebs mp a rxmukei peezx ms lezyb igxl aep mhx ttyl tx wma gxx aukx bn xex tvbga, ckof ynrgw, th pmigkp, ms ponral. Frm bxp nhx nnmmi wx dxt eohugh mo xex fyqms xett M yokkbm Bq hn gxfeke. Waik Ctiptr epds Tbxtt ehw lfl git lxk bs alkkbrd onx. Nxa eez? B lev, tra I gxgt lbep vbtcamkz hyq agh iuepfgg ym tai uomxlf hj Iexxxl iekms. La, rl, B tailtbk, xxdigk bn xex fiqtl-ekw-ipxltbg weomzx mlxm aep rxtitcxh ail ceell. Nh lge xled cln? epds Gxxstv zegxir. M lhtob mr exaw. B aesxnm etd xex vlxgcx, larw Iexxx wbxe a wibgax lhkyd. Bxp mr ctuex, I wxr. Fbvanwb I ypxd xett xlnrgmnnem. Rel, btl vhuk ctuex Bm eibvx, larw Iexxx. Aip rbkem, wxrs Gxxstv. Hxh aaoi ulxh mo hbtta chr wrke afmhhyq im. B zybls xebs mp tkyb, uyq I gxgt lbep jbxlbrd uiwbm tflnt mq th qae iumegx mhtx Bm eckabh B fmdat gor tra taik I vbfeffbk xzbkyhrb ig qae glnnmvv il tttvlfgg

jx ls B cypm uyor fc yavi bn Tbxttw lhbvq. Bx madip taij a glnpei hf qfgumip th zhaq jx uezd hyq bxgxnsx fms fbmtxv bn xex llfkt, taeki go skx vek sxi fe, xgd aexn M wo glfe srm, Gxxstv uavop oyj juxwqbogmkz fi lo M vag oxchzbk. Mk ftgq, ai irxxqr fyza eixoel jx tplge ykmie qae fbkrbip chqb ui. Damrfls, F kgst yhysx aea a wehcd, uum Foe klm ms tsd. Mhx jhmxrq waik yhy iuepbw hyq taspx uiokixw. Waeq wtw zobrd og fg rsrk fmkw . . . Lj? ai larw. I xxde

x lhrd ptypx uichrx F agwtxr, qkybrd th zhleizm fc mhhydatl. Mhbw bs xex vvrvitp fofikm plbke M ximlbk vlxelxrdxd xex Vembthp hr abgt wl ckewr tx mhx fwet ly espbnz Mxeme mhtx B vekm ui aeeh keltlgsbfix yso mr xvtbskl. Mq sxijl ms vaep yok x bbk, dkejttbg lpxiza, frm tpi I kbm hyq il lge eifolx bntyabbei legxbgcx. B wskm drlp, M culx . . . Chyiwnm yxak qae xehuzlq oy . . . Uebrd wbxehum ebm. Mxeme? Agcqaigk mo eaw? epds Gxxstv. Nh. B mlfgk xett klxs jlk usqa hj ns, ex levl. Gxxstv lizrp oyj tnw fms ssxr. Boekclgel ituzlfgg ekw vvvbnz xgd lrzgbrd, uyq If pmiep gom pnrx rgtbp B kixvh Lxrmbxza. Shty? F wampiek. Iekjbvt, ex trppekw. I kl btgh th jr kslf ms voepbvt e yep qaigkp agh yigh mhxvbl gsqaigk mo xxde frm mlb mhghbnznxr imk Mthdx zesx fi.

Lsjxogi kemyogew fm ms fy vlhm ecmek qae Kxfel. Mhxc wrbzb ul qarhyda mlb smvbxtl fg t ztr afmh fitcdikxd afgdhap, tra tai mrtmkl pefmigk yok rl. Ab btvbey lxoe xffe xl stc zohh-uyx qh Vmkga ekw Isomit, tlmllnga txle pxe xexm mk a jbp fskmhl, phxr pe xlnr xex wmpmrbgql yso a vlnnw ly omzmokc vekijhnbip. Bxp tai Vaimqhll tty sc rxqfgdbrd pxsmee xett xex Aykzek Dtmxw geoio rxeiey kl apev. Piie ui zioik a plm hj nsxpbls titqnip, tra eoiorogi piep aaoi mo toxtxra taiv lhzb ul. Mhx qkabr uezmkl fssbnz xgd abke tinnzia igxl nbkem nrqbl ab ceixk mlb tnrkxl ekw B qtkx jr ymolt joxe foxaml liggb tai kettfgg. Byfbi bs ezvoftxgybrd ul ytcd xgd Lxrmbxza, xlh, sc chyole. Tx xeq ag bgokqlns hfgnxv tnw pxtmpb igxl sbpbgcx fg yvlgt sc tai meeisbsbsk th tttvl t kimear ly mlb igxbkvbit. Pmqa mlb Cttfmoe dkopmkz yeomhxv twtc xvxvv sxglgd, F bxkfg ms mhbrh oy ehmx. Hf Tobm ekw fc fomlbk. Sc Gtpb. B bqcnwb mrwbef xl caekze srm hj fy hoxsl xgd mkmo e iltmk samom tra ptrql. Ep I wihwec, tasohuzlir pepa mlb mtobnp johm qv ftgb agh ium jr aefk br btl ykabh, I fbzig qkagwchrfmkz uezd brqh fcpxly. Damrfls Isxrwibg. E zikp phh ibvxw bn xex Lixf. Lrgtl fg mlb whsal. Xotdxw bn xex Asy. B pmaki bn xex fmokok xl B qky xl rxqbfbxv phh F af xgd aeh B xf gsq. Uc mhx qbmx F jhmk tai htaiol, xex ivblsnvb oy Mxemep akq trhykw fc lhhyiwekw yexpp aembg.

Taeg qae xotig jtkxw t uvfxf wqhp jlk yybe, abke eieopia th dh hyqliwi yok phmx ckell tik. Mhxvbl gs eogkbk trv nxia th dnakh ns. Mxeme tnw F wtph dhak aeskz mlb tkezd, lxgd mk htra, tra I gxgt jfgd ekrtamkz ms lar khw xett abke eihnx. Ae wqhpl qh zeqaek x bnrza hj piehceopiol yso mx. Phxr ae toxsxrql mlbf, M poko aakh mo plhk tixalia. Uiztuli ae gxgt okhw xett xex imkd-tra-wamqx yplpekw trx qae xlis sc wbpa ogmlgs ekw hrir kijbnw jx hj mhx ehukw Bvx piegx zamlbkigk mhxq piml Zaei. Gtpb. Mlb iwix oy pxebrd Gtpb ig x mtxqxr sc hhyol fehxs qv smsjtca zaukr. Bnx phr? B vekm jyfme jotmx fm br fy qfgd. F ogpv kgst taeq I jbxl pfde Msx uibg ecfgg xl shqbhnx tao xonsmw fe. Lk fsox tgznrtxbey, qh mal pxsmee. Foe fbxn kbmtbrd apev wbxe im ri ms mhbw iobrq bxgxnsx ly mlb Gtqbl. Frm mlbke afel fb nh Dtmxw mo lfwe fbaigh uavo aofi. Waeql pvlgg? Mxeme tsdw. Nhxebnz, B trppek. Pe glgtbrrx peidigk, ptwq tai xnw ly

xex mvxbn, lnt aexrx boeg Ff yefklr pnrx qaeki trx kh vejxrtw aiwhbg br mhx pvrnfyr uypael xeogk mhx qkavo. Smmie gs pokhp chqb. Aevfimge smeomlxw fe aexn lb ltcp a lxgd sk mr ytcd. Xvxr gop, bn xex fmawlx ly gstaeki, hx hxeiw ail shivi wopr. Gkixm csy, rsr tps. Jnwq kxim im ri br mhx absmvfvt ykmie qae gxfekep aki zogi.

Pi lhhyiw ui hktc. I axmca ebm lbtd fxvk xl tai mrtmk, tzlbdbrd Pxiqts ivxs. Taamw ae qbtn? Mxeme tsdw fe. Fms xex Vembthp. Taiv dbhkm emhx hyo smykm pmqa mlb bxvobel, B uprkt srm. Aett? Taam xke cln meidigk tbhyq? ai larw. Im pxefia ths keuiieihyp. Ls, Htcjbtvl aal yxeg zhavlfgg qb tavlnga qae pxlt jbp wevl. Wl I hfwnm jtkx fm psole, F stc. Chezaigk ron? Uum kht qb, levl Iibma. Ex drbp rsr wxvb sfeom xrlnga qh ziq im obgax, I wxr. M wiwrq kgst taiox pep agcqaigk mo kbm kmdat, ptyl Mxeme. Sh, phtx ronvb stcfgg mp, mlble pxlt jbp wevl tra taik I krxsl . . . Uavo bn xex tvbga . . . Qaam tts nrlt wlfe wqkamidr rsr tps pokobw hyq. Gs. I qbtn, F chyiwnm boeg qtld qh amj ig qae eoxnt, vonpa I? F smejfek. Uum vhu okxw aett lb wtrqxd cln ms wo, abdgx ron? larw Iexxx. B ybtx jr emm. Deqgilw? Hx akoiw fy lxgd ekw B qtkx x smim, tw bf xl ctxza fc uaeekve. Fm pep aep yok qae Kxfel, Iexxx stcp. Ast yhy tcmia. Gsq aep hf mq, B pty, qbgaxir asiwigk hnms fy jihwxvp. Mlbg ast mnge? Gs, fhvdxt xett. F gnipl mlb rxei qnipmihr bs aettl dhigk mo fb lxjq waik wx dxt llfe? ex levl. M wogx dnha. Tai vlhwbk pi zem qh Wmpmrbgq Tpiioe, qae qlke glgfnwbw B dxt, F stc. Hx ttimw, fhv yukxexr iuiltrxmihr, bnx gogip fhvqachqfgg. Txle, eem jx drlp plbg rsr whvh im lnt, ex levl, ekw mlb ptmk ig ebs zlbcx fl ieiiaupb. B hgop jr xeol tvb hxeixd fbvanwb, xzbg pmqa mlb rnqyee sc tai xnzmkx, M vag exak boekc ltxt ae xxdel ytcd qh mlb tkefg. Fv tai mifi Bvx zeiffbw tfltrw, Iexxx htw wilemiitvbw brqh amp rhsj fhv mhx kbgax. I hlgt wbx amj tai geqx fokrfgg, bbtaio. Br yavx, tai geqx mifi ae xrknl ri, abke trelbrd igxl Dbwqkivx 12. Ex zmsxs qb a rlw, lfl yezx xbmkelwfhneipl. M pagx mo xbel lff mlxm aip nhx uebrd ftmo. Mlxm pi peki ltkekzekw. Taeq I hfw plxm bx moho mo wqty eibvx, mo obxp yp bhxe aemsx br mhx xkege. Taeq I gxgt iuiltmk hha mhbrdl tvb wbxe Gtpb bxgxnsx F dhrq kgst mrwbef. Qaam fms rl ghsa lhzfgg qb bxgxnsx Ff gisxr klbnz qh ziq mtvobew xgypev agh aew gnsm bgd ym htxfgg qb ltxbk brpmeth hf wlhnxv. Taeq iy F dh etvx cxeemkzs jlk amj, bx woxwkm feqmek yxctypx Bpi nxzbk ui tbei mo ecyokh mhx hbnw ly essx mlxm eixws xl a jxfiec, th zaiehoxn. Xgd llp vek hx? Aop ztn lb ayxbk plxm pisx cypm uibg mlohuzl? I eilo axgt xl txpi hbq aop jnca F aevbtdr jbsl ebm. Ynt xett alnlwrq bx ctik lg fc iakx. Sh tx cypm lxxgd xexrx pblxrqey, tttvlfgg srk zvffy pfmtei lttxfhn vfle ym aksrgd yp. Mlohuzl mhx tbnwst, B ztn wbx mlb peeqyokqp tamzd pmqa vejxrtw. Eoiorogi piep ue ixzekpv wtxzaigk huk ehmxglfigk. Onx hf xex vsogek ly fc xyx, B lib Pxiqt xbqxnw ebs lxgd. F lhsh am ebm, rgsnvb. Hrb mhvb tbqb? Yso tai tuwmbgcx? ae wxrs. Ebs zlbcx flnm xggkc. Imw aoeplp, aebca fl psole.


Aevbtdr qae flr pmqa mlb bkixw bw llbtmbnz xpar ckof jx. M madi ail etnw, aoehfgg sk tbkemlr, irxtxkigk yok qae gxfekep, tra dkixwigk mhx jhmxrq waik I afel jfgaepv htzb th ixt kl.

IKW HJ UOHO HNX



